<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66157 </DOCNO>
<HT>  "jpcar027___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<H2>   May Reports </H2>
<AU>  JPRS-CAR-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  8 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTERNATIONAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Journal Discusses U.S. Role in Europe </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Journal Discusses U.S. Role in Europe </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0230A Shanghai GUOJI ZHANWANG [WORLD OUTLOOK] in Chinese 
No 3, 8 Feb 94 pp 6-8 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0230A </F>
<F P=104>  Shanghai GUOJI ZHANWANG [WORLD OUTLOOK] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Gao Ping (7559 1627): "Where Is NATO Headed in </F>
the Wake of the Cold War? -- Analysis of the Results of the 
Brussels NATO Heads of State Conference"] 
  [Text] The direction NATO is taking in the wake of the Cold 
War is an important issue affecting the international situation. 
However, for Europe and the United States, which have 
experienced various difficulties such as the indifference and 
mutual distrust brought about by the disappearance of the Cold 
War threat, the several deadlocks that have occurred in the 
Uruguay round of negotiations, and the divergence of views over 
intervention in the Bosnia-Hercegovina civil war, the importance 
of this issue is even more important. Between 9 - 16 January, 
U.S. President Clinton made his first visit to Europe since 
taking office. Since one of the main goals of this visit was to 
refashion the relationship between the United States and its 
European allies, and between NATO and East Europe and the 
countries of the former Soviet Union, President Clinton chose 
Brussels as his first stop, and took part in the NATO heads of 
state conference there. Foreign public opinion gave fairly high 
marks to this visit, feeling that President Clinton's first trip 
to Europe was truly something that had a new and far-reaching 
effect. 
<H5>  Establishing a "Peaceful Partnership" Between East and West </H5>
Europe 
  The first change in NATO brought about by the two-day 
Brussels heads of state conference was passage of an 
U.S.-sponsored plan for a "peaceful partnership," which formally 
answered the question of whether and how NATO would be extended 
to the east, which had been outstanding since the end of the 
cold war. 
  East Europe's difficulties in freeing itself from restraints 
to establish its own independence and security following the end 
of the cold war made it very anxious to enter NATO. The recent 
clamor from the Czech Republic, Slovakia, Hungary, and Poland, 
in particular, had been loudest. Two years earlier, the NATO 
heads of state conference in Rome had decided to set up a North 
Atlantic Cooperation Committee that would accept East European 
and former Soviet Union countries as members to improve 
relations and cooperation between NATO member states and their 
erstwhile adversaries, and to move these countries in the 
direction of a western-style democracy. However, some of the 
East European nations were no longer entirely satisfied with 
that kind of extremely loose and entirely symbolic cooperation. 
Faced with the "power vacuum" in East Europe following the end 
of the cold war, the potential threat of a revival of Russian 
great nation chauvinism, and the instability caused by extreme 
nationalism and ethnic clashes in East Europe, some East 
European nations urgently demanded genuine security guaranties 
from NATO. The clamor to joint NATO increased with each passing 
day. 
  In their heart of hearts, both the United States and its 
West 
European allies naturally very much wished to extend NATO 
eastward. At the beginning of the cold war more than 40 years 
earlier, the United States singlehandedly planned establishment 
of NATO with the goal of doing all possible to stem the 
increasing expansion of Soviet influence, and doing all possible 
to expand eastward western military power and even the west's 
free and democratic system. Now that the cold war was over, 
naturally the United States could not abandon this opportunity 
that it had yearned for. It was for this reason that U.S. 
Secretary of State Warren Christopher hastily said, "During this 
crucial transition period, building of such a (east and west 
Europe) relationship will make it possible for democracy and 
reform to succeed, and the possibility of this success will be 
far greater than the opportunities that a war would bring." 
However, the United States had some apprehensions about what 
specific actions to take. In the view of the Clinton 
administration, the extension of membership status to all the 
East European nations was really premature. First of all, in 
addition to the lack of any real basis at the present time for 
these East European countries to carry out within NATO the 
assurances of Article 5 of the NATO Treaty (namely, that an 
attack on one member nation would be regarded as an attack on 
all members), the tangled and complex ethnic conflicts and the 
latent territorial conflicts prevailing in East Europe might 
cause conflicts that would make the heads of NATO member states 
hesitate to act. NATO feared that too early acceptance of these 
East European nations might result in NATO becoming bogged down 
later on in regional conflicts like the war in 
Bosnia-Hercegovina. Furthermore, even though NATO has for many 
years successfully maintained a relationship between two 
antagonistic member nations, Greece and Turkey, there was no 
reason for NATO leaders to believe that the East European 
nations would do the same thing. Second, and more important, 
was the Clinton administration's unwillingness to countenance 
"drawing a line at the western border of Russia to replace the 
former iron curtain." The United States worried that too early 
and too speedy NATO acceptance of these East European countries 
that were formerly allies of the Soviet Union might intensify 
Russia's feelings of isolation and stimulate an anti-American 
and anti-western tendencies in the Russian public. It might even 
increase ultra-nationalist forces within Russia, thereby 
weakening the forces of democratic reform factions such as 
Yeltsin's that the United States supported. These apprehensions 
found greater expression when the Radical Nationalist Party 
headed by Zhirnovsky gained the second largest number of seats 
in Russia's Duma in December 1993. In fact, on the eve of 
Clinton's visit to Europe, a strong reaction occurred within 
Russia to the formal application for entry into NATO of Latvia, 
one of the three Baltic nations. Russian President Yeltsin 
warned the west not to do "anything to isolate Russia." Because 
of the above worries, President Clinton adopted a fairly 
cautious attitude about expanding NATO, showing that the issue 
is not whether to expand NATO but "how and when to expand it." 
  The peaceful partnership plan that the NATO heads of state 
passed was a deft compromise to avoid stirring up Russia 
following careful consideration by the United States. In 
accordance with this plan, non-NATO member East European 
countries and former republics of the USSR will gradually 
develop their military relationship with NATO member countries, 
conducting joint training and exercises. These "peaceful 
partners" will become a planning team that cooperates closely 
with NATO in the organization of joint training and exercises in 
preparation for possible future joint military action. It is on 
the basis of this conception that NATO will nurture the ability 
to deal with "challenges to Europe's common security." 
Henceforth, should the territorial integrity, political 
independence, and security of any partner country be threatened 
at any time, NATO will conduct deliberations at once. According 
to Warren Christopher, founding of such a mechanism will 
"eliminate feelings of insecurity among East European and former 
Soviet Union partners, strengthening the political relationship 
between NATO and them." 
  In order not to dash the hopes and to support the requests 
of 
some East European and former Soviet Union republics who desire 
immediate NATO entry, during his visit to Europe President 
Clinton constantly reiterated that the "peaceful partnership," 
plan does not replace arrangements for entering NATO, but is 
"the first step toward entering NATO." The United States 
explained to Europe that partner nations could demonstrate their 
desire and their ability to assume NATO obligations and enjoy 
NATO benefits by approving this plan's provisions for 
strengthening political and military cooperation. In future 
years, the situation will show which countries possess the 
conditions for formal entry. Then NATO can consider the question 
of whether to grant them formal membership status. To use 
Clinton's words, this is a "gradual and case-by-case expansion 
procedure." 
  The Clinton administration believes that the "peaceful 
partner relationship" plan that it devised can kill many birds 
with a single stone. First, it satisfies, to a certain extent, 
the desires of those East European and former Soviet republics 
that eagerly sought entry into NATO, and it increases their 
confidence. It enables them to continue and accelerate progress 
toward western democracy while at the same time it avoids 
arousing ultra-nationalist sentiment in some Russians so that 
they do not regard NATO expansion as a military threat. Second, 
the plan's provisions for an expansion of military cooperation 
with East European countries will help NATO improve its ability 
to act in important new fields of crisis management, 
humanitarian rescue, and peace keeping, thereby effecting a 
smooth change in NATO's functions. Third, since the Clinton 
administration says that in the future NATO will unilaterally 
have the right to decide when to increase membership, this 
"single track system" of examining credentials will force those 
East European nations that wish to enter NATO to listen to what 
the United States says. They must not only take an active part 
in NATO activities, but more importantly -- as Clinton said -- 
they must demonstrate "their decision to respect the values on 
which NATO depends for its survival." This includes respect for 
individual freedom, human rights, and a system of law, and 
peaceful resolution of disputes without the use of armed force 
to change existing national borders. Thus, the United States 
has transformed NATO expansion, which was formerly a matter of 
examining member nations credentials, into a powerful lever for 
ensuring the peace, stability, and freedom of East Europe. 
  Therefore, the United states has a deep sense of 
satisfaction 
about NATO heads of state approval of the "peaceful partnership" 
plan, as well as the acceptance of this plan by East European 
countries like the Czech Republic and Poland. it believes this 
to be an important result of President Clinton's trip to Europe. 
However, whether this carefully conceived plan will truly be 
workable, and whether it can attain the goals that the United 
States envisages will depend on the the test of time. 
<H5>  Recognition of West European Allies Autonomy in Defense </H5>
Matters 
  The second important change in NATO that President Clinton 
brought during this visit was the United States' decision to 
recognize the autonomy of its West European allies on defense 
matters. This gives them the right to independent military 
action that they, particularly France, have long desired. 
Contrary to the United States Government's past position, during 
this heads of state conference, President Clinton explicitly 
recognized that Europe has authority over defense matters 
affecting its own independence; thus, West Europe has the right 
to make its own decisions and take independent actions to deal 
with defense matters purely within Europe. For this purpose, the 
United States said it would permit its West European allies to 
use NATO matriel and equipment for their own military actions. 
This means that the West European allies may take military 
action using NATO's command, reconnaissance and logistics 
systems in the name of the West European alliance or in the name 
of joint French and German forces rather than in the name of the 
North Atlantic Treaty Organization. In addition, this NATO heads 
of state meeting decided to set up a new military entity termed 
a multinational task force. Acting under the leadership of the 
West European Alliance or NATO, this force could undertake peace 
keeping, human rights rescue, and other military tasks. The 
United States could decide whether to take part in these 
military actions as circumstances warrant. United State 
Secretary of Defense Les Aspen said that according to this plan, 
"military forces and equipment that are an organic part of the 
NATO military organization could be used to deal with unexpected 
incidents of purely European concern without U.S. direction." 
  When the cold war first ended, the United States felt at a 
loss about what to do for a time. On the one hand, the United 
States realized that the disappearance of the tremendous Soviet 
threat meant that it would no longer have to concern itself with 
every matter regarding Europe's security as it had done in the 
past. The United States no longer saw it worthwhile to go to war 
and shed blood over conflicts in regional conflicts such as the 
crisis in the former Yugoslavia. On the other hand, the United 
States, which had been accustomed for more than 40 years to 
issuing orders to Europe and attending to everything itself, was 
unwilling to be cast aside now, allowing West European nations 
to make their own decisions and carry out their own actions, and 
it was apprehensive about it. It was with these conflicting 
feelings that the former Bush administration, and the Clinton 
administration at its outset always vacillated and contradicted 
itself on European affairs. This characteristic was demonstrated 
most markedly on the Bosnia-Hercegovina civil war issue. The 
West European allies were extremely unhappy about this, and 
U.S.-European relations consequently blew hot and cold. All 
these events showed that the United States Government had formed 
no clear-cut consensus on U.S.-European relations. It lacked a 
consistent policy. 
  The change in the United States Government's position now 
shows that the Clinton administration has a new understanding of 
United States-European relations after having gone through a 
period of consideration. 
  No matter how one looks at it, the security of Europe is of 
crucial importance to the United States; therefore, the United 
States must remain in Europe and continue to play a leading 
role. However, the United States cannot both want to play the 
part of leader and also side with West Europe in making empty 
promises when a crisis occurs in the European situation. The 
only workable approach is for the U.S. Government to change its 
former equivocal and ambiguous attitude, clearly recognize and 
respect Europe's autonomy in certain defense matters, and let 
the European allies handle matters themselves in return for 
their cooperation and support in matters of importance to U.S. 
defense. Clinton embraced just such a clear-cut understanding in 
making a trip to Europe. While affirming that Europe remains at 
the heart of U.S. security, he said that "the common enemy on 
both sides of the Atlantic Ocean has disappeared, but common 
dangers have not disappeared." By this he meant that although 
not as mortal as the former Soviet threat, the "quiet 
instability that has appeared" in Europe is fraught with danger. 
Both the United States and West Europe must react to this. 
However, this reaction should be selective. According to the 
current thinking of the United States Government, when a major 
threat occurs that endangers the western value system, the 
survival of the western system, and reverberates on the 
situation on both sides of the Atlantic, the United States will 
work in concert and bend efforts to cooperate with Europe. When 
a partial or regional crisis occurs in Europe that does not 
threaten the overall situation within a short period of time, 
acting in the spirit of "Europeans handling European affairs," 
the United States will not intervene. Actually, the 
Multinational Task Force was born out of the U.S. desire not to 
shed blood in European regional disputes, and in Europe's desire 
to make a rapid response to them. 
  This change in the U.S. Government's position was welcomed 
by 
West Europe, especially France. For a long time, France has 
wanted the right to take independent military action and 
maintain an independent West European military force. The United 
States always refused, however, because it feared that this 
might lead to a disintegration of the western alliance. The 
United States' unexpected declaration at the NATO heads of state 
meeting and the results it obtained evoked a joyous response 
from France. The French Minister of Defense termed the new 
Atlantic alliance following this heads of state conference the 
"second NATO." The United States termed the proposal it made at 
this conference and the existing North Atlantic Treaty "each 
attending to his own affairs," but not each going his separate 
way. This means that NATO and the West European Alliance will be 
complementary rather than mutually exclusive in the future. 
Nevertheless, the U.S. attitude shows that its effect on 
European affairs has declined. It is a choice that the United 
States had to make after the situation changed in order to avoid 
even grater damage to Europe-U.S. relations. No wonder that 
after President Clinton said that the United States was resolved 
to remain in Europe that some European public opinion still 
suspected that this change in the U.S. position might be the 
first step in its gradual withdrawal from Europe. 
  Results of the Brussels heads of state conference showed 
that 
a change in the control and even the purpose of NATO was 
unavoidable. The direction that this conference set for 
east-west and Europe-U.S. relations, in particular, means that 
the Brussels heads of state conference has become yet another 
important milestone in the more than 40 year history of NATO. As 
a WASHINGTON POST editorial said, the conclusion of this 
conference marks "a quiet revolution" that is going on within 
NATO. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66158 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar027___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  4 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Officials, Experts on Reform of Key Enterprises </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Officials, Experts on Reform of Key Enterprises </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0349A Beijing JIDIAN RIBAO in Chinese 4 Mar 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0349A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JIDIAN RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Guo Peng (6753 7720): "Privatization -- Key </F>
Issues in Enterprise Reform in 1994 -- A Conversation Concerning 
Establishing a Modern Enterprise System"] 
  [Text] The "Directive of the CPC Central Committee 
Concerning Issues in Establishing a Socialist Market Economic 
System," promulgated by the 3rd Plenum of the 14th CPC Congress, 
calls for changing the state-owned enterprise system and 
establishing a modern enterprise system. Given such an agenda, 
to answer the question how enterprises can best understand its 
import and grasp the substantive issues involved in establishing 
a modern enterprise system in order to effectively implement the 
process of reform, this reporter called on several individuals 
for a wide-ranging discussion: State Commission for 
Restructuring the Economic System's Horizontal Coordination 
Bureau director Lu Piao [0712 2613], an expert on enterprise 
groups; State-Owned Property Administrative Bureau's Enterprise 
Groups Department deputy director Zhou Fangsheng [0719 2397 
3992], an expert on the system of production authorities; and 
Beijing Junhe Consulting Company manager Li Su [2621 5126], an 
expert enterprise consultant. The content of our discussion is 
as follows: 
  [Reporter] The future direction of enterprise reform is 
establishing a modern enterprise system -- privatizing 
enterprises is the inevitable trend after over 10 years of 
reform in establishing a new enterprise system by reallocating 
production authorities and enterprise profits. How did the 
impetus to establish a modern enterprise system come about? 
  [Li] It began in 1987; No. 2 Gas Plant, having had 
experiences carrying out internal reforms, proposed the 
establishment of a modern enterprise system -- an urgent request 
toward privatization. At the All China Symposium on Enterprise 
Groups held in Luoyang, then No. 2 Gas Plant director Chen 
Qingtai [7115 3237 3141], after reporting the impressions of his 
observation tour abroad, proposed that his plant be privatized 
as a company under a modern enterprise system. Subsequently, we 
made three separate trips to visit and study No. 2 Gas Plant, 
and participated in its restructuring under comrade Chen 
Qingtai's leadership. 
  [Zhou] In the earlier stages, concerned experts and cadres, 
organized by the State Commission for Economy and Trade, 
undertook a nationwide study of all aspects involved in 
establishing a modern enterprise system; they collected and 
reviewed a large body of data from both inside China and abroad 
dealing with the practices, experiences and lessons of 
enterprise system reform, and submitted an excellent proposal 
that China proceed to establish a modern enterprise system. 
Having taken part in the study and investigation which led up to 
this proposal, we were deeply impressed by the spirit displayed 
at the 3rd Plenum to act in a timely manner, a spirit 
crystallized by over 10 years of enterprise reform. 
  [Reporter] There are many theories and explanations for a 
modern enterprise system, how can its substance best be 
summarized? 
  [Lu] The point of departure in establishing a modern 
enterprise system is to break down all the original barriers, 
and change the system of classifying different types of 
enterprise by the source of production authority (people, 
collectives, individuals, or foreign investors) to classifying 
them on the basis of management responsibilities (by 
individuals, partnerships, enterprises with unlimited liability, 
companies with limited liability, or joint-stock enterprises 
with limited liability). Enterprises operated by individuals or 
partnerships have a long history, but the crux to a modern 
enterprise system is a system of privatized enterprises with 
limited liabilities. Therefore, in developing a modern 
enterprise system, we are basically applying the limited 
liability enterprise model to reform enterprises owned by the 
state, people or collectives where the production authorities 
are not clearly spelled out. 
  [Reporter] How would establishing a modern enterprise system 
enable the state-owned enterprises to change their operating 
system? 
  [Li] When we participated in restructuring the No. 2 Gas 
Plant into a privatized enterprise, we took note of two major 
difficulties which China encountered earlier in implementing the 
reform policy of reallocating production authorities and 
enterprise profits: 
  First, the contradiction between decentralizing and 
centralizing authority. In the overall context of a planned 
economy, strong administrative controls hampered flexible 
operations of the enterprise; in the early stages of reforming 
the system, however, the profits structure created was open to 
strong pressure from the workers which also constrained the 
enterprise from moving briskly forward. Both these types of 
pressure were present in the No. 2 Gas Plant, resulting in sharp 
contradictions between branch factories and subsidiary 
enterprises demanding free reign to operate, and the 
headquarters wanting to hold on to centralized operating 
authority. A system of decentralized authority can lead to waste 
of resources if not tied to a production authority; but if 
centralization of authority goes too far, it will certainly 
strengthen administrative controls which affect the forward 
thrust of development. Given these factors, the contradictions 
experienced by the No. 2 Plant in the early stages of 
restructuring were similar to those confronting China's 
enterprise reform, and the reform process itself continued to be 
pulled in contradictory directions of decentralizing and 
centralizing authority. 
  Second, there was the contradiction between competition and 
alliance or integration. In a planned economy divided into 
separate spheres, the various administrative monopolies created 
tended to block operational mobility, and various government 
managing departments acting like a large engine forcefully drove 
subsidiary enterprises to produce according to plan, allocated 
resources equally to different enterprises and divided the 
existing contradictions equally among all enterprises. The 
enterprise reform of reallocating authorities and profits 
involves, in essence, breaking down the administrative 
monopolies and reallocating production authorities and profits, 
but there can also be negative consequences including disorderly 
allocation of resources, duplication of investment, twisted 
organizational structure, and the lack of macroeconomic 
coordination, etc. To deal with this situation, horizontal 
integration of enterprises and enterprise groups was carried 
out. But, because of the enterprise structure, integrating 
loosely linked or radically different enterprises could not 
solve the contradiction of blind competition, while their 
administrative integration can easily result in restricting 
competition. The No. 2 Gas Plant led other enterprise groups in 
China in terms of growth and development, and experienced 
particularly keenly the contradiction between competition and 
integration. 
  Looking at the situation from this perspective, the modern 
enterprise system reform which the No. 2 Gas Plant has pursued 
since 1987 involves changing the enterprise group into a 
privatized enterprise, and at the same time resolving the two 
obstacles in reform. In terms of the contradiction between 
decentralizing and centralizing authorities, a system of 
corporate management created by privatization, with its Board of 
Directors, can prevent government departments from 
administratively interfering in various levels of enterprise 
management, can restrain subordinate enterprises from blindly 
exerting pressure on top management or, by joining with workers 
and staffs, putting pressure on the enterprise, and ultimately 
develop an operating system which has both restraints as well as 
safeguards. In terms of the contradiction between competition 
and integration, a system of production authorities, which 
legalize asset linkage of parent and subsidiary enterprises, can 
strengthen control over subsidiary enterprises and help develop 
the transactional mechanism for reallocating and transferring 
production authorities and assets. Therefore, the establishment 
of a modern enterprise system is of great strategic significance 
in terms of changing the operating mechanism of state-owned 
enterprises. 
  [Report] A modern enterprise system is not a simple system, 
it involves an array of substantive details, which of these are 
most important? 
  [Zhou] The foundation of a modern enterprise system is a 
system of production authorities. Because the latter is basic to 
a market economy, only after production authorities are clearly 
established can we talk about commercial exchanges from which 
evolved a series of complex market-oriented economic rules and 
regulations. But at present, in the state-owned enterprises, the 
line of production authorities is not clearly defined, 
responsibility for production not clearly fixed, organizational 
leadership system irrational and managerial methods not up to 
par. The reform tasks are enormously difficult when the twin 
functions of government are not completely separated, and the 
mechanisms for transferring assets, organizing production 
authority and allocating resources are not fully developed. 
Among the collective enterprises, contradictions have surfaced 
over abuse of authority and confused lines of responsibility due 
to enterprises operating without clearly defined centers of 
production authority. Therefore, a rational system of production 
authorities is an indispensable condition for establishing a 
modern enterprise system. 
  [Lu] One special characteristic of a modern enterprise 
system 
is the freedom to assign or transfer production authorities 
within a system of safeguards, and the goal of developing a 
modern enterprise system is to achieve unity of production 
efficiency and safeguard in a market-oriented economy; because 
the public nature of enterprise production authority is 
increasingly being emphasized by the development of large-scale 
stock-holding incorporated companies, these companies, unlike 
the individual enterprises in the early days of reform, must 
give priority to the unity of production efficiency and 
safeguard. That is to say that in terms of the structure and 
management in a modern enterprise system, enterprises must 
operationally emphasize internal coordination, working with the 
stockholders and workers through the corporate body (the 
management). In terms of the enterprise's external concerns, the 
enterprise and government should jointly promote and perfect a 
social welfare system and ensure that enterprise managers have 
the freedom to allocate corporate assets for this purpose within 
a rational environment with safeguards. 
  [Li] In summarizing, it should be pointed out that 
establishing a modern enterprise system involves establishing a 
system with eight major features, as follows: 
  1. A system of production authorities designed to meet 
conditions of market-oriented transactions; this is the 
foundation of a modern enterprise system characterized by, 
first, a clear definition of production authority; second, the 
freedom to exercise that authority; and third, the ease in 
exchanging or transferring production authority. 
  2. A system of incorporation based on a modern system of 
credits; this is the symbol of a modern enterprise system 
characterized by, first, a production authority governed by 
stock and bond transactions; second, personification of 
enterprise management (in the independence of a new body of 
stockholders); and third, public accountability for enterprise 
management. 
  3. A system for acquiring enterprises based on a market for 
trading in stocks and bonds; this is the trend of a modern 
enterprise system characterized by, first, the freedom to buy 
and sell shares; second, lowering the controlling share ratio; 
and third, simplification of transactions of key asset factors. 
  4. A system for stratifying enterprises based on a system of 
macroeconomic coordinations; this is the essence of a modern 
enterprise system characterized by, first, competition among 
large monopolistic enterprises; second, government coordination 
and control at different levels of the enterprise; and third, 
linking or merging of medium and small enterprises. 
  5. A system of association or merger of enterprises based on 
a strict system of laws and regulations; this is the form of a 
modern enterprise system characterized by, first, limited 
liabilities on the part of parent and subsidiary enterprises; 
second, lively and free purchase or transfer of components of 
enterprises; and third, standardization of business management 
practices in branch companies (supervising asset managements of 
subsidiaries). 
  6. A system of finance based on a system of public 
accountability and supervision; this is the linkage of a modern 
enterprise system characterized by, first, transparency of 
enterprise accounting practices; second, balanced earnings from 
assets; and third, rational allocation of financial assets. 
  7. A system of personnel governed by social welfare 
regulations; this is the essence of a modern enterprise system 
characterized by, first, intensification of personnel 
competition; second, market determination of the value of labor; 
and third, socialization of personnel attribution and 
replacement. 
  8. A system of enterprise management based on a consolidated 
approach to education; this is the safeguard of a modern 
enterprise system characterized by, first, blending of personnel 
trained in science and technology and the liberal arts; second, 
consolidation of management departments; and third, 
systematization of managerial techniques. 
  [Reporter] Summarizing what has been mentioned above, 
establishing a modern enterprise system is not something 
enterprises can accomplish by piecemeal reforms; its development 
must be systematic, and involves various ramifications and 
varying intensities which go beyond the reform policy of 
reallocating authorities and profits; this is a gigantic 
systemic task which cannot be accomplished in one fell swoop, 
but only by painstaking labor of a generation. This year is a 
year for major efforts in China's reforms and we must press 
ahead systematically and steadily and tackle the tasks from the 
simple gradually to the complex; with emphasis on reforming the 
current enterprise system, we begin by changing the state-owned 
enterprises into enterprises with limited liabilities, would 
that be a fair summary? 
  [Lu] It is, because the publicly organized joint-stock 
companies with limited liabilities can now operate only within a 
limited sphere, while a series of reforms dealing with 
enterprise bankruptcy, exchange or transfer of production 
authority, strengthening of management and expansion of 
enterprise groups are closely related to the restructuring of 
the state-owned enterprise system. 
  [Zhou] The reform of the state-owned enterprise system 
should 
be coordinated with the operation and management of components 
of enterprise groups, including those operating with state-owned 
assets, which are in the process of reallocating production 
authorities. As for privatizing existing enterprise groups, we 
should make a clear distinction between two groups of 
enterprises, the nuclear enterprise and the close-knit, 
multi-layer enterprise, pursue privatization separately with 
each group, and step by step shape the parent- subsidiary 
relationships that exist between the two groups. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66159 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar027___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  2 May 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   1993 Prices Analyzed, 1994 Trend Forecasted </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    1993 Prices Analyzed, 1994 Trend Forecasted </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0347A Beijing ZHONGGUO WUJIA [PRICES IN CHINA] in 
Chinese No 1, Jan 94 pp 3-6 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0347A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO WUJIA [PRICES IN CHINA] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Ma Jiantang (7456 1696 1016), Ren Xingzhou (0117 </F>
5281 3166): "An Analysis of 1993's Price Situation and Forecast 
of 1994's Price Trend." The authors are affiliated with the 
State Council Development Center's Market Circulation Research 
Department.] 
  [Text] Since 1993, in the wake of the sharp and rapid 
increase in investment and consumption demands and the 
accelerated pace of change in the market pricing mechanism, and 
accompanying the nation's high rate of economic growth, market 
prices have also increased fairly rapidly. Since June, in the 
wake of the implementation of various macro regulation and 
control policies, the grave inflationary situation has eased 
somewhat, and regulation and control have slowly produced 
results. But overall, the market price situation is still very 
grim; the task of stabilizing prices is very arduous. Therefore, 
diligently analyzing the 1993 price situation, correctly 
assessing the 1994 price trend, and formulating appropriate 
policy proposals are essential to ensure the sustained, speedy, 
and healthy development of the national economy in 1994. 
<H5>  I. Facts About the Price Increases in 1993 </H5>
  The facts and characteristics of price increases in the 
market in 1993 are as follows: 
  1. Nationwide, retail prices skyrocketed month after month. 
Since March, the magnitude of price increases has been in the 
double-digits, reaching a peak of 15.1 percent in August 
compared to a year before. Price increase slowed somewhat in 
September compared to August. From January to September, prices 
rose 12.1 percent compared to the same period a year earlier. 
The rate of increase for each month was 8.4 percent, 8.7 
percent, 10.2 percent, 10.9 percent, 12.5 percent, 13.9 percent, 
14.9 percent, 15.1 percent, and 14.5 percent respectively. 
  2. The market prices for food, clothing and necessities, and 
industrial consumer goods and services were generally higher. 
Between January and September, prices for each category rose 
18.1 percent, 13.6 percent, and 39.3 percent respectively, 
compared to the same period a year earlier. All three categories 
are everyday necessities, the demands for which are fairly 
inelastic. Pushed by these prices, the nation's cost of living 
index climbed 14.5 percent in the January-September period 
compared to the same period a year earlier, and in 35 large and 
medium-sized cities, the index rose 18.9 percent, and in the 
highest month (September,) it actually topped 23.3 percent, 
which was the highest rate in recent years. 
  3. The momentum of market price increase in the rural areas 
was especially strong. Between January and September, the rural 
retail price index rose 11.8 percent compared to the same period 
a year earlier, approaching the urban area's 12.6 percent rate 
of increase. 
  4. Pulled by the demand for fixed asset investments, the 
price of producer goods soared. Prices skyrocketed in the first 
half of the year, rising by 38.2 percent in the first quarter. 
Beginning in the third quarter, macro regulation and control 
began to show results, and the excess demand for producer goods 
eased and prices did not increase as much compared to the 
previous two quarters. But prices were still high, and compared 
to the same period a year earlier, the purchase prices of raw 
materials, fuel, and energy were 40.6 percent higher. The 
factory-exit price of steel rose 83.1 percent, cement price 
increased 52.7 percent, and raw coal price rose 27.4 
percent--compared to the second quarter of 1993, the rates of 
increase have declined 3.3, 2, and 29 percentage points, 
respectively. 
  Based on the above analysis, it is clear that because of the 
high rate of increase in investments and the high cumulative 
rate of increase in credit loans in 1992, total social demand 
surged and prices soared in the first half of 1993. In the 
second half of the year, even though macro regulation and 
control clearly played a role in stabilizing the financial 
situation, improving financial order, and curbing the increases 
in the prices of producer goods and exchange prices, overall, 
the basic factors that caused prices to rise have not 
dissipated. Statistics showed that inflationary pressure was 
still strong, or even stronger, in the second half of the year. 
It is estimated that for the year 1993, the retail price index 
for society as a whole was around 12.5 percent; the cost of 
living index might reach 16 or 17 percent, and in the 35 large 
and medium-sized cities, the cost of living index could be 
around 20 percent. 
<H5>  II. Analysis of the Causes of 1993's Price Increases </H5>
  1. The surge in fixed asset investments: Investments have 
sustained a high rate of increase since 1992; society's fixed 
asset investment has increased 37.6 percent. From January to 
September of 1993, the state-owned units completed a total of 
401.5 billion yuan in investments, 66.4 percent more than in the 
same period a year earlier. Specifically, investments in capital 
construction increased 62.4 percent. In the first half of the 
year, in particular, credit loans went out of control, and the 
investment scope exploded, increasing by 69.3 percent compared 
to the same period a year earlier. In the second half of the 
year, with the implementation of various regulation and control 
measures, although the increase slowed somewhat, it was still 
significant. Excess investment demands necessarily push up the 
prices of producer goods, and higher costs cause consumer 
product prices to soar. 
  2. The increased force of price reform gave impetus to a 
general rise in the price level: Since 1993, the force of price 
reform has clearly increased. At the heels of decontrols in 1991 
and 1992, the state-monopolized prices of grain and oil were 
decontrolled; the prices of steel materials, coal, crude oil, 
cement, and other basic raw materials were either decontrolled 
or significantly readjusted; the prices of housing, gas, water, 
electricity, and other utilities were raised, and the localities 
generally revised their service-oriented fees in 1993. These 
price reform measures no doubt raised the price level in society 
as a whole. 
  3. The price increases in 1992 left a "rooster tail" effect: 
Price reform made fairly big strides in 1992, and for the year, 
40 billion yuan's worth of direct price adjustments were made. 
Because most of the price adjustments in 1992 were introduced 
after April, they had a significant "rooster tail" effect on 
prices in the first half of 1993. According to a relevant 
department, the price adjustments in 1992 were responsible for 
approximately 4 percentage points of the price increases in the 
first half of 1993. 
  4. Prices were affected by the drop in exchange prices: The 
expanded investment scope increased the demand for imported 
producer goods and caused an increase in demand for foreign 
exchange, and adding the speculative activities, RMB's 
regulation price plummeted, driving the prices of imports up, 
which in turn drove up the prices of electronics and light 
industrial products. 
<H5>  III. Forecast of 1994's Market Price Trends </H5>
  There is nothing we can do about 1993's high prices, and 
1994 
market price situation still appears grim, and the main reasons 
are: 
  1. The expanded investment impulses linger: Judging by 
conditions in the second half of 1993, although the macro 
regulation and control measures have produced initial results 
and the magnitude of increase in the scope of fixed asset 
investments has diminished somewhat, it is estimated that 
society's total scope of fixed asset investment for the year 
still exceeded the previous year's by more than 46 percent, 
surpassing the planned scope by 350 billion yuan. Both in terms 
of investment value and investment scope, last year's increases 
were the most significant since the 1980's. In terms of the 
money supply, from 1 January to 17 November 1993, net currency 
input topped 101.892 billion yuan, 24.374 billion yuan more than 
in the same period a year earlier. This kind of large-scale 
investment and increase in the money supply will have 
significant effects on market supply and demand and product 
prices in 1994. In addition, the guiding principle for the 
economy in 1994 is accelerated growth, and the localities and 
enterprises are full of investment impulses. If the money supply 
and credit loans are eased once again, market prices may 
continue to soar. 
  2. The fairly high rate of increase in income will further 
drive up prices: From January to September 1993, the citizens' 
income sustained a high rate of increase. In the cities and 
towns, the residents' per capita monthly earned income rose 29.4 
percent compared to the same period a year earlier, and 
discounting the price factor, the actual increase was 12.7 
percent. The peasants' income also increased. Judging from past 
experiences, consumer prices are a function of income, and so 
long as the people's income continue to rise, it will 
necessarily lead to higher consumer prices. In particular, 
because of their inelastic demand, the prices of food stuff, 
everyday industrial goods, and various kinds of services will 
increase. 
  3. Prices may be more erratic after decontrol: Currently, 
the 
prices of more than 85 percent of the producer goods and more 
than 90 percent of the consumer goods and materials are 
completely decontrolled. Decontrolled prices are very much 
affected by changes in supply and demand in the market and are 
more difficult to control at the macro level. When there is 
excess demand, the price level will rise rapidly. 
  4. Because of strong demand in the domestic markets in 1994, 
foreign imports will continue to exceed exports, and the price 
of foreign exchange may rebound, leading to a rise in import 
prices as well as the overall price level. 
  5. Price reform measures introduced in 1993 will continue to 
have a "rooster tail" effect on 1994's product prices, and in 
addition, some new price regulation items will be introduced in 
1994, and they will have even greater effects on 1994's market 
prices. 
  6. The steady rise in 1993's price level has produced an 
effect on the people's consumption psychology (for example, in 
some localities, there were rushes to buy gold and other goods 
to hedge against inflation.) If prices remain high in 1994, it 
will exacerbate the people's expectations about inflation, and 
if not properly guided, it can lead to panic buying and in turn 
push prices even higher. 
  Because of the above factors, 1994's market price situation 
will remain very grim, and if not properly controlled, we may 
not be able to keep the retail price level at single-digit. This 
will have an adverse effect on reform and development. 
<H5>  IV. Policy Suggestions on Curbing Inflation and Stabilizing </H5>
Prices 
  1. We must make keeping prices relatively stable an 
important 
macroeconomic policy goal. Years of experience and lessons 
showed that only if the price level is rising relatively slowly 
can we attain a rapid rate of economic growth. This is because, 
first, at a high rate of inflation, because the rate of return 
on investments in industrial enterprises is relatively low and 
most funds tend to flow toward stock speculations and real 
estate investments and other nonproductive sectors where the 
rates of return are high, we tend to have a "bubble economy." It 
will cause the investment structure and the industrial structure 
to deteriorate and damage the basis of rapid economic growth. 
Second, with a high rate of inflation, the national economy is 
tightly stretched, making it difficult to implement some of the 
measures to promote reform and development, and this will make 
reform more difficult and more risky, which will hamper the 
establishment of the socialist market economy. Furthermore, when 
the rate of inflation runs high, lawless speculators will take 
the opportunity to disrupt market order, which will make the 
marketization process much more difficult. In addition, a high 
rate of inflation will have a ruinous psychological effect and 
stir great dissatisfaction among the masses. Thus, whether from 
the point of maintaining social stability, further deepening the 
reform, or making a smooth transition toward the market economic 
system, we must control the inflation rate. Only in this way can 
we truly guarantee sustained, speedy, and healthy economic 
development. 
  2. We must apply proper force on macro regulation and 
control. In the wake of the implementation of various macro 
regulation and control measures in the second half of 1993, the 
overheated economy which plagued 1992 and the first part of 1993 
has cooled; the excess market demand has eased, and the increase 
in the price of producer goods has slowed, and these are 
indications that macro regulation and control are producing 
initial results. But at the same time, market sales have been 
flat, more industrial enterprises have been losing money, and 
not all of the state's key construction projects are fully 
funded. These and other problems make it even more important to 
gauge the proper force of macro regulation and control. It is 
our opinion that under the circumstances, we must not "decontrol 
at once" and blindly ease macro regulation and control. Some 
regulatory and control measures should continue to be 
implemented. But at the same time, we must exert proper force to 
avoid the negative effects of severe economic fluctuations 
caused by applying too much force. In particular, the price 
increases in 1993 were the result of many factors that have 
built up since 1992, over a fairly long period of time, and it 
will take some time to lower the inflation rate. We must avoid 
"stepping hard on the brakes." With this understanding, we 
suggest that the price monitoring goal for 1994 should be to 
keep the increase in the overall retail price level at around 10 
percent. 
  3. We should implement a fairly tight monetary policy. From 
January to 17 November 1993, net money input already topped 
101.892 billion yuan, and it is estimated that by year-end, it 
would reach approximately 150 billion yuan, which is a 
significant scope. Considering that there is usually a 
10-month-to-one-year time lag before the effects of excess money 
input on product prices begin to show up, 1993's money supply 
will have definite effects on raising product prices in 1994. 
Therefore we should continue to implement a fairly tight 
monetary policy in 1994 to keep the money supply within a proper 
scope. In particular, we should maintain a positive interest 
rate level. This will have a very critical effect on stabilizing 
the financial situation, on the people's expectations, on 
curbing the bloated demands, and on absorbing investment funds. 
  4. In 1994, when regulating and controlling the 
extraordinary 
increase in fixed asset investments at the macro level, we 
should put the emphasis on readjusting the investment structure. 
Investments in the state's key projects and production-oriented 
projects that should be guaranteed must be guaranteed; 
nonproductive-type investments should be kept down. We must give 
full play to the functions of differential interest rates, 
investment direction taxes, and other economic levers and 
strengthen the regulation of privately-funded fixed asset 
investments. 
  5. We should enhance the state's ability to regulate and 
control market prices at the macro level. This includes: one, 
setting up and perfecting a price regulation fund system for key 
commodities at the central and local levels to promote 
production, enliven circulation, and curb price increases; two, 
setting up a special reserve system for everyday necessities to 
regulate supply and demand and stabilize the market; three, 
perfecting the market economy's price monitoring system. 
Currently, prices of the absolute majority of consumer goods and 
materials and producer goods and materials have already been 
decontrolled. We need comprehensive economic, legal, and 
administrative means to strengthen the management and monitoring 
of the decontrolled prices. On the one hand, we should monitor 
and check those prices more closely and be resolute in cracking 
down on price gouging and exorbitant profits. On the other hand, 
we should strengthen the industrial departments' direct 
management of various product prices and set up and improve 
various policies and laws and regulations to encourage 
competition and curtail monopolies. In addition, it is also very 
important to provide stronger planned guidance and rely more on 
effective market exchange formats to reduce the recklessness in 
production management and price fluctuations and give play to 
the price regulation roles of various trade associations. 
  6. Coordinating with the restructuring of the tax system in 
1994, we should work harder on collecting and administering 
personal income tax and inheritance tax to avoid the draining of 
state revenues, to regulate the citizens' income, and ease the 
pressure on price increases. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66160 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar027___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  2 May 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> NATIONAL AFFAIRS, POLICY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Analysis of Market Prices, Forecast for 1994 </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Analysis of Market Prices, Forecast for 1994 </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0332A Beijing ZHONGGUO WUJIA [PRICES IN CHINA] in 
Chinese No 12, Dec 93 pp 3-9 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0332A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO WUJIA [PRICES IN CHINA] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Gao Tiesheng (7559 6993 3932), Liu Wen (0491 </F>
2429), and Zhang Xu Hong (1728 2485 1347) of the Market and 
Price Regulation and Control Division, State Planning 
Commission: "Market Prices: The Current Situation in 1993 and 
Forecast for 1994"] 
  [Text] In 1993, the entire nation was sincerely carrying 
out the spirit of the 14th National Party Congress and the 
instruction of Comrade Xiaoping to "grasp opportunities and 
hasten development" and not delay in furthering economic reform 
and hastening economic development. As in 1992, the national 
economy continued to operate at a high speed. At the same time, 
conflicts caused by the transition between the old and new 
systems and rapid economic development became even more 
conspicuous and latent inflationary pressures began to be 
released. Beginning with the latter half of 1993, when the party 
Central Committee and the State Council decided to strengthen 
and improve macroeconomic regulation and control, starting with 
a rectification of the finance system, the national economy 
began to stabilize and market prices subsided to a certain 
extent. Looking at 1994, it appears that the rate of economic 
growth will subside to an appropriate level, but there will 
still be a relatively high growth rate. The extent of investment 
growth will decrease but an appropriate level of investment will 
be maintained in order to strengthen structural adjustment. The 
range of commodity price increases will decline somewhat but 
inflationary pressures will remain high. Price increases will 
remain at a relatively high level. Price reforms will be 
actively pursued in a prudent manner, based on the capacities of 
various elements and control of the appropriate intensity and 
timing of reforms. 
<H5>  I. The Form and Characteristics of Market Prices in China in </H5>
1993 
  1. From January through September of 1993, the total retail 
volume of social commodities was up 22.4 percent over the same 
period in the previous year. The national aggregate retail price 
levels were 12.1 percent higher than those of the same period of 
the previous year. The cost of living was 13.7 percent higher 
than that of the same period of the previous year. The cost of 
living in 35 large and mid-sized cities increased 18.9 percent. 
In examination of 1993 market commodity prices, the following 
main characteristics can be seen: 1. The market for consumer 
products is flourishing and dynamic. From January through 
September, the retail sales volume of social commodities was 
22.4 percent higher than that during the same period of the 
previous year. After excluding the price increase factor, the 
actual increase was 9.3 percent. The activity of China's 
consumer product market in 1993 can be divided into two phases: 
1) During the first half of the year, the consumer product 
market maintained vigorous sales and the growth rate increased 
each month. From January through June, the retail sales volume 
of social commodities was 21.6 percent higher than that during 
the same period of the previous year. The increase during the 
first two months of the period was 15 percent. During March it 
was 18.5 percent; in April it was 25.4 percent; in May 27.3 
percent; and in June it reached 28.4 percent. 2) During the 
latter half of the year the high growth rate momentum of China's 
consumer products market began to slow and a trend from peaking 
toward stability emerged. This was seen in the following: First, 
growth in market sales began to subside. Growth in the social 
commodities retail sales volume decreased 1.9 percent in July 
from June. In August it was 4.6 percentage points lower than 
that of June. Second, the hoarding and panic buying by residents 
which occured during one period of the first half of the year 
nearly disappeared. Sales of imported and name brand household 
electrical appliances and gold jewelry clearly decreased. Third, 
the momentum in group consumption inflation was brought under 
control and decreased from a peak of an average of 30 percent 
during the first half of the year to approximately 22 percent in 
August and September, which was even lower than the growth in 
resident consumption. 
  2. The capital goods market, which was consistently tight 
during the first half of the year, became relatively loose. 
Price increases which had been leaping forward began to slow. 
This was chiefly evidenced by: 1) Market sales clearly fell to a 
stable level. The sales volume growth margin fell from 49.5 
percent during the first half of the year to 27.3 percent in the 
third quarter. The supply and demand environment changed 
gradually from a seller's market towards a buyer's market. The 
change in the supply and demand environment in the capital goods 
market was caused by the following two factors, in addition to 
the influence of the greater economic environment: The first was 
that the strengthening of macroeconomic regulation and control 
basically eliminated speculative false demand in the market. The 
second was that imported capital goods arrived continuously and 
increased the general supply of resources. 2) Inventories 
increased by a large margin, bringing inventory levels up 
dramatically from the steady decline over the past year. By the 
end of July, steel inventories for the entire society were up 
10.8 percent from the beginning of the year. Cement supplies 
were up 15.6 percent and lumber was up 1.2 percent. 3) Capital 
goods prices fell back somewhat to previous, already high, 
levels. The growth range in the general price index for capital 
goods fell back to 43.2 percent in August from 52.9 percent in 
June and, after decreasing 2.9 percentage points in July, 
decreased another 6.8 percentage points in August. 
  3. The bloat in the general level of retail prices grew 
markedly since the beginning of the year and potential 
inflationary pressures began to be released. After the 
strengthening of macroeconomic regulation and control, the 
inflationary trend began to slow to the basis of previous high 
levels. From January through September, national retail prices 
increased 12.1 percent over the same period of the previous 
year. The increase in January was 8.4 percent, in February 8.7 
percent, in March 10.2 percent, in April 10.9 percent, in May 
12.5 percent, in June 13.9 percent, in July 14.9 percent, in 
August 15.1 percent, and in September 14.5 percent. Although the 
general retail price level continued to rise during the latter 
half of the year, the inflationary trend had already begun to 
slow. The main factors that served to check the inflationary 
trend in commodity prices were: The first was that apart from 
rail freight and upward adjustments of electricty prices, no 
other new price reforms were brought to bear in the latter half 
of 1993. The second was that the effects carried over to 1993 of 
the grain, coal and transportation price reforms of the latter 
half of 1992, which had a relatively large impact on commodity 
prices, gradually disappeared during the latter half of the 
year. The third was that the decline in capital goods prices 
decreased the cost factor pushing commodity prices. 
  An examination of the price increases of various types of 
commodities and services from January through September shows 
that the prices of everyday commodities increased 6.4 percent, 
the price of entertainment commodities increased 0.5 percent, 
the price of books, newspapers and magazines increased 6.0 
percent, the price of pharmaceuticals and medical commodities 
increased 9.4 percent, construction materials increased 29.6 
percent, fuel increased 38.3 percent, agricultural production 
materials increased 13.8 percent, and the price of services 
increased 28.2 percent. When the information is categorized by 
area, one can observe that the retail price increase in urban 
areas was 12.6 percent and in rural areas 11.8 percent, and the 
service price increase in urban areas was 31.6 percent and in 
rural areas 25.6 percent. 
  Based on the new characterstics of the release of potential 
inflationary pressures and the current operation of prices in 
the market, we predict that the trends in national market prices 
during the latter months of this year will be: The general level 
of prices will remain high and not decline, but inflationary 
trends will gradually subside. The general level of retail price 
increases will be around 13 percent. 
  4. There has been great progress in the transition to price 
mechanisms, in keeping with the requirements of a socialist 
market economy. After government fixed prices were decontrolled 
on a major scale as a continuation of the goal drafted and 
promulgated in 1992 to redistribute pricing authority, a series 
of measures were adopted in 1993 which resulted in breakthrough 
progress: 1) In keeping with the principle of "unified policy, 
decentralized policy making, guidance according to category, and 
gradual advancement," grain and oil purchase prices were 
decontrolled in all but a few provinces and regions. 2) The 
price of most centrally allocated coal was decontrolled. First 
the producer price of centrally allocated coal in Eastern China, 
Northeast China (including the Eastern part of Inner Mongolia), 
and Hunan province was decontrolled. Second, the producer price 
of all clean coal from centrally allocated mines (not including 
the portion used to produce coal gas for residential use) was 
decontrolled. Third was the decontrol of prices of centrally 
allocated power coal used in the production of electricity and 
in the metallurgy industry in the whole country as well as of 
economic coal submitted by local governments to the central 
government for allocation. 3) The prices of most steel products 
were decontrolled. Apart from steel used in mandatory plans for 
national defence and military industry, in agriculture and 
agricultural hydropower, and in specialized railway use, all of 
which are state guided prices, the prices of all remaining steel 
products were decontrolled. At the same time, the prices of 
coking coal, raw iron, ingot steel, steel billets, iron alloys, 
refractory materials, and carbon products as well as the 
producer prices of iron ore and manganese ore were decontrolled. 
4) The prices of some cement, communication exchange equipment, 
civilian use trucks, fire trucks and fire-fighting equipment 
were decontrolled. 5) Railway industry products were 
decontrolled on a major scale. The number of items with prices 
determined by the state or ministries was reduced from 13,875 to 
161. The number of products with prices guided by the state or 
by ministries was increased from 89 to 359. The number of items 
with decontrolled prices was increased from 248 to 13,355. 6) 
Agent pricing was implemented for raw materials for foodstuffs, 
chemical fertilizers, cotton, wood pulp, and clothes washing 
detergent imported under the national foreign currency use plan. 
7) Management authority for the receipt of 22 types of 
administrative fees such as visa fees for foreigners was 
delegated to the relevant administrative agencies to determine 
and implement fee levels. 
  As of the end of 1992, the proportion of state-fixed prices 
was 5.9 percent of the retail volume of social commodities, 
about 12.5 percent of the total purchases of agricultural 
by-products, and about 18.7 percent of total income from capital 
goods sales. In keeping with the development towards a market 
economy, in 1993 the proportion of state-fixed prices decreased 
yet another step. In summary, the leading role of the market in 
the formation of prices for capital goods and consumer materials 
has been basically confirmed. 
  5. Price structure adjustments have taken a great step 
forward, with the emphasis on gradually correcting excessively 
low prices in the basic industries. After the state adjusted the 
prices of four sets of major products, foodstuffs, coal, 
petroleum, and transportation, and raised prices in basic 
industries such as steel, chemical fertilizers, post and 
telegraph services, and surface transport in 1992, price 
structure adjustments took another big step forward in 1993: 1) 
In order to encourage crude oil production, enhance industrial 
development capacity, and promote oil conservation, the low 
level of China's crude oil prices was changed.In 1993, 30 
million tons, or a "medium to high" amount of crude oil was 
produced and the price of finished product oil was increased by 
a commensurate amount. 2) In order to raise additional funds for 
construction and hasten the development of railway 
transportation, railway goods transportation prices were raised 
in 1993 by 1.5 fen per ton per kilometer, from 3.85 fen to 5.35 
fen per ton per kilometer. 3) On the basis of rectifying 
electricity prices and eliminating irrational prices, 
electricity prices were raised appropriately by power grid. The 
national average price of electricity for industrial use was 
raised about 3.2 fen per quarter. The price of electricity for 
residential illumination was raised about 5 fen per quarter, and 
the price of electricity for rural irrigation was raised about 2 
fen per quarter. 4) The producer price for logs allocated from 
state-owned forests in the Northeast and Inner Mongolia was 
raised as well as the price of lumber turned in by state-owned 
forests in Sichuan and Yunnan. 5) Producer prices for products 
from copper and zinc were raised. The price of electolytic 
copper went from a previous amount of 13,000 yuan per ton to 
18,000 per ton. The price of raw copper went from a previous 
level of 11,750 yuan to 16,200 yuan per ton of pure metal. 
Refined copper ore went from a previous price of 9,870 to 12,000 
yuan per ton. Zinc ingots went from a previous price of 6,400 to 
7,700 yuan per ton. Refined zinc ore fell from a previous price 
of 3,600 yuan to 3,000 yuan per ton. After the prices of copper 
and zinc were adjusted as representative products, producer 
prices for other similar products were adjusted appropriately 
based on the stipulated price comparison coefficients. 
Preliminary corrected calculations show that the adjustment 
measures brought into play in China this year have directly 
resulted in an increase in the average level of commodity prices 
by 2.5 percentage points. The smooth implementation of these 
adjustment measures has served an important function in 
ameliorating China's irrational price structures and furthering 
the development of basic production. 
  5. There was additional improvement of the system of 
macroeconomic regulation and control of prices. With the 
sustained rapid movement of the economy since 1993, production, 
construction, circulation, and consumption, after expanding 
rapidly during the previous year, have all experienced even more 
rapid, inter-linked growth. At the same time, some new problems 
and new conflicts have become more conspicuous. In particular, 
excess currency circulation, a disorganized finance system, a 
sudden expansion in investment demand and consumer demand, and 
the exacerbation of "bottleneck" restrictions in basic 
infrastructure and basic industry sectors have pushed up 
commodity prices significantly and hastened the emergence of 
inflation. Under these conditions, the party Central Committee 
and the State Council have taken charge of the entire economic 
scene and have decided to adopt a series of measures to advance 
and strengthen macroeconomic regulation and control, based on 
the guiding principle of "in economic work, we must take hold of 
opportunities and hasten development but at the same time pay 
attention to reliability and avoid losses, especially large 
losses." Effective control will be exercised over the economy by 
expanding reform, hastening the development and completion of 
the market system, and quickly perfecting macroeconomic 
regulation and control, using economic techniques, legal 
techniques and, when necessary, administrative techniques. After 
a period of great effort, the macroeconomic regulations and 
controls have achieved some preliminary success, as demonstrated 
by: First, illegal short-term loans by banks have ceased. 
Second, various types of illegal accumulation of capital have 
been brought under a preliminary degree of control, savings have 
increased greatly, and the excessive issuance of currency has 
slowed somewhat. Third, the exchange value of the renminbi has 
fallen to a rational level. Fourth, capital goods prices have 
fallen back to a certain extent and real property prices have 
fallen by a large margin. Five, the population's expectations 
for inflation have gradually decreased. 
<H5>  II. Looking Ahead at the Operation of Market Commodity </H5>
Prices for 1994 
  After two years of rapid growth in China's national economy, 
there has been a great change in the macroeconomic environment. 
The effectiveness of market mechanisms is gradually increasing. 
The overall power of the country has clearly been strengthened. 
Macroeconomic regulations and controls have begun to take 
effect, the conflicts and problems which have emerged in 
economic life have been resolved to a certain extent, and the 
national economy is developing in a healthy direction. Favorable 
conditions have been created for comprehensive reform and 
opening and hastened economic development in 1994. The 90's are 
a key era in China's socialist modernization. China is currently 
facing a rare historical opportunity. In the face of new 
situations and new tasks, in 1994 we must not delay in 
furthering reform and opening, hastening the establishment of a 
socialist market economy system, and promoting sustained, rapid, 
and healthy economic development. For this reason, the national 
economy must maintain a relatively high rate of development in 
1994. According to the predictions of relevant experts, the 
growth rate of the gross domestic product will remain above 10 
percent. The fixed capital investment growth rate and the retail 
merchandise sales volume growth rate of the entire society will 
remain above 20 percent. Reform will be actively promoted in 
1994 in such areas as taxation, finance, pricing, investment, 
and foreign trade as well as in the enterprise system. These 
reforms will have a fairly great impact on the operation of 
market commodity prices in 1994. At the same time, the delayed 
effects of the extraeconomic issuance of currency in 1993 and 
the inertia of commodity price increases cannot be ignored. In 
summary, a look at the market commodity price situation in 1994 
shows that there are factors favorable to stability in market 
commodity prices and factors which could lead to a rise in 
market commodity prices. 
  In examining the factors favorable to stability in commodity 
prices it can be seen that after the central government set down 
policies to strengthen reform and macroeconomic regulation and 
control, these policies were quickly disseminated and sincerely 
implemented by all the regions and ministries and have achieved 
some effectiveness, as demonstrated by the following: 
  1. There has been improvement in the finance system, which 
is 
moving towards stability. First, chaotic phenomena such as 
sloppy short-term loans, sloppy fund raising, and the sloppy 
establishment of finance organizations have ceased. Second, 
citizens' savings deposits have been steadily rising every 
month. As of September, the sum of remaining citizens' savings 
deposits had reached 1386.7 billion yuan, 232.2 billion more 
than at the end of the previous year. Third, the momentum of 
injecting excessive amounts of bank notes into circulation was 
halted and the rate of increase in the currency supply was 
slowed. As of July, the margin of increase in M1 (narrowly 
defined currency) had slowed from about 40 percent during the 
first half of the year to a normal rate. Fourth, the payment 
ability of specialized banks was strengthened. As of September, 
reserve deposits rates in specialized banks had increased to 7.2 
percent. 
  2. The fiscal and tax system improved and practices to 
increase income and reduce expenses began to achieve 
effectiveness. By eliminating inappropriate reductions or 
remittals in taxes and aggressively attacking tax cheating and 
stealing, clear improvements were made in the fiscal and tax 
system. A preliminary turnaround was achieved over the first 
half of the year when economic growth was rapid and low revenues 
fluctuated. At the same time, the rapid growth in fiscal 
expenditures was also brought somewhat under control. 
  3. There was improvement in the capital goods market, the 
stock market, the foreign currency market, and the real estate 
and development zone systems. The implementation of 
macroeconomic regulation and control measures such as 
standardizing the finance market and cleaning up the real estate 
and development zone situations has clearly suppressed 
speculative practices and "froth economy" elements. One such 
example is that the profiteering practices in the capital goods 
field have clearly been reduced. Capital goods supplies, which 
were very tight, have become plentiful and prices have gone back 
down. Second is that all areas have eliminated development zones 
which did not meet requirements and are continuing to clear out 
such zones. Third is that investment growth in commodity housing 
has receded. Fourth is that the development of the stock market 
is gradually stabilizing. Fifth is that the price ratio of the 
dollar to the renminbi in the foreign currency adjustment market 
has stabilized at about 1 to 8.8.4. Certain factors influencing 
market commodity prices have changed: The first is that the 
prices of foodstuff, domestic fuel, and building materials, 
which exert the greatest pressure on commodity price levels, 
have been largely decontrolled during the past two years and 
thus will have less residual impact on 1994. The second is that 
the prices of many capital goods in China now approach or have 
exceeded international market price levels. These prices are 
expected to stabilize at a fairly high level. The third is that 
the consumption psychology of residents is becoming more mature. 
Rational purchasing is more common than waves of panic buying, 
and consumer spending is becoming more and more planned. The 
fourth is that there has been a clear shift in the distribution 
of residents' income, with more spent on savings, housing and 
the purchase of stocks and bonds and some delay in a portion of 
residents' immediate consumption. 
  5. The rapid growth in the national economy has increased 
the 
supply efficiency of the market, which has contributed a solid 
material base for the maintenance of basic balance in the 
aggregate supply and demand of the society. 
  6. The advancement of all the reforms will gradually resolve 
many of the conflicts and problems remaining from the old system 
at a fundamental level and will diffuse excess purchasing power, 
mitigating and releasing some of the potential inflationary 
pressure. 
  The factors which would cause commodity prices to rise can 
be 
seen in the following: 
  1. Society's aggregate demand is still peaking. Looking at 
investment demand, it can be seen that although the growth in 
fixed capital investment during the past few months has 
decreased somewhat, it is still not an ideal situation. The 
current growth rate in fixed capital investment is still over 60 
percent, and it is predicted that fixed capital investment for 
the year will exceed the plan by over threefold. The investment 
rate will reach 37 percent, clearly beyond the limits of normal 
figures and not favorable to the maintenance of steady and 
healthy economic development and the normal functioning of 
market commodity prices. Looking at consumption demand, it can 
be seen that incomes of urban and rural residents will continue 
to increase by a large margin. From January through September, 
the average cost of living income for urban residents was 29 
percent higher than that for the same period of the previous 
year. After commodity price factors were deducted, the actual 
increase was 12 percent. The average cash income for rural 
residents increased 17 percent, or actually about 5 percent 
after commodity price increases were factored out. A look at the 
consumption demand trends in the fourth quarter shows that 
following the implementation of the civil functionary system and 
a series of measures designed by the state to promote 
production, increase income and decrease expenditures for the 
peasants, consumption demand will maintain a high rate of 
growth. These factors will create a rather strong demand pull on 
market commodity prices in 1994. 
  2. Looking at the finance and currency situations, it can be 
seen that the number of new loans by banks and the net amount of 
currrency put into circulation will be far greater than was 
planned at the beginning of the year. An excessive amount of 
currency in the market could cause inflation at any time. 
History has proven that when the currency supply is excessive in 
any given year, it will not only influence the inflation rate 
for that year but also the inflation rate of the following year. 
Therefore, when we predict the level of inflation for 1994, we 
must examine not only the plans for currency issuance in 1994 
but also the lagging influence of the currency issued in excess 
of the economy in 1993. 
  3. It is not easy to be optimistic about the prospects for 
the government fiscal situation. Although the current government 
fiscal situation shows some improvement, the difficult financial 
straits of the central government are still quite present. 
Because the fourth quarter represents the peak period for 
government financial expenditure, with the added financial 
difficulties experienced during the previous period, many 
appropriated funds are in arrears. This will increase pressure 
on government fiscal payments during the next few months. 
  3. Due to the extensive price increases for energy and raw 
materials during the past two years, as well as the large price 
increases for funding, foreign exchange, and wages, pressures 
for higher prices created by cost are now being released. During 
the past year, prices paid by enterprises for energy and raw 
materials have been over 30 percent higher than during the 
previous year. The price of funds has risen over 10 percent and 
the cost of foreign exchange has risen over 20 percent. These 
price hike factors will necessarily push enterprise costs higher 
and thus push prices higher. Because the push factor of costs 
has a certain rigidity, this will not diminish significantly in 
1994 and will not be clearly suppressed by macroeconomic control 
and regulation. 
  4. Due to the lingering impact of excessive currency in 
circulation, as the economy gradually cools down, market 
commodity prices will still operate at a high level. Looking at 
retail prices, it can be seen that in June prices rose 13.9 
percent, in July 14.9 percent, and in August the increase 
reached 15.1 percent. Cost of living prices for residents 
increased 12.5 percent during the first half of the year and 
then rose another 13.7 percent between the first and third 
quarters. The cost of living in 35 medium-sized and large cities 
has continued to rise at the high level of over 20 percent since 
June. 
  5. The agricultural situation is also not optimistic. The 
party Central Committee and the State Council have placed a high 
priority during the past year on agriculture and have introduced 
many specific policy measures to protect agricultural 
production, with some effectiveness. Many factors influencing 
the stability of agricultural production, however, are still 
present and it is not easy to be optimistic about agriculture. 
Stable agricultural production and an ample supply of 
agricultural products provide the essential material base which 
determines whether market commodity prices can operate normally. 
The agricultural situation of 1993 will have a definite 
influence on the operation of market commodity prices in 1994. 
  In summary, there are many objective factors present which 
are favorable or not favorable to next year's market commodity 
price situation. The key element determining whether market 
commodity prices will maintain normal operation next year will 
be whether the strength of macroeconomic control and regulation 
is appropriate. If only we can be united in our understanding of 
the situation and face the problems which exist, putting a top 
priority on all aspects of the work to be done, we can maintain 
the normal operation of market commodity prices and avoid severe 
inflation. 
<H5>  III. Macroeconomic Policy Choices for the Operation of </H5>
Market Commodity Prices in 1994 
  There are mainly three choices for macroeconomic policies 
for 
the operation of market commodity prices in 1994. 
  The first is to adopt macroeconomic policies of 
comprehensive 
retrenchment as in 1988 and 1989. The advantage of this policy 
is that it would allow inflated commodity prices to come down 
rather quickly. The disadvantage is that it would be severely 
detrimental to normal economic growth and would create a long 
period of slump in the market. 
  The second is to seek only short-term high economic growth, 
adopting a laissez-faire attitude towards market commodity 
prices, eventually causing severe inflation which would then 
necessarily bring down the rate of economic growth. This type of 
tumultuous economic fluctuation would not only result in serious 
damage to the national economy but would also impact on social 
stability. 
  The third is to adopt a "soft attack" macroeconomic policy. 
This would be to continue to strengthen and improve the 
macroeconomic regulation and control of the national economy and 
to gradually bring down the excessively high growth rate of 
commodity prices while maintaining a sustained high rate of 
healthy economic growth. 
  Our view is that the third option is usable. This is 
because: 
1) The 1990's are a key period in China's modernization. The 
national economy must maintain a relatively high rate of growth. 
We must take advantage of opportunities for development and 
strive to create the conditions necessary to promote a sustained 
high rate of healthy economic growth. 2) The current economic 
environment, economic mechanisms and economic situation have 
changed considerably from 1988. Therefore, our macroeconomic 
regulation and control policies cannot simply repeat the 
approach of 1988. We must operate in keeping with the patterns 
of a market economy to favor the establishment of a socialist 
market economy and avoid great economic rise and fall and major 
losses. For this reason, we must not use "comprehensive 
retrenchment" or "emergency brakes." 3) Looking at the conflicts 
and problems present in current economic life, from a 
fundamental point of view, it can be seen that because the 
transition in economic systems is still not complete and the 
disadvantages of the original economic system are still present, 
macroeconomic reforms in finance, taxation, and investment are 
particularly lagging behind. The fundamental approach to 
resolving current and future problems in economic development is 
to strengthen reform and establish a new socialist market 
economic system. 
  In terms of macroeconomic policies, we must put great effort 
into the following tasks to guarantee the normal operation of 
market commodity prices in 1994: 
  1. The relationship among economic development, the 
advancement of reform, and price stability must be managed 
properly. We must control the proper strength of macroeconomic 
regulation and control, and avoid severe inflation while 
maintaining sustained rapid economic growth. In terms of the 
current situation, the policy measures adopted by the central 
government to strengthen and improve macroeconomic regulation 
and control have already had a positive impact and have achieved 
some preliminary success. The conflicts and problems in economic 
life have been resolved to a certain extent. This has created a 
macroeconomic environment more conducive to the normal operation 
of market commodity prices and the advancement of reform and 
opening. The assessment, however, of the current achievements 
cannot be overdone. The conflicts and problems still present in 
economic life are difficult to ignore. On the one hand, policy 
measures to strengthen macroeconomic control have not been in 
effect very long and the positive impact of these measures is 
still preliminary. On the other hand, some deeply rooted 
conflicts will only be resolved through deeper reform. In our 
current economic work, we must continuously research and analyze 
the newly emerging situations and problems in the economy and 
correctly master the patterns of economic development in order 
to resolve quickly problems and conflicts in the operation of 
the economy. Looking at 1994, we must make every effort to keep 
the economic growth rate and general commodity price level 
growth rate at around 10 percent. We must also maintain two 
security lines: The first is that the growth rate of common 
incomes of urban and rural residents must not be below the rate 
of commodity price increases. The second is that the savings 
funds of residents must not depreciate and savings interest 
rates must be higher than the rate of commodity price increases. 
At the same time, we must hold steadfast to the use of combined 
regulation and decontrol to actively and prudently advance price 
reform policies. We must avoid overly hurried, one step 
approaches but arrange for timely and smooth implementation of 
each reform in an appropriate fashion and thus maintain the 
stable functioning of market commodity prices. 
  2. The key to strengthening and improving macroeconomic 
regulation and control is in expanding reform. The conflicts and 
problems present in the current operation of the economy have 
been caused primarily by friction between the old and new 
systems. Therefore, the key to strengthening and improving 
macroeconomic regulation and control is in expanding reform. In 
the process of expanding reform, special attention must be paid 
to the comprehensive use of economic levers such as government 
finance, credit, interest rates, commodity prices, tax revenues, 
wages and exchange rates. These must be coordinated in a 
consistent fashion. At the same time, attention must be paid to 
linking short-term regulation and control with long-term reform. 
At the same time, ample use should be made of the comprehensive 
planning function of the State Planning Commission. In 
perfecting the system of macroeconomic regulation and control, 
the Party Central Committee and the State Council have great 
respect for planning and have emphasized the need to research 
development strategies, research the fundamental impact of the 
market on resource allocation, research mid- and long-term 
planning and annual planning, and research production industry 
policy. The State Planning Commission must take a comprehensive 
view of the entire situation, and from a higher plane, research 
and offer major macroeconomic policies. It must also offer 
comprehensive coordination of the various economic policies and 
economic regulation methods. Currently the emphasis should be on 
coordinating the relationships among planning, finance, and 
government finance, these three areas, to ensure consistency 
among the various economic policies, economic levers and 
economic methods. 
  3. Proactive measures should be adopted to strengthen the 
macroeconomic regulation and control of fixed capital investment 
and to vigorously refine the investment structure. Resolute 
control of the scope of fixed capital investment with vigorous 
refinement of the investment structure is a key element in 
policy making on macroeconomic regulation and control and a 
crucial major task. Unless we are determined to resolve the 
problems of overextended construction, it will be difficult to 
mitigate the tension in the macroeconomic environment and 
effectively resolve the conspicuous problems in finance, 
government finance, and other areas. Each region and ministry 
must conform its thinking and actions to the central 
government's policies and adopt effective measures to solve the 
problems in fixed capital investment. 
  4. To create a better financial environment for the major 
state reforms of 1994 and promote sustained rapid and healthy 
development of the economy, the regulation, control and 
management of the central bank's basic currency holdings must be 
strengthened. First, we must continue to implement macroeconomic 
regulation and control measures, correct the finance system, 
strictly adhere to finance discipline and continue to enhance 
reform. Second, we must strengthen the regulation, control and 
management of the central bank's basic currency reserves and add 
to the basic currency reserves in a timely, appropriate, and 
effective fashion, to support the key needs of the development 
of the national economy and further the sustained rapid and 
healthy development of the national economy, and create a 
financial environment conducive to reform and opening. Third, we 
must continue adjusting the credit structure to guarantee the 
key requirements for capital. Fourth, we must use the method of 
strengthening reform to further improve the management system 
and management methods of the credit fund system. 
  5. Price reforms must be actively promoted without delay to 
advance the sustained rapid and healthy development of the 
economy. The guiding philosophy of price reforms in 1994 should 
be to actively pursue price reform in a safe fashion, with 
rational control over the intensity of reform, on the basic 
premise that the growth rate in aggregate commodity price levels 
must be lower than that for the previous year. This must be 
viewed with the following aspects in mind: 1) We must further 
develop and improve price mechanisms with market prices as the 
key. We must continue to shrink the scope of state-fixed prices 
and actively further the transition to market prices, based on 
the status of market supply and demand and of price reforms. 
Prices for competitive commodities and common service fees must 
be decontrolled as much as possible and allowed to be determined 
by the market. The double track system for capital goods prices 
must be eliminated gradually and the scope of the capital goods 
market must be expanded. 2) Based on the requirements of the 
developing socialist market economy, price structures should be 
further rationalized and basic product prices should be raised, 
to solve the problem of excessively low basic industry prices. 
The prices of agricultural products should be raised 
appropriately and the system of guaranteed prices and support 
prices for food and key agricultural by-products should be 
established and perfected, with attention paid to guaranteeing 
benefits for the peasants. 1994 will represent an important step 
forward in adjusting price structures, based on the progress of 
China's price reforms and the capacities of all elements. 
  6. The system for indirect macroeconomic regulation and 
control of the market by the government must be perfected. 
First, a complete two-tiered price regulation and control system 
for the central government and the provinces, autonomous 
regions, and direct-ruled municipalities must be gradually 
perfected. Second, economic, administrative, and legal methods 
must be used in a comprehensive fashion to strengthen management 
of decontrolled prices. Third, the price adjustment fund system 
for the central government and local governments and the reserve 
system for important commodities must by established and 
perfected, in order to strengthen the state's ability to exert 
macroeconomic regulation and control over the market. Fourth, 
the assessment and advance warning systems for market prices 
must be further developed, in order to provide accurate 
indicators and reliable bases for price policy making and price 
regulation and control. Fifth, the legal system of laws and 
regulations for actions relating to the markets and prices must 
be perfected and standardized. 
  7. The central government's policy measures on strengthening 
agriculture must be sincerely and thoroughly implemented to 
strive to stabilize agricultural production. Agriculture is the 
basis of the national economy and of social stability. A good 
agricultural situation provides a foundation for the normal 
operation of market commodity prices. If major problems emerge 
in agricultural production, there will be a serious impact on 
the stability of the market and commodity prices. Looking at the 
current situation, the following tasks must be completed: The 
first is to further implement all measures to stabilize and 
strengthen agriculture, after the meeting of the Central Working 
Committee on Agriculture. The second is to continue expanding 
rural reforms, to foster markets, expand the market system, and 
strengthen macroeconomic guidance with priority placed on the 
protection of the peasants. We must also hasten the 
establishment of rural economic operation mechanisms and 
management systems suited to the requirements of a socialist 
market economy. The third is to enlarge the extent of funds 
invested in agriculture by all levels of government. It would be 
preferable to cut back temporarily on the number of industrial 
projects and provide guarantees for the pressing needs of 
agricultural development, raise the prices appropriately for 
agricultural products, and inspire the enthusiasm of the 
peasants to develop production. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66161 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar027___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  25 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> PROVINCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Shanghai Government Work Report </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Shanghai Government Work Report </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0411A Shanghai JIEFANG RIBAO in Chinese 25 Feb 94 pp 1, 
2, 3 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0411A </F>
<F P=104>  Shanghai JIEFANG RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Shanghai Mayor, Huang Ju (7806 5468): </F>
"Government Work Report -- Delivered at the Second Meeting of 
the Tenth Shanghai People's Congress on 18 February 1994"] 
  [Text] Delegates: 
  Now, on behalf of the Shanghai Municipal People's 
Government, 
I will report to the Congress on the work of the government. I 
ask that you consider it, and I ask all members of the People's 
Political Consultative Congress and other personnel in 
attendance to express their views. 
<H5>  1. Retrospective on Work During 1993 </H5>
  1993 was the year in which Shanghai began to implement a 
development strategy to make the city an international economic, 
finance and banking, and trade center. It was also a year in 
which Shanghai strove to bring economic development to a new 
level, to break new ground in reform and opening to the outside 
world, and to effect new changes in the look of the city. Under 
leadership of the CPC Central Committee, the State Council, and 
the Shanghai Municipal CPC Committee, we took the theory of 
building a distinctively Chinese brand of socialism as our 
guide, completely carried out the Party's basic line and the 
spirit of the 14th Party Congress, diligently put into practice 
Central Committee measures for strengthening and improving 
macroeconomic regulation and control, and persisted in the 
intensification of reform to move ahead with all work. Thanks to 
the joint efforts of the people throughout the city, we 
victoriously completed all tasks set by the First Meeting of the 
Tenth Shanghai Municipal People's Congress for national economic 
and social development, and we rode the wind and cleaved the 
waves, surmounting all difficulties and move up another level in 
response to Comrade Deng Xiaoping's call in early 1993. 
  Maintenance of Sustained, Rapid, and Healthy 
Development of the National Economy; Marked Improvement in 
Quality of Economic Growth In 1993, the national economy 
continued a rapid growth momentum founded on markets, quality, 
and returns. The city's GNP for the year totaled 151 billion 
yuan, up 14.9 percent over 1992. This was higher than actual 
growth in 1992 and higher than national average growth. The 
quality of economic growth increased markedly. This was 
manifested largely in the following: steady improvement of 
structural benefits, tertiary industries primarily in the 
finance and banking, business and trade, transportation, 
communications, and real estate having become new growth points 
for economic development. Tertiary industries accounted for 38 
percent of the city's GNP versus 36 percent in 1992. Economic 
growth was driven mostly by secondary and tertiary industries in 
common rather than by secondary industries alone as in the past. 
The benefits of scale began to appear. A number of new mainstay 
industries grew up quickly in secondary industries, and they are 
gradually progressing toward benefitting from the economies of 
scale. Specifically, production of sedans and digitally 
programmable telephone exchanges has increased greatly, output 
value from new sales accounting for 16 percent of the city's new 
output value. Market returns began to expand gradually, 
industrial sales output value amounting to 323.7 billion yuan, 
up 20.1 percent from 1992. The industrial products sales rate 
reached 98.9 percent. Social commodity retail sales totaled 65.4 
billion yuan, up 33.5 percent from 1992. Foreign trade exports 
totaled $7.38 billion, up 12.7 percent from 1992. Economic 
growth, which was pulled mostly by investment demand, gradually 
shifted to being pulled by both investment and consumption 
demand. More groundwork for future benefits was laid in the form 
of changes in the functions of the municipal government and the 
development of large modern markets. This infused economic 
development with new vim and vigor. Overall economic returns 
continued to rise. Local government fiscal revenues calculated 
on the basis of the same specifications, totaled 24.23 billion, 
or 30.6 percent more than in 1992. This was the first time in 
many years that they exceeded the GNP rate of increase. 
  Steady Intensification of Economic System Reform; 
Steady Enhancement of the Basic Role of the Market in the 
Allocation of Resources. During 1993, reform scored 
substantive advances in many important fields. The pace of 
building large modern markets quickened, new large grain, 
chemical industry, petroleum, building materials, motor vehicle, 
agricultural means of production, and technology markets being 
built. Currently, the city has 11 exchanges (markets) in which 
total trading volume for the year broke the 1 trillion yuan 
mark, including 520 billion yuan in negotiable securities, or 
5.8 times the 1992 volume. Metals trading volume reached 388.9 
billion in initial expression of the central role of Shanghai 
markets in the allocation of resources. Price reforms moved 
ahead step by step, grain and edible oil prices being 
decontrolled, and some public utility prices such as for 
household fuels, water, electricity, and public transportation 
being moderately adjusted. A needed commodity reserve system and 
a grain and edible oil, vegetables, and nonstaple foods 
production risk fund system were set up. The market mechanism 
played an every increasing role in setting prices. 
Transformation of the enterprise operating system proceeded 
rapidly. The all-out promotion of all kinds of reform pilot 
projects in state-owned enterprises, and active promotion of a 
share cooperative system in city and countryside collective 
enterprises encouraged development of the privately owned and 
individually owned economy. Enterprises gradually became the 
main market entities; the elements of production were mostly 
assembled through the market, and all sorts of products were 
mostly traded through markets. The basic role of markets in 
allocating resources increased greatly. Reform of the social 
security system accelerated gradually. After listening to 
opinions from various quarters, the old age insurance system was 
completely reformed. Reform of government organs moved ahead 
steadily with the active establishment of pilot projects for 
reform of the state-owned assets management system, and further 
improvement of the "two level government and two level 
administration" system of the city and its districts and 
counties. The administrative system for operating the new 
Pudong zone was started up, and government functions were 
changed in accordance with needs for developing a socialist 
market economy, new management methods explored. 
  Rapid Expansion of Internal and External Opening Up, 
the Number of Initial Points Opened Up Rising Further. 
During 1993, 3,650 foreign investment projects were newly 
approved throughout the city. Agreements were signed with 
foreign traders for the direct investment of $7 billion. This 
was a respective 81 and 109 percent increase over 1992. The city 
newly approved investment by other provinces and cities in 4,641 
enterprises, the investment totaling 16.3 billion yuan, up a 
respective 95.7 and 56.7 percent over 1992. The number of 
initial points completely open domestically and to the outside 
world increased. First, there are more trans-national 
corporations and large projects. Well-known trans-national 
corporations that have invested in the operation of firms in 
Shanghai now number 128. The number of large projects in which 
the investment is $10 million or more is 205. Agreed-upon 
investment in foreign-owned enterprises accounts for more than 
60 percent of all agreed-upon foreign investment in the city. 
Eighty-percent of joint venture enterprises that have gone into 
production and are now making a profit. Shanghai joint venture 
enterprises that are making both a profit and earning foreign 
exchange number approximately one-sixth of the total for the 
country as a whole. Second is a widening of the areas open to 
the outside world. The scale of B share issuance has expanded; 
trans-national corporations have been attracted to set up 
holding companies; the use of foreign capital to construct 
housing for domestic sales is being explored; and more than 50 
overseas securities firms have entered the Shanghai securities 
market. All jurisdictions in the country take part in the 
development of Shanghai's large modern markets, more than 85 
percent of exchange members and more than 70 percent of 
investors coming from various jurisdictions throughout the 
country. Third is a quickening of the pace of meshing with 
international markets. Securities and metal exchanges have 
formed information networks with similar markets 
internationally, and they have set up central registration and 
settlement systems that conform to international standards. Some 
industrial and trading enterprises have begun to operate in 
accordance with international practice on product quality 
standards, their accounting system, their management system, and 
their motivation system. In addition, the number of countries 
and territories investing in Shanghai has increased from 40 to 
56; economic and technical cooperation with the outside world 
has expanded further; and international tourism, the contracting 
of projects abroad, and the export of labor services have also 
developed fairly rapidly. 
  Development of Pudong Moving Ahead Rapidly; Initial 
Appearance of Externally Oriented Economic Functions. 
During 1993, the new Pudong zone entered a new stage in which it 
began to function even while construction was going on. As key 
projects, such as the first phase of the Outer Gaoqiao new 
harbor area and the Pudong section of the inner circumferential 
highway continued to be completed and come on stream, except for 
the Outer Gaoqiao Electric Power Plant, the initial phase of 10 
major infrastructure projects in the new zone was basically 
completed two years ahead of schedule. Development goals in key 
sub-zones were realized ahead of schedule. The area in which the 
seven components of infrastructure [roads, running water, 
electricity, telecommunications, gas, drainage pipes, and sewage 
pipes] and the leveling of ground for construction have been 
completed has increased to 11.8 kilometers. The investment 
climate has gradually improved, and functional development is 
fully underway. Two square kilometers of the first phase of 
development of the Outer Gaoqiao bonded area have been sealed 
off and have begun to operate, and the country's largest bonded 
means of production exchange market has been built and has 
started operating too. International finance and banking, 
entrepot trade, and bonded warehouse businesses are coming along 
rapidly, the import-export-trade growing manifold. In the 
Lujiazui finance and trade zone, construction of 50 high rise 
buildings has begun, and the Wendeng Road commercial street has 
begun to take shape. In the Jinqiao export processing zone, 
domestic and foreign owned projects number more than 200. On 
average, the investment in each project is more than $13 
million. Work has begun on 100 of these projects, and 30 of them 
have been built and gone into production. After adjusting the 
scale and initiating rolling development, the Zhangjiang High 
Technology Park is gradually moving ahead with full development 
and construction of the park area. Externally oriented economic 
functions consisting primarily of finance and banking, trade, 
and export processing are beginning to appear in the new Pudong 
zone. The economy is developing at high speed, and its GNP has 
increased 30 percent, which is 15 percentage points higher than 
for the city as a whole. 
  High Intensity Inputs in the Building of 
Infrastructure; More New Changes in the Appearance of the 
City. The amount of money invested during 1993 in building 
the city's infrastructure reach at all-time high totaling 16 
billion yuan. Major advances were made in the building of a 
downtown transportation network. Work was completed on one after 
another key projects in the building of a surface and 
underground transportation network. Following construction of 
the big bridge in south Pudong, the imposing Yangpu Bridge was 
built across the Huangpu Jiang; two large crossovers were 
constructed and opened to traffic on Luoshan Road and Longyang 
Road. Trial runs have been made on the southern segment of the 
No. 1 subway line. On the inner circumferential highway, all the 
surface roads have been linked up, and the first phase elevated 
roadway on the inner circumferential highway has been built and 
is open to traffic. Advances have been made in building the 
urban environment. Building of the first phase of the "life 
project" that people throughout the city hope for -- cleaning up 
waste water from the confluence of streams -- has been 
completed. Once the concomitant ancillary facilities have been 
built, the quality of the water in Suzhou Creek will improve 
substantially, its dark color and bad odor largely eliminated. 
This will set the stage for improving water quality in the lower 
reaches of the Huangpu Jiang. One after another, major projects 
are being completed. These include the first phase of the coking 
plant's "triple supply," the first phase of the Shitongkou Gas 
Works, the People's Square Underground Transformer Station, and 
the expansion and improvement of the municipal telephone 
network. These projects will promote further improvement of the 
urban environment and the living environment. The large scale 
transformation of major streets and areas such as Nanjing Road, 
Huaihai Road, the New Passenger Station, and the Siccawei 
District will enhance the city's modern flavor. In particular, 
once the project for the complete transformation of the Bund has 
been completed, an entirely new scene will greet visitors from 
all over. It will become a new indicator that Shanghai is moving 
toward the future. 
  Steady Development of Various Social Endeavors; 
Continued Intensification of the Building of Spiritual 
Civilization. Scientific and technical work oriented 
further toward economic construction. Nearly 2,000 major 
scientific and technical achievement were made during the year, 
50 of them winning national science and technology awards. The 
rate at which scientific and technical achievements were applied 
rose further, high and new technology industries developing 
rapidly, the number of scientific and technical industry 
projects carried out exceeding 500. New achievements were also 
made in social science research. A multi-component school 
operating system in which government operation of schools is 
primary, with all quarters of society taking part, is in process 
of formation. The school management system is being completely 
reformed; money is being raised through many channels to 
increase investment in education; and school operating 
conditions continue to improve. Cultural and physical education 
developed vigorously. Some new plays that have a modern flavor 
and propagate ethnic culture were well received by society; 
large scale activities such as Shanghai's first international 
film festival were successfully run; and the building of key 
cultural facilities such as a new Shanghai library building, and 
a new Shanghai museum building continue. The first East Asian 
athletic meet was held excitedly, satisfactorily, and 
successfully in Shanghai, demonstrating to the outside world the 
vigor of Shanghai's people. Shanghai's athletes scored 
achievements in major international and domestic competitions, 
and the mass physical education campaign saw vigorous 
development. The widely conducted campaign to "study knowledge, 
study science, and study technology" served to raise the caliber 
of city residents. Advances were made in the building of medical 
ethics and medical demeanor for a gradual improvement in 
treatment conditions. Both the appearance of the city and 
environmental hygiene showed further improvement. Civil 
government welfare facilities steadily improved; a social 
atmosphere of reverence and respect for the old gradually took 
shape, and help for the disabled increasingly gained social 
concern and support. Double cherish work [the army cherishing 
the people and the people cherishing the army] intensified, the 
unity of the army and the government and the army and the people 
growing steadily stronger. Periodic achievements were scored in 
the fight against corruption; overall control of social order 
continue to improve; and the social order has remained stable. 
  Gradual Rise in the Standard of Living of Both City and 
Country People; Steady Improvement in Living Conditions The 
people's standard of living steadily improved as the economy 
developed. Staff member and worker wages averaged 5,600 yuan per 
year for a 9.1 percent increase after deducting for a rise in 
the cost of living. The net income of peasants living in the 
suburbs averaged 2,650 yuan in a 4 percent rise after deducting 
for a rise in prices paid for commodities. By yearend, city and 
countryside residents savings deposits showed a balance of 57.4 
billion yuan, up 39 percent. The shopping environment improved, 
both the amount and quality of citizens' consumption rising. 
Practical items closely associated with the people's life were 
readily available. The housing area completed was more than 6 
million square meters, civilian gas and telephone hook-ups rose 
further, the social services field expanded, and people's living 
environment and living conditions continued to improve. 
  New accomplishments were scored during the past year in 
Shanghai's reform and opening to the outside world, building of 
the economy, and development of the society. In this regard, I 
would like to express my heartfelt thanks on behalf of the 
Shanghai municipal people's government to the rank and file of 
workers, peasants, and intellectuals throughout the city who 
battled on all fronts, to the people's congress delegates, to 
CPPCC members and democratic parties, and to people in all walks 
of life who provided support and supervision, to all central 
government departments, fraternal provinces and cities, and to 
the PLA and People's Armed Police who provided energetic 
support, to Hong Kong and Macao compatriots, Overseas Chinese, 
and international friends, who supported the building of 
Shanghai's economy, to the masses of city residents who showed 
concern for the common good and made selfless contributions to 
the building of the city, and to the comrades and friends who 
showed concern for and supported the booming development of 
Shanghai. 
  Of course, while appreciating the accomplishments made, we 
must also realistically and extremely clearheadedly realize that 
numerous difficulties and problems lie ahead: Business concerns 
losses are large; the earnings of some staff members and workers 
have declined, and increasing numbers of personnel who have lost 
positions and are looking for employment are facing quite a few 
difficulties in their livelihood and in finding new employment. 
Transportation difficulties remain a rather conspicuous problem. 
Housing is in short supply for those who must be moved to make 
way for municipal government construction or when parcels of 
land are leased, and the facilities in newly built housing areas 
are not complete, occasioning much inconvenience in the daily 
life and work of large numbers of residents. Vegetables are in 
short supply and prices have risen substantially. The government 
is still in the exploration stage regarding regulation and 
control of the economy under market economy conditions. It lacks 
experience. Many weaknesses remain in urban planning and 
administration, social order, and safety in production. All 
these matters require our conscientious solution in the course 
of future work. 
  In reviewing the work of the past year, the main knowledge 
we 
have gained from experience is as follows: 
  First is adherence to "development is the last word," 
seizing opportunities to advance development. Socialism 
requires the development of productivity. If Shanghai is to 
realize the magnificent strategic goal of "a single turnkey and 
three centers," it will have to maintain high speed growth of 
the national economy for a fairly long time to come. During the 
past year, we seized the favorable opportunity that the world's 
good view of China, of Shanghai, and of Pudong provides to 
continue to attract foreign investment, which reached a new 
high. We made full use of the positive benefits for the speedy 
development of Shanghai that central government enhancement and 
improvement of macroeconomic regulation and control have 
brought. This has permitted us to maintain a fine momentum of 
sustained, speedy, and healthy development of the national 
economy. Practice makes us realize that development is the last 
word. We must accelerate development; we must seize favorable 
opportunities in the macroeconomic environment; we must dare to 
meet challenges; we must be adept at transforming pressures into 
motivation; do more to seize opportunities, developing our own 
sense of urgency about the time, inculcate a scientific attitude 
of seeking truth in facts, and use improvement of the quality of 
economic growth as a springboard for making the maximum effort 
to move ahead with the building of the economy. 
  Second is perseverance in reform and opening to the 
outside world to move out in front, taking the lead in building 
a socialist market economy operating mechanism. Shanghai's 
strategic position in the overall pattern of nationwide reform 
and opening to the outside world during the 1990s requires it to 
be in the forefront of the whole country in reform and opening 
to the outside world. During 1993, we further emancipated 
thinking, proceeded from Shanghai's realities, dared to tackle 
tough problems, and dared to break new ground, courageously 
explored the building of large modern markets, promoted reform 
of the state-owned assets administration system, developed the 
share system and the share cooperative system, and widened the 
opening to the outside world. Consequently the fundamental role 
of the market in allocating resources, and the central role of 
Shanghai markets in allocating resources were further exercised, 
infusing new vitality into the development of the economy. 
Practice shows that only by moving out in front in adhering to 
reform and the opening to the outside world can economic 
development steadily make new strides upward and can we 
discharge the heavy tasks that history has conferred on us to 
make new contributions to China's modernization. 
  Third is insistence on beginning at a high starting 
point in building the city, laying a foundation for the building 
of a modern international city. Building the city requires 
insistence on beginning at a high starting point. This is an 
objective requirement for Shanghai becoming a modern 
international city. In 1993, we convened a citywide planning 
work conference where we began to study the overall framework 
for amending the Shanghai municipal master plan, presented ideas 
for building a central commercial district, key commercial 
areas, and setting up a bi-level city, unfolded a strategic plan 
titled "Shanghai Striding Toward the 21st Century," and 
concentrated forces on building some major infrastructure 
projects at the international level. Facts show that Shanghai 
has entered a new stage of all-out promotion of urban 
modernization and transformation. Henceforth, we shall 
continue to move ahead steadily with modernization of the city, 
meeting needs in "orienting toward the world, orienting toward 
the twenty-first century, and orienting toward modernization." 
  Fourth is perseverance in correctly handling the 
correlation among reform, development, and stability to create a 
fine social environment for reform and development. Reform 
is the powerhouse; development is the goal; stability is the 
prerequisite. Without social stability, reform, opening to the 
outside world, and economic construction will accomplish 
nothing. During 1993, we adhered to a policy of working at 
multiple tasks at the same time, and working with might and 
main, vigorously buttressing the building of socialist spiritual 
civilization, and constantly regarding maintenance of social 
stability as a major matter bearing on the overall situation. We 
made timely readjustments in the intensity of reforms that had a 
substantial impact on enterprises, staff members, and workers; 
we set and gradually put into effect insurance measures such as 
minimum wage standards for incumbent staff members and workers, 
and minimum living standards for city and town residents; we 
worked hard to solve the problem of finding housing for people 
moved because of municipal government construction projects and 
the leasing of land; we arranged for supplies of principle farm 
and agricultural sideline products including grain, edible oil, 
and vegetables; we bent efforts to solve problems of major 
concern to the public and real difficulties in daily life; and 
we cracked down hard on all sorts of criminal activities. 
Through practice, we learned the need for carefully considering 
the timeliness and intensity of reforms; we unflaggingly 
bolstered the building of socialist spiritual civilization; we 
channeled, protected, and made the most of the enthusiasm of the 
broad masses; and we employed every means to safeguard social 
stability and unity. This is the only way to ensure new advances 
in reform and opening to the outside world, to move ahead 
steadily with development of the economy, and to bring about new 
changes in the appearance of the city. 
  Fifth is concentration on key matters to ensure change 
in one year and big changes in three years. In the course 
of building "one turnkey and three centers," Shanghai must do a 
very great number of things. It must be adept at giving 
attention to those things that have a major effect on the 
situation as a whole, and on key links that play a decisive role 
in bringing about change in a single year. During 1993, we 
placed the emphasis in economic development on fostering new 
mainstay industries. In building the city, we concentrated on 
the major project of building the framework for a surface and 
underground transportation network. In reform, we emphasized the 
building of a modern city. In opening to the outside world, we 
emphasized the new approach of increasing the use of foreign 
investment; and in the development of Pudong, we focused on 
function. Practice has demonstrated that only by emphasizing key 
points, and being adept at concentrating forces on crucial links 
in all our work can we effect a change in one year and big 
changes in three years. 
<H5>  2. Seize Opportunities To Promote Development and Continue </H5>
To Usher in a New Situation in National Economic and Social 
Development 
  Shanghai has now entered an important stage of sustained, 
fast, and healthy economic development that offers extremely 
favorable opportunities. Internationally, the whole world looks 
with favor on the trend of China's economic development. 
Shanghai and Pudong have become investment hot spots both 
domestically and abroad. Domestically, China's overall national 
strength is steadily growing. Reform and opening to the outside 
world have infused economic development with powerful vitality. 
They have created a favorable macroeconomic environment for 
Shanghai's reform and development. In Shanghai itself, overall 
economic strength has increased markedly. Strategic adjustment 
of the industrial structure has accelerated, the investment 
climate has steadily improved, and the basic material conditions 
are in being to maintain fairly rapid economic growth. Even 
though there may be difficulties and detours along the way, we 
are fully capable of developing better and faster; we are fully 
capable of shouldering the important historic mission that 
history has bestowed on us. 
  The year 1994 is a key one for China's promotion of reforms 
for the building of a socialist market economy, and it is also a 
decisive year for the people of Shanghai to bring about a change 
in one year and great changes in three years. The overall 
guiding thought for the economic and social development of 
Shanghai is as follows: full implementation of the spirit 
of the 14th Party Congress and the Third Plenary Session of the 
14th Party Central Committee, and the Second Plenary Session of 
the 6th Shanghai Municipal CPC Committee, emancipating thinking, 
seeking truth in facts, daring to innovate, and being skillful 
in breaking new ground; to take more solid actions from a newer 
and higher base point, seizing opportunities, deepening reform, 
expanding the opening to the outside world, promoting 
development, and maintaining stability; to score new 
ground-breaking advances for taking the lead in establishing a 
socialist market economy operating mechanism, striving to 
maintain sustained, rapid, and healthy development of the 
national economy, promoting social progress, and bringing about 
coordinated economic and social development. 
  With this guiding thought as a foundation, during the coming 
year we will have to strive to complete the following six main 
tasks in economic construction and social development: 
  First is continuing to maintain a fine momentum in the 
sustained, rapid, and healthy development of the national 
economy. Shanghai's realization of its long-term 
development objectives will require continued implementation of 
the "3, 2, 1" industrial development policy, persisting in 
taking domestic and foreign market demand as the orientation, 
doing all possible to readjust the industrial structure, 
accelerating technological progress, developing the city in 
every way, effecting a complete rise in economic returns, and 
ensuring sustained and steady ground of the economy. Plans 
call for a 12 percent increase in the city's GNP during 1994. In 
the actual process of achieving this, we must strive for real 
growth that is no lower than last year while simultaneously 
controlling at around 15 percent the degree of rise in overall 
retail prices. 
  Acceleration of the strategic adjustment of the industrial 
structure. Optimization of the industrial structure is an 
important foundation for improving the quality of economic 
growth. The percentage of tertiary industries' contribution to 
GNP must be increased to around 40 percent together with the 
fostering and development of modern markets, and emphasis on the 
development of finance and banking, commerce and trade, real 
estate, transportation, communications, information, tourism, 
and service businesses, with more progress being made in the 
automation of finance and banking, and trade. Secondary 
industries must strive to increase output, increase markets, and 
improve quality and returns. They must particularly concentrate 
energies on 18 key technological transformation projects having 
a high level of technology, good market prospects, marked 
economic returns, and that are able to play a supporting role 
such as the second phase of the Sangtana [phonetic] sedan 
project, and the Bell programmable switchboard expansion project 
to raise the overall level of Shanghai's industry. They must 
vigorously develop mainstay industries including motor vehicles, 
communications, electric power stations, computers, and 
household appliances, actively advancing high and new technology 
industrialization, particularly in the microelectronics and 
biological engineering fields. They must continue to emphasize 
key new product development and production, shaping a complete 
development system for new products that includes promotion, 
opening up new markets, and keeping stocks on hand. They must 
initiate "turnkey plans" that enhance ability to export, 
emphasizing support for the 100 products and firms whose exports 
earn upward of $50 million in foreign exchange. The primary 
industry must accelerate structural readjustments as the market 
requires to spur the further development of agriculture toward 
high yields, premium quality, and high returns. 
  Opening of markets everywhere: The constantly expanding 
ultimate requirement is maintenance of dependable power for 
sustained economic growth. All concerns must maintain a market 
orientation, increase their consciousness of market competition, 
improve their sales ability, and vigorously open up markets, 
making increase in Shanghai products' market share, coverage 
rate, and customer satisfaction rate both at home and abroad the 
premier task in promoting economic development, and doing it 
solidly, painstakingly, and well. They must increase the degree 
to which commodity circulation is socialized and organized by 
readjusting the organizational structure of wholesale firms, 
developing nationwide or regional chain enterprises, setting up 
commodity distribution centers, and forming highly efficient, 
rational, and open commodity wholesale and retail networks made 
up of firms under different forms of ownership and having 
different forms of organization. They must borrow successful 
domestic and foreign experiences to improve their sales methods, 
to improve their sales corps, to do a good job of providing 
service before and after sales, to institute various kinds of 
distribution stimulation mechanisms, and to increase the 
enthusiasm of sales personnel. They must open up markets in 
order to expand sales and to ensure that high speed economic 
growth is sustained and stable. 
  Use of many channels to raise money for building the 
economy: 
Increased investment is necessary to support sustained economic 
growth. Many methods such as the auctioning of medium and small 
concerns, real estate transfers, land leasing, sales of business 
premises, and speedier building of commercial housing were 
employed in moving state-owned assets to the market to turn them 
into money, thereby opening new channels for raising money for 
economic construction. The amount of foreign capital used 
continued to be expanded, efforts focusing on increasing the 
rate at which foreign capital was provided, the actual amount of 
foreign capital invested increased, and new means actively 
explored to use foreign capital to accelerate the building of 
urban infrastructure. Planning was coordinated, all categories 
of funds used well and imaginatively to increase returns from 
the use of funds. Investment tilt policies continued to ensure 
the building of Pudong development projects, major municipal 
government infrastructure projects, high and new technology 
industry project, important technological transformation 
projects, and foreign-capitalized projects for which contracts 
had already been signed. 
  Second is continuing to move ahead with development of 
the Pudong new zone. 
  In the development of Pudong during 1994, we must continue 
to 
hurry to take the lead in establishing a socialist market 
economy operating mechanism and in meshing with international 
markets, making further use of the zone's "turnkey" role, basic 
development, functional development and urban area development 
proceeding at the same time to produce a new situation of 
all-around acceleration of Pudong's development and opening up. 
The degree of increase in main economic indicators in the new 
zone must be higher than the average for the city as a whole. 
  Highlighting of key points, paying close attention to 
progress in construction that conveys an image. Efforts must be 
concentrated on urgent construction of the highway 
transportation network in the new zone, on starting construction 
of the Zhangyang Road widening project, on the Yanan East Road 
tunnel and multiple ancillary road projects in the Pudong 
section, on the first phase of the outer ring Grand Canal water 
conservancy project, and on the Jinqiao crossover project; on 
doing a good job on the Pudong section of the outer ring road, 
and the Outer Gaoqiao power plant second stage project's early 
stage preparatory work. The total area developed in the key 
sub-zone must reach 15 square kilometer areas. In the Lujiazui 
finance, banking, and trade area, the beginning of work and 
construction of nearly 100 high rise buildings must be speeded 
up, thirty buildings rising more than 40 meters above the ground 
during 1994, and nearly 20 buildings being capped to display an 
image of a group of modern buildings in Pudong's downtown area. 
In the Jinqiao export processing zone, close attention must be 
given to the completion of work and coming on stream of 80 
enterprises, and work on 150 projects now under construction to 
make this area an important new export processing base. In the 
Outer Gaoqiao bonded zone, the sealed off operating area must be 
expanded to 4 square kilometers to bring the bonded means of 
production exchange market to proper size that enhances its 
function as a point from which free trade emanates to maintain 
the trend toward manifold increase in total import-export trade 
volume within the zone. In the Zhangjiang High Technology Park, 
the building of infrastructure such as roads and a transformer 
station must accelerate, a widespread campaign must be launched 
to attract traders, development and construction taking on a new 
appearance as quickly as possible. 
  Planning and Construction of Downtown Pudong. The new Pudong 
zone is a symbol of the new Shanghai. Simultaneous with close 
attention to revision of the new zone's urban development master 
plan, a detailed control plan should be drawn up as quickly as 
possible for downtown Pudong that sets forth the layout of 
commercial zones, industrial zones, and living areas. The new 
Pudong zone should be the area between the main street in Pudong 
and Yanggao Road centering on the existing main development 
sub-zone. Four main zones should be planned and built, namely 
Outer Gaoqiao to Gaoqiao, Jinqiao to Qingning Temple, Zhangjiang 
to Beicai, and Lujiazui to Huamu. The central axis avenue 
through the Lujiazui area must be opened up quickly, and the 
building of a group of modern structures along both sides of the 
avenue planned. Close attention must be given to the 
construction of a number of hospitals, schools, and cultural and 
amusement facilities to promote the advancement of all social 
endeavors. In addition, with the completion of work on main 
parts of the infrastructure, scenic roads, and the main 
landscape, transportation, plantings, environmental sanitation, 
and environmental protection tasks should be tackled to spruce 
up the appearance and ambience of the new zone. The new Pudong 
zone must improve government at the grassroots level, increase 
social control, and fashion a more complete administrative 
system. 
  Third is moving ahead vigorously with the city's 
modernization. 
  Speeding up the city's modernization, steadily changing the 
look of the city is not only the most important mark of the 
major changes to be made in three years, but even more a 
necessity for building a modern international city. We must 
insist on a high starting point and high standards, incessantly 
advancing the modernization of the city. 
  We must continue to concentrate energies on the building of 
municipal government projects, particularly on roads and 
transportation arteries. We should complete a large number of 
major engineering projects within the year as follows: the 
number one project is the inner circumferential highway, work on 
the second phase elevated road on the inner circumferential 
highway completed to permit opening of the entire highway to 
traffic. The number two project is complete transformation of 
People's Square including completion of the square's roads, 
plantings, lighting, government administration buildings, and 
decoration of the museum's exterior walls, as well as cleaning 
up the roads in the vicinity of the square so that it can be 
completely opened for the national anniversary. The number three 
project is the subway's number 1 line, the whole line from new 
Longhua to the new passenger station opened and tested. Other 
projects are linking together the sections of the entire six 
lane elevated portion of the Chengdu Road elevated highway 
project; beginning of construction on the Yanan East Road tunnel 
and multiple lanes; phase two of the water diversion in the 
upper reaches of the Huangpu Jiang should enter the substantive 
construction stage; early stage preparatory work must be done 
for Pudong International Airport, the number 2 subway line, the 
deep water port at Jinshanzui, the southwest section of the 
outer circumferential highway project, and the river crossing 
project. More work must be done on the feasibility of the Chang 
Jiang water diversion plan. Power plant construction must be 
speeded up to ensure that the Outer Gaoqiao Power Plant's first 
300,000 kilowatt unit generates power for the grid. Every effort 
should be made to start work within the year on the eighth phase 
of the Wujing Power Plant project. We must continue to implement 
the principle of concentrating energies to wage a war of 
annihilation, ensuring availability of project funds and 
materials, rigorously enforcing construction controls, and 
giving substance to measures for producing premium quality, 
expert, and safe construction to ensure that the building of all 
major projects moves along smoothly. During the coming year, we 
must also address the construction of a number of medium and 
small size highway transportation projects that require little 
investment, can be completed in a short time, and that show 
quick results. We must repair and renovate three seriously 
damaged roads including Honghe New Road. We must build or 
renovate four crossovers such as those on Jiangsu Road and 
Shandong Road; and we must encourage and support jurisdictions 
in widening and building a number of local roads to improve the 
city's road transportation facilities and ease the city's 
traffic problems. 
  Large Scale Housing Construction. We must attain the goal of 
10 square meters per capita of living space by the end of the 
present century. We must arouse the interest of all quarters for 
continued acceleration of the housing construction pace, 
striving to vault ahead during 1994 to completion of 7 million 
square meters of housing. Each year from now on, we must break 
new ground each year, and gradually improve housing construction 
and design standards. At the same time, we must raze 1 million 
square meters of dangerous old houses. This will require finding 
accommodations for the residents who will have to move. 
Realization of the above goals will require, first, finding 
project financing channels, actively moving ahead with 
attracting foreign investment in pilot projects for the sale of 
houses in China for a widening of sources of funding for 
dwelling construction. Second, it will require close attention 
to advance preparations for the state-stipulated "peaceful 
dwelling project" for the energetic building of economically 
practical housing in the shaping of an economical practical 
housing supply system. Third, it will require better control 
over real estate dealings and development corporations, the 
energies of many quarters aroused to accelerate residential 
housing construction. Governments at all levels must tilt land 
use, funds, and policies in favor of housing construction, and 
they must genuinely pay close attention to the public 
construction of amenities in newly built residential areas. 
  Moving Ahead With the Building of the Urban Ecological 
Environment. Environmental protection is a basic national policy 
in China, and creation of a fine ecological environment is a key 
task in Shanghai's construction of a modern international city. 
  In 1994, we shall focus on "greening projects" in the 
building of the city's ecological environment. Work has begun on 
building a large green strip 500 meters wide around the entire 
city outside the circumferential highway; in the upper reaches 
of the Huangpu Jiang, various forest belts have been built; and 
inside the Zhongshan circumferential highway, various type of 
green lands have been newly planted and expanded in connection 
with the transformation of the old area. Planting of greenery on 
building balconies and rooftops is strongly encouraged as part 
of the greening of residential and factory areas and greater 
greening of public places. Willful encroachments on green areas 
in violation of the law will be resolutely halted. During 1994, 
the public green space is to reach 1.4 square meters per capita 
for a 15 percent coverage. Close attention shall be given to 
cleaning up the urban environment, the emphasis being on 
prevention and control of industrial pollution. The spread of 
seriously polluting industries and projects is to be strictly 
controlled. The movement and cleaning up of seriously polluting 
enterprises (workshops) is to be accelerated. Real actions will 
be taken to protect sources of potable water, and to control 
urban noise to advance the integrated development of the economy 
and the environment. At the same time, vigorous efforts will be 
made to intensify propaganda and education about environmental 
protection and greening for further enhancement of ecological 
awareness. Thus people throughout the city can make a positive 
contribution by adding a little green and adding a little beauty 
to improve the appearance of Shanghai's urban environment. 
  Efforts To Improve Urban Administration. Full hearing of the 
views of experts and all quarters forms the basis for amending 
and improving the urban development master plan. Legal, 
economic, and administrative means will be used in accordance 
with the principle of level-by-level administration and showing 
efficiency to improve urban plan control to ensure realization 
of plan objectives. More must be done to improve urban traffic 
control, traffic controlled strictly according to law. The 
traffic clean-up and propaganda campaigns should continue, the 
removal of clutter on the streets, violations of regulations 
corrected, and promotion of smooth traffic flow being the 
emphasis. The traffic methods used in large international cities 
should be studied, priority going to public transportation to 
ensure a smooth flow of public transportation. Certain public 
transportation roads should be opened or extended to ease 
problems in traveling via public transportation. The city's 
appearance and environmental sanitation should be better 
controlled to make Shanghai a city renowned for its cleanliness 
throughout the country, celebration of the forty-fifth national 
anniversary [1994] serving as the turning point. While moving 
ahead actively with the building of environmental sanitation 
projects, we must go all out to improve the city's appearance 
and improve environmental sanitation, further raising the 
overall level of sanitation in the city. We must also improve 
fire prevention, flood prevention, and production safety in an 
effort to reduce losses from disasters and to prevent major 
accidents. 
  Fourth Is Better Work in Agriculture and Rural Villages 
To Spur All-Around Development of the Suburban Economy 
  The suburban economy holds an extremely important place in 
Shanghai's development strategy. We must conscientiously carry 
out the spirit of the central government's rural work conference 
for genuine improvement of agriculture, actively exploring new 
avenues for the economic development of the suburbs of an 
exceptional large city. 
  We must continue to stabilize agricultural production by 
vigorously developing the economy of the suburbs. All trades and 
industries must show concern for and vigorously support 
agriculture. Numerous channels and numerous levels must be used 
to raise funds for the development of agriculture. We must 
continue to increase investment in agriculture, persevere in 
relying on science and technology to develop agriculture, work 
hard to increase capital construction for farmland water 
conservancy, and improve ability to withstand natural disasters. 
We must set up commodity grain field sanctuaries and year-round 
vegetable field sanctuaries in a planned way; set up 
agricultural demonstration zones and horticulture demonstration 
zones that produce high yields, premium quality, and high 
returns; perfect agricultural risk funds; protect the peasants' 
interests; and promote the stability and improvement of suburban 
agriculture. We must solidify and improve "market basket" 
projects to ensure that the suburban vegetable growing area 
remains at 150,000 mu, properly adjust the pattern of vegetable 
growing and nonstaple food growing bases, and begin to build a 
number of new vegetable and horticultural farms to be ready 
within three years. This will enable an increase from the 
present 170,000 mu to 250,000 mu in the high yield, assured 
harvest, canopied vegetable field area, thereby stabilizing and 
increasing vegetable and nonstaple food production in an effort 
to even out supplies reaching market. We must optimize the 
varieties produced, speed up the pace at which vegetables and 
nonstaple foods are deeply processed, and develop small 
packaging of cleaned vegetables and nonstaple foods to meet the 
consumption needs of different strata. We must actively support 
vegetable growing areas set up vegetable dealing group 
corporations, experiment with the operation of vegetable 
exchanges mostly for wholesaling, practice a "combination of 
agriculture and trade and linking urban districts with rural 
counties" in greater Shanghai, gradually set up sales networks 
in the urban area, and organize the direct marketing of 
vegetables to ensure the vegetable supply and to stabilize 
vegetable prices. At the same time, we must improve control over 
country fair markets, resolutely halting the jacking up of 
prices, and cracking down on efforts to dominate markets. How 
well the suburban economy develops depends on the overall 
economic strength of large cities. We must avail ourselves of 
the chance that strategic readjustment of the city's functions, 
industrial make-up, and layout provides to match up and link 
together counties, districts, and locales to reinforce each 
others strengths, the counties (or districts) having requisite 
conditions thereby combining to expand the use of foreign 
capital to concentrate on the building of an industrial 
development zone having a certain scale and characteristics that 
increase the overall caliber of suburban economic development. 
  Continued Intensification of Rural Economic System Reform. 
We 
should actively try out reform of the agricultural land use 
system, separating the "three rights" of land ownership rights, 
contracting rights, and operating rights as a means of improving 
the protection of land resources, developing farming on a proper 
scale, and raising the level of agricultural production. We 
hould accelerate reform of the rural commodity flow system, 
organizing the peasants to expand from the production area to 
the commodity flow area, combining the development of 
agricultural and sideline products processing with the fostering 
of rural markets, particularly rural key elements of production 
markets. We must suit general methods to specific circumstances 
to build a number of high starting point, regional agricultural 
and sideline products exchanges for vigorous development of an 
economic system in which production, processing and marketing 
are part of a whole for gradual raising of the level of 
socialized services in agriculture. We must continue to promote 
the joint-stock cooperation system for further increase in the 
vitality of township and town enterprises. We must make fullest 
use of the positive role of arms in accelerating reform of the 
rural economic system and development of a modern suburban 
economy. 
  Active Advances in the Urbanization of Rural Villages. 
Acceleration of the urbanization of suburban rural villages is 
an important integral part of Shanghai's modernization. We are 
moving ahead step by step with the urbanization of suburban 
rural villages, actively setting the stage for the gradual 
development of secondary cities within the city in accordance 
with the requirements of Shanghai's urban development master 
plan, and using a unified plan as a premise. The aim is moderate 
development of small cities and towns. We will closely link the 
building of cities and towns with the building of small 
industrial zones, the building of infrastructure, and the 
development of tertiary industries. We will accelerate planning 
and building of suburban tourism facilities, concentrating on 
the development of the Sheshan modern tourism and amusement area 
and the Dianshan Hu resort area. We will continue to do early 
stage preparatory work on the Huangsha Island tourist vacation 
area. We will do a good job of planning and building suburban 
road transportation, striving to build a fairly complete, high 
standards, arterial road transportation network in each county 
(and district) during the next two or three years. Running water 
is to be supplied to suburban rural villages this year. In 
addition, we must devote serious attention to improving the 
peasant's cultural level and overall quality of life, and 
improve overall rural administration to set the stage for early 
urbanization of rural villages. 
  Fifth Is Vigorous Development of Scientific and 
Technical, and Educational Endeavors To Provide Strong Technical 
and Intellectual Support for Modernization 
  Maintenance of sustained, rapid, and healthy development of 
the national economy relies, in a fundamental sense, on the 
development of science and technology, and improvement of the 
caliber of the citizenry. We must accelerate reform and the pace 
of development of scientific and technical education to make the 
fullest use of Shanghai's scientific and technical, and human 
resources advantages. 
  Scientific and technical work must be further suited to the 
development of a socialist market economy. We must actively spur 
close links between science and technology and the economy. We 
must accelerate the transformation of traditional industries 
through high and new technology. We must devote serious 
attention to the assimilation and absorption of imported 
technology, and to innovation. We must use biological 
engineering and pharmaceuticals, and computers and their 
applications to break into high and new technology industries. 
We must translate important scientific and technical research 
results into production, stressing support for the 100 
scientific and technical items that can help readjust the 
make-up of industry, whose market prospects are good, and that 
bring substantial sales within the next several years. We must 
further develop and perfect technology exchanges, and build 
associated technology exchange service centers. We must 
intensify reform of the science and technology system, 
accelerate the transformation of scientific research organs and 
institutions, promote readjustments in the make-up of scientific 
research institutes, encourage research units and enterprises to 
forge links with each other, when possible, or enterprise 
entrepreneurial blocs or become scientific and technical 
enterprises. We must continue to pay close attention to basic 
research, and we must maintain continuity among and train a 
number of middle age and young permanent research cadres. We 
must intensify research in the social sciences, actively 
exploring important theoretical and practical problems in reform 
and opening to the outside world, and in development. We must be 
sure to study the major development strategy for "Shanghai 
marching into the twenty-first century" to provide scientific 
data for government macropolicies. 
  In education, we must conscientiously put into practice 
"China's Educational Reform and Development Program," and the 
"Teachers' Law," further establishing education's strategic 
position in overall and leading basic industries in Shanghai's 
economic development to score new advances in developing 
undertakings, straightening out systems, transforming 
mechanisms, and increasing investment. We must put into practice 
a high quality nine-year compulsory education system, continue 
to move ahead with reform of intermediate and primary school 
courses and teaching materials, generally improve teaching 
quality and the ways schools are run, accelerate the building of 
a vocational and technical educational system, pay close 
attention to carrying out the "training project for talent in 
short supply in Shanghai during the 1990s," actively move ahead 
with key construction projects at institutions of higher 
education and make changes in their layout, do a good job of 
running pilot projects for the "joint building" of institutions 
of higher education in Shanghai in conjunction with central 
government ministries and commissions, and promote an optimum 
allocation of educational resources. We must accelerate reform 
of the school operating system, improve level-by-level 
administration and tailored guidance in education, and intensify 
guidance and administration of non-government run schools and 
international cooperatively run schools. We must intensify 
reform of schools internal administrative systems, do more to 
build the teaching corps, further rouse the zeal of the rank and 
file of teachers, and strive to improve returns from the 
operation of schools. We must continue to move ahead with reform 
of the school enrollment and employment system. Depending on 
social need and the ability of the public to pay for it, we must 
expand somewhat the percentage of student enrollments at their 
own expense, and perfect a series of associated measures. 
Schools of all kinds at all levels must intensify and improve 
ethical education to promote students' full development. 
Governments at all levels must continue to increase investment 
in education, raising money for education through many channels, 
Society as a whole must be concerned about and support education. 
  Sixth Is Intensification of the Building of Spiritual 
Civilization to Improve Further the City's Cultural Level and 
Maintain Social Stability 
  Under the new circumstances of moving ahead vigorously with 
reform and opening to the outside world, and accelerating 
economic construction, we must persevere in working at multiple 
tasks at the same time, and working with might and main. We must 
persist in developing the economy and society together, 
intensify the building of socialist spiritual civilization, and 
strive to safeguard the fine social atmosphere and social order 
to create a stable and fine social environment for reform, 
opening to the outside world, and development of the economy. 
  During 1994, we must be guided by the theory for building a 
distinctively Chinese brand of socialism. By way of celebrating 
the forty-fifth anniversary of the liberation of Shanghai and 
the national anniversary, and in order to improve the caliber of 
the people of Shanghai and the city's cultural level, we must 
intensify education in patriotism, collectivism, and socialism. 
We must intensify education in ethics, social morality, and 
family precepts and ethics. We must continue mass spiritual 
civilization building campaigns such as "study knowledge, study 
science, and study technology." We must encourage fine social 
mores and refined and healthy life styles, and strive to 
nurture a new generation of people possessed of ideals, virtue, 
culture, and discipline. We must focus the creativity of the 
public on the magnificent goals of making Shanghai prosper and 
developing Pudong. We must continue to do a good job of the army 
and the people building together, and the army supporting the 
people and the people supporting the army to intensify unity 
between the army and the people. We must intensify national 
defense education, do a good job of finding work for retired 
servicemen, and of militia and reserves work. We must accelerate 
the building of cultural and physical education facilities, 
substantially completing construction of the Pearl of the Orient 
Television Tower, and the new wing of the Shanghai Museum during 
1994, ensure that work begins on building the big Shanghai 
Theater, and take in hand fund raising and preparatory work for 
construction of an 80,000 seat sports stadium. We must persist 
in serving the people, in serving socialism, and in a policy of 
letting a hundred flowers blossom and a hundred schools of 
thought contend so that cultural endeavors will flourish even 
more. We must propagate main themes, promote diversity, and 
actively support refined arts and outstanding literary works to 
enrich the spiritual life of the people. We must do a good job 
of running a series of major activities including the Shanghai 
International Culture and Arts Festival, the Shanghai 
International Youth and Children's Cultural and Arts Festival, 
the Fifth Shanghai International Television Festival to promote 
Shanghai's cultural exchange and cooperation with the outside 
world. We must accelerate cultural system reform, gradually 
shaping a new pattern in which the government and society run 
cultural events together, government putting up most of the 
money. We must run pilot projects to transform and reform 
literary and artistic groups to increase the vitality of 
literary and artistic groups and promote improvement of literary 
and artistic creativity and performances. We must make a major 
effort to develop cultural enterprises, continue to improve 
control of the cultural market, and perfect cultural economics 
policies. We must actively conduct mass cultural and physical 
education activities, promote development and improvement of 
physical education, strive to raise the level of Shanghai's 
sports activities, and do a truly good job of preparing for the 
Eighth All-China Games. We must do more to develop medical 
treatment and health work to improve medical care. We must 
improve the level-by-level administration and management by 
objective responsibility systems. We must pay close attention to 
sanitation and sickness preventions work, particularly 
intestinal tact diseases to control the incidence of 
communicable diseases. We must take strong action to control the 
soaring cost of medical treatment. We must do more to build 
medical ethics and medical demeanor in an effort to improve the 
quality of medical treatment. We must continue a fine 
performance in planned parenthood, adhering to a policy of 
producing fine offspring who receive fine nurture, earnestly 
improving floating population planned parenthood control. 
  While reforming and developing, we must maintain stability. 
Governments at all levels must take effective actions for proper 
solution to various conflicts and problems that arise in the 
reform and development process. They must particularly exercise 
a high degree of responsibility and pay close attention to 
problems affecting the basic livelihood and personal interests 
of the masses. They must devote extreme energy to freeing the 
public from worries and hardships. When problems cannot be 
solved at once, they must be carefully looked into to gain the 
understanding and pardon of the public. We must strive to remove 
conflicts of all kinds to eliminate factors causing instability. 
In no case may negligence and dereliction of duty be 
countenanced. A diligent job must be done in controlling the 
floating population from elsewhere. Control systems must be 
established and perfected. Workers from elsewhere who are taking 
part in Shanghai's economic construction and are engaged in 
legitimate businesses should be provided needed conditions and 
services. We must safeguard their legitimate rights and 
interests in an effort to maintain social stability. We must 
further improve overall control of social order, crack down hard 
on all forms of criminal behavior, and spend greater energy on 
maintaining order in public places. We must continue to 
"prohibit prostitution, prohibit pornography, and prohibit 
narcotics," effectively controlling the proliferation and spread 
of all kinds of social ills to promote a further change for the 
food of the social atmosphere. 
<H5>  3. Intensification of Reform, Emphasizing New Approaches, </H5>
and Hastening the Pace of Establishing a Socialist Market 
Economy Operating Mechanism. 
  "Decisions of the CPC Central Committee on Various Problems 
in Establishing the Socialist Market Economy System" is the 
master plan for China's establishment of a socialist market 
economy system. It is the operating program for economic system 
reform during the 1990s. Proceeding from the overall 
requirements of economic system reform, the CPC Central 
Committee and State Council set forth major reform measures 
regarding fiscal revenues, finance and banking, planning, 
investment, foreign trade, and state-owned assets. These will 
help shape an overall administrative system suited to 
requirements for developing a socialist market economy. They 
will help advance economic construction, and they will also help 
implementation of Shanghai's long-term development strategy. 
Shanghai must unswervingly and completely organize 
implementation. Shanghai must do a good job of putting in place 
a new fiscal system in the city proper, its districts, and rural 
counties, following the principle of a uniform tax code, fair 
tax burdens, a simplified taxation system, and reasonable 
division of authority. It must also gradually improve the local 
tax collection system. It must open financial markets, 
accelerate the separation of banks that do business for policy 
reasons from commercial banks, and found urban cooperative banks 
and rural cooperative banks. It must spell out who are to be the 
main investors, and regulate investment conduct. It must 
gradually set up a foreign trade operating mechanism that is in 
keeping with international practice; and it must continue to 
move ahead with pilot projects for reform of the state-owned 
assets control system. While actively and completely 
implementing major central government reform measures, it must 
continue to break new ground in important areas and key links of 
reform and opening to the outside world as Shanghai's 
circumstances require and in accordance with the need to be a 
leader. 
  First Is Acceleration of the Building of a Modern 
Enterprise System Establishment of a modern enterprise 
system holds important significance for improving the 
administration and management of large- and medium-sized 
state-owned enterprises, and for improving competitiveness, the 
better to exercise a leading role. Shanghai is a place in which 
state-owned enterprises, particularly large and medium 
state-owned enterprises are fairly highly concentrated. It is 
necessary to set up modern enterprise systems to speed up 
clarification of equity rights, the division of authority and 
responsibility, the separation of government administration and 
enterprise management, and for management science. Share system 
corporations that are already listed on the stock market must 
improve their internal organizational and administrative systems 
to meet the basic requirements of a modern enterprise system. 
State-owned large and medium size enterprises that have gained 
marked results in the transformation of their operating 
mechanisms may reorganize according to law to become single 
investor sole proprietorship limited liability corporations. In 
addition, is faster readjustment of assets on hand to enable 
some enterprises or companies to become limited liability 
corporations having multiple investment entities, nd to 
encourage various kinds of enterprises invest jointly for an 
organizational change to limited liability joint-stock 
corporations. Ways and means must be studied to solve the 
various historical burdens of state-owned enterprises in order 
to created the necessary conditions for reorganizing in 
corporate form. Following approval, state-owned enterprises that 
have sustained losses for a long period may be permitted to halt 
payment of interest, which suspended from accounts or posted to 
accounts. Needed associated policies should be added to help 
these enterprises get out of their predicament. For the small 
number of enterprises who have no prospect of reversing losses 
even after making an effort to do so, and who are unable to 
repay indebtedness on time, bankruptcy should be conducted 
according to law in separate, step-by-step, orderly ways. 
Special attention must be given to finding jobs for the staff 
members and workers of bankrupt enterprises, and enterprises 
that are doing well should be encouraged to buy or merge with 
these enterprises, bankruptcy and buy outs or mergers being 
meshed for gradual formation of a survival of the fittest 
mechanism. In order to ensure that enterprise reform proceeds 
smoothly, we must further improve the unemployment and old age 
insurance systems, actively setting the stage for hastening 
implementation of a staff member and worker medical insurance 
system, and the inauguration of commercial insurance for the 
rapid formation of a multilevel, multiform social insurance 
system that covers all workers. 
  Second Is Founding of Many Kinds of Large Enterprise 
Blocs. Innovation of an enterprise organizational system in 
which the founding of large blocs is the key element not only 
helps establish a modern enterprise system, but also helps 
develop economies of scale to improve the competitiveness of 
Shanghai's enterprises in domestic and foreign markets. 
Industries, foreign trade, commercial, scientific and technical, 
and township and town enterprises having a development potential 
should be selected for the founding of large enterprise chains, 
conglomerates, enterprise blocs, and trans-national corporations 
that combine science, industry, commerce, and trade, in which 
finance and banking are the medium, assets are the bond, 
purchases and mergers are the basic methods, and expansion of 
domestic and foreign market share is the goal. Such blocs should 
be supported with an overall policy to promote the blending of 
industrial capital, finance capital, and commercial capital to 
make fullest use of combined economic and technical strength and 
economic self-control capabilities for the conduct of 
diversified business. This would enable them to become models 
and stimulators for Shanghai's establishment of a modern 
enterprise system. International experience should be vigorously 
applied to the founding of large blocs, conditions actively 
created for their founding and each bloc founded when conditions 
are ripe. Rushing headlong into mass action is to be guarded 
against at all costs. Enterprise blocs must focus on a 
transformation mechanism, develop the advantages of scale, and 
increase returns from the economies of scale, entering highly 
competitive domestic and international markets like a combined 
arms army. Thus, they will become the main growth point 
propelling Shanghai's economic development. 
  Third Is Hastening the Building of a Modern Market 
System. Only by building a modern systematized, 
regularized, and international modern large market can fullest 
use be made of the central role of Shanghai's markets in 
allocating resources. In 1994, the emphasis is on early 
systematization of markets, building new foreign exchange 
exchanges linked by a nationwide computer network; making active 
preparations to build gold markets that include gold jewelry and 
gold bars, gold negotiable instruments and the trading of gold 
futures; setting up equity trading markets to promote the 
monetarization of enterprise assets in being; further expansion 
of national debt exchanges to serve as open national operating 
centers; establishment of computer networks and integrated 
national financial credit centers, using the existing discount 
business as a basis for improving discount and rediscount 
markets; opening insurance markets and finance leasing markets; 
exploration of the founding of information markets; and setting 
up and perfecting standard, full service labor markets. Large 
markets of all kinds must speed up standardization, those having 
requisite conditions meshing with international markets as 
quickly as possible. We must make a positive effort to form as 
quickly as possible a large, modern market system that can plug 
into domestic and foreign financial flow, commodity flow, 
technology flow, human resources flow, and information flow. 
  Fourth, Concentrate Energies on Development of a 
Central Commercial District. A central commercial district 
is the main mark of a modern international city. Shanghai must 
accord an extremely important strategic position to the planning 
and construction of a central commercial district. Shanghai's 
central commercial district includes both the small Lujiazui 
district in Pudong and the Bund in Puxi. While speeding up large 
scale development of the small Lujiazui district, we will soon 
sell real estate and conduct open auctions in the Bund area to 
free up government office buildings so that finance and banking, 
trade, and other commercial institutions can congregate in this 
area as quickly as possible. First a finance and banking street 
is to built on the Bund. This is a major action that can be 
taken that requires little investment, will not require much 
time, will yield good results, and will have a great impact. 
Work will begin as quickly as possible in 1994. Income obtained 
from real estate sales minus costs involved in relocating 
people, will be applied exclusively to the building of the 
central commercial district. 
  Fifth Is Moving Ahead With Making Large State-Owned Key 
Enterprises Joint Ventures. As part of the orientation 
toward industrial restructuring, various means will be used, 
including inviting tenders from businessmen for whole 
industries, industries that cut across industrial lines, and 
industries that integrate production, marketing, and sales to 
stimulate joint ventures and cooperative ventures between large 
state-owned key enterprises with well-known foreign 
corporations, particularly in the fields of motor vehicles, 
communications, electronics, power station equipment, computers, 
petrochemicals, pharmaceuticals and fine chemicals, and 
metallurgy to create large industrial joint ventures in which 
the technology content is high, the advantages of size are 
great, and from which economic returns are good. This will bring 
in top flight technology and increase the scope of key 
industries, thereby enabling Shanghai's industry to maintain its 
leading position and attain the international advanced standard. 
  Sixth Is the Opening Up of New Fields for the Use of 
Foreign Capital. We must further widen the opening to the 
outside world, more actively and more effectively opening up new 
fields, new methods, and new approaches for the use of foreign 
capital. We must open bidding to foreign traders in connection 
with the mounting of the 10 major urban infrastructure 
engineering projects such as the outer ring of the 
circumferential highway, the subway number 2 line, and the 
Pudong International Airport. We must encourage foreign traders 
to take part in the construction of housing for domestic sale; 
and we must adopt new forms such as comprehensive investment and 
development, Sino-foreign joint venture stock companies, and 
BOT, using foreign capital to accelerate modernization of the 
city's infrastructure. We must expand both direct and indirect 
use of foreign capital to speed up the building of water 
conservancy for suburban farmland, and for developing more 
agricultural resources. We must try running Sino-foreign joint 
venture foreign trading companies; try out the establishment of 
Sino-foreign joint venture commercial wholesale enterprises and 
means of production retail enterprises; and explore joint 
ventures and cooperative ventures for commercial retail 
enterprises and foreign chain stores in an effort to get 
Shanghai's products into the international sales network. We 
must try operating and developing various kinds of overseas 
institutions for investment including joint finance, investment 
trust, and holding companies, operating in accordance with 
international practice in soliciting business in order to 
attract more medium and small investors abroad. We must attract 
foreign financial institutions, trans-national corporations, and 
well-known enterprise blocks to move their regional headquarters 
to Shanghai. We must organize foreign-owned financial 
institutions in Shanghai to provide syndicated credit. We must 
advance the opening to the outside world to a new level, to many 
fields, and more deeply. 
  Seventh Is Urging Township and Town Enterprises To Take 
a New Sino-Foreign Joint Venture Development Road Right 
now, we must especially explore the operation of modern joint 
venture enterprises with foreign traders by suburban township 
and town enterprise, large urban area industries, and large 
foreign trade enterprises. In conjunction with the strategic 
readjustment of the industrial structure and the location of 
productivity, we must use joint ventures and cooperative 
ventures as a means of linking the advantages that foreign 
businessmen have in the form of access to capital, technology, 
management, and the opening of foreign markets to the advantages 
that suburban villages possess in the form of low differential 
land rent, low labor costs, and plenty of space for development, 
and the advantages stemming from an exceptionally large city's 
overall total economic strength and general investment climate, 
the science and technology and the human resources in large 
industries, the market network and the business of large scale 
foreign trade. By so doing, township and town enterprises can 
move upward, improve quality, improve scale, and improve 
returns, township and town enterprises in the suburbs of an 
exceptionally large city, thereby taking a new road of 
development. 
  Eighth Is Continuance of Pilot Projects for Housing 
System Reform. We must diligently put into effect "State 
Council Decisions on Rapid Reform of the City and Town Housing 
System," adhering to the principle of simultaneous "selling, 
leasing, and building" to bring about the commercialization of 
housing actively and steadily. Dwelling sale prices must be set 
fairly, and the price ratio between renting and buying of 
publicly owned housing must be readjusted. We must used various 
forms of payment for housing purchases, payment in full being 
accorded favorable treatment, interest paid and profit earned on 
installment purchases; and application for mortgage payments may 
be used as well. We must make full use of public accumulation 
funds to set up mortgage funds to create conditions for low 
income staff members and workers to buy dwellings. Income 
derived from the sale of publicly owned housing should be used 
entirely for housing construction. At the same time, housing 
should be better managed, a concomitant real estate management 
service system set up. 
<H5>  4. Better Building of the Government Itself To Strive for </H5>
Realization of Shanghai's Strategic Goals 
  Realization of Shanghai's strategic goals is a magnificent 
but daunting task requiring that better building of the 
government itself be given an extremely important position. 
Acting under the supervision and with the support of the 
people's congress and its standing committee, and under 
supervision of democratic discussion by the CPPCC, governments 
at all levels should make policies democratic and scientific, 
increase economic administration and coordination capabilities, 
raise consciousness of administration according to law, promote 
honesty among government workers, and constantly open up new 
work vistas. 
  First Is a Genuine Transformation of Government 
Functions, Increasing Economic Administration and Coordination 
Capabilities. Governments at all levels must work in 
accordance with the principles of separating government 
administration from enterprise management, simplicity, 
uniformity, and effectiveness. They must gradually separate 
government's social and economic administrative functions from 
its state-owned enterprise ownership functions. They must 
completely grant to enterprises all the rights and 
responsibilities they should have. Government's economic 
management function is largely one of improving overall 
integration of the economy, doing a good job of building urban 
infrastructure, and creating a fine environment for economic 
development. The transformation of government functions, 
together with reform of the state-owned assets management system 
and the founding of large enterprise blocs should set the stage 
for the use of many methods for gradually reforming specific 
economic administrative organizations, and for improving 
multipurpose, audit, and economic oversight departments, 
particularly setting up and perfecting a citywide overall 
economic regulation and control committee, and a market 
administration committee. We must closely watch the direction 
and volume of flow of all funds, monitor and provide early 
warning about operation of the economy, improve follow-up 
analysis and study of the economic situation, and make timely 
recommendations on ways to maintain the economy's healthy 
development to improve government's ability to administer and 
regulate the economy. We must energetically develop various 
kinds of intermediary social institutions, found all kinds of 
self-regulated trade associations, and promote indirect 
government administration to set the stage for the reform of 
government organizations. We must do more to improve the caliber 
of government employees, actively doing the preparatory work 
needed to put in place a national civil service system. 
  Second, gradually Straighten Out Relations Between the 
City and Its Districts and Counties, Steadily Improving the "Two 
Level Government, Two Level Administration" System Shanghai 
is an exceptionally large city. Only by steadily improving the 
"two level government, two level administration system" on the 
basis of a clarification of responsibilities and the separation 
of powers can the vitality of the entire city be increased. 
During 1994, we must act in accordance with the principle of 
commensurate powers and responsibilities, and commensurate 
fiscal authority and authority over matters in general to spell 
out the responsibilities and powers of the city and its 
districts and counties regarding streets, municipal government 
facilities, municipal administration, district and country 
planning, and reform and development of district and county 
departments. The municipal government must take more 
responsibility for overall planning, and the coordination of 
administration. It must improve overall coordination and 
tailored guidance for each of the districts and counties. In 
addition, it must set up a joint city and district or county 
conference system for specific matters based on the each 
district's or county's local situation and functions. It must 
jointly study avenues for reform, opening to the outside world, 
and development, jointly discuss ways and means of solving 
problems, and jointly explore new approaches for enhancing and 
improving city administration. District and county governments 
must do more in the way of building grassroots level government 
and democracy, and make full use of the role of street, township 
and town, and residents committees, and of village committees in 
providing social services, social order, and environmental 
sanitation. 
  Third, a High Degree of Attention to Government Legal 
System Work, Running the Government Strictly According to 
Law. Establishment of a socialist market economic system 
requires a sound socialist legal system to provide direction, 
standards, and support. During 1994, the municipal government 
must work hard on drawing up a number of government regulations 
that are needed urgently for the development of a socialist 
market economy, including equity exchange control, futures 
market and futures brokerage company control, control over the 
sale of state-owned land use rights, control over real estate 
exchanges, and staff member and worker medical insurance 
regulations. In places where conditions permit, local laws and 
regulations should be drafted to presentation to the municipal 
people's congress and its standing committee. At the same, 
government regulations not suited to a socialist market economy 
system should continue to be checked and either promptly amended 
or scrapped. The municipal people's congress and its standing 
committee should be asked to amend or scrap local regulations 
that do not apply. A good job must be done in planning the 
building of a government legal system. Close attention must be 
given to the advisory and staff officer role of experts in 
building a government legal system. Administrative law 
enforcement and monitoring of law enforcement must be improved, 
governments at all levels administering according to law, 
handling matters according to law, and being adept and 
application of legal methods to manage the economy and the 
society. Leading cadres at all levels must study the law 
diligently to improve their understanding of the law. Separate 
government regulations for regulating operation of the market 
economy should be specially checked for enforcement for resolute 
correction of situations in which the law is not followed, not 
strictly enforced, or violations go unpunished. An unremitting 
struggle must be conducted particularly against those who 
violate the law when they are supposed to enforce the law, and 
who bend the law for the benefit of relatives or friends. 
Governments at all levels must truly give an important position 
to the task of setting up a government legal system. They must 
do more to build government legal institutions and the legal 
corps, and to improving the caliber of law enforcement personnel 
and law enforcement. 
  Fourth Is Changing Work Style and Work Methods. 
New situations and new problems constantly arise in the 
process of building a socialist market economy system. 
Governments at all levels must energetically encourage the 
practice of conducting investigations and study. Leading cadres 
at all levels must immerse themselves in realities and go down 
to the grass roots to find through practice major problems in 
need of solution, or difficulties that have lingered without 
solution for a long period of time, making them the emphasis of 
investigation and study. Through investigation and study, they 
can comprehend circumstances, work out approaches, and provide 
remedies and actions for solving problems. Cadres at all levels 
must inculcate the concept of looking at the situation as a 
whole, subordinating themselves to and serving the main goal of 
invigorating Shanghai and developing Pudong. They must 
subordinate limited interests to the overall interest, and they 
must subordinate departmental interests to total interests. They 
must be adept at examining problems, analyzing problems, and 
solving problems in terms of the overall situation and 
macroeconomically, doing their work creatively within the terms 
of the master plan and deployments for the whole city. The must 
establish and perfect a democratic and scientific 
decision-making system that truly ensures that the masses are in 
charge, and have the right to take part in democratic 
administration and democratic decisionmaking. They must 
implement all major reform measures, pay close attention to the 
views of all, and gain the understanding and support of the 
masses. They must pay close attention to the views and 
suggestions of consulting and research institutions and of 
experts on government work. They must use to the full the role 
of mass organizations such as the trade union, the Young 
Communist League, and the Women's Federation as bridges bonds. 
They must be more responsible to letters and visits from the 
people. They must diligently implement the Party's ethnic and 
religious policies, and do a good job on overseas Chinese 
affairs and regarding Taiwan. 
  Fifth Is Greater Building of Clean Government, Adhering 
to the Purpose of Serving the People Wholeheartedly. 
Maintenance of clean and dutiful administration at all levels of 
government is a necessary condition and an important support in 
establishing a socialist market economy system, and promoting 
economic development. We must vigorously carry forward the 
glorious tradition of arduous struggle and painstakingly and 
frugally handling all matters. We must be honest in the 
performance of official duties, and be earnest in government for 
the people. We must use the results obtained in the fight 
against corruption to continue to move ahead during 1994, 
concentrating on the punishment of corrupt acts like misuse of 
authority for private gain, misuse of ones job for private gain, 
and trading authority for money, investigating and punishing all 
cases that violate discipline or the law. We must be willing to 
take harsh measures, positively not acting leniently. In the 
struggle against corruption, we must use treatments that strike 
at the root of the problem, focus on existing problems, and 
actively explore new mechanisms for building clean government in 
order to root out corruption. We must build a self-policing 
system for leading cadres at the department level and above in 
counties, and set up supervisory stems for the rotation of 
people to different positions periodically, for the open 
handling of matters, and for avoiding conflicts of interest. We 
must conduct multilevel supervision and prevention work for 
greater examination of administrative effectiveness thereby 
putting government workers, particularly leading cadres at all 
levels, under effective supervision. 
  Governments at all levels must pay extremely close attention 
to the living conditions of the masses. As the economy develops, 
they must continue to raise the real income level of both city 
and country people, striving to ensure that the broad masses of 
people generally receive the benefits that reform and opening to 
the outside world brings. We must continue to carry on the fine 
tradition of doing things for the masses, diligently completing 
the 10 deeds that the municipal government has set for 1994, 
including improvement of communications facilities, improving 
environmental sanitation, increasing public green space, 
increase hydroelectric and gas supply capabilities, increasing 
the number of telephone subscribers, accelerating housing 
construction, and perfecting community services. Governments at 
all levels must pay close attention and solve promptly various 
social "hot spot" "tough spot" problems. regularly conducting 
various kinds of campaigns for providing a little cheer. We must 
work hard at caring for orphans, widows, the sick, and the 
disabled, and pay attention to the living conditions of retirees 
and staff members and workers having special difficulties. We 
must do more in the way of vocational training for unemployed 
workers who have lost their jobs in enterprises, actively 
creating opportunities and conditions for their re-employment. 
We must do good civil affairs work, actively developing various 
social welfare endeavors, thereby demonstrating to the full the 
superiority of socialism. 
  Delegates! 
  Shanghai has entered the decisive year for realizing three 
years of major changes. The new situation urges us to battle 
ahead, and the tasks we face are more daunting. We must take 
firm grip on this historical opportunity for major advances, 
adopt a spirit of seizing the day, seizing the hour, and seizing 
every minute, striving to be the best, open new avenues, and 
create new prospects. We deeply believe that guided by Comrade 
Deng Xiaoping's theory of building a distinctively Chinese brand 
of socialism, under leadership of the CPC Central Committee, the 
State Council, and the Shanghai CPC Committee, and with the 
support of the people throughout the country, thanks to the 
joint efforts of the people throughout the city, Shanghai will 
certainly be able to realize the goal of three years of major 
changes, and Shanghai will also certainly be able to follow a 
road of development that is distinctively Chinese, that has the 
character of the age, and that has a Shanghai character, making 
even greater contributions to China's socialist modernization. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66162 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar027___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  2 May 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> PROVINCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Jilin 1993 Economic Communique </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Jilin 1993 Economic Communique </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0361A Changchun JILIN RIBAO in Chinese 8 Feb 94, p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0361A </F>
<F P=104>  Changchun JILIN RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article: "Jilin Provincial Statistical Bureau Statistical </F>
Report on 1993 National Economic and Social Development"] 
  [Text] In 1993 under the guidance of Comrade Deng 
Xiaoping's important speech and the spirit of the 14th Party 
Congress and given impetus by the magnificent goal of 
establishing a developed border and coastal province, the 
province increased the pace of reform and opening up, put forth 
a great effort to develop the socialist market economy, 
enthusiastically implemented macroeconomic control policies, 
promoted rapid and sound development of the national economy, 
and laid a firm material foundation for the economy to jump to a 
new level in three years. Annual industrial and agricultural 
production grew rather fast, fixed asset investment experienced 
strong growth, internal and external trade was active, and the 
rate of overall economic development was further accelerated. 
According to preliminary statistics, annual provincial gross 
domestic product (GDP) reached 67.05 billion yuan, a 14.3 
percent increase over the previous year. Within that the 
increased value of tertiary industry was 16.74 billion yuan, a 
17.3 percent increase, making up 25 percent of the GDP. But the 
rapid growth of the economy made the contradictions among the 
many types of economic relations in the conversion from the old 
to new system more obvious. The growth of light industry was 
sluggish, the growth of basic industries was slow, large and 
medium-sized state enterprise operations were difficult, price 
increases were high, and the performance of the overall economy 
was not sufficiently ideal. 
  I. Agriculture 
  Overall agricultural production developed steadily. In 1993 
throughout the province, practical measures were adopted to 
further strengthen the basic position of agriculture, promote 
overall growth of agricultural production, and begin to put 
agriculture on the road to high production, high quality, and 
high efficiency. For the year, agriculture achieved an added 
value of 15.15 billion yuan, a 6.5 percent increase over the 
previous year, making up 22.6 percent of the GDP. 
  The planting industry, oriented by the market, rationally 
adjusted the structure of planting and overcame unfavorable 
climatic affects such as drought, waterlogging, storms, and low 
temperatures in some regions and put forth a great effort to 
develop scientific and technical activity to make agriculture 
prosper and ensured a good harvest for crops. It was the 
province's second highest year in history for grain production. 
The annual added value for the planting industry was 10.64 
billion yuan, a 5.3 percent increase over the previous year. 
  Production for major agricultural products was as follows: 


                                          1993              Increase From 
                                                            Previous Year 
                                                            (percent) 

Grain                                     19.009 million    3.3 
                                          tons 

Within that:          Corn                13.446 million    1.4 
                                          tons 

                      Paddy               2.89 million      -4.6 
                                          tons 

                      Soybeans            1.081 million     43.4 
                                          tons 

Oil-bearing Crops                         286,000 tons      -20.1 

Within that:          Sunflower Seeds     178,000 tons      -36.0 

Sugar Beets                               972,000 tons      5.9 

Cured Tobacco                             40,000 tons       -27.9 

Hemp                                      3,000 tons        -19.2 

Orchard Produce                           21,000 tons       5.2 

Vegetables                                4.915 million     9.9 
                                          tons 

Melons (used for                          534,000 tons      -1.0 
fruit) 


  Development of diversified operations continues to 
accelerate. With further sound development of the rural market 
system and improvement in the commercialization of livestock 
products, especially the establishment throughout the province 
of twenty cattle-raising base counties (cities), impetus has 
been given to the pace of development of livestock commodity 
bases, spurring the steady growth of provincial livestock 
production. The annual increased value of the livestock industry 
was 3.45 billion yuan, a 13.9 percent increase over the previous 
year. 
  Major livestock product production and livestock on hand 
figures are as follows: 


                                         1993               Increase From 
                                                            Previous Year 
                                                            (percent) 

Pork, Beef, and                          579,000 tons       15.6 
Mutton 

Within that:         Pork                483,000 tons       12.6 

                     Beef                85,000 tons        37.6 

Milk                                     94,000 tons        -14.6 

Eggs                                     327,000 tons       7.3 

Sheep's Wool                             9,837 tons         8.8 

Pork Hogs Removed                        5.147 million      10.8 
From Inventory                           head 

Year-end Hog Count                       5.679 million      4.2 
                                         head 

Year-end Large                           3.603 million      5.6 
Livestock Count                          head 

Within that:         Year-end Cattle     2.419 million      8.5 
                     Count               head 

Year-end Sheep                           2.419 million      6.3 
Count 


  New progress was achieved in forestry production and 
greening. In 1993 throughout the province, forested area was 
110,000 hectares, a 5.7 percent increase over the previous year. 
Throughout the province, the rate of forest cover reached 37.9 
percent and forest fire protection achieved the good results of 
13 successive years without a major fire. The annual increased 
value achieved by forestry was 360 million yuan, a 5.0 percent 
increase over the previous year. 
  Fishery production continued to develop. Annual aquatic 
product production was 98,000 tons, a 15.3 percent increase over 
the previous year. Annual increased value for fisheries was 300 
million yuan, a 64.7 percent increase over the previous year. 
  Township enterprises, on the base of the extraordinary 
leaping development of the previous year, continued to develop 
rapidly and have become an important driving force in the rapid 
growth of the provincial economy. For the year, township 
enterprises achieved a total output value of 33.2 billion yuan 
and achieved profit taxes of 3.81 billion yuan, increases of 
48.5 percent and 35.6 percent, respectively, over the previous 
year. 
  Measures to promote the development of agricultural 
production were further increased and the finance and banking 
sectors continued to be slanted toward agriculture. Bank and 
credit union agricultural loans had a net increase of 620 
million yuan. Enthusiasm for science and technology to make 
agriculture prosper continued to rise. The provincial finance 
department invested 5.3 million yuan in starter funds and awards 
funds to popularize agricultural scientific and technical 
achievements and also invested 20 million yuan in deducted 
interest loans to be directly used to popularize new technology 
and develop new products. Throughout the province, more than 
20,000 scientific and technical personnel are participating in 
new rural technology and new popularization projects. There were 
as many as 285 popularization projects. Party and government 
departments at every level by every means possible are 
lightening farmers' burdens. They have abolished 45 unreasonable 
burdens and aroused farmers' enthusiasm to plant grain. 
  II. Industry and Construction 
  In 1993 industry and construction production throughout the 
province maintained its strong growth and was an important 
mainstay to rapid provincial economic development. Increased 
value of secondary industry for the year was 35.16 billion yuan, 
a 17.6 percent increase over the previous year, making up 52.4 
percent of the GDP. 
  Provincial industrial enterprises thoroughly implemented the 
Regulations, intensified reform, actively converted operating 
mechanisms, improved their structure, improved product quality, 
expanded production closely centered on the market, developed 
domestic and foreign markets, and maintained rather rapid growth 
in both production and sales. Industry achieved an annual 
increased value of 30.82 billion yuan, an increase of 17.4 
percent over the previous year, making up 46.0 percent of the 
GDP. In overall industry, production of other economic types and 
collective industrial enterprises developed rapidly and the 
vitality of large and medium-sized state enterprises increased 
somewhat. The annual added value of state industries increased 
by 16.0 percent over the previous year and the added value of 
large- and medium-sized industries increased by 26.7 percent. 
  The pulling power of investment on provincial industrial 
production was obvious. The growth of heavy industry with the 
vigorous pulling power of investment demand soared. For the 
year, the added value of heavy industry at the township level 
and above was 19.18 billion yuan, a 39.1 percent increase over 
the previous year. Growth in the production volume of such 
industries as machinery, construction materials, and metallurgy 
was rather great. Growth of light industry production was weak 
because it lacked a base, had few high-demand products, and was 
low in competitiveness. Annual added value for light industry 
was 5.96 billion yuan, a 3.6 percent increase over the previous 
year, and production of some products such as home appliances 
and textiles declined. 
  Production volume of major industrial products was as 
follows: 


                                             1993            Increase From 
                                                             Previous Year 
                                                             (percent) 

Cloth                                        144 million     -20.6 
                                             meters 

Synthetic Fibers                             35,200 tons     4.3 

Woolens                                      4.696 million   -20.1 
                                             meters 

Machine-made Paper                           555,000 tons    -9.6 
and Cardboard 

Beer                                         620,100 tons    25.3 

Cigarettes                                   705,200 cases   6.9 


Sugar                                        106,600 tons    7.9 

Synthetic                                    17,500 tons     5.0 
Detergent 

Bicycles                                     83,500          -58.8 

Watches                                      1.1663          2.4 
                                             million 

TV Sets                                      106,600         -43.6 

Of which:            Color TV Sets           61,000          -53.4 

Home Washing                                 284,400         -1.2 
Machines 

Home Refrigerators                           172,400         23.0 


Plastic Products                             84,700 tons     -11.3 

Total Volume of 
Primary Energy 
Production 

(converted to                                24.3408         3.3 
standard coal)                               million tons 

Raw Coal                                     24.0992         1.4 
                                             million tons 

Crude Oil                                    3.38 million    -2.0 
                                             tons 

Processing Volume                            4.1479          -2.4 
of Crude Oil                                 million tons 

Generating Volume                            23.506          17.2 
                                             kilowatt 
                                             hours 

Of which:            Hydroelectricity        5.027 billion   41.7 
                                             kilowatt 
                                             hours 

Finished Steel                               982,800 tons    7.9 

Ten Types of                                 42,500 tons     25.8 
Nonferrous Metals 

Ferroalloys                                  290,900 tons    16.1 

Lumber                                       4.6759          6.6 
                                             million cubic 
                                             meters 

Plate Glass                                  2.2327          6.7 
                                             million heavy 
                                             cases 

Cement                                       6.6364          15.9 
                                             million tons 

Sulfuric Acid                                112,300 tons    -0.8 

Soda Ash                                     26,300 tons     431.5 

Caustic Soda                                 88,400 tons     -2.8 

Synthetic Ammonia                            435,600 tons    -11.3 

Chemical             (converted to pure      283,200 tons    -5.2 
Fertilizer           volume) 

Calcium Carbide                              88,500 tons     -1.8 

Plastics                                     65,000 tons     9.5 

Tires                                        833,800         -29.2 

Metal Cutting                                2,350           12.1 
Machine Tools 

Automobiles                                  177,000         10.6 

Tractors                                     1,293           -52.1 

Small Tractors                               24,600          -55.2 

Railroad Passenger                           882             6.9 
Cars 


  State industrial enterprises have made rather great strides 
in intensifying reform and converting operating mechanisms. In 
1993, 2,800 industrial enterprises throughout the province 
extended comprehensive experimental reforms in such areas as 
labor and personnel, wage allocation, social insurance, and 
training and testing, and in 321 industrial enterprises they 
broadened experiments in opening up operations and converting 
mechanisms. Smooth progress was achieved, especially in 
experiments with the stock system. A total of 201 industrial 
enterprise corporations and limited liability companies were 
approved, with total capital reaching 8.65 billion yuan. 
  The industrial economic performance improved somewhat, but 
not very ideally. In 1993 composite indicators of the economic 
performance of independently accounted industrial enterprises at 
the township level and above calculated for six indices of 
economic performance were 80.6 percent, a 10.4 percentage point 
improvement over the previous year. Within that, the profit tax 
rate on industrial funds was 7.3 percent and the sales rate for 
industrial products was 96.1 percent, a 0.9 percentage point 
improvement. For the year, they achieved 8.14 billion yuan in 
profit taxes, a 39.6 percent increase over the previous year. 
Throughout the province, losing enterprises greatly increased 
and the loss rate rose, eroding large-quantity profits. For the 
year, there were 2,466 losing enterprises with losses of 2.94 
billion yuan, and the ratio of losses to profits reached as high 
as 51.8 percent. Products were overstocked and enterprise bank 
interest burdens were heavy, becoming the two major obstacles to 
the mobility of enterprise funds. 
  Construction industry production developed rapidly. In 1993 
throughout the province, the construction industry achieved an 
added value of 4.34 billion yuan, a 20.0 percent increase over 
the previous year. Economic performance of state construction 
enterprises rebounded somewhat. All personnel labor productivity 
reached 22,497 yuan, a 15.0 percent increase over the previous 
year. The area of housing construction was 10.834 million square 
meters, an 8.0 percent increase over the previous year. It 
achieved total profit taxes of 310 million yuan, a 5.6 percent 
increase over the previous year, and the quality of construction 
products improved somewhat. 
  Geological surveys and prospecting made new progress. For 
the 
year, geological prospecting mechanical core drilling was 27,000 
meters, with three new mineral producing sites discovered, and 
there was one newly increased mineral reserve verified. 
  III. Fixed Asset Investment 
  There was a strong increase in fixed asset investment, 
accumulating a reserve for sustained steady coordinated 
development of the economy. For the year, the whole society 
achieved 23.21 billion yuan in fixed asset investment, a 53.6 
percent increase over the previous year. Within that, state unit 
investment was 19.81 billion yuan, a 62.8 percent increase; 
collective unit investment was 1.19 billion yuan, a 2.5 percent 
decline; and urban and rural individual investment was 2.21 
billion yuan, a 28.5 percent increase. For the year, new starts 
increased greatly and the scale of construction expanded. 
Throughout the province, there were 1,729 state unit capital 
construction and transformation and renovation new starts of 
50,000 yuan or higher. For the whole society, the total scale of 
construction projects was 58.33 billion yuan, a 39.2 percent 
increase. 
  Within state unit investment, investment in capital 
construction was 10.45 billion yuan, a 68.3 percent increase 
over the previous year; transformation and renovation investment 
was 4.93 billion yuan, a 45.0 percent increase; investment in 
commercial housing construction was 3.21 billion yuan, a 124.5 
percent increase; and other investment was 1.22 billion yuan, an 
8.0 percent increase. From the perspective of subordination, 
central projects completed 7.7 billion yuan in investments, a 
70.0 percent increase over the previous year, and local projects 
completed 12.11 billion yuan in investments, a 58.5 percent 
increase. 
  Within state unit investment, tertiary industries completed 
8.81 billion yuan in investments and increased their share to 
44.5 percent from 33.6 percent the previous year. Within that, 
transportation and post and telegraph investment was 2 billion 
yuan, raising their share from 6.7 percent to 10.1 percent; 
secondary industry investment was 10.73 billion yuan, with their 
share declining from 65.1 percent to 54.2 percent. Within that, 
investment in the energy industry was 3.47 billion yuan, with 
their share declining from 24.9 percent to 17.5 percent, and raw 
material investment was 2.85 billion yuan, with its share 
declining from 15.9 percent to 14.4 percent. 
  The pace of key construction accelerated. Nineteen large- 
and 
medium-sized capital construction projects of state units listed 
in the state plan completed 4.35 billion yuan in investment. 
Within that, the Hunjiang third stage generating plant project 
and the Shuangyang Cement Factory totally completed construction 
and went into production and part of such projects as the Jilin 
Oilfield, the Jilin transformer project, the Number One 
Automobile Factory, and the Changbai Mountain and Forest Region 
development, completed construction and went into production. 
Eleven renewal projects listed in the state plan above the quota 
invested 510 million yuan. Within that, the Siping Grease 
Chemical Factory, the Tonghua Two-way River Generating Plant, 
and the Changchun Telecommunications Bureau telephone network 
projects completed construction and went into production. Of 174 
technology upgrading projects of 100 enterprises under 
provincial administration, fifty completed construction and went 
into production. Major projects directly related to the strength 
of provincial economic development proceeded smoothly. All 
together, such projects as the Dazhong Automobile Company, Ltd's 
150,000 car project, the Jilin Chemical Industry's 300,000 ton 
ethylene project, the Shuangliao Generating Plant's 300,000 
kilowatt generating unit project, the Tonghua Steel Company's 1 
million ton steel project, and the Char Reservoir reservoir and 
irrigation area project with 253 million yuan invested are being 
earnestly developed. The project in Changchun to "divert water 
from the Song to the Changjiang," the largest infrastructure 
project since the founding of the country, is getting people's 
attention. In October it had the foundation stone laying 
ceremony. The Tu-Hui Railroad has had test run trains, the 
Si-Chang high-speed highway entered the land levying and removal 
stage, and such projects as the Jilin Synthetic Medicine Base 
are being prepared. 
  Throughout the province, state unit investment in capital 
construction and transformation and renovation during the year 
had 1,488 projects that completed construction and went into 
production. New increases in fixed assets were 7.3 billion yuan, 
the annual rate of fixed assets made available for use was 47.5 
percent. Newly increased major production capacity was: 
installed generating capacity, 300,000 kilowatts; petroleum 
exploitation 110,000 tons; lumber cut and shipped 350 million 
cubic meters; cement, 670,000 tons; 220,000 volt electrical 
lines, 204 kilometers; synthetic washing detergent, 50,000 tons; 
and 80,000 intra-city automatic telephone exchanges. 
  IV. Transportation and Post and Telegraph 
  Despite the fact that transportation enterprises are 
vigorously tapping the potential of transportation and equitably 
allocating transportation, the disparity with what is needed for 
the rapid growth of society's economy is still rather 
pronounced. The shortage of railroad transportation especially 
still has not greatly improved. 
  The situation accomplished by various types of 
transportation 
is as follows: 


                                        1993                Increase From 
                                                            Previous Year 
                                                            (percent) 

Freight                                 46.639 billion      -0.3 
Circulation Volume                      ton kilometers 


                     Railroad           39.777 billion      2.6 
                                        ton kilometers 

                     Highway            6.731 billion ton   10.5 
                                        kilometers 

                     Water Transport    131 million ton     -7.0 
                                        kilometers 

Passenger                               16.767 billion      -2.6 
Circulation Volume                      passenger 
                                        kilometers 

                     Railroad           12.36 billion       11.1 
                                        passenger 
                                        kilometers 

                     Highway            4.39 billion        -21.9 
                                        passenger 
                                        kilometers 

                     Water Transport    17 million          -6.0 
                                        passenger 
                                        kilometers 


  The development of civil air has accelerated. In 1993 five 
new air routes opened, two of them international. By the end of 
the year, thirty domestic and international air routes had 
opened. For the year, the volume of passenger transport was 
250,000 people, a 1.6 percent increase over the previous year. 
  Post and telegraph communications developed rapidly. The 
success achieved in constructing communications facilities was 
amazing. The total volume of post and telegraph business 
achieved for the year was 1.07 billion yuan, a 52.4 percent 
increase over the previous year. Within that, such business as 
express special delivery, beepers, and mobile telephones, 
increased by 86.0 percent, 280 percent, and 360 percent, 
respectively. For the year, 140 million letters were sent, a 
12.2 percent increase over the previous year, and 400 million 
periodicals were issued, a 17.4 percent increase. By the end of 
the year, throughout the province total capacity of city 
telephone exchanges reached 738,000, a 68.5 percent increase 
over the end of the previous year. Cities and counties 
throughout the province had all entered automatic long distance 
telephone networks. Intra-city programmed telephones from merely 
356,000 at the end of the previous year, have reached 656,000. 
The total of city telephone instruments throughout the province 
reached 501,000, a 51.8 percent increase over the previous year. 
  V. Domestic Commerce and Market Prices 
  In 1993 throughout the province, commercial enterprises 
constantly intensified reform, put forth an effort to convert 
operating mechanisms, developed market systems, and adopted 
flexible and diverse ways to promote sales, and amply supply 
consumer products. Market sales throughout the province were 
stable in the midst of prosperity. Annual social commodity 
retail sales were 35.75 billion yuan, a 19.9 percent increase 
over the previous year (with the price factor discounted, the 
actual increase was 7.7 percent). Within that, consumer product 
retail sales were 32.55 billion yuan, a 24.5 percent increase 
over the previous year, and retail sales of agricultural means 
of production were 3.2 billion yuan, a 12.8 percent decline. 
Among consumer product retail sales, urban retail sales were 
27.88 billion yuan, a 26.7 percent increase, and rural retail 
sales were 4.67 billion yuan, a 12.5 percent increase. Retail 
sales to citizens were 29.29 billion yuan, a 25.4 percent 
increase and those to social groups were 3.26 billion yuan, a 
16.8 percent increase. 
  Retail commodity sales from various types of economies all 
rose. State unit retail sales were 13.33 billion yuan, a 7.9 
percent increase over the previous year; collective unit retail 
sales were 7.2 billion yuan, a 0.2 percent increase; and other 
unit retail sales were 15.22 billion yuan, a 48.1 percent 
increase. Farmers' retail sales to nonagricultural residents 
were 3.83 billion yuan, a 27 percent increase. From the sales 
figures for various types of consumer items, it seems that 
edible and useful commodities increased greatly. Within that, 
the sales volume for edible vegetable oil, pigs and pork, fresh 
eggs, and aquatic products all increased by 19 percent or more. 
Among durable consumer items, video recorders increased by 10.6 
percent, refrigerators increased by 4.2 percent, and other 
commodities all declined to a different extent. 
  Development of the market system made rather great strides. 
In 1993 while consolidating and developing the commodity market, 
emphasis was put on developing and perfecting such essential 
markets as the financial, science and technology, talent, labor, 
real estate, and property rights exchange markets. The Changchun 
Commodity Exchange Market and the Jilin Grain Commodity Exchange 
were established and went into operation one after the other, 
and the establishment of the futures market also made new 
strides. Throughout the province, all types of markets grew to 
2,495 from 1,700 at the end of 1992. 
  The means of production market went from flourishing to 
slack. In the first half of the year, pulled by the investment 
demand, means of production were in short supply and the price 
rose. Since the last half of the year, with the implementation 
of macroeconomic control measures, the means of production 
market has stabilized. For the year, the provincial goods system 
purchase of means of production was 6.84 billion yuan, a 24.8 
percent increase over the previous year, and sales of all types 
of means of production was 7.37 billion yuan, a 19.6 percent 
increase. Sales volume for principal means of production 
declined somewhat from the previous year. Steel declined by 10.5 
percent, cement declined by 16.3 percent, and automobiles 
declined by 22.7 percent. 
  Price reform made greater strides and prices rose high. In 
1993 on the base adjusted a few years ago, the state and the 
province made rather great adjustments in the prices of daily 
necessities and service fees or freed them. Also pulled by the 
vigorous demands of society from the rapid development of the 
economy, prices all over the province rose completely. Prices of 
grain, building materials, civilian use fuel, and service fees 
especially rose rather greatly. Price rises throughout the 
province stood at the mid-lower level for the country, but for 
low-income citizens the pressure was rather great. 
  Various types of 1993 prices and their changes from the 
previous year are: 


                                                 1993          Amount of 
                                                 Increase      Increase or 
                                                 Over the      Decrease From 
                                                 Previous      Previous Year 
                                                 Year          (percentage 
                                                 (percent)     points) 

1. Citizens'                                     12.6          4.6 
Living Expense 
Prices 

Within that:     Urban                           13.2          4.9 

                 Rural                           8.8           4.9 

2. Retail                                        11.3          4.2 
Prices 

Within that:     Consumer Items                  11.4          4.2 

                 Food Items                      13.5          5.3 

                                   Grain         22.4          -6.5 

                                   Edible        14.2          -3.1 
                                   Vegetable 
                                   Oil 

                 Clothing                        3.8           1.4 

                 Daily Use                       5.3           2.3 
                 Articles 

                 Cultural and                    1.0           3.5 
                 Entertainment 
                 Items 

                 Books,                          5.8           1.0 
                 Newspapers, and 
                 Magazines 

                 Medicines and                   8.2           1.9 
                 Medical Items 

                 Building and                    27.3          32.3 
                 Decorating 
                 Materials 

                 Fuel                            59.7          22.3 

                 Agricultural                    9.3           4.8 
                 Means of 
                 Production 

3. Service                                       24.5          12.3 
Prices 

Within that:     Urban                           25.9          13.3 

                 Rural                           16.3          4.6 

4. Raw                                           73.9          46.8 
Material and 
Fuel and Power 
Purchasing 
Prices 

5. Industrial                                    27.9          16.5 
Product 
Producer 
Prices 

6.                                               18.4          18.8 
Agricultural 
and 
Agricultural 
Byproduct 
Purchasing 
Prices 


  VI. External Economy 
  In 1993 the opening to the outside of the whole province 
developed to a higher level, broadened in scope, and expanded in 
every direction. The strategy of opening borders and linking up 
overseas was well implemented, the investment environment 
improved, the number of cooperative partners greatly increased, 
and brand new situations were initiated in the external economy. 
  Imports and exports grew rapidly. According to statistics of 
the Ministry of Economic Relations and Trade, in 1993 provincial 
foreign trade import and export totals reached US$2.617 billion, 
a 36.1 percent increase over the previous year. Within that, 
export totals were US$1.617 billion, a 23.7 percent increase, 
and imports were US$1 billion, a 62.3 percent increase over the 
previous year. According to customs statistics, foreign firms 
invested US$300 million in import facilities, goods, and 
materials, a 150 percent increase over the previous year. Barter 
trade totalled US$690 million. Within that, barter exports were 
US$300 million. 
  Solicitation of foreign investment was remarkably 
successful. 
In 1993 throughout the province, 1,434 new cooperative projects 
were signed using foreign funds and US$770 million in foreign 
funds was cooperatively utilized, for a 136.2 percent and a 40.0 
percent increase over the previous year, respectively. Actual 
use of foreign investment was US$650 million, an increase of 
nearly 200 percent over the previous year. According to 
statistics of the Bureau To Solicit Foreign Firms, by the end of 
the year, throughout the province the number of enterprises with 
foreign investment had reached 2,235. 
  Rather great progress was achieved in foreign economic and 
technical cooperation. In 1993 throughout the province, new 
contracts were signed for foreign contracted projects and labor 
cooperation amounting to US$160 million, a 14.3 percent increase 
over the previous year, and they did business amounting to US$70 
million, even with the previous year. 
  The tourist industry developed further. In 1993 overseas 
tourists coming to Jilin Province for travel, visits, to seek 
relatives, and to engage in various activities came to 79,000, a 
5.7 percent decline from the previous year. Tourist foreign 
exchange revenue reached US$11.1 million, a 0.7 percent increase. 
  VII. Science and Technology, Education, Culture, and 
Health and Sports 
  Science and technology developed rather rapidly. With 
gradual 
intensification of reform of the science and technology system, 
throughout the province news of victories on the science and 
technology front kept pouring in. In 1993 throughout the 
province, a total of 722 scientific and technical achievements 
were accomplished, six of which received national awards. Of 
these one received the National Science and Technology Progress 
Award, one received the National Invention Award, and four 
received the National Spark Award. There were 168 achievements 
that received provincial awards. During the year, 1,718 patents 
were requested from the National Patent Office and 1,346 patents 
were authorized, for an 11.6 percent and a 76.9 percent increase 
over the previous year, respectively. By the end of the year, in 
the entire province there were two new national high technology 
industry development zones and 75 newly added Spark Plan 
projects. 
  Science and technology expenditures increased. In 1993 
throughout the province, 1.05 billion yuan was expended by 
science and technology organizations and such units as 
institutions of higher learning and large- and medium-sized 
industrial enterprises for use in science and technology, an 8.2 
percent increase over the previous year. Within that research 
and development expenditures were 330 million yuan. Science and 
technology ranks were expanded and personnel quality improved. 
At the end of 1993, throughout the province local state 
enterprises and institutions had a total of 707,000 people with 
various types of technical specialties, an increase of 24,000 
people or 3.5 percent from the end of the previous year. 
Throughout the province, there were 175 independent state 
research and development organizations at the county level and 
above, 200 scientific research organizations run by institutions 
of higher learning, and 360 scientific research organizations 
run by large and medium-sized industrial enterprises. There were 
54,000 people engaged in scientific and technical activities, of 
whom 30,000 were scientists and engineers. 
  By the end of 1993, authorization was received from the 
Jilin 
Provincial Technology Oversight Office to establish 33 
provincial level product quality test and measurement 
organizations. Of those, five were national level quality test 
and measurement organizations. Throughout the province, a total 
of fifteen ultrashort wave weather warning report service system 
transmitting stations were established. 
  The technology market further prospered. In 1993 throughout 
the province, a total of 8,175 technical contracts were signed 
for 670 million yuan, a 4.6 percent and a 55.8 percent increase 
over the previous year, respectively. There were 2,533 
technology trading organizations of various types active on the 
technology market, a 34.1 percent increase over the previous 
year, and 39,000 people were engaged in technology trading 
activities, a 14.7 percent increase. 
  Reform of the education system accelerated the development 
of 
general higher education, training a large number of specialists 
for provincial economic development and social undertakings. In 
1993 a total of 1,956 graduate students were recruited, an 
increase of 547 over the previous year. There were 4,848 
graduate students in school, an increase of 762 over the 
previous year. General institutions of higher learning recruited 
31,000 regular and specialized students, an increase of 6,000; 
and there were 86,000 students in school, an increase of 11,000. 
  Secondary level vocational education grew steadily. In 1993 
throughout the province, there were a total of 196,000 students 
in secondary level professional schools and upper middle 
vocational schools, an increase of 8,000 people over the 
previous year, making up 53.9 percent of the total students at 
the upper middle stage, an increase of two percentage points 
over the previous year. 
  The universality of mandatory education improved somewhat. 
In 
1993 in general middle schools and lower middle schools 
throughout the province, there were 1.128 million students in 
school, an increase of 3,000 over the previous year. There were 
2.573 million elementary school pupils in school, 26,000 fewer 
than the previous year. The rate of elementary school age 
children enrolled in school reached 99.3 percent, and the 
proportion of elementary school graduates who moved to next 
level of education reached 91.1 percent, an increase of 0.8 
percentage points and a decline of 0.2 percentage points, 
respectively, from the previous year. Throughout the province, 
there were 1,971 kindergartens and 489,000 kindergarten children. 
  Adult education achieved new success. In 1993 throughout the 
province, schools of higher education recruited 27,000 general 
and professional adult students, an increase of 8,000 over the 
previous year, and there were 62,000 in school, an increase of 
10,000 people. A total of 1.599 million people completed 
training in adult technical training schools, an increase of 
124,000 over the previous year. Literacy efforts achieved 
outstanding results. In 1992-1993 throughout the province, 
262,000 people from 15 to 50 years of age became literate. 
  Culture and the arts flourished. At the end of 1993 
throughout the province, there were a total of 68 performing art 
troupes, who had made 107,000 performances for audiences 
totalling 9.018 million people. Throughout the province, there 
were a total of 64 theaters, 1,024 culture and arts halls 
(stations), 50 public libraries, 16 museums, and 89 archives. 
There were 26 broadcasting stations, 33 medium and shortwave 
transmitting and relay stations, and 40 televisions stations. 
There were 74 television transmitting and relay stations of 
1,000 watts or higher. Throughout the province, broadcast 
coverage reached 85 percent and television coverage reached 82 
percent. There were 3,521 motion picture projection units of 
various types and during the year they made 162,000 projections 
for audiences reaching 30.059 million people. During the year, 
altogether 50 local newspapers published a total of 480 million 
issues, and 55.98 million journals of various sorts, and 110 
million picture books were published. 
  The Changchun Studio during the year produced 23 feature 
films, six jointly shot films, 2 art films, and 9 dubbed films. 
Film distributing units during the year distributed 173 new 
films (long films) of various types. Throughout the province, a 
total of 21 television dramas in 202 episodes were shot and 22 
radio dramas in 85 episodes were made. 
  Hygiene continued to develop and medical conditions further 
improved. In 1993 throughout the province, there were a total 
4,006 health organizations of various types and 129,000 people 
possessing special health technology, an increase of 1,000 from 
the end of the previous year. Among those were 53,000 physicians 
and 38,000 nurses and nurse practitioners. Medical treatment 
beds reached 97,000, a 1.6 percent increase from the end of the 
previous year. 
  Athletics achieved outstanding success. In 1993 athletes 
from 
Jilin Province rallied together and with the spirit of winning 
honor for the country won four gold medals and three bronze 
medals in major world competition; and won eight gold medals, 
eight silver medals, and three bronze medals in major Asian 
competition. In national competition, they won 27 gold medals, 
20.5 silver medals, and 24 bronze medals. Within that, athletes 
from Jilin Province won nine gold medals, nine silver medals, 
and twelve bronze medals at the Seventh National Games. They 
were the 15th team overall, achieving the goal of "leaping in 
position" proposed by the provincial government. Athletes from 
Jilin Province achieved the best record in recent years at the 
national games. During the year, altogether five athletes from 
Jilin Province nine times broke seven world records and twelve 
people sixteen times broke sixteen national records. 
  Athletics for the masses flourished. In 1993 throughout the 
province, the number of people who regularly participated in 
physical exercise reached 12.45 million, and the number who 
participated in organized morning exercises reached more than 
850,000. Students who achieved National Physical Exercise 
Standards exceeded 2.52 million. In 1993 in national mass 
athletics assessment, the overall achievement of Jilin 
Province's mass athletics was in the top ten. 
  VIII. Population and People's Livelihood 
  Family planning was successful and population growth was 
controlled. According to a sample survey of population changes, 
in 1993 the provincial population birth rate was 15.28 per 
thousand, the death rate was 6.31 per thousand, and the natural 
population growth rate was 8.97 per thousand, a decline of 0.20 
thousandths from the previous year. According to calculations, 
the total population of the province at the end of 1993 was 
25.545 million, a 228,000 increase from the end of the previous 
year. 
  The incomes of urban and rural residents further increased. 
According to preliminary statistics, in 1993 worker wages 
throughout the province totalled 14.17 billion yuan, a 16.1 
percent increase from the previous year. If the price factor is 
deducted, it is a 2.6 percent increase. Workers' average 
monetary wage was 2,623 yuan, a 13.6 percent increase from the 
previous year. If the price factor is deducted, it is a 0.4 
percent increase. According to the calculations of the sample 
survey, in 1993 throughout the province the per capita living 
expense income of urban residents was 1,761.05, a 19.7 percent 
increase over the previous year. If the price factor is 
deducted, the actual increase is 5.8 percent. The net per capita 
income of farmers was 891.61 yuan, a 10.4 percent increase over 
the previous year. If the price factor is deducted, the actual 
increase is 3.0 percent. 
  Urban and rural savings continued to increase. At the end of 
1993, throughout the province, urban and rural residents' 
savings balances reached 38.94 billion yuan, an increase of 7.4 
billion yuan or 23.5 percent from the end of the previous year. 
Citizens' awareness of financial investment increased and such 
things as stocks and bonds became in great demand for people's 
investment. 
  Residential conditions of urban and rural residents further 
improved. In 1993 throughout the province, there were 2.4 
million square meters of newly-constructed urban residences and 
3.75 million square meters of newly-constructed rural 
residences. The per capita residential space of urban residents 
reached 6.2 square meters and that of rural residents reached 
16.0 square meters, for an increase from the previous year of 
0.2 square meters and 1.8 square meters, respectively. 
  The labor employment service system gradually improved. In 
1993 throughout the province, there were 551 township, town, and 
neighborhood employment service stations. Labor departments at 
the county level and above established 48 new labor force 
exchange markets. During the year they served more than 10,000 
employing units and 380,000 personnel seeking employment and 
facilitated the employment of 304,000 people. During the year, 
they made arrangements for a total of 117,000 urban people 
awaiting employment, and the year-end unemployment rate was held 
within 2.5 percent. At the end of the year, the number of people 
employed throughout the province reached 5.403 million, and the 
number of people in urban private business and individual 
laborers reached 400,000. Old age insurance and social plans 
continued to expand. Throughout the province, state units had 
2.21 million workers and 495,000 retired personnel participating 
in the plan. 
  Social welfare steadily improved. Throughout the province, 
there were 930 social welfare institutions of various types, 
with beds reaching 42,000 and 32,000 people taken in. Urban and 
rural people receiving various types of state social assistance 
reached 1.2 million, and throughout the province 87 percent of 
township towns established rural social assurance networks. 
Urban social service networks also grew rather rapidly, 8,464 
social region service facilities of various types were 
established. 
  The scope of insurance expanded and areas of service opened 
up. In 1993 throughout the province, property insurance of 
various types totalled 112.9 billion yuan. A total of 21,968 
enterprises took part in enterprise property insurance, there 
were 2.18 million households that participated in family 
property insurance, and 4.34 million people who took part in 
individual insurance. During the year, insurance companies dealt 
with a total of 64,000 property insurance claims and paid out 
350 million yuan, and paid out 110 million yuan in personal 
insurance claims to 92,000 people. 
  Environmental protection achieved new success and the 
environment that people lived in improved. At the end of 1993, 
throughout the province there were a total of 2,930 people 
employed by the environmental protection system. Of those 1,073 
were monitors. A total of three national level nature protection 
zones and ten provincial level nature protection zones were 
developed. During the year, eight local administrative 
regulations and one local environmental standard were 
promulgated. There were 187 limited time environmental pollution 
clean-up projects completed with a total of 49.377 million yuan 
invested. At the end of the year, throughout the province 209 
soot control zones covering an area of 348.6 square kilometers 
were established in 23 cities, and in 20 cities 60 zones 
covering 86.4 square kilometers were established that had 
achieved environmental noise standards. 
  Notes: (1) In this report, indices for the GDP, township 
enterprise total value of output, and the total value of output 
of industries are calculated according to current prices and the 
rate of growth is calculated according to comparative prices. 
  (2) In this report, the data of some indices are quickly 
reported or estimated figures. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66163 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar027___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  15 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Official on Implementation of Value-Added Tax </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Official on Implementation of Value-Added Tax </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0403A Hong Kong TANG TAI [CONTEMPORARY] in Chinese No 
35, 15 Feb 94 pp 30-31 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0403A </F>
<F P=104>  Hong Kong TANG TAI [CONTEMPORARY] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Li Bengui (2621 2609 6311), Taxation Research </F>
Office, State Administration of Taxation: "This Year's 
Large-Scale Reform of the Tax System--Promoting Comprehensive 
Implementation of Value-Added Tax"] 
  [Text] Comprehensive implementation of the value-added tax 
[VAT] will not only overcome the various deficiencies of the 
product tax, but will also have all enterprises operate in 
equitable competition, and thus also be more easily supported by 
the taxpayers. 
  Reform of the turnover tax system is this year's major item 
in financial and tax reform. Success or failure of this reform 
depends directly on the success or failure of the reform of the 
entire taxation system, and depends also directly on whether it 
will be possible to fully develop the very function of taxation. 
As we look at the objective demands with regard to taxation 
posed by China's socialist market economy, and as we look at the 
experiences and lessons gained in China and abroad in matters of 
reforming the turnover tax, China's thorough reform of the 
turnover tax system will have to be a matter of implementing the 
VAT. 
<H5>  Specific Ideas for Comprehensive Implementation of the VAT </H5>
  Comprehensive implementation of the VAT means its fullest 
implementation in all areas of commodity production and 
circulation --excepting agriculture-- with due regard for the 
principles of fairness, neutrality, translucency, and 
universality, also having China's VAT conform to the standards 
of international practices. Specifically, it should comprise the 
following: 
  1. Abolishing the present product tax and business tax, 
combining the internal and external turnover taxes, abolishing 
the unified industrial and commercial tax, standardizing the 
current VAT, and having the VAT cover all the processes of 
commodity production and commodity circulation (excepting 
agriculture). 
  2. Thorough simplification of the VAT tariff, establishing a 
main tariff with no more than two brackets and a sundries tariff 
of one bracket. Once the comprehensive adjustment of the VAT 
will have been accomplished, it may be in order to levy a 
consumption tax, with different tax rates and within a suitable 
parameter, for commodities which require particular adjustments. 
  3. Implementing tax-excluded pricing, recording the amount 
of 
tax due on the invoices, and adopting the method of deducting 
tax according to the tax deduction law. 
  4. Demanding that all taxpayers separately report VAT due, 
and establishing a special VAT administrative organ, with modern 
facilities, for the collection and administration of VAT. 
  After complete implementation of VAT, China's turnover tax 
system will have only two types of taxes, the VAT and the 
consumption tax. As soon as comprehensive adjustment of the VAT 
will have been completed, and as soon as the tax base and tax 
tariff will have been determined, it will then be possible to 
maintain a state of relative stability. The consumption tax 
shall undergo a special readjustment, the adjustment of its tax 
base and tax tariff may consider the economic circumstances. It 
is crucial for the comprehensive implementation of VAT that it 
cover the areas of commodity production and commodity 
circulation, and that there be an extensive simplification of 
the tax tariff, and also that effectiveness of tax collection 
and tax administration be ensured. 
<H5>  The Necessity for Comprehensive Implementation of VAT </H5>
  In China's present turnover tax system there are three types 
of taxes: product tax, VAT, and business tax. The two kinds of 
turnover tax systems, the internal and the external one, and the 
current VAT have also been instituted on the understanding that 
the tax burden of the original product tax would be maintained. 
Therefore, no matter whether these taxes are named differently, 
all turnover taxes, including the VAT, show evident traces of 
the product tax; namely, they still levy taxes on the full 
amount from the taxpayers, without consideration for the 
taxpayers' costs. Although this will ensure revenue for public 
finance, there is here a serious problem of duplication of 
taxation, and this is detrimental to a fair equilibrium of tax 
burdens as between import commodities and domestic commodities. 
  China's present turnover tax system is excessively complex, 
and there are too many tax brackets. The present system of 
unified industrial and commercial tax collected from foreign 
firms is excessively complex, and there are too many tax 
brackets. In the present unified industrial and commercial tax 
collected from foreign firms, there are 108 taxable items and 40 
tax brackets, the highest 69 percent and the lowest 1.5 percent. 
The product tax has 96 taxable items and 21 tax brackets with 
different rates, and one fixed tax rate, the highest rate being 
60 percent and the lowest 3 percent. The VAT has a tariff of 31 
taxable items and 12 brackets, the highest being 45 percent and 
the lowest 8 percent. The business tax has a tariff with 14 
items and 4 brackets, the highest 15 percent and the lowest 3 
percent, while it is also prescribed that the temporary business 
tax may be adjusted to within a range of from 5 to 10 percent. 
This state of having too many tax brackets and a great disparity 
between high and low rates is causing an inconsistency between 
the nominal tariff and the real taxable tariff, imbalances of 
tax burdens as between enterprises, and impedes fair competition 
under the conditions of socialist market economy. It is also 
detrimental to tax collection and administration, as it results 
in serious losses of turnover tax revenue. 
  The standardized VAT is a kind of turnover tax which takes 
as 
tax object the added-value components in the various links of 
commodity production, commodity circulation, and labor services. 
It has therefore very obvious advantages over China's current 
turnover tax: It makes it possible to thoroughly overcome the 
deficiencies of the product tax with its double taxation; it 
will benefit development of social production in its move toward 
specialization; it will benefit the improvement of productivity 
of social labor and the improvement of product quality; and it 
will benefit stability in the tax burden and in the economy. 
  Under China's present conditions, comprehensive 
implementation of VAT will not only be able to overcome all 
deficiencies of the product tax, but will also have the 
following advantages: It will enable equitable competition among 
all types of enterprises; it will extensively simplify the tax 
tariff; it will benefit the strengthening of tax collection and 
administration and prevent loss of turnover tax revenue; it will 
benefit efforts to overcome the present state of too high a 
nominal tax tariff and a low real taxable tariff, and it will 
more easily gain the support of the taxpayers. 
<H5>  Let Us Seize the Opportunity for Comprehensive </H5>
Implementation of VAT 
  Since the turnover tax accounts for over 60 percent of the 
revenue from the industrial and commercial tax, it makes up 50 
percent of the central authority's fiscal income. In the 
interest of stabilizing its fiscal income and of stabilizing the 
commodity price system, the state has all along, since the 
beginning of reform and opening up, maintained a cautious 
attitude toward reform of the turnover tax. 
  Repeated tax reforms of the past have been conducted, as far 
as the turnover tax burden was concerned, on the principle of 
always maintaining the preceding tax burden. This had been 
completely necessary during the transitional period when China's 
state-owned enterprises changed from turning over profits to 
paying taxes and when the pricing system had not yet been 
straightened out. 
  Following the deepening of the reform and of opening up, 
especially since China has now for over 10 years experimented 
with the VAT and accumulated relevant experiences, also done 
very thoroughgoing studies on the theory and practice of VAT as 
practiced in China and abroad, the possibilities of this tax 
ever leading to a reduction in fiscal income, leading to harmful 
fluctuations in commodity prices, and to unfair tax burdens on 
the enterprises, will have been greatly reduced. Moreover, since 
the central authorities are now determined on a thorough reform 
of the public finance and tax system, the opportunity has 
therefore definitely arrived for a thorough reform of the 
turnover taxation system. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66164 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar027___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  31 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Economist Interviewed on `Ideal' Form of Investment </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Economist Interviewed on `Ideal' Form of Investment </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0390A Beijing LIAOWANG [OUTLOOK] in Chinese No 5, 31 Jan 
94 pp 14-15 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0390A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing LIAOWANG [OUTLOOK] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Report on interview by staff reporter with Xu Zhantao (6079 </F>
0594 3447), young economist studying investment; place and date 
not given: "Investment Funds: A Popular and Ideal Investment 
Means"] 
  [Text] Investment funds are a form of investment in 
which private capital is pooled for commissioned operation by 
experts. Investment funds are characterized mainly by: 
collective investment, expert operation, decentralized risk, and 
joint benefits. Investment funds, through orderly and 
decentralized investment packages, optimize investment 
efficiency, risk-dispersion efficiency, and expert-operation 
efficiency. 
  In today's China, where our socialist market economy is 
developing rapidly, investment has become a keen undertaking for 
the Chinese public and enterprises. All sorts of investment 
activities, such as buying stocks and bonds, and investing in 
self-run enterprises, joint ventures, partnerships, and trusts, 
are unfolding. The public asks: Of the many investment forms, 
which option is actually the more ideal? In response to readers' 
inquiries, I interviewed Xu Zhantao, a young economist studying 
this business. 
  Reporter: While investment is a hedge 
against inflation to proliferate assets and earn higher returns, 
which makes sense, can the current decentralized, industrial, or 
securities direct-investment options achieve this goal? 
  Xu Zhantao: The popularization of investment 
subjects shows that investment subjects have shifted to a deeper 
level. The profit-forces incentive of investment to proliferate 
assets as a hedge against inflation, the drive of entreprenurial 
creativity and aspiration, and the conversion of investment 
operating forces, have sharply strengthened the public oversight 
and restraint mechanisms for investment, promoting a steady 
increase in investment microeconomic efficiency. In contrast to 
a single financing means, this is a great advance. 
  But it needs to be noted that for the ordinary small and 
midsize investor, these investment means also involve many 
adverse factors. 1. In industrial investment, as the public 
lacks the knowledge and skill to do feasibility studies of 
projects, the ability to make accurate market analyses and 
projections, modern business management techniques, and the 
capability to utilize advanced S&amp;T, this unavoidably creates 
unchecked and duplicate investment in enterprises, thus making 
it hard to avoid poor investment efficiency, and even the risk 
of bankruptcy. Moreover, as such investments are small, it is 
hard to make decentralized and package investments, thus making 
it difficult to disperse and reduce investment risks. Also, due 
probably to the ulterior motives and fraudulent fundraising of 
certain private enterprises, it is hard to keep public investors 
from being cheated and engulfed by unfortunate evil 
consequences. 2. In securities investment, as small investors 
have no stock market knowledge, and inadequate investment might 
for repeated investment in many securities, the investment risks 
are obvious. 3. Macroeconomically, small investments are adverse 
to a rational pooling of construction funds, the control of 
investment scale, the upgrading of investment structure and 
improvement of efficiency, the optimum disposition of resources, 
the stability and growth of stock markets, and even social 
stability. 
  Reporter: Prosperity leads to thoughts of 
investment. Since reform and opening, China's productive forces 
have been developed sharply, with public and enterprise 
self-accumulation growing steadily. Incomplete statistics show 
the Chinese public to now have over 2 trillion yuan in financial 
capital, an average of nearly 2,000 yuan a person, and almost 
4,000 yuan a person in coastal zones, with enterprise self-owned 
assets-accumulation also quite sizeable. What investment means 
would you choose to effectively avoid risks and earn higher 
returns? 
  Xu Zhantao: I hold that the development of a new 
public pooled trust and investment means--investment funds, is 
the more ideal option. 
  Investment funds are a unique means of fundraising, 
differing 
from fundraising through either bank savings and various bonds 
or through stocks and stock rights, rather using fund shares or 
beneficiary documents to raise funds from small and midsize 
investors. While they have set terms (which stocks do not), they 
do not have fixed, advance-set returns (which deposits and bonds 
do). Moreover, they give investors some powers similar to 
shareholders. 
  Investment funds are a unique investment means, being 
neither 
a simple credit investment or one in the shares of a single 
enterprise, but rather a comprehensive investment integrating 
creditor rights, property interests, and stock rights. 
  Investment funds are a unique investment-operation system. 
While bank loans are a bonded debt credit system, and stock 
investment is an ownership system, investment funds are a pooled 
trust system, an expert agent investment-operation system in 
which "agents are entrusted with money management." 
  Investment funds are a unique financial commodity and 
investment instrument, being a financial commodity somewhere 
between savings, deposits, bonds, and stocks, or a borderline, 
composite financial commodity, and a comprehensive investment 
instrument integrating stock rights, property interests, and 
creditor rights. 
  Investment funds reflect unique, diversified economic 
relations. Financial allocations reflect voluntary distribution 
relations, bank deposits and all types of bonds reflect 
intermediary relations between bonded debt and credit, and 
stocks or stock rights reflect the relations between owners and 
operators, while investment funds reflect diversified economic 
relations among the four parties of investors, sponsors, 
managers, and custodians. 
  It could be said that investment funds create a public, 
pooled, trust-agent investment means between bank-credit 
intermediate investment and public and individual direct 
investment, being a popular, democratic, and collective 
investment means. Their appearance will inevitably set off 
another investment-system change, being bound to speed up the 
formation of a new fundraising and investment mechanism, to make 
the disposition of public resources more efficient and optimal. 
This means will be more suited to the public investment needs 
of a country like China with a huge population that is just 
beginning to prosper, where individual assets are relatively 
decentralized, and where most investors are small and midsize. 
  Reporter: It is understood that China now 
has 45 investment funds of all types, with funds topping 4.2 
billion yuan. What do you believe is the significance and impact 
of the birth and development of this new investment means suited 
to public investment? 
  Xu Zhantao: While its significance is multiple, it 
is mainly: 1. It will contribute to further investment-system 
change, strengthening public oversight and restraint forces for 
investment; 2. It will help to intensify financial reform, 
promoting a rational adjustment of our national 
financial-capital structure, and lowering commercial-bank risk; 
3. It will be favorable to stock market stability and 
development, reducing blind with-the-wave transactions by and 
short-supply manipulation of small and midsize investors; 4. It 
will benefit the attraction of foreign investment, expanding 
foreign-investment scale, limits, and targets, without turning 
China's foreign-currency debt into a case of killing many birds 
with one stone; 5. It will be advantageous to macroeconomic 
regulation and control. As investment funds are a standardized 
means of public fundraising, the state can regulate, control, 
and guide them to regulate, control, and guide stock markets. In 
contrast to regulating hundreds of thousands of small and 
midsize investors to stabilize stock markets, this will be much 
easier and produce much better results. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66165 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar027___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  28 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FINANCE, BANKING </F>
<H3> <TI>   Problems in Developing Shareholding System </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Problems in Developing Shareholding System </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0358A Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO in Chinese 28 Feb 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0358A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article: "Problems in Developing Shareholding System and </F>
Strategies"] 
  [Text] 1. Accelerate Law-Making. The promulgation of the 
Company Law has been a powerful boost to the development of the 
shareholding system. The Company Law, however, does not cover 
the nation's entire shareholding system. Special laws and 
regulations are urgently needed to regulate the conduct of the 
principal players on the booming stock market, to tackle the 
rapid growth of shareholding cooperative enterprises in 
townships and rural areas, and to improve stock market 
information disclosure, etc. The top priority right now is to 
introduce a securities law without delay to meet a most pressing 
need and better facilitate the implementation of the Company Law. 
  2. Accelerate Pilot Projects. Compared to a decade ago, the 
shareholding system has developed significantly in the last two 
years. However, it still falls short of objective requirements. 
There is currently a strong demand among members of the public 
for the shareholding system to be broadened, something that must 
be given full attention by the pertinent agencies. Why was the 
contract system widely adopted (not just experimented with) 
almost overnight, while all broad-based pilot projects involving 
the shareholding system have run into considerable difficulties? 
If our exclusive preoccupation with stability causes us to let 
opportunities slip by, it will ultimately militate against the 
establishment of a socialist market economy in China. 
  3. Establishing a Regularized Shareholding Economy. The call 
for regularization is as old as the first pilot projects in the 
shareholding system. Yet the inertia of the planned economy has 
distorted the content of regularization. There are rules that 
say one cannot issue shares until after one has fulfilled the 
commitment of purchasing treasury bonds and that mandate 
examination and approval formalities level after level, not to 
mention specifying the value of shares to be issued. All this is 
typical of the way the planned economy operates and is most 
irregular. Any particular economic model must operate by its own 
rules and be supplemented by the corresponding management tools. 
If we do otherwise, regularization would be out of the question. 
And if we seek to correct the mistakes later, we will have to 
pay a high price. 
  4. Imbalance in Pilot Projects. There are proportionately 
more experiments in the shareholding system in the coastal 
provinces and economically developed provinces than in the 
border and remote provinces. Take, for instance, the ratio of 
companies whose shares are being traded on the stock market. 
Between them, Shanghai, Shenzhen, Guangdong, and Fujian have 
something close to a monopoly, whereas southwest and northwest 
China are clearly falling behind. Balance, it should be 
realized, is the cornerstone of stability. If we locate every 
shareholding pilot project in special economic zones [SEZ's], 
leading to the large-scale movement of qualified personnel and 
funds helter-skelter, we will necessarily upset the balance and 
bring about social instability. 
  5. A Diversified Mix of Shares. No other nation has as 
diverse a mix of shares as China does, including state shares, 
legal-person shares, foreign-funded shares, personal shares, 
collective enterprise shares, internal shares, A shares, B 
shares, H shares, so on and so forth. Simply put, the mix is the 
product of both a historical reason (a plethora of state 
enterprises) and the planned economy (foreign exchange control). 
It would be unfair to blame a single factor exclusively. If this 
problem is not resolved soon, it will inevitably delay the 
regularization of the shareholding system, hurt the interests of 
every category of shareholders, and hinder the two-way 
circulation of funds. However, it will take technology and, even 
more important, time, to straighten out this problem. 
  6. Primary and Secondary Markets. The practice of issuing an 
unlimited number of share purchasing forms greatly reduces 
speculation and profiteering opportunities on the primary and 
secondary markets. Capacity expansion also renders the secondary 
market stable and orderly. Such a development, we must say, is 
normal. The past phenomenon of making a fortune overnight was 
precisely a sign of the peculiarity of the Chinese stock market. 
Accordingly, we should fully endorse the issue method on the 
primary market and capacity expansion on the secondary market 
and pin our hopes for the maturing of the stock market in the 
country on them. 
  7. Tighten the Regulation of Stockbrokers. The stockbroker 
plays a crucial role as a middleman. At present, however, some 
stockbrokers are inefficient in their work, charge arbitrary 
fees, and offer poor services, even lining their own pockets 
with ill-gotten gains by taking advantage of the opportunities 
provided by their line of work. Their practices have left the 
shareholders profoundly dissatisfied and there are frequent 
disputes between them. Thus it is most important to educate 
stockbrokers to make them comply with discipline and obey the 
law and improve the quality of their services. When a 
stockbroker breaks the law, he must be dealt with strictly. To 
protect shareholders' legitimate rights and interests, it is 
proposed that a special agency be created to monitor the 
stockbrokers and a telephone hot-line be set up on which a 
shareholder can make complaints about a stockbroker. 
  8. Step Up Prevention Of Stock Market Crime. Stock market 
crime has now become a new kind of crime in society. A typical 
analysis of stock market criminals shows that they include 
leaders equipped with the power to allocate funds, to review and 
approve shareholding pilot projects, and to issue shares. For 
this reason, tightening the authorization and control of funds, 
reinforcing ideological education, improving all sorts of 
systems, launching multiple-rights restraint, and even 
conducting stock market general inspections regularly (annually, 
for instance) are all effective ways to prevent stock market 
crime. 
  9. Share ownership should go hand in hand with rights, 
profits, risks, and responsibilities. The "five-tong" issue 
("tong gu," "tong quan," "tong li," "tong xian," and "tong ze") 
has never been satisfactorily resolved. For instance, when an 
arbitrary decision is made not to match state shares, the right 
of the state as shareholder is lost. State shares and most 
legal-person shares cannot circulate, which translates into lost 
interests and heightened risks. The department in charge at the 
higher level wilfully intervenes in personnel appointments and 
dismissals, in the distribution of dividends, and in business 
decision-making. This infringes upon the shareholders' rights 
and constitutes irresponsibility. Every category of shareholders 
must learn to operate in accordance with the principles of the 
shareholding system. 
  10. It is undeniable that the stock market fever has much to 
do with the fact that some enterprises only see the advantages 
of raising funds by issuing shares. As long as money paid for 
shares is there, they could not care less how the shareholding 
mechanism works. In some cases, it has become a mere formality. 
The shareholders' meeting, for instance, is held perfunctorily. 
The selection of the board chairman and general manager is 
prearranged internally. The board of directors has become a 
dumping ground for cadres about to retire. Shareholders are not 
consulted on major decisions and changes. Information given out 
on the enterprise's performance is less than truthful. 
Fund-raising takes place in the guise of share allocation and 
shareholders are issued IOU's. If these practices continue, one 
fears one will hear slogans calling for the revitalization of 
shareholding enterprises very soon. It is proposed that the 
board of supervisors of the enterprise fully discharges its 
duties and responsibilities by promptly examining the company's 
financial data, monitoring the managerial conduct of the 
directors and manager, and correcting it regularly. The board of 
supervisors must be chosen democratically, comprising only 
shareholders with no leadership responsibilities. Furthermore, 
units at the higher level must support shareholding enterprises 
in transforming their mechanism and cannot wilfully or 
coercively dismiss a company leader or disrupt its 
decision-making and management. Departments in charge of staff 
functions (tax, finance) should operate in accordance with 
shareholding policies and not impose on shareholding enterprises 
the standards appropriate to other enterprises. With the 
enterprises and departments in charge working together, changing 
the mechanism of shareholding enterprises will not be a problem. 
  11. Regularize the Way in Which a Shareholding Enterprise 
Buys Up Another. The three incidents of shareholding enterprises 
buying up one another in 1993 were both a shock and a wake-up 
call to the agencies concerned, to companies whose shares are 
being traded on the stock market, and to shareholders. What the 
shareholding enterprises in the cases did was basically normal. 
Due to inexperience, the individual companies made some 
technical errors and were duly punished. It is normal market 
behavior for a company which has shares being traded on the 
stock market to purchase a particular stock through the stock 
market. This is an effective way to acquire or merge with 
another enterprise. But the purchasing process must be open. If 
an excess is acquired, it must be made public. Information 
disclosure must be prompt and the purpose must be constructive. 
Acquisition is inherently an act of property transfer. It is 
conducive to resource reallocation and reorganization and helps 
enterprises enhance their competitiveness. However, the existing 
policies, laws, and regulations governing enterprise acquisition 
are too general, which does nothing to facilitate the process of 
buying up an enterprise whose shares are traded on the stock 
market. Thus detailed, practical, and orderly rules are badly 
needed. 
  12. Crack down on bogus and inaccurate information. Both 
shareholders and the stock market were badly burned by the 
several incidents in 1993 involving bogus or inaccurate 
information. Preventing the dissemination of such information is 
essential to protecting shareholders and the stock market. 
Accordingly, media that disclose information must operate 
strictly in accordance with the "Implementation Regulations on 
the Disclosure of Information Relating to Companies With 
Publicly-Traded Shares." Violators should be sternly handled. 
(Already some publications were disciplined in 1993.) Detailed 
penal regulations must be formulated and people who fabricate 
information must be severely punished. Information consulting 
points should be set up everywhere to disseminate information 
regularly and squelch bogus information. 
  13. The issue and circulation of state shares and 
legal-person shares is inevitable. Whether you like it or not, 
state shares were traded on several occasions in 1993. This 
shows that it is only a matter of time before state shares are 
traded and circulate on the market. For now we must promptly 
decide who should be the agent for state properties to 
accelerate the personalization of the trading of state shares. 
No time should be wasted in formulating rules for the trading of 
state shares so that there is a law to go by. The trading of 
quasi-state shares, that is, legal-person shares, should also be 
handled as described above. Managing the issue and trading of 
these shares artificially by resorting to planned quotas would 
not work. If state shares and legal-person shares are not traded 
on the open market, rights and interests would remain stagnant 
at the existing level and the state would then be stuck with the 
risk. In the end, state properties would suffer. 
  14. Intensify Stock Market Risk-Consciousness. The 
shareholding system in China is still in its infancy, with many 
people having no basic knowledge of the system. They labor under 
the one-sided view that one makes a profit the moment one buys 
some shares and are hardly conscious of the risks involved. 
Consequently they are more likely to feel distraught when they 
lose money. Thus we must strengthen the shareholders' 
risk-awareness even as we organize all sorts of lectures showing 
people how to play it smart on the stock market and hire stock 
experts to tell us their experiences. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66166 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar027___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  13 April 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Light Industrial Output Value by Area in Mar </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Light Industrial Output Value by Area in Mar </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK1304105894 Beijing CEI Database in English 13 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> HK1304105894 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CEI Database </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing (CEIS) -- Following is a list of the light 
industrial output value by area in China in March 1994 released 
by the State Statistical Bureau: 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                  |                  |                  |(Unit: 100 millio-| 
|                  |                  |                  |n yuan)           | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Area              |3/94              |3/93              |Change Over 3/93 (| 
|                  |                  |                  |pc)               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Total             |1617.43           |1348.81           |19.9              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Beijing           |38.58             |30.02             |28.5              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Tianjin           |35.34             |29.59             |19.4              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Hebei             |51.45             |44.96             |14.4              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Shanxi            |11.09             |11.46             |-3.2              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Inner Mongolia    |9.77              |8.89              |9.9               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Liaoning          |47.32             |41.62             |13.7              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Jilin             |19.39             |19.09             |1.6               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Heilongjiang      |24.14             |23.64             |2.1               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Shanghai          |106.29            |94.82             |12.1              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Jiangsu           |269.13            |218.36            |23.3              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Zhejiang          |153.82            |122.90            |25.2              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Anhui             |50.19             |40.86             |22.8              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Fujian            |50.83             |40.68             |25.0              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Jiangxi           |27.14             |23.56             |15.2              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Shandong          |169.61            |117.73            |44.1              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Henan             |61.15             |48.38             |26.4              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Hubei             |58.68             |52.33             |12.1              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Hunan             |34.13             |31.28             |9.1               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Guangdong         |229.64            |185.37            |23.9              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Guangxi           |32.96             |31.38             |5.0               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Hainan            |4.56              |5.32              |-14.3             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Sichuan           |62.21             |56.15             |10.8              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Guizhou           |7.20              |7.69              |-6.4              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Yunnan            |24.93             |23.03             |8.3               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Tibet             |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Shaanxi           |18.41             |17.06             |7.9               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Gansu             |6.73              |7.78              |-13.5             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Qinghai           |1.27              |1.49              |-14.8             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Ningxia           |1.47              |1.56              |-5.8              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Xinjiang          |10.00             |11.81             |-15.3             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66167 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar027___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  14 April 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Statistics on Output of Raw Materials in March </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Statistics on Output of Raw Materials in March </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   HK1404103994 Beijing CEI Database in English 14 Apr 94 </F>
<F P=103> HK1404103994 </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing CEI Database </F>
<F P=105>  English </F>


<TEXT>
BFN 

  [Text] Beijing (CEIS) -- Following is a list of the output 
of raw materials in March 1994, released by the State 
Statistical Bureau: 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Item              |Unit              |3/94              |3/93              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Iron ore          |10,000t           |1864.39           |1748.60           | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Pig iron          |10,000t           |800.11            |711.40            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Steel             |10,000t           |819.15            |755.80            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Rolled steel      |10,000t           |736.02            |638.18            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Ferro alloys      |10,000t           |13.08             |12.51             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Coking coal       |10,000t           |551.38            |517.27            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Ten nonferrous me-|10,000t           |29.43             |27.03             | 
|tals              |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Of: Copper        |10,000t           |5.78              |6.23              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Aluminium         |10,000t           |11.70             |9.53              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Copper products   |10,000t           |5.52              |5.64              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Aluminium products|10,000t           |5.67              |5.60              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Alumina           |10,000t           |15.66             |9.54              | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Sulphuric-iron ore|10,000t           |142.21            |106.05            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Phosphorus ore    |10,000t           |213.83            |201.39            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Timber            |10,000cu m        |477.64            |498               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Artificial board  |10,000cu m        |40.96             |38.23             | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Cement            |10,000t           |3247.60           |2905.20           | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Plate glass       |10,000c           |896.71            |910.79            | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Notes: t - ton, cu m - cubic meter, c - case                               | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66168 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar027___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  1 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> INDUSTRY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Trends in Nonferrous Metals Futures Market </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Trends in Nonferrous Metals Futures Market </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0352B Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO in Chinese 1 Mar 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0352B </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by reporters Li Haifu (2621 3189 3940) and Jiang </F>
Zuozhong (3068 0146 0022)] 
  [Text] Recently, authorities at the Shenzhen Nonferrous 
Metals Exchange discussed the futures market for nonferrous 
metals and predicted that prices for copper and aluminum, in the 
first quarter, will rise rather sharply, after which they are 
expected to stabilize at a definite price level. 
  This authority said that in 1933 the futures market for 
nonferrous metals went through a "tightening and relaxing" 
phase. At the beginning of last year, the national economy 
heated up sharply, due chiefly to a rise in nonferrous metal 
prices, which dropped gradually in the second and third quarters 
to finally bottom out in October, the lowest point for the whole 
year. After this, following an improvement in the national 
economy, prices on nonferrous metals rose again, though not to 
the level of the first part of the year. 
  Price fluctuations for the chief nonferrous metals this 
past year are described as follows: 
  Copper: China has a short supply of copper. Output in 1993 
was 710,000 tons, an increase of about 12 percent over that last 
year. As copper use required 800,000 tons, the shortfall was met 
partly by imports. International prices on copper which dipped 
in early May and late October, led to sizeable increases in 
copper imports. Adding the imports of copper, copper alloys, and 
copper processing materials for the year, estimated to range 
from 350,000 to 400,000 tons, the available copper supply 
totalled around 1.11 million tons. After allowing 150,000 tons 
for normal inventory stocks, the excess which added up to 
200,000 to 250,000 tons created great pressures on the domestic 
copper market. 
  From January to September, the price of copper inventories 
at the Shenzhen Nonferrous Metals Exchange was maintained 
between 19,000 yuan to 22,500 yuan per ton. Since mid-September, 
copper prices began sliding sharply, finally bottoming out in 
mid-October at 16,700 yuan per ton, but rising again to about 
18,500 yuan per ton by the end of December. In comparison with 
international copper prices fluctuating in the range of $600 
U.S. per ton, the fluctuation range of 6,800 yuan per ton in 
domestic copper prices basically reflect the trend in the 
international market. 
  Aluminum: Aluminum output in China last year reached 1.2 
million tons. Imports of aluminum and aluminum alloys were 
roughly 170,000 tons. The total amount of aluminum expended 
during the year was around 1.3 million tons, so supply and 
demand of aluminum on the domestic market were basically 
balanced. 
  From January to March, when the people's currency used to 
regulate foreign exchange showed acute variation, aluminum 
prices at the Shenzhen Nonferrous Metals Exchange remained 
between 12,400 yuan and 12,950 yuan. Because of the great 
pressure of imports and the effect that the rapid drop in 
aluminum prices on the international market had, aluminum prices 
at the Shenzhen exchange finally stabilized around 12,000 yuan 
per ton. 
  Lead and Zinc: Besides meeting domestic needs, China's 
supply of lead and zinc had surplus amounts available for 
export. In 1993, the output of lead and zinc in China were 
400,000 tons and 800,000 tons respectively, valued at 7,860 yuan 
to 8,000 yuan per ton. The trend was stable. 
  Tin: Besides adequately meeting domestic needs, most of 
China's tin output was exported. In 1993, tin output was about 
49,000 tons, an increase of 34 percent over the year before. The 
amount expended domestically was 13,000 tons, comparable to 
amounts expended the previous year. Tin prices last year showed 
great fluctuation, between 43,000 yuan and 50,000 yuan per ton. 
One reason for this was partly excessive supply over demand, and 
another was a sudden drop in international tin prices in 
mid-September to $4,300 U.S. per ton. 
  Nickel: In 1933, China's output of nickel was about 30,000 
tons, an increase of 1.72 percent over that for the year before. 
The amount of nickel imports was about 9,000 tons, making the 
total supply of nickel available at 39,000 tons. As the amount 
of nickel expended was 38,000 tons, supply and demand were 
basically balanced. However, affected by international price 
fluctuations, domestic nickel prices in 1933 were found to range 
between 58,000 yuan and 48,300 yuan per ton, a rather 
substantial fluctuation. 
  The main trends concerning the market for nonferrous 
metals in 1994 will now be discussed. 
  Because the supply of nonferrous metals on the 
international market exceeds demand, inventories at the London 
Metals Exchange were as high as 600,000 tons for copper; for 
aluminum, 2.4 million tons; for lead, 300,000 tons; for zinc, 
880,000 tons; for tin, 19,000 tons; and for nickel, 120,000 
tons. This showed a considerable range of increases over 
inventories for the year before. 
  Against such a background, and right at a time when the 
building of China's socialist market economy is entering a new 
stage, and reforms in finance, international trade, and capital 
investment are opening up on a broad scale, China's nonferrous 
metals market is facing an opportunity and a challenge at the 
same time. 
  For 1994, output estimates for the main nonferrous metals 
are noted as follows: copper, 800,000 tons; aluminum, 1.35 
million tons; lead, 410,000 tons; zinc, 750,000 tons; tin, 
35,000 tons; and nickel, 32,000 tons. These figures all showed 
rather large increases in output. But output expended is 
expected to reach 900,00 tons, 1.1 million tons, 350,000 tons, 
709,000 tons, 15,000 tons, and 40,000 tons respectively. The 
trading pattern in nonferrous metals will show that copper and 
nickel will still depend on imports to meet part of their needs, 
though some of the lead, zinc, and aluminum will have some 
excess for export, while a good part of the tin will be exported. 
  In 1994, because international trade has great hopes for 
economic recovery in countries such as Great Britain, the United 
States etc., that within a quarter, the international price for 
copper will undergo a substantial rise, though the range may not 
be as broad as that for the year before. Under such 
circumstances, domestic copper prices may show a noticeable rise 
possibly to a figure as high as 22,000 yuan per ton, and follow 
the slide of international copper prices and drop. For the year, 
the fluctuations may range between 18,000 yuan to 20,000 yuan 
per ton. 
  International prices for aluminum are affected by 
international copper prices, in that at the beginning of the 
year, prices may rise, though not steeply. Because of this, 
domestic prices for aluminum at the beginning of the year can be 
expected to stabilize at 12,500 yuan per ton, but very quickly 
would be subject to depression. For the year, prices can be 
expected to remain at an average of 12,000 yuan per ton. 
  Peak prices for lead, zinc, tin, and nickel in 1994 are 
also expected to appear in the beginning of the year. As 
domestic prices for lead and nickel in 1994 are affected by the 
international market, they would likely stabilize at more than 
3,900 yuan per ton and 48,000 yuan per ton, respectively. 
  Domestic prices for tin are most depressing, and their 
overall level during the year is expected to remain around 
16,000 yuan per ton. Zinc prices are expected to be sustained 
around 8,000 yuan per ton. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66169 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar027___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  15 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FOREIGN TRADE, INVESTMENT </F>
<H3> <TI>   Current Protection of Service Trademarks </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Current Protection of Service Trademarks </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0406A Beijing GUOJI MAOYI [INTERTRADE] in Chinese No 
145, 15 Jan 94 pp 45-46 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0406A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GUOJI MAOYI [INTERTRADE] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zhang Pengjun (1728 7720 6511) of the Foreign </F>
Trade Department, Northeast Finance and Economics University: 
"Protection of Service Marks in China"] 
  [Excerpt] [passage omitted] Legal Status of Service 
Marks in China 
  So far, China has no sound legal system to protect service 
marks. Article 4 of the Chinese Trademark Law states: 
"Enterprises, institutions, and self-employed workers and 
businessmen wishing to have rights to the exclusive use of 
trademarks for the commodities they are producing, 
manufacturing, processing, turning out by selection processes, 
or putting on the market for sale should apply to the Trademark 
Bureau for registration of the trademarks." As can be seen, the 
trademarks protected by the Chinese Trademark Law cannot be 
separated from commodities. That is, only trademarks for 
commodities are protected by the Trademark Law, while service 
marks are not. Of course, in actual practice, service-type 
enterprises that also produce and sell commodities sometimes may 
register their service marks as trademarks in the hope of 
getting legal protection. From the perspective of the Trademark 
Law, however, those service marks are protected simply because 
they are treated as trademarks. If someone uses a mark identical 
with or similar to the registered trademark as his or her own 
service mark, the act will not constitute an infringement, and 
the one who originally registered the trademark will have no 
right to ban such use or claim indemnity under the Trademark Law. 
  In some countries, service marks are protected not only by 
the trademark law but also through the adoption of an 
anti-unethical competition law. The two kinds of protection 
differ from each other. Generally speaking, to be protected by 
the anti-unethical competition law, the service mark must be 
well-known to the public, and it is necessary to prove that use 
of the service mark by others would confuse the public and that 
such use has already occurred and constituted an act of 
unethical competition. The "Anti-Unethical Competition Law of 
the People's Republic of China" adopted on 2 September 1993 
stresses the protection of trademarks but lacks explicit 
provisions on service mark protection. So we can say that now in 
our country service marks are neither protected by the Trademark 
Law nor safeguarded by the Anti-Unethical Competition Law as in 
some foreign countries. 
  With the acceleration of China's market-oriented economic 
construction, the tertiary industry is playing an increasingly 
striking role in the whole national economy. Obviously, the 
pertinent laws and systems currently in effect in our country 
can no longer meet the needs of service mark protection. Now 
that more and more countries in the world are legally protecting 
service marks, we should lose no time in formulating our own 
laws and systems for this purpose. Based on the successful 
experience of most countries, we should, first of all, enlarge 
the scope of protection by our Trademark Law. Necessary 
provisions should be included in the Trademark Law so that it 
will protect service marks as well. By revising this law, we 
should establish a service mark registration system similar to 
the one for the registration of commodity marks. Since service 
mark registration has many unique problems that do not exist in 
the ordinary trademark protection system (such as the unit or 
individual with the right to use the service mark, the 
definition and scope of the service, the makeup of the service 
mark, and infringement on the service mark), an essential 
question to be studied in revising the Trademark Law is how to 
properly proceed with the legislation of service mark 
protection. Apart from this, we should consider adding a 
clear-cut provision on service mark protection to the 
Anti-Unethical Competition Law. This way we will not only be 
able to prevent unauthorized use of properly registered 
commercial marks, trade and service marks alike, but can also 
give them legal protection if the rightful interests are hurt 
through unethical competition, whether the marks have been 
registered or not. We will thus improve our legal system for 
service mark protection to meet the needs of our country's 
economic development and the program of reform and opening up. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66170 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar027___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  8 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FOREIGN TRADE, INVESTMENT </F>
<H3> <TI>   Strategies for Increasing Trade in 1990's </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Strategies for Increasing Trade in 1990's </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0407A Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO in Chinese 8 Mar 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0407A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing JINGJI CANKAO BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Chen Baojiu (7115 1405 3773): "Can China's </F>
Foreign Trade Catch the World's Express Train in the 1990's?"] 
  [Text] Looking at the world today, we cannot deny this 
fact: The question of economy has gradually replaced political 
and military confrontation as the main theme of the times, while 
competition in science and technology is playing the role of the 
commanding point in trials of comprehensive strengths among 
nations. Ever since the beginning of the 1990's, economic 
regional collectivization has developed by leaps and bounds 
across the world, and trade wars have become increasingly 
white-hot between regions and nations. Vigorous development of 
multinational companies has given a powerful impetus to economic 
globalization. Accelerated progress of a new technological 
revolution has prompted the industrialization of high technology 
in developed countries, which is expected to become a new trend 
in the world. All these are fostering a tremendous change in the 
world's industrial structure. 
  This is the international environment China has to face in 
developing its foreign trade in the 1990's. Both opportunities 
and challenges exist. The key question is how to draw up an 
economic development strategy in line with our national 
conditions so as to guide our foreign trade and the reform and 
opening-up drive and to quicken our process of modernization. 
  In the 1990's, we should carry out a grand economic and 
trade strategy--that is, opening widely to the outside world on 
all sides, in diverse areas, and through multiple channels; 
integrating economic and trade cooperation among domestic 
industries and such cooperation with countries in the world; and 
giving full play to foreign trade's guiding role and 
comprehensive services for our economic development. 
  We may say that if our country is to take a foothold in 
the world's trade, we must blaze between brambles a new trail 
for foreign trade development in line with our national 
conditions. A "grand economic and trade strategy" will no doubt 
assist us macroeconomically in opening such a trail. 
  The "grand economic trade strategy" should be taken as 
China's overall economic and trade strategy for the 1990's. It 
means "great opening, wide-scale integration, and a big change 
in functions." 
  Great opening. We should increase the depth and breadth of 
our foreign economic and trade activities so as to create a 
situation of opening on all sides, in diverse areas, and through 
multiple channels. 
  Great integration. This means the integration of different 
foreign economic and trade operations, the integration of 
multilateral, regional, and bilateral economic and trade 
cooperation, and the integration of trade, industry, 
agriculture, technology, banking, and commerce. 
  A big change in functions. While increasing its 
contributions, foreign trade should serve the purpose of 
readjusting our industrial structure and speeding up the 
development of technology-intensive industries. It should also 
play a guiding role and provide comprehensive and multifacet 
services for our economic development. 
  Now, let us make a forecast. This overall strategy will 
bring our foreign trade to the following state in the 1990's: 
  --Our foreign trade will change from its self-devised 
system to an open form of development. In the 1990's, under the 
overall situation of opening widely at home and toward the 
outside world, our foreign trade must also develop in an open 
way. Barriers between different trades should be removed, and 
their activities should be allowed to diffuse into each other's 
areas. We should combine trade, industry, agriculture, 
technology, commerce, and banking into an organic whole and give 
a fuller play to foreign trade's overall guidance role and 
comprehensive service function in developing the economy. 
  --Our foreign trade operations will change from extensive 
to intensive operations. The export volume will be expanded 
mainly through the improvement of the quality of export 
products, increase in their varieties and designs, and creation 
of famous brands. Returns from both export and import businesses 
will be boosted to a fairly big extent. 
  --The principal exports will change from primarily 
processed products with a low added value to intensively 
processed products and manufactured goods with a high added 
value. The makeup of imports will also be changed--an increase 
will be noted in proportion of advanced technology and equipment 
in the total amount of import. 
  --Readjustment and reorganization of foreign trade 
enterprises will be put in high gear through the formation of 
Chinese-type business companies. It is expected that a 
"pyramidic" foreign trade enterprise structure headed by about 
10 large transnational companies will come into being by the end 
of this century. The objective is to raise our competitiveness 
in world trade. 
  --In the 1990's, division of labor among foreign trade 
enterprises will develop toward this goal: diversified 
businesses for a few big enterprises; specialized operations for 
most small and medium-sized enterprises. 
  --Rational disparity will exist between different 
localities in developing export-oriented industries. Foreign 
trade operations will tend to concentrate in cities on sea 
coasts, along rivers, and on the border with convenient 
transportation and information facilities, abundant foreign 
trade manpower, and well-developed infrastructures. Particular 
efforts will be made to better utilize the all-round favorable 
conditions of traditional trade ports such as Guangzhou, Dalian, 
Shanghai, Qingdao, and Tianjin. 
  In the 1990's, technology imports should aim at directly 
participating in international division of labor instead of 
achieving 100 percent domestic production. Emphasis should be 
placed on import of technologies for the machinery, electronics, 
petrochemical, and certain new- and high-tech industries as well 
as related upstream and downstream industries, including 
materials and equipment industries. 
  Technological progress is a key factor for improving a 
country's industrial structure and the international 
competitiveness of its products, thus changing its own 
conditions for promoting foreign economic relations and trade. 
For a developing country like ours, technology imports are a 
main avenue leading to technological progress . 
  In view of the drastic changes that will take place in 
China's internal and external environments during the mid- and 
late-1990's, experts and academics deem it imperative to study 
and formulate a technology import program for the new situation 
based on the requirements of the grand economic and trade 
strategy. In this regard, they say, we must draw on the 
successful experience of Japan and Korea. That is, while beefing 
up technology imports, we must energetically readjust the 
methods and the makeup of such imports. The strategy to be 
applied should be gearing our technology imports to strategic 
industries (meaning technology-intensive industries). We should 
devote great efforts to promoting the technological progress of 
strategic industries and shortening as much as possible the time 
of transit from import substitution to export promotion so as to 
achieve the goal of making strategic industries the leading 
export industries by the end of this century. 
  Based on the above mindset, the following changes should 
be made in our technology imports in the mid- and late-1990's: 
  First, it is imperative to expand the scale of technology 
imports. Every effort should be made to raise to an appropriate 
extent the percentage of advanced technology and equipment in 
the total import from the previous levels of 30.8 percent and 33 
percent registered in 1989 and 1990 respectively. 
  Secondly, we should speed up the implementation of the 
technology import strategy that emphasizes strategic industries. 
In the post-war period, Japan has carried out a strategy of 
gearing its technology imports to three categories of big 
leading industries (the first category is the thermal power 
industry; the second category includes petroleum refining, 
petrochemicals, iron and steel, and shipbuilding; and the third 
category covers automobiles, household electrical appliances, 
and so on). Efforts have also been made to integrate technology 
imports closely with its own research and development program. 
As a result, it has not only digested, assimilated, and improved 
the imported technologies, but also created new technologies of 
its own. This has enabled the country to achieve great success 
in quickly raising its labor productivity and international 
competitiveness and bringing its leading industries from the 
state of import substitution to the road of export-oriented 
development. In the mid- and late-1990's, China should increase 
its technology imports and boost its research and development 
efforts in the fields of the machinery, electronics, 
petrochemical, and certain new- and high-tech industries as well 
as related upstream and downstream industries, including 
materials and equipment industries. The purpose is to speed up 
the pace toward the promotion of exports instead of relying on 
imports. 
  In view of the fact that China will face an open 
environment internally and externally in the mid- and 
late-1990's, China's technology imports should be changed from a 
simple import model to a multifacet model. This means that 
advanced technologies should be introduced into our country in 
diversified ways, including technological cooperation, science 
and technology exchanges, utilization of foreign capital, 
overseas investment, and technology and equipment imports. In 
addition, all-inclusive imports should be replaced by selective 
imports. That is, we should decide on the basis of our own 
backgrounds and conditions whether it is appropriate to import 
the whole package of machinery, equipment, and technology or 
part of the technology or just certain parts and elements of the 
machinery or equipment and the related technology. Our basic 
goal should be direct participation in international division of 
labor rather than 100 percent domestic production. 
  We arrived at the above conclusion after paying a high 
price. Taking our computer industry as an example, our country 
has, since the 1980's, imported some production lines for the 
most popular computer models of the times. Nonetheless, while we 
are still digesting and assimilating the technologies related to 
these models and trying to increase the percentage of 
domestically made parts and elements for our computer 
industry--which is essentially the assembly of imported 
parts--new breakthroughs in computer technology have been made 
by foreign countries. All of a sudden, our imported computer 
production lines have been pushed to the brink of obsolescence. 
  From this, we have come to understand that we should, 
first of all, have a high starting point and aim at the advanced 
international level as our target in planning technology 
imports. Secondly, we should stress the importance of various 
forms of international technological cooperation and make 
China's technology-intensive industries a major link in the 
world's industrial technology chain. In no way should we require 
everything to be produced domestically. Otherwise, our 
technology imports will always lag behind the advanced world 
level, the gap will remain forever, and we will fall into an 
absurd cycle of "technology imports--domestic 
production--lagging behind--technology imports again." 
  In the 1990's, we should put emphasis on bolstering and 
developing the export of products of heavy industries, including 
the machinery, electronics, chemical, and metallurgical 
industries. We should expand the export of automobiles, complete 
sets of equipment, ships, civil airplanes, machines, and 
electronic products. And we should assist new-and high-tech 
industries, including computer and software, microelectronics, 
optoelectronics, biotechnology, and materials technology 
industries, in expanding their exports. 
  Presently, our country's export products consist mainly of 
light industrial products, including textiles. A principal 
characteristic of these products is that they are of a 
low-technology nature and belong to the so-called low-grade 
category with a low added value. To develop export under such 
circumstances, our effort will be inevitably hindered by a host 
of domestic and international factors. The best way to change 
this situation is to carry out the strategy of upgrading our 
export industries. This means putting more emphasis on 
developing technology-intensive industries, primarily heavy 
industries and certain new- and high-tech industries. We should 
see to it that these industries will become our leading export 
industries by the end of the 1990's. 
  Specific targets are as follows: Stress should be laid on 
bolstering and developing the export of products of heavy 
industries, including the machinery, electronics, chemical, and 
metallurgical industries. We should see to it that these 
industries will become our leading industries in the future and 
our prime export industries by the end of this century. Of the 
products of technology-intensive industries, machinery and 
electronic products should account for a big share. We should 
boost in a selective manner the export of the following items: 
motor vehicles (including motorcycles) and their parts and 
accessories, whole sets of equipment, electronic products, 
communications devices, ships, civil airplanes, textile 
machinery, clocks and watch, general machinery, power plant 
machinery, machine tools, bicycles, and cameras. We should make 
these items the main exports of our country. In addition, we 
should make all-out efforts to develop the export of 
high-value-added products turned out by petrochemical, precision 
chemical, metallurgical, and building materials industries. 
Among these industries, whichever has matured should be put on 
the track of export-oriented development as early as possible. 
  Also, we should assist certain new- and high-tech 
industries in boosting their exports, primarily in the fields of 
computers and software, communications products, life science, 
aviation and space science, microelectronics, optoelectronics, 
integration of machinery and electronic devices, nuclear 
technology, biotechnology, and materials technology. We should 
make them the major exports of our country by the end of 1990's. 
  Currently, of the nearly $100 billion worth of products 
that China exports each year, a sizable part are the products 
made by backbone enterprises, which are mostly labor-intensive 
enterprises. So the readjustment, upgrading, and updating of the 
products of these enterprises are of crucial importance to 
China's exports in the 1990's. 
  To cope with the trend of developing "intellectual type" 
and high-grade products for international trade and to meet the 
growing demands for high-grade, precision, and advanced products 
on the world market, we should shift the stress of our future 
efforts to developing intensively and finely processed products. 
We should try to create a higher added value from every unit of 
material we consume. In the adjustment of our garment industry, 
for example, material improvement, development of new fabrics, 
intensive processing, and production of high-grade garments may 
be taken as our major tasks. In developing intensive food 
processing, upgrading and updating household electrical 
appliances, and improving the quality of footgear and toys, more 
efforts should be devoted to creating brand-name products so as 
to boost competitiveness and increase returns. With respect to 
primary products, export of raw materials and fuels should be 
put under proper control. 
  The above ideas are based on the views held by experts and 
academics as well as the opinions of the government departments 
concerned. Some have been or are going to be put into practice. 
The "grand economic and trade strategy" is China's overall 
strategy for its foreign trade development in the 1990's. The 
implementation and realization of this strategy will enable 
China's foreign trade to catch the world's fast-running economic 
express. 
  And we have good reason to believe that we will see its 
realization by the end of the 1990's. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66171 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar027___94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  15 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> FOREIGN TRADE, INVESTMENT </F>
<H3> <TI>   Final Act of Uruguay Round Evaluated </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Final Act of Uruguay Round Evaluated </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0384A Beijing GUOJI MAOYI [INTERTRADE] in Chinese No 
146, 15 Feb 94 pp 28-30 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0384A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GUOJI MAOYI [INTERTRADE] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Sheng Baoliang (4141 0202 5328) of the </F>
International Economic Relations and Trade Department, Ministry 
of Foreign Trade and Economic Cooperation: "The Final Act of the 
Uruguay Round and Its Impact On China's Economic Trade"] 
  [Excerpt] [passage omitted] 
<H5>  II. The Final Act's Impact on China's Economic Trade </H5>
  1.The Uruguay Round's relevance to China. 
  In July 1986, the Chinese government formally applied to 
regain China's status as a GATT signatory state. In September of 
that year, the Chinese government attended the new Uruguay Round 
multilateral trade negotiations in the status of full 
participant. For seven years, China enthusiastically attended 
this round of negotiations from beginning to end, and made due 
contributions to the successful negotiations. In the process of 
negotiations, besides making significant adjustments in economic 
and trade policies in accordance with the requirements of the 
negotiations, China submitted tariff reduction forms for 
agricultural products and non-agricultural products, involving 
taxes on more than 800 agricultural products and taxes on more 
than 4,000 nonagricultural products. 
  In the trade service aspect, from start to finish, in 
addition to participating in the negotiations and drafting of 
the general agreement on trade service, China also submitted the 
final trade service reduction form, and opened sectors which 
included banking, insurance, shipping, land and sea oil 
exploration, professional services (including legal, accounting, 
etc.), computers, real estate, and advertising. Plans are for 
China to initial all Uruguay Round accords at April's 
ministerial level meeting, but the actual implementation of 
these accords must wait for China to reenter GATT and become a 
founding member of the World Trade Organization (WTO). 
  2. The Uruguay Round's final act and its impact on 
China's economy and trade. 
  There is no doubt that the agreement to liberalize world 
trade described in the final act of the Uruguay Round will push 
world markets open further and promote the world's economy, in 
which the growth and promotion of international trade in most 
countries has fallen upon hard times insofar as creating 
significant economic efficiency and employment opportunities are 
concerned. Economists believe that the Uruguay Round's agreement 
to liberalize world trade will bring a $6,000 billion increase 
in output value in the next decade, and by 2005, the gross 
amount of world trade will have increased by 12 percent from the 
current level of $3,600 billion. 
  However, the benefits that accrue from the agreement to 
liberalize world trade will be different for each country in the 
world, especially for poor nations which import agricultural 
products, because they will pay more to purchase grain in the 
world market. Talking about China's situation, the Uruguay 
accord will have the following impact on our economy and trade. 
  1. It will assist the further development of China's 
economic 
trade, especially the foreign-oriented economy. It will help to 
promote and expand export of China's products and service, to 
expand attraction of foreign capital. This is chiefly due to: a) 
Internationally, the success of the Uruguay Round will help 
restrain western nations' trade protectionism and push them 
further into China's open market while providing good and 
relaxed external conditions for our economic development; b) the 
free trade benefits from the Uruguay Round must be extended to 
China, because although China in not yet a GATT member, we have 
signed bilateral trade accords with MFN status; c) since the 
implementation of the policy of opening and reform, China's 
economy has become more closely linked to the world economy, and 
the pace of that linkage is accelerating. In recent years, 
reform and opening have gone further and expanded, and the 
lasting rapid development of China's economy has created a nice 
internal environment for the further development of economy and 
trade. 
  One analysis by an economic cooperation organization showed 
that China will be one of the countries deriving the most 
benefits from the Uruguay Round's trade liberalization, and by 
2002, its annual income will reach $37 billion. 
  But a more open market means more intense competition, 
setting out a new and more serious challenge to the mix and 
quality of China's export products and service. China's domestic 
market will face strong competitive pressures from imported 
products, and our export products must also face a strong fight 
for markets with other countries' products. For this, we must 
have clear understanding and preparation. 
  2. For the next step in China's economic and foreign trade 
reform, the Uruguay Round accord will be an important reference 
point. It will play an important role in making our economic and 
foreign trade system match up better with international 
regulations. 
  3. It gives a greater urgency to the negotiations for 
China's 
rejoining GATT, and the negotiation assignment will be more 
critical. According to the schedule set up by the Uruguay Round 
and the conditions for funding membership set by the WTO accord, 
China must have completed its GATT re-entry before the WTO goes 
into effect (estimates are for July 1995, with the final date 
for going into effect to be established at the ministerial level 
meeting in April 1994). Otherwise, China will have to re-apply 
to join the WTO again, pay an expensive second time "entry fee," 
and will also have greater obligations in opening markets. 
Speaking of the assignment, the accords reached in the Uruguay 
Round will become the obligations China must comply with. So, in 
the future negotiations on rejoining GATT, the signatory parties 
will demand a higher price from China. 
  4. On the other hand, the final act of the Uruguay Round 
will 
also have some negative impact on China's economic and trade 
development. For example, it allows cross-industry retaliation 
(as an example, a nation can take retaliatory measures against 
fabric products for problems in intellectual property rights and 
service industries). Although the unified system for resolving 
disputes will alleviate international trade disputes more 
efficiently to prevent unilateral retaliation, it will not 
resolve the problem of some countries exploiting their domestic 
laws (for example, the American Special 301 Provision) to 
implement restrictive measures against foreign countries in 
order to retaliate for trade problems; some countries such as 
the U.S. have made anti-dumping agreements part of their 
domestic laws, opening a convenient door for them to use 
anti-dumping restrictions on imports at their will. 
  It is worth mentioning that it will be some time before the 
final act of the Uruguay Round goes into effect, and there will 
be gradual implementation of the trade liberalization agreement 
in it, so its impact on China's economy and trade will also be 
gradual. 
  In short, while on the one hand, the final act of the 
Uruguay 
Round will be favorable to the further development of China's 
economy and trade, on the other hand, its imperfect nature will 
have some negative impact on the development of China's economy 
and trade. At the same time, it makes China's GATT re-entry 
negotiations all the more urgent and formidable. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66172 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar027___94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  25 December 1993 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> POPULATION </F>
<H3> <TI>   Symposium on `Chengde Model of Population Control' </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Symposium on `Chengde Model of Population Control' </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0339A Beijing RENKOU YU JINGJI [POPULATION AND 
ECONOMICS] in Chinese No 81, 25 Dec 93 pp 59-62 </F>

<F P=103> 94CE0339A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing RENKOU YU JINGJI [POPULATION AND 
ECONOMICS] </F>

<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Liu Xiangru (0491 4161 1172): "Summary in </F>
Symposium on Chengde Model of Population Control"] 
  [Excerpts] [passage omitted] The Population Society of 
China, the ZHONGGUO RENKOU BAOSHE [Population Journal of China], 
the Hebei Provincial Family Planning Commission and the Hebei 
Provincial Population Society jointly held, between 26 - 30 July 
1993, a symposium in Chengde City, Hebei Province, on the 
"Chengde Model of Population Control." Attending and addressing 
the symposium were Peng Peiyun, State Councillor and chairman of 
the State Family Planning Commission; Yang Kuifu [2799 7608 
1318] and Jiang Zhenghua [5592 2973 5478], vice chairmen of the 
said state commission; Li Honggui, head of the general office of 
the state commission; Gu Erxiong, Vice Governor of Hebei; Zhang 
Chunyuan [1728 4783 0337], Deputy Director of the Population 
Society of China and other comrades. Over 100 people were 
present at the symposium including theoreticians on population 
of the ZHONGGUO RHONCHI BAOSHE, the Beijing University, the 
People's University of China, the Population Information 
Research Center of China, the Hebei University, the Hebei 
Teachers' University and the Hebei Provincial Institute of 
Social Sciences and comrades of the family planning commissions 
in various cities and prefectures in Hebei Province, the 
Hanzhong Prefecture in Shaaxi Province, the city of Yancheng in 
Jiangsu and the Shanxi Provincial Family Planning Commission. 
[passage omitted] 
<H5>  I. Chengde's Major Experience in Population Control </H5>
  The City of Chengde is a typical hilly, old, minority and 
poor district. It economy is not well developed. The rural 
population accounts for 95 percent and the minority population 
makes up 48 percent of the total population in the district. Six 
of the eight counties under its administration are 
poverty-stricken ones which the state and the province need to 
provide major assistance. The leading comrades in the city often 
realize that the city's population growth is hampering the 
economic development of the hilly city. They are determined to 
place the population growth under control. They often educate 
the people by using publicity and education, strengthening 
scientific management and providing high-quality services to 
help control the birth rate on a regular and legal basis and 
with a scientific approach. For several years running, the city 
has successfully maintained its rate of family planning above 95 
percent and its rate of natural population growth below the 10 
percent level. The total number of women of child-bearing age 
and the child birth rate is lower than the replacement rates. 
Since 1988, the city of Chengde has been rated as an advanced 
family planning city for five years in a row, and four of its 
eight counties have been elected national advanced counties for 
birth control. 
  The symposium summarized Chengde's experience in family 
planning in the following eight aspects: 
  1. Reach a common understanding. "It is necessary to control 
birth in order to eliminate poverty, and it is essential to 
emancipate from ignorance in order to become well-to-do." "We 
must attach importance to both types of production [the 
production of means of subsistence and the production of human 
beings] and develop both resources (human and natural 
resources)." To regard population growth as a strategic 
breakthrough to help the rural areas become rich is no longer 
the understanding of the principal party and government leaders 
and the leading comrades in charge of birth control, but also 
that of the leading bodies in Chengde. It is not only the 
understanding of the local leadership, but also that of the 
leading bodies at all levels. It is not only the understanding 
of the cadres, but also that of the broad masses. Only there is 
an unified and correct understanding, will it be possible to act 
correctly and in a unified manner. 
  2. Strengthen leadership. The party committees and 
governments at all levels have achieved their goals in "giving 
priority to the four aspects" in doing the work of family 
planning. They give priority to helping those who seek family 
planning advises register at the maternity clinic, to discussing 
any issue on family planning, to studying any issue on birth 
control and to helping them make the final decision. On the 
daily agenda of the party and government leading comrades, 
"family planning is always an important item, no matter how busy 
they are. The supply of funds is always available for population 
control, no matter how tight the financial situation is. Cadres 
in charge of family planning are always assigned, no matter how 
small the authorized size of a government body." In dealing with 
major issues in family planning, the leadership at all levels 
invariably set up on-the-spot offices to resolve problems. 
During the period from 1990 to 1992 alone, the leading comrades 
of the administrative office of the Chengde Prefectural CPC 
Committee set up on-the-spot general offices in 567 villages 
throughout 113 townships to tackle issues on population control. 
As a result, they had successfully solved 117 specific problems. 
  3. Give extensive publicity. Whenever one enters Chengde 
City, one would feel the widespread publicity on family 
planning. Publicity covers China's state affairs, state policy 
and laws on family planning, basic knowledge on population and 
family planning and general knowledge on contraceptives and 
eugenics. Publicity has been given in the form of news media, 
school education, video and audio tapes, literary and art works, 
contests, repeated comparisons of facts and figures and 
face-to-face education. The contents are varied and colorful. In 
the course of giving publicity to family planning, the policy of 
birth control is often linked with the aspiration in shaking off 
poverty and becoming well-to-do. 
  4. Stable policy. At the beginning of the 1980s, the policy 
of family planning in the rural areas of Chengde was 
comparatively rigid. After gradual improvement, it has now 
become a fairly stable childbirth policy. "Regulations on Family 
Planning in Hebei" stipulates that a rural couple in the hilly 
area may have two children. This policy conforms with the actual 
situation in Chengde's rural district. It is more reasonable. 
Therefore, this policy wins the support of the majority of the 
people there. 
  5. Strong contingents. The first contingent is one of 
management for family planning. There is a committee for family 
planning in each township and a deputy head in every village 
assigned in charge of planned parenthood. There is a leader for 
each group of women of child-bearing age. The second contingent 
is one of professionals for family planning. The third 
contingent is one of mass autonomy [qun zhong zi zhi 5028 5883 
5261 3112]. The aforementioned three contingents form a network, 
covering all areas. Persons in charge of family planning are of 
high quality, and they are professionally devoted in carrying 
out their assignments. The leadership at all levels sincerely 
appreciate their work for family planning. 
  6. Scientific management. After many years of practice, 
Chengde has already summarized its experiences and worked out 
ten management systems including the system of "four lines and 
one emphasis." The four lines are the party line, the political 
line, the special line for family planning and the line of 
associations, while the one emphasis is to place emphasis on 
controlling couples of child-bearing age. Other systems include 
the dual target management system, the contract system for 
family planning, the contract system for the control of women of 
child-bearing age, the management system of dividing families 
into different groups and posting signs, the system of 
management prior to pregnancy and the management system for 
family planning among people of floating population. These 
systems ensure the control of population growth and turn birth 
control into a regular practice and scientific way of life. 
  7. Departmental cooperation. Chengde has established a 
powerful leading organ and set up a system under which four 
major departments divide the work of family planning while 
maintaining close ties with each other. The city has clearly 
defined the duties and functions of each department, supervised 
their work and enjoyed a veto power. It truly takes 
comprehensive measures to improve the work of family planning by 
pooling the efforts of all four departments, and attained 
excellent results. 
  8. Serve the people from all sides. The party committees and 
governments at all levels in Chengde have linked the work of 
family planning with peasants' aspiration to shake off poverty 
and become well-to-do. They always link the two kinds of 
production together, develop economy without ignoring population 
control and make population control serve economic development. 
The city's department in charge of family planning implements 
the preferential policy and strives to help the masses build up 
family fortunes. It also enforces a policy to encourage people 
practice family planning in order to shake off poverty, improve 
the social security and retirement system, encourage grooms to 
live with their wives' families after marriage and support and 
take care of their wives' old parents. It always takes the 
interests of the people into consideration, helps them solve 
their actual problems and combine childbirth with their 
production and daily life. It helps people change their views on 
family planning by providing them with services in many areas. 
<H5>  II. On Chengde Model of Family Planning </H5>
  1. Background in Evolving Chengde Model of Family Planning. 
  In face of the serious situation of China's spiraling 
population, the theoreticians on population and workers in 
charge of family planning have always been looking for a model 
of population control to effectively check population growth. In 
May 1992, the Population Society of China, the ZHONGGUO RHONCHI 
BAOSHE and the Jiangsu provincial family planning commission 
held a symposium in Suzhou to study the "Southern Jiangsu Model" 
for population control in economically developed areas. At the 
symposium, Peng Peiyun, Chairman of the State Family Planning 
Commission, divided the work of family planning in the whole 
country into four categories. The first category is family 
planning work in the economically developed or fairly developed 
area where population is well under control. The second category 
is family planning work in the economically developed or fairly 
developed area where family planning is out of control. The 
third category is family planning work in the economically 
underdeveloped area where population is well under control. The 
fourth category is family planning work in the economically 
underdeveloped area where population growth is out of control. 
Chairman Peng also pointed out that some economically 
underdeveloped areas in China such as the Hanzhong Prefecture in 
Shaaxi Province, the Zhangjiakou Prefecture and the Chengde 
Prefecture in Hebei Province, the Bazhong County in Sichuan 
Province and the Longsheng Multinational Autonomous County in 
Guangxi, have scored remarkable achievements in controlling 
population growth, because the leadership there attach 
importance to family planning work. To earnestly summarize and 
popularize the experiences of these localities will be of great 
significance in improving the work of family planning in most of 
the areas in China and helping some cadres change their passive 
attitude and overcome their fear of difficulties in promoting 
family planning. 
  After the conclusion of the symposium on the Southern 
Jiangsu 
Model, theoreticians on population and workers for family 
planning have promptly studied the work for the control of 
population growth in economically underdeveloped areas. In their 
studies, the theoreticians have discovered that Chengde is a 
fairly typical "hilly, old, minority and poverty-stricken" 
district. After exploring various ways and carrying out various 
experiments over a protracted period of time, they have 
developed a management mechanism which conforms with the local 
economic and cultural situation, and found the road to success 
in family planning. By using on-the-spot inspection tours, the 
leadership of the State Family Planning Commission and scholars 
on population growth highly praised Chengde's experience in 
controlling population growth. They regarded Chengde as a 
typical example of an underdeveloped district in successfully 
controlling population growth. To study Chengde's experience in 
controlling population growth will be of great significance in 
promoting family planning in most of the areas in China. 
[passage omitted] 
  2. Theoretical Background in Developing Chengde Model of 
Family Planning 
  Western experts in demographic economics believe that 
economic development plays a significant role in promoting 
population growth when the per-capita income is below US$300. 
Both economic development and population growth are full of 
vitality when the per-capita income is between US$300 and 
US$700. Economic development notably restrains population growth 
only when the per-capita income reached US$700. Chinese scholars 
on population also believe that in China, a turning point in 
population growth will appear, only when the per capita income 
reaches 1,500 to 2,000 yuan. The practice of family planning in 
Chengde challenges this kind of theory. In an area where the 
economy is not well developed, Chengde tries to control 
population growth, while developing its economy. It has realized 
its goal in placing its population under effective control while 
rapidly developing its economy. 
  Chengde's experience once again tells us that in a nation 
where the economy is not well developed and the pressure from 
population is extremely high, we can no longer sit tight to wait 
for our social and economic conditions to change any more. 
China's state of affairs shows that on the one hand we must 
regard economic construction as the central task, vigorously 
develop the productive forces in society, and strive to create 
conditions for China's four modernization program and check 
population growth; while on the other hand, we must unswervingly 
implement the basic state policy on family planning, adopt 
strong measures to effectively control population growth and 
create a fine environment in terms of population for the 
development of our economy. 
  3. Comparison between Chengde Model and Southern Jiangsu 
Model 
  China's uneven economic developments leads to the uneven 
development of the family planning program and the use of 
different forms in population control. There are already several 
models for population control in China. The Southern Jiangsu 
model is a typical example of population control in an 
economically developed area, while the Chengde model is one 
which prevails in an economically underdeveloped area. 
  The Souther Jiangsu model of population control is a 
mechanism aimed at diverting the pressure exerted on the society 
by population such as employment, social distribution, social 
security, social welfare and other social benefits to each 
family to restrain family growth. Economic development and 
various mechanisms of restraint including the mechanism with the 
benefits as the guiding factor help people change their concept 
on childbirth and achieve the goal of controlling population 
growth. 
  The Chengde model of population control is aimed at 
fostering a management mechanism which conforms with the local 
economic and cultural conditions and follows the path of 
controlling population growth and developing the economy 
simultaneously in an underdeveloped area. The effective control 
of the population promotes economic development, while the rapid 
economic development helps people change their concept on 
childbirth. 
  4. Intension [nei han 0355 3211] of Chengde Model of 
Population Control. 
  As for the intension of the Chengde model of population 
control, many views were expressed at the symposium. 
  The Chengde model of population control organically combines 
educational guidance, resounding organization, scientific 
management, standardization and meticulous work. It creates a 
fine social environment for overall and coordinated family 
planning. It is a model that will make a breakthrough in 
lowering the rate of population growth and promoting social and 
economic development in a coordinated manner. 
  The Chengde model of population control is a comprehensive 
pattern aimed at controlling population growth in a planned 
manner with education paving the way, with the state policy on 
population providing the guidance and with economic factors 
playing the leading role. 
  The Chengde model of population control is one with which 
the party committees and governments regard the control of 
population growth as an important task and set up a set of 
mechanisms for family planning suited to the local conditions, 
link family planning with the people's aspiration to shack off 
poverty and become well-to-do, make breakthroughs in controlling 
population growth and embark on a new path of maintaining "lower 
birth and death rates and low population growth." 
  -- The Chengde model of population growth is a one with 
emphasis on services and management. It adopts comprehensive 
measures to achieve its goal. 
  -- The Chengde model of population control is one which 
takes the lead in bringing about population changes and makes 
the economy and population develop in a coordinated way. 
  -- The Chengde model of population control is one with 
economic construction as its central task. Meantime, it places 
population under strict control, while linking family planning 
with the aspiration to shake off poverty and become well-to-do. 
It also helps the economy and population develop in a 
coordinated manner. 
  5. Operational mechanism of Chengde Model of Population 
Control. 
  Some people believe that the operational mechanism of the 
Chengde model of population control is divided into three 
structural levels -- the macro-structural level, the 
mesostructural level and the micro-structural level. 
  1) From the macro-structural point of view, this model is an 
operational mechanism for population and economy. the lowering 
of the rate of population growth will certainly promote social 
and economic development, because funds for raising children can 
be saved and invested in improving the quality of life and 
developing the economy; and in promoting educational development 
and economic construction. Educational development and the 
changes in the concept and behavior on childbirth also brings 
about social progress. On the other hand, economic, educational 
and social developments also create material conditions for 
population control. After a series of actions and 
counteractions, various essential factors such as population, 
economy, education and society undergo adjustments to adapt 
themselves to each other. They will gradually creates a virtuous 
cycle of growth and improvement. 
  2) From the meso-structural point of view, this model is an 
operational mechanism which combines guidance, encouragement and 
administrative and social restraint. When guidance is given, 
efforts are made to guide people ideologically and materially. 
Education on population has been promoted and meticulous 
ideological and political work carried out among the people. The 
leading comrades play their exemplary role well and give 
publicity to the typical examples. The people have been given 
both material and moral encouragement. The social insurance 
program is developed in families where family planning has 
helped people shake off poverty and become well-to-do. Efforts 
have also been made to evaluate the people on how they carry out 
their birth control program. Those who have distinguished 
themselves are rewarded, while those who have done poorly are 
punished. Measures are taken to give more benefits to those who 
have less children. They make those with less children feel 
glorious and those with more children feel guilty conscious. 
  In developing the restraint mechanism, emphasis has been 
placed on administrative as well as social restraint. Signs of 
administrative restraint are: The principal leadership shoulders 
the overall responsibility, while others shoulder the 
responsibility of each of their own department to implement its 
population control program, work out the policy and regulations 
for family planning and resolutely act according to rules and 
regulations and in coordination with other administrative 
measures. As for social restraint, associations for family 
planning are set up at various levels. Party and Communist Youth 
League members and activists take the lead in mobilizing the 
masses to participate in the family planning program, to educate 
and supervise themselves and to create fine public opinion and 
environment in the society and in exerting pressure on views and 
acts which run counter to the family planning program. 
  3) The micro-structure refers to the administrative 
mechanisms in control of married women of child-bearing age. 
Chengde serves every family through its administrative offices, 
contingent of professionals and advisors and the mechanism of 
mass autonomy by giving people pre-wedding education and 
advising them on marriage, pregnancy, childbirth, child-raising 
and retirement. It gives pre-wedding education to the unmarried 
young people and advises the newly wed on married life and 
childbirth and help them set up plans for the next generation. 
It provides consultations for prenatal care and advises on 
health care for the babies and young children. It also teaches 
women how to correctly use contraceptives at their request. 
  Another group of people believe that the operational 
mechanism of the Chengde model of population control includes 
the mechanism of social restraint, the mechanism of motivation 
by benefits, the mechanism of publicity and education, the 
mechanism of management before pregnancy and the mechanism of 
mass autonomy. The mechanism of social restraint is the core and 
the mechanism of motivation by benefits is the motive force and 
trend of development. The mechanisms of publicity and education, 
management before pregnancy and the mechanism of mass autonomy 
are protective measures. 
  6. Effect of Chengde Population Control 
  The assessment of any model of population control should be 
made on the basis of the population effect, the economic effect 
and the social effect. Chengde has achieved remarkable effects 
in all these three aspects. 
  1) Population effect. Chengde's rate of family planning has 
always been maintained above 98 percent since 1989. In 1992, a 
year of China's third peak of childbirth, the birth rate was 
only 11.72 per thousand and the rate of natural population 
growth was only 6.29 per thousand. If we calculate according to 
the birth rate of women of child-bearing age in the 1970s, 
Chengde would have over 800,000 babies less between 1981 and 
1991. 
  2) Economic effect. The effective control of the population 
greatly alleviates the pressure exerted by excessively rapid 
population growth on the economic development. Chengde's per 
capita income growth and rate of GNP growth in 1991 ranked top 
among the eight prefectures in the province. 
  3) Social effect. The development of family planning brings 
about profound changes in people's knowledge on childbirth and 
in their concept of values on children and their obligations in 
society. People now prefer late marriage, late childbirth and 
less children rather than early marriage, early childbirth and 
more children. They prefer a new form of life over the rural or 
retirement life. The young people take care of their children, 
while old people are also well taken care of. According to a 
survey conducted by Du Peng and others from the People's 
University of China, 16.3 percent of the people in Chengde 
Prefecture regard a single child as adequate, 68.7 percent of 
them regard two children as adequate, while only 12.8 percent of 
them prefer three or more children. This indicates that notable 
changes have taken place in people's concept on childbirth. 
  7. Development Trend in Chengde Model of Population Control 
  If we analyze the basic trend in population growth, we 
realize that changes of the production of human beings generally 
have to go through the following several stages -- the stage of 
using control as the leading factor, the stage of mixed 
restraints and the stage of using economic and social conditions 
to spontaneously check population growth. 
  The stage of using control as the leading factor means that 
various means and ways of control are mainly used to check 
population growth in the area where the economy is not well 
developed. This is the original pattern to bring about 
population changes in an economically backward area where the 
population growth is excessively rapid. This pattern is adopted 
because the local economy is backward, and there is no economic 
foundation to spontaneously reduce the population growth rate. 
The backward economy may even serve to increase the population. 
The Chengde model of population control belongs to this type. 
  The model of mixed restraints uses both economic and control 
factors in controlling population growth. The characteristics of 
this model is that although the factor of economic conditions to 
spontaneously control population growth is growing, there are 
still no social and economic conditions to spontaneously lower 
the population growth rate. It is necessary to use means of 
control to check population growth. The southern Jiangsu model 
belongs to this type. 
  The model of using economic and social conditions to 
spontaneously check population growth mainly appears in 
economically developed countries or districts. When social 
production enters the stage of industrialization, the 
modernization of science and education, education and culture 
and the raising of living standard serve to change people's 
ideas and concepts on values and on childbirth, and help people 
realize the modernized goal of maintaining low birth and death 
rates and low population growth. 
  At the symposium, many comrades freely expressed their own 
views on the Chengde model of population control. 
  Some of the comrades believe that Chengde has achieved a 
great deal in population control today. In addition to the fact 
that the leading comrades at all levels have attached importance 
to and truly worked hard for population control, and 
persistently grasped the two types of production simultaneously, 
Chengde's success is also closely connected with the competent 
basic-level organizations and their efforts in giving publicity 
and education, in energetically serving the masses and in 
managing their affairs with a scientific approach. It is also 
because the policy on childbirth is quite close to that of the 
masses and the people's customs and work style are good. In 
light of the actual difficulties in carrying out production and 
living in hilly districts and on the river embankments, the 
"Hebei Provincial Regulations on Family Planning" stipulates 
that the masses living in Hebei's hilly districts and river 
embankment areas may have second child four years after their 
first one. This policy is quite close to the people's 
aspiration on childbirth. Work on family planning in this 
connection can be carried out more easily. 
  Some comrades also said that Chengde's experience in 
controlling population growth is good. However, it is nothing 
unique. It is a combination of the experiences in various 
localities. Therefore, it cannot be called a "model." It should 
be called "Chengde Experience." Others also pointed out that the 
"low birth and death rates and low population growth rate" of 
Chengde's population are unstable. The population will bounce 
back once the administrative restrains were loosened. Moreover, 
problems such as the low quality of life, high rate of birth 
defects and high sex ratio of babies also exist. The Chengde 
model of population control still fails to bring about a 
modernized population change. It is too early to call it a 
"model." 
  In dealing with these arguments, Li Honggui, head of the 
general office of the State Family Planning Commission, pointed 
out at the symposium that it is a misunderstanding to regard 
everything as good, whenever a "model" is mentioned. A "model" 
is not something rigid and unchangeable. There is still room for 
development and improvement. Yang Kuifu, Vice Chairman of the 
State Family Planning Commission said that there are different 
opinions on whether it should be called Chengde's model of 
population control or Chengde's experience in population 
control. We may continue to explore, but this will not affect us 
in analyzing Chengde's way of thinking, practice and experience 
in controlling population growth. The "Southern Jiangsu Model" 
was a term in connection with the economic model of Southern 
Jiangsu. Actually it can be called "Southern Jiangsu 
Experience." If Southern Jiangsu can be called a "model," so can 
Chengde. As for some people's saying that Chengde combines the 
experiences of various localities, Yang Kuifu said that I 
believe, it is something good to learn from other localities. 
Chengde is good in learning from others' strong points, apply 
them in its own areas and improve upon them. I think this is 
something unique itself. To learn from the advanced for one's 
own use and make further improvements is a form of creation and 
development itself. Particularly in today's era of information, 
various prefectures should learn from and encourage each other, 
and join their efforts in improving themselves. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66173 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar027___94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  31 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Anhui Cotton Procurement, 1994 Tasks </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Anhui Cotton Procurement, 1994 Tasks </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0397N Hefei ANHUI RIBAO in Chinese 31 Mar 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0397N </F>
<F P=104>  Hefei ANHUI RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Summary] As of 15 March, Anhui Province had procured 
3,320,000 dan of cotton, fulfilling 73.8 percent of the 
procurement plan, and was a decline of 680,000 dan from the same 
period in 1993. 
  In 1994 Anhui's cotton production tasks are to plant 6 
million mu, to have a gross output of 6 million dan, and to 
procure 5 million dan. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66174 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar027___94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  22 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Jiangsu 1994 Cotton Area </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Jiangsu 1994 Cotton Area </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0397O Nanjing XINHUA RIBAO in Chinese 22 Mar 94 p 5 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0397O </F>
<F P=104>  Nanjing XINHUA RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Summary] In 1994, the planned cotton area in Jiangsu 
Province is 9,040,000 mu, an increase of 1,500,000 mu over the 
actual area in 1993. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66175 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar027___94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  26 March 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Paper Reports Horse Disease Spreading </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Paper Reports Horse Disease Spreading </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0398A Beijing NONGMIN RIBAO in Chinese 26 Mar 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0398A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing NONGMIN RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by reporter Lin Fei (2651 5481): "Horse Influenza </F>
Has Again Broken Out and Is Spreading--Agriculture Ministry 
Orders All To Quickly Control the Epidemic"] 
  [Text] Since spring of this year, horse influenza has again 
broken out in China and has become epidemic. It is threatening 
horse breeding and can be a serious threat to spring plowing. 
The animal husbandry and veterinary departments of the Ministry 
of Agriculture have issued an urgent circular notice a few days 
ago, urging all localities to give serious attention to 
preventative action against horse influenza. 
  Statistics on the epidemic show that during the period from 
May 1993 to January 1994, horse influenza has been rampant in 
249 counties of 11 provinces, municipalities, and autonomous 
regions throughout China, namely in Inner Mongolia, 
Heilongjiang, Liaoning, Jilin, Ningxia, Shaanxi, Gansu, Shanxi, 
Hebei, Beijing, and Henan, with 1.37 million horses sick, 19,000 
horses dead, and a total direct economic loss of 170 million 
yuan. Although some preventive measures have been adopted in 
every province, it has not yet been possible to control the 
epidemic. Since February of this year, horse influenza has 
reappeared in Shanxi, Beijing, Ningxia, and Gansu, and has also 
spread to the breeding areas of Qinghai and Sichuan. Within only 
one month, 170,000 animals have fallen sick and almost 10,000 
have died; it is an extremely serious situation. 
  Since the founding of the PRC, horse influenza has been 
epidemic in China four times, but the present epidemic is the 
most serious outbreak since the founding of the PRC, specially 
characterized by its widespread occurrence, long duration, high 
death rate, and frequent recurrences. To control and wipe out 
the present widespread epidemic of horse influenza as quickly as 
possible, the Ministry of Agriculture has especially issued an 
urgent circular notice, ordering the agriculture and animal 
husbandry departments of all ranks to vigorously pursue and 
effectively take in hand all relevant preventative work and to 
immediately make comprehensive epidemic prevention dispositions. 
  The agriculture and animal husbandry departments shall pay 
particular attention to any occurrence of the disease and its 
developmental trend, and regardless of time and place shall make 
an immediate report to the next higher animal epidemic 
prevention organ. They shall also promptly inform the 
neighboring animal epidemic prevention organs to assist in any 
preventive measures. The notice orders all localities to 
earnestly and effectively store up epidemic prevention material, 
to render active support in supplying basic curative and 
disinfecting pharmaceutical materials and instruments, so as to 
ensure that regular action be taken in preventative work and 
that epidemic situations be expediently dealt with. Districts in 
which the epidemic has already broken out must be closed off and 
isolated as quickly as possible. Entry and exit of all equidae 
to and from such districts shall be forbidden, markets for all 
equidae shall be closed, and buying and selling of such animals 
forbidden. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66176 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar027___94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  1 April 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> ECONOMIC </F>
<F P=101> AGRICULTURE </F>
<H3> <TI>   Jilin Sets Grain, Edible Oil Prices </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Jilin Sets Grain, Edible Oil Prices </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CE0397M Changchun JILIN RIBAO in Chinese 1 Apr 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CE0397M </F>
<F P=104>  Changchun JILIN RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

  [Summary] Beginning 1 April, Jilin Province implemented 
the following sticker prices for grain and edible oil. In 
state-run grain stores the sticker price for grade A rice is 
0.77 yuan per 500 grams, and grade B rice 0.74 yuan. The market 
price may not exceed the price in state-run grain stores by 5 
fen per 500 grams. The state-run and market price for standard 
flour is 0.65 yuan. The state-run and market price for soybean 
oil in Baishan, Tonghua, and Liaonyuan Prefectures is 3.70 yuan, 
in other prefectures the price is 3.50 yuan. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66177 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar027___94021" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  2 May 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> SOCIAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Article Views Abduction of Women, Children </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Article Views Abduction of Women, Children </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0208B Shanghai SHEHUI [SOCIETY] in Chinese No 109, Feb 
94 pp 4-7, 21 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0208B </F>
<F P=104>  Shanghai SHEHUI [SOCIETY] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by A Bing (7093 0393): "Save the Abducted" -- </F>
edited by He Yulin (0149 3768 7792)] 
  [Excerpt] [passage omitted] One of the questions we should 
think about is the criminal nature of the acts of abducting and 
selling people on the one hand and buying abducted people on the 
other. The reality is that different views exist on the 
criminality of the buyers and sellers and on whether the offense 
is a felony or a misdemeanor. In certain aspects, the difference 
in opinion is rather wide. This is a question worth studying by 
the judicial department. Meanwhile, investigations reveal that 
the public security department can act strictly and promptly to 
crack down on abductors, and once an abductor is caught, a case 
is set up for open trial. Such action is to the immense 
satisfaction of the public. As to those buying abducted people, 
however, no prompt action is taken to put them on trial. Some 
people even express sympathy with the buyers, thinking that 
they, too, are victims, who were cheated by human mongers to buy 
abducted people with their hard-earn money. In the opinion of 
these people, when the public security department has rescued 
the abducted people, the buyers have "lost both the people and 
money," so they should be excused from legal liability if at all 
possible. This kind of thinking has misled a number of people, 
giving them the erroneous idea that because money is spent, 
buying humans does not offend the law. Such a state of affairs 
has fueled, to a certain extent, the rampancy of abduction. It 
has convinced human mongers that if they can abduct people, 
there is a big "market" to sell their preys. The writer deems it 
necessary to strike hard at human mongers. This will give 
everyone a lift of heart. At the same time, the writer also 
holds that it is imperative to deal hard blows to human buyers, 
punish them promptly, harshly, and strictly, and make them aware 
that using money to buy humans is an offense against law. 
  Another question to think about is that the two "five-year 
plans to spread legal knowledge," though both have its dead 
angle, have produced remarkable results. This is a matter worthy 
of deep thought. Since 1985, our country has formulated two 
educational plans aimed at spreading legal knowledge among all 
its people. In general, the plans have been well carried out 
with remarkable results. The results are especially noticeable 
in certain areas, big and medium cities in particular. This can 
be seen from the fact that the masses in these areas are better 
aware than before of the need to use law to protect themselves. 
With regard to disgusting phenomena in society and relations 
between people, they no longer have a simple idea and viewpoint, 
but can deeply ponder over and analyze the questions. Moreover, 
they have enhanced their consciousness of self-protection by 
means of law. Some have imbued their minds with the idea that 
"all men are equal before the law" and displayed the spirit of 
equality contained in the "law" in dealing with everything. Now, 
the fact is that there are far less instances of abduction in 
cities than in the countryside, and the situation is better in 
well-off rural areas than in remote villages and mountain areas. 
In view of this, the writer believes that an important task to 
radically eliminate abduction is to educate the citizens to 
protect and guard themselves. All other measures can only solve 
the symptoms on the surface. They can only reduce, to a certain 
degree, the instances of abduction, but cannot thoroughly 
eradicate the problem. 
  The third question is that provisions should be 
established for the administration of both permanent residents 
and floating population. The resident registration system formed 
after the founding of the People's Republic has been improved 
from time to time during the past decades. We should say that 
resident registration has been normalized and widely accepted by 
the broad masses as a common practice. However, with the 
deepening of the reform and open drive, especially the 
development of rural reform, a large number of surplus laborers 
have emerged from the countryside and become jobless vagrants. 
To earn a living, make a good income, and become better off at 
an early date, these people have rushed to more economically 
developed areas to do business, work as laborers, engage in 
contract work, or conduct other economic activities. This has 
increased remarkably the floating population in these areas. 
Unfortunately, our population administration regulations and 
procedures have not been revised in time to catch up with such a 
situation. As a result, in some localities no control can be 
exercised over the floating population. Taking advantage of this 
loophole, lawless elements have come up to commit abduction and 
selling of people. In view of this, it is necessary to 
strengthen the administration of resident registration for 
floating as well as permanent residents. Those who temporarily 
reside in a locality should be required to register as temporary 
residents. This way, we will be able to exercise unified 
administration of floating residents and to prevent or alleviate 
the problem of lack of macro-control over the population. In 
this regard, some localities have made successful exploration 
and trials. They require those who have come from outside to 
register as temporary residents. Based on the information 
provided, they check the newcomers' original places of domicile 
and send out letters to the departments concerned to find out 
the real situation, thus exercising effective macroeconomic 
control over the floating population. In addition, some 
localities have set up computerized floating-population files. 
All related information is recorded in the computer and put into 
a control network. This method has long been used in foreign 
countries. In our country, however, its application is 
relatively limited because computers have not been so widely 
popularized. As far as the present situation is concerned, 
establishing a normal, rational population-flow mechanism and 
forming a floating-population administration system based on the 
law should be one of the major tasks in building China's legal 
system--a task we should carry out step by step and continue to 
improve. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66178 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar027___94022" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  3 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL </F>
<F P=101> SOUTHWEST REGION </F>
<H3> <TI>   Work Report of Sichuan Higher People's Court </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Work Report of Sichuan Higher People's Court </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0213A Chengdu SICHUAN RIBAO in Chinese 3 Feb 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0213A </F>
<F P=104>  Chengdu SICHUAN RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Li Yulong (2621 3768 7893), President of the </F>
Sichuan Provincial Higher People's Court: "Work Report of the 
Sichuan Provincial Higher People's Court; Presented 22 Jan 1994 
at the Second Session of the Eighth People's Congress"] 
  [Excerpt] Each level of the Provincial People's Court and 
the Chengdu Railroad Transportation Special Court 
conscientiously implemented the fundamental line and spirit of 
the 16th National Court Working Conference. The courts focused 
on economic construction and faithfully carried the duties 
entrusted to them by the constitution and the law, severely 
assaulting serious criminal offenses and economic crimes, fully 
exploiting legal means to regulate economic, civil, and other 
social relationships, strengthening self-reform and 
construction, and making new progress in every aspect of its 
work. Last year, we accepted and heard a total of 310,281 first 
trial cases, tried and wound up 282,598 cases, which were 
increases of 10.94 percent and 12.85 percent respectively; 
mediated and dealt with 21,208 simple and non-lawsuit type 
cases. The Provincial Higher People's Court handled 3,579 cases 
of various types in accordance with the law, an increase of 21.4 
percent over last year. We have made positive contributions 
toward keeping society stable and promoting further development 
of the anti-corruption struggle, so as to guarantee reform, 
opening, and economic development. 
<H5>  I. Launched Further "Severe Attacks" in the Fight To Keep </H5>
Society Stable 
  Courts throughout Sichuan province persist in the principle 
of "conducting dual tactics, with both tactics being tough," 
developing massive, concentrated "severe assaults" and various 
special fights, making a severe assault on criminal activities 
of all kinds. We accepted and heard a total of 40,332 
preliminary hearing criminal cases, with 38,169 cases brought to 
completion, with 43,971 prisoners sentenced. This protected 
public security, and provided a better social environment for 
reform, opening, and economic construction in Sichuan province. 
  Stressed the key points of attacking and strengthening 
our power to attack. Always direct the spearhead of the 
attack against those who seriously endanger public security and 
the people's lives and property. Last year, we tried and 
completed a total of 10,419 cases of murder, robbery, bombing, 
rape, and gang activity, especially group criminal acts with 
underground characteristics, and sentenced 14,652 prisoners, 
increases of 23.2 percent and 24.5 percent over last year. For 
the worst criminals, under the precondition of guaranteeing case 
quality, we sped up handling their trials in order to sentence 
them as severely as possible. Among completed criminal cases, 90 
percent were completed within the legal stipulated time period. 
Of those sentenced to prison, 17,493 felons received sentences 
of more than five years' imprisonment, 2,007 were sentenced to 
life imprisonment or the death penalty (including stays of 
execution); this was a total of 19,500 prisoners, which was 
44.35 percent of the total number of prisoners sentenced, an 
increase of 6.6 percent over last year. We moved up our handling 
of major cases, trying and handling them rapidly; for those 
criminal cases where something less than the death penalty would 
leave people dissatisfied, we resolutely sentence the criminals 
to death. For example, when the murder of National Softball 
Training Team member Liu Li [0491 7787] was discovered, the 
Zhigong Intermediate People's Court immediately dispatched 
officials to make an investigation and obtain evidence. Within 
three days after the case was prosecuted, the criminal defendant 
Jiang Bin [3068 1755] was sentenced to death at the first trial. 
Soon after learning of the case, the Provincial Higher People's 
Court also sent an official to make double verification, and the 
death penalty for the criminal was verified and approved. 
Meanwhile, we consciously carried out the policy of combining 
punishment with leniency. In order to expand the social effect 
of our "critical attack," we selected typical cases for public 
pronouncement and judgment, and by the National Day alone we had 
made 764 case of public pronouncement and judgment, which 
promoted further development of the "critical attack" struggle. 
  Launched special items of the struggle, and implemented 
special treatment. Last year we tried and completed 1,351 
cases of "highwaymen," sentencing 2,413 prisoners; tried and 
completed 12,180 cases of larceny, sentencing 20,013 criminals 
in the first trial; tried and completed 2,027 cases of swindling 
and selling women and children, luring, abetting, compelling or 
organizing women into prostitution, and sentenced 3,657 
prisoners. To support the "26 June International Day of Drug 
Abolition," Railroad Transport Intermediate Courts in such 
cities as Liangshan and Chengdu individually held pronouncement 
and judgment meetings, concentrated on executing a group of drug 
dealers. This showed China's solemn and just standpoint on 
severely suppressing criminal drug activity. 
  Enthusiastically attended to comprehensive treatment 
of public security. Courts at each level persisted in the 
principle of "stressing both attack and deterrence, treat both 
the target and the foundation," and enthusiastically attended to 
comprehensive treatment of the public security. We held a total 
of 1,549 pronouncement and judgment meetings, directly educating 
as many as 19.46 million people (times); a total of 4,595 
suggestions on enforcement were made, and 3,452 of these were 
adopted, encouraging relevant departments to strengthen their 
protective measures; we persisted in combining punishment with 
education for teenage criminals, and educated and saved a group 
of teenagers who had taken a wrong step in their lives; we paid 
attention to doing a good job in our legal publicity, education 
and conciliation work, preventing 4,858 cases of dispute from 
becoming more serious; we gave reduced sentences and releases on 
parole to those who showed repentance and mended their ways, and 
to those who rendered meritorious services, maintained order in 
prison governance, or stimulated enthusiasm for reform in other 
prisoners. 
<H5>  II. Sternly Attacked Serious Economic Crimes To Promote the </H5>
Construction of Clear and Honest Politics 
  We consciously implemented the major and important decisions 
and the demand of the central CPC that there must be periodic 
achievements in launching the anti-corruption struggle, by 
making stern attacks on serious economic crimes. Last year we 
accepted and handled a total of 6,203 cases of economic crimes 
which were prosecuted by procuratorial organs in the first 
trial. We completed a total of 5,843 cases, a case completion 
rate of 94.3 percent, sentenced 7,570 prisoners and recovered a 
total of 62.7 million yuan in economic losses for the State and 
collective. 
  Focused on attacking the crimes of graft, acceptance of 
bribes, and diversion of public funds. Courts at each level 
conscientiously implemented the "Supplementary Rules for 
Punishing Crimes of Graft and Bribery," passed by the National 
Congress, by accepting and handling a total of 1,893 cases 
prosecuted by procuratorial organs in first trials for graft, 
bribe-taking and diverting public funds. We completed 1,717 
cases, a case completion rate of 90.7 percent, and sentenced 
2,072 prisoners. We promoted the further development of the 
anti-corruption struggle by launching stern attacks against 
economic criminals. 
  To maintain economic order, we meted out stern 
punishments for such economic crimes as tax evasion, tax 
resistance, swindling, and making and selling fake or bad 
quality commodities. Last year we accepted a total of 73 
cases of tax evasion, and completed 67 cases; we accepted 302 
swindling cases, completing 283. We enthusiastically waged a 
special fight to "attack fake products and deal with bad 
products," firmly sentencing criminals to death if their crime 
was carried out in a vile way and caused severe consequences. 
Take for example the case of Wang Lingang [3769 5677 0474] of 
Gulin, who trafficked in bogus fertilizer: The volume of his 
illegal operation reached 208,000 yuan, while he personally made 
an illegal profit of 118,000 yuan, and in one year caused a 
severe output reduction in more than 20,000 mu of farmland in 
Rongchang, Xuyong and Gulin, leaving hardened soil which will be 
difficult to recover, and extremely critical consequences. The 
court sentenced the criminal Wang to the death penalty, a good 
outcome for society. 
  Paid serious attention to trying and dealing with big 
and major cases of economic crime. We established a 
registration and reporting system and a supervision system for 
big and major economic cases, moving these cases up on the 
calendar in order that they could be tried as soon as possible 
after indictment. Last year, among economic criminals sentenced 
by courts throughout the province, 1,212 of the crimes involved 
more than 1,000 yuan, and 66 of these involved more than 100,000 
to 500,000 yuan, while three involved between 500,000 and 
1,000,000 yuan, and two in which over 1,000,000 yuan was 
involved. In order to expand the effects of trying and handling 
big and major cases, the Provincial Higher People's Court 
organized courts in four localities, including Chengdu and 
Chongqing, to concentrate on publicly charging 28 serious 
grafting and bribing criminals on the same day. They also held a 
press conference to let the masses of people see the 
determination of the party and government to punish corruption, 
and do a good job of building clear and honest politics. 
  Strictly delineated the boundary line between guilt and 
innocence. We adhered to the principle of "being firm on 
the one hand, but on the other hand be cautious and certain." If 
the policies and legal regulations were unclear, if there was no 
clear delineation of guilt or innocence, then we were cautious 
in judgment; for those who were bold in reform, even if they 
made mistakes in their work, we did not charge them with crimes; 
those who had not committed a crime were declared innocent in 
accordance with the law; in cases where the principal facts were 
unclear and proof was lacking, we firmly returned these to 
procuratorial organs for supplemental investigation. We fed a 
total of 800 economic crime cases back to procuratorial organs 
for supplemental investigation, declared 40 cases to be exempt 
from criminal punishment, and declared 25 cases of innocence. 
<H5>  III. Adjusted Economic Relationships by the Full Use of </H5>
Legal Means To Promote Macroscopic Adjustment and Control and 
Development of the Market Economy 
  Courts at each level tried vigorously to widen service areas 
and channels, actively serving the nation's macroscopic 
adjustment and control and establishing the socialist market 
economy. Last year we accepted and handled a total of 65,349 
first trial economic dispute cases of various kinds, completed 
57,325 cases, increases of 28 percent and 30 percent 
respectively. The total amount of money involved in these 
lawsuits was 300,298 yuan, an increase of 125 percent over the 
year before. This work was important for speeding up opening and 
reform and economic development. 
  We coordinated with the reorganizing financial order, 
trying and examining bank loan cases. We vigorously carried 
out and fulfilled the central government's decision concerning 
strengthening and improving macroscopic adjustment and control 
by launching special trials and services for recalling loans. 
Last year we tried and completed a total of 20,793 loan cases, 
lawsuits which involved a total of 62,323 yuan. This recovered a 
great deal of capital for financial organs, alleviating a tight 
capital situation. In just the period July to October, the Dazhu 
County Court recalled 20.47 million yuan in "outstanding" loans 
for financial departments by concentrating its time and force. 
  Strengthened investigation and handling of cases of 
enterprise converting their operational system, to promote 
enterprises entering the market. Courts throughout Sichuan 
have always done a good job in their investigation and handling 
of such cases as state-owned enterprises' (especially medium and 
large State-owned enterprises) contractual, leasing, joint stock 
operations and enterprise cooperation, and annexing and 
bankruptcy, regarding these as focal work points. Last year we 
tried and completed a total of 1,654 such cases. We protected 
enterprises' right of self-operation in our handling of these 
cases, supporting the triumph of the excellent with elimination 
of the bad, and fair competition, encouraging enterprises to 
convert their operational system and enter the market. We 
enthusiastically and conscientiously handled cases with strong 
policy connection, having wide scope and major social effects, 
especially in bankruptcy cases. 
  Did a good job of investigating and handling cases of 
production and circulation to protect and promote healthy 
development of the market economy. Last year we tried and 
completed a total of 27,069 economic dispute cases which dealt 
with purchasing and selling, cooperation, contracts for 
construction projects, contracts for processing, financing and 
leasing, property leasing and goods transportation, an increase 
of 33.4 percent over the previous year. Through investigating 
and handling cases, and punishing those whose activities 
violated the law, we protected a group who were engaged in legal 
production operation activities. The courts at each level made 
bold explorations, investigated and handled a group of disputes 
involving stocks, bonds, trademarks, patents, and technical 
contracts. The courts also appropriately and vigorously provided 
the legal services for further reform. 
  Enthusiastically investigated and handled rural 
contractual disputes and township enterprise economic dispute 
cases to promote rural economic development. Last year we 
tried and completed a total of 8,389 cases of rural contractual 
disputes and township enterprise economic disputes, which 
defended the responsibility system which links remuneration to 
output and promotes the development of a rural market economy. 
<H5>  IV. Comprehensively Strengthened Civil Trials To Promote </H5>
Stability, Unity, and Economic Development 
  Courts throughout Sichuan further improved trial methods, 
and 
improved the level of enforcement, making new progress in civil 
trials. Last we accepted and handled a total of 202,412 civil 
cases of various kinds, and completed 185,185 cases, increases 
over the previous year of 7.27 percent and 9.7 percent 
respectively. 
  Enthusiastically tried and handled real estate and 
labor dispute cases connected with further reform and 
development of the market economy. With the development of 
a real estate labor market, real estate and labor disputes have 
increased, as well as growing more complicated and having strong 
policy effects. Courts at each level courts enthusiastically and 
conscientiously tried and handled 8,249 real estate and labor 
dispute cases. The Provincial Higher People's Court strengthened 
its supervision to promote development of this work. 
  Strengthened handling of marriage and household, debt, 
and damage compensation cases. These three types of cases 
constituted over 90 percent of the civil cases, great in number 
and in difficulty. We always persisted in combining trials with 
publicizing the law, proposing good social habits and building 
ideological civility, with an emphasis on alleviating disputes 
through mediation and conciliation. Last year we tried and 
completed a total of 172,351 of these cases, alleviating social 
controversies and protecting the parties' legal rights, 
promoting stability and unity and constructing "two 
civilizations." 
  Examined and handled personal rights and intellectual 
rights cases. We strictly delineated the boundary line 
between appropriate use and violation, between proper media 
coverage and damage to reputation. Last year we tried and 
completed a total of 446 cases of violation of citizens, legal 
person reputation right, title rights, portrait rights, and 
intellectual rights, which was and increase of 38 percent over 
the year before. We protected the legal rights and interests of 
citizens and legal persons. 
  Properly handled cases of land, mountain forest, and 
water conservancy rights. These cases usually occurred in 
the countryside, and involved the reasonable use of resources. 
Related to the lives and production of the masses, 
contradictions of this sort can easily become intense and 
violent. Each local court properly tried and completed 815 of 
these cases in accordance with relevant laws and policies, 
eliminating unstable factors and playing a positive role in the 
maintenance of rural stability and the promotion of agricultural 
production. 
<H5>  V. Conducted Administrative Trials in Accordance With the </H5>
Laws, While Safeguarding and Supervising Administration Organs 
in Carrying Out Their Administration in Compliance With the Law 
  Last year we accepted and handled a total of 2,188 cases of 
every kind in the first trial, completing 1,919 cases. These 
included 333 cases in which the actions of administrative organs 
were sustained in detail, 303 cases in which details of the 
actions were reversed, 13 cases in which a punishment verdict 
was amended in the interest of fairness, and 1,270 cases in 
which the plaintiffs withdrew their suits or the cases were 
dealt with in other ways. 
  Enthusiastically tried and handled administrative cases 
in which enterprises' rights to self-operation were 
violated. Last year we tried and completed a total of 28 
cases of in which enterprises' rights to self-operation were 
violated. We protected enterprises' self-operation rights, 
promoted the government's conversion role, and the enterprises' 
conversion of their operating system. For example, Guangan 
County Court tried and completed a case in which the Guangan 
County No 2 Construction Corporation brought suit against the 
Guangan County Agricultural Machinery Bureau for violating their 
right to self-operation. The Court's judgment was to reverse the 
defendant's administrative decision to nominate, hire, and fire 
the Managers and vice-managers of the Guangan County No 2 
Construction Corporation. This protected the plaintiff's 
self-operation rights and was better for society. 
  Properly tried and handled administrative cases 
involving reduction of farmers' burdens. Courts at each 
level firmly implemented relevant decisions of the CPC, State 
Council, Provincial Party Committee and Provincial People's 
Congress which deal with reducing unreasonable burden on 
farmers. They enthusiastically and consciously handled 
administrative cases of farmers' burden. A total of 249 cases 
were tried and completed, involving more than 73,000 farmers, 
and in which more than 13.37 million yuan in overcharged fees 
were returned to the farmers. We protected the legal rights of 
the masses farmers, as well as their interest in and enthusiasm 
for production, promoting rural stability and the development of 
production. 
  Strengthened examination and handling of administrative 
cases dealing with tax revenues, industry and commerce, state 
lands, environmental protection, transportation, city 
construction, and birth control. Last year we tried and 
completed a total of 465 cases of the above types, including 133 
cases in which the actions of administrative organs were 
sustained in detail, 132 cases in which plaintiffs withdrew the 
suit, 3 cases where there was withdrawal or changes in 
accordance with law, and 197 cases of other treatments. Each 
local court also actively supported relevant administrative 
departments in undertaking special trial and enforcement work in 
tax collection, state land usage fees, selling prices, and 
related fixed fees in accordance with the law. Last year there 
was a total of 12,938 cases in which administrative organs 
applied for enforcement. These cases involved tax receipts, 
fixed fees, etc., in the amount of 58.63 million yuan. We 
safeguarded and supported legal administration by administrative 
organs. 
<H5>  VI. Strengthened Supervision of Trials, Professional </H5>
Guidance and Enforcement To Safeguard the Judiciary 
  There has been new progress in the area of appeals and 
petitions. Last year, Sichuan courts received a total of 
187,739 persons (times), and handled 247,578 letters from the 
masses. The number of visiting higher level officials and 
repeated petitions dropped compared to the year before, and the 
number of visits from Beijing government officials and letters 
of appeal dropped 2.5 percent and 2.7 percent respectively. For 
appeals and request for a second hearing, we persisted in the 
principle of "seeking truth from facts, every error must be 
corrected," to conscientiously investigated and dealt with each 
of these. We investigated 92 cases in which the trial procedure 
was appealed, and after a second hearing, judgment in 30 was 
changed in accordance with law; we retained as correct the 
original judgment in 53 cases in which the appeal was untenable; 
there were 9 cases in which the appealing party withdrew the 
appeal or in where there was other treatment. We were practical 
in protecting the quality of case handling the parties' rights 
and interests. 
  Upper level courts strengthened professional guidance 
of lower level courts. Court leadership at each level took 
the lead in developing investigation and research, increasing 
their initiative and forecasting work. On the grounds of 
investigation and research, the Provincial Higher People's Court 
formulated its "Suggestions Concerning the Strengthening of 
Current Trial Functions to Provide Enforcement Protection for 
Social Stability, Construct Clear and Honest Politics and 
Macroscopic Adjustment and Control," a professional document for 
judging the nature of collective ownership enterprises and 
trying and handling cases involving bankruptcy, loans, reduction 
of farmers' burdens, etc. This provided effective instruction in 
doing good a job of the various kinds of trial work. During the 
"severe attack" period, the Provincial Higher People's Court at 
one time or another sent many work groups to deal promptly with 
problems related to policy and legal matters, and promotion of 
the "severe attacks" was successful. 
  Further strengthened implementation. In order to 
safeguard the solemnity of the law and the authority of the 
People's Courts, courts throughout Sichuan adopted measures to 
further strengthen implementation. The Higher and Intermediate 
Courts strengthened coordination and supervision among courts 
both inside and outside the province. Last year we implemented a 
total of 81,483 cases of various kinds, with a total of 775.54 
million yuan involved in the implementations. These were 
increases of 5.9 percent and 78.88 percent, respectively, over 
the year before. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66179 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar027___94023" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  10 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL </F>
<F P=101> SOUTHWEST REGION </F>
<H3> <TI>   Work Report of Guizhou Provincial Higher People's Court </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Work Report of Guizhou Provincial Higher People's Court </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0234A Guiyang GUIZHOU RIBAO in Chinese 10 Feb 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0234A </F>
<F P=104>  Guiyang GUIZHOU RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Xie Jinhan (6200 6930 3352) titled: "Guizhou </F>
Higher People's Court Work Report" -- (January 1, 1994 at 
Guizhou's Eighth National People's Congress Second Session)] 
  [Text] Fellow delegates: [passage omitted] 
  Now I will report to the People's Congress for approval and 
examination the overall situation and future views on the work 
of the courts throughout the province: 
  1) Strengthening the "harsh crackdown" struggle, and 
maintaining social stability 
  After ten years of the "harsh crackdown" struggle, Guizhou's 
public order overall is stable. However, there are many factors 
influencing the stability of the public order, and major 
pernicious cases are on the rise, so that in some locales the 
situation with public order is not good. Throughout the 
province, courts are conscientiously working to implement the 
essence of directives from Party central on maintaining social 
stability, and are gradually strengthening their effect against 
the enemy dictatorship, and punishing various types of criminals 
in strict accordance with the law. Over the year as a whole, 
some 14,109 criminal cases in total were accepted and heard, and 
13,903 were tried and settled, while 15,470 criminals were 
provided with legal services in the course of court decisions. 
Among these, there were 5964 people who received sentences of 
more than 5 years in prison, life imprisonment, or the death 
sentence (including stays of execution), or some 38.55 percent 
of the total criminals sentenced; 9166 people received sentences 
of less than 5 years, detained labor, or were placed under 
surveillance, while 248 people avoided criminal sanction, and 92 
people were declared innocent. 
  In the course of launching the "harsh crackdown" struggle, 
we 
are stressing the proper handling of the following links: 
  1) Make the key crackdown points standout, vigorously 
promote 
the trying of major cases. Target the crackdown against 
murderers, robbers, rapists, bombers, hooligans and other 
serious criminal elements, particularly against the ringleaders 
of other criminal organizations with a sinister social effect, 
and against recidivists, and habitual offenders. For this type 
of case, we must adopt intervention in advance, and after a case 
is prosecuted, pay close attention to hearing and settling the 
case, and strictly meting out punishment in accordance with the 
law. For example, when former Shuigan Public Security Department 
people's policeman Jiang Qianjun [5592 7816 6511] used a gun to 
murder someone, this had a great social effect, the danger was 
great, and the case was followed with great interest by the 
masses. After the court accepted the case, only nine days were 
required from the first hearing to the final state of the second 
hearing, and the approval of the death sentence for him. At the 
same time as the day-to-day type crackdown work is strengthened, 
in order to frighten criminal elements, we must build up our 
prestige, and in an organized and prepared manner launch a four 
time province wide concentrated attack operation, and 
concentrated pronouncing of judgements against a group of 
criminal elements seriously harming the public order. It was 
only during a pre-National Day unified effort, with the 
provincial court and nine mid-level courts, 48 county and 
municipal courts convening a comparatively large-scale meeting 
for pronouncing judgement, that 119 people guilty of the most 
heinous crimes were sentenced to death, and for the criminal 
elements the law did not allow to remain, the swollen arrogance 
of the criminal elements was attacked. 
  2) Continue to launch special struggles and stress bringing 
things under control. In accordance with central and provincial 
deployment of personnel, various local courts, under the unified 
leadership of party committees, and closely integrated with 
public security and procutorial organs, are launching, in line 
with local conditions, special struggles such as "attacking 
kidnappers," banning drugs, opposing robberies, and attacking 
"train bandits," while stressing bringing things under control. 
Various local courts are strengthening their efforts to bring to 
trial these types of cases, and accomplishing rapid trying and 
rapid resolution of cases, concentrated attacks, and on-the-spot 
pronouncements. The entire province in total has sentenced 1944 
criminals who abducted and kidnapped women and children, 163 
drug dealers, 5475 thieves, and 1910 robbers. Through such 
things as explaining the law, printing and distributing notices, 
disseminating material, etc., they have galvanized the masses to 
arise and resolutely struggle with criminal elements, and to 
strengthen vigilance. 
  3) Increasing the force level of major attacks, ensuring the 
quality of handling of cases. Throughout the province, courts 
are unswervingly implementing the guiding policy swiftly and 
seriously and in accordance with the law. For serious criminal 
elements committing crimes guilty of the death penalty, 
sentencing of the death penalty is resolutely carried out. For 
crimes requiring stiff sentencing, criminals are being 
resolutely sentenced to stiff penalties, paying attention to 
overcoming and preventing the phenomenon of attacks with 
insufficient force. For the year as a whole, among cases tried 
and completed in one hearing, the proportion of those sentenced 
to more than 5 years specified imprisonment up to the death 
penalty rose 7.6 percent compared to 1992. At the same time, the 
courts are conscientiously carrying out a policy of combining 
suppression with leniency, and persisting in equal doses of 
leniency and strictness. In order to properly utilize corporal 
punishment and the relevant resolutions of the Standing 
Committee of the National People's Congress, county courts have 
strengthened their inspection and examination guidance, and are 
conscientiously resolving issues of measurement of penalty in 
convicting someone of a crime. No matter whether it is 
concentrated attacks or special combat efforts, or normal trying 
of cases, courts should persist in properly handling the facts 
of a case, and master the legal criteria, and surely, 
accurately, and relentlessly attack criminal elements. 
  4) Conscientiously carry out comprehensive measures for 
managing participation in maintaining public order. 
[comprehensive programs of public order] When severely punishing 
criminals, courts at various levels should in a comprehensive 
way give full play to their judicial functions, and 
conscientiously carry out various linkup participatory measures 
in terms of vigilance, education, management, construction, and 
transformation. Over the year as a whole, in all there were 414 
judicial meetings, some 401 cases where judicial suggestions 
were put forward to relevant departments, and 7538 cases of 
commuted sentences and releases on parole. In addition, in terms 
of aspects related to publicizing legal institutions, 
strengthening the people's legal work, guiding mediation of 
disputes, education, setting an example, rescuing errant youths, 
etc. they have worked very hard, and had a quite good social 
effect. At the same time, by persisting in the goal of 
responsible management, and establishing and perfecting a varied 
system with peoples' courts carrying out comprehensive measures 
for managing participation in maintaining public order, taking 
the various operations and requirements of comprehensive 
measures for participation in maintaining public order and 
channelling them into the unit target responsibility system, and 
strengthening management, during county and locally organized 
inspections on reaching the goals of comprehensive management, 
all examined courts achieved their targets, and many courts also 
were appraised as Comprehensive Program of Public Order Red Flag 
Units. 
  2. Severely attack serious economic crime, resolutely mete 
out punishment for corruption, safeguard the economic order 
  Peoples' courts at all levels throughout the province, in 
accordance with the Party Central's personnel deployment, are 
actively launching an anti-corruption campaign, stressing major 
cases as the breach, augmenting the force of attacks on economic 
crime. Over the year there were a total of 1755 economic crime 
cases accepted and heard in one hearing, with 1718 being 
completed, and 1980 people were sentenced. Of these, those 
sentenced to over five years, those receiving life sentences, 
and those receiving the death penalty (including stays of 
execution) totalled 752 people, or 37.98 percent of the total 
number of criminals sentenced, an increase of 6.64 percent over 
the previous year. Among the sentenced economic criminals, those 
convicted of individual crimes involving more than 10,000 RMB 
totalled 271, of which 22 people associated with crimes 
involving more than 100,000 RMB. Through these judicial 
proceedings, economic losses of 718,860,000 RMB were collected 
and returned to the state. 
  In the struggle to attack economic crime, throughout the 
province courts at all levels are paying attention to seizing 
the key points, and vigorously bring to trial major cases. The 
attack points are aimed at those cases where state workers, 
particularly leading cadres, use their positions to engage in 
graft, bribery, misappropriation of public funds, and other 
serious infringements on the interests of the state and people, 
and undermine Party and government prestige. It is also aimed at 
cases of major swindling, profiteering, manufacturing and 
selling counterfeit goods, evading taxes and refusing to pay 
taxes, etc., that seriously damage the market economic order. 
During the year, there was a total of 515 tried cases of graft, 
bribery, and misappropriation of public funds, and 636 criminals 
were sentenced. Various local courts are paying attention to 
properly mastering the work of trying major cases, and are 
progressively perfecting the registering and reporting system 
for major cases, and the timely grasping of the relevant 
circumstances. Taking the initiative to strengthen relations 
with inspection organizations, for those major economic crime 
cases resulting in significant harm, having a major effect and 
to which the society is paying great attention, courts are 
resolutely promoting intervention, and painstakingly organizing 
proper bringing of cases to trial, working closely together to 
coordinate the launching of the anti-corruption campaign. Last 
year at the end of October, the province's 29 counties and 
cities one after another convened large-scale sentence 
pronouncement meetings, to concentrate pronouncing of sentences, 
and handled 80 cases of economic crime, leading to the 
sentencing of 111 criminals. Among these, there were 20 major 
cases that the county courts directly handled, with 30 criminals 
sentenced. For this set of serious economic criminal elements, 
relying on the law to mete out strict punishment, there were 12 
people who received the death penalty, death sentence with a 
two-year reprieve and forced labor, or life imprisonment, 11 
people received sentences of more than 10 years, and seven 
people received sentences of less than 10 years. The county 
courts also specially convened press conferences, and reported 
on the launching of the anti-corruption campaign, and on the 
strict punishment of serious economic criminals. And through 
using the news media, and providing widely disseminated 
reporting, the momentum and social effectiveness of the attacks 
on economic crimes will be extended. 
  Strict reliance on the law for handling matters, 
conscientiously ensuring the quality of cases. The circumstances 
of economic crime are complex, and have different 
characteristics than normal crime: the facts of the crimes, such 
as the monetary totals involved in graft and bribery are 
difficult to thoroughly investigate; the stages involved in the 
commitment of crimes are diverse, and proof is hard to obtain; 
the basis of convictions are very closely related with policy 
regulations, and in the process of the transformation of the 
economic system, for behavior in the economic sphere it is 
necessary to make clear distinctions between the criminal and 
the noncriminal, and the difficulties here are not small. Thus, 
throughout the province courts at all levels are firmly basing 
cases on the facts, taking the law as the principle criterion 
and being guided by the principle of "the first necessity is to 
stand firm, the second necessity is to be cautious, and be sure 
to be prepared," and strictly and properly involved the facts in 
seeking proof, repeatedly do research to determine the nature of 
an offense, and correctly mete out penalties, and be sure to 
approach the judgement of cases by obtaining the experience of 
history. The county courts, using issues that they encounter in 
trying cases of economic crime, and on the basis of 
investigative research and through case precedence discussions 
and critical analysis, are drafting a series of concrete 
stipulations suited to policies and laws, and are strengthening 
their professional guidance for lower level courts; lower level 
courts, for some cases that they have no preparation for, are 
taking the initiative to request instructions and report on the 
cases, preventing erroneous decisions. 
  In the wake of the deepening of the anti-corruption 
campaign, 
a series of major economic crime cases have been ferreted out 
and investigated, and the number of economic crime cases 
prosecuted in court will increase. Courts at all levels have 
intellectually and in terms of judicial strength already 
properly handled the making of the required preparations, and 
for those major cases such as graft, bribery, etc., no matter 
how many people are involved, all will be fully investigated, 
and stern sanctions will be applied in accordance with the law, 
and by no means will evil be tolerated as this is tantamount to 
abetting it, and under no circumstances will we break our 
promises to the people. 
  3. Comprehensive launching of economic, civil, and 
administrative judicial work, giving full play to regulatory 
functions, to develop market economic services 
  Throughout the province, under intellectual guidance 
designed 
to establish a socialist market economic system to provide legal 
guarantees and legal services, courts are actively making great 
efforts during the course of economic, civil, and administrative 
judicial work to increase the strength of services, expand the 
realm of services, and give full play to their regulatory 
functions. 
  1) Economic judicial work has been developed to a 
substantial 
degree. Last year in economic judicial work there emerged a good 
trend involving large numbers of accepted cases, large numbers 
of completed cases, and large numbers of resolved disputes. 
Throughout the province, courts hear a total of 10,679 cases 
involving economic disputes, an 18.07 percent increase over last 
year; in total, 9976 cases were resolved, an increase of 19.83 
percent from the previous year. Among these, mediated cases 
totalled 5980, a mediation rate of 59.94 percent, or a 4.5 
percent increase over last year; Some 84.84 percent of the cases 
were resolved within three months, a 1.23 increase over the past 
year. In all there was a total of 337,911,900 RMB involved in 
the resolved disputes, up 70.02 percent from last year. In 
addition, there were 3784 cases applicable to paying for the 
resolution of economic disputes, with a total value of 45,652, 
400 RMB. 
  2) Civil judicial cases have progressively developed. Last 
year, the overall number of civil cases totalled 56,276, with 
53,452 cases settled, increases from last year respectively of 
6.89 percent and 7.61 percent. The number of cases accepted 
exceeded historical high levels, and there emerged a number of 
new circumstances, new issues, and major changes occurred for 
civil cases, in terms of the principal part, content and type of 
litigation. Looking at the province as a whole, matrimonial and 
family disputes, though they still occupied the leading position 
in cases accepted (constituting 32,791 cases, or 58.27 percent), 
cases frequently touch on issues dealing with contracts involved 
one party (husband or wife) against the other or two party 
(husband and wife) contracts, rent, and management rights 
issues; personal and property damage compensation disputes have 
already leapt into second place (constituting 1810 cases, or 
10.32 percent), and investigation and obtaining of proof and 
determination of compensation amounts have encountered major 
difficulties; in various types of business, rent, and mortgage 
disputes, due to the developing of the market economy, prices 
change, and issues of cost, rental money, and mortgage amounts 
become very difficult to try. In addition, there has been an 
increase in the number of new types of cases such as celebrity 
rights, book rights, real estate development, and labor 
disputes, and cases touching on foreign countries, Hong Kong, 
Macao, and Taiwan. From this description it is evident that at 
the same time as the number of civil dispute cases accepted by 
peoples' courts involving the aspect of personal rights and 
interests, the proportion of cases involving some aspect of 
property rights and interests has increased substantially. This 
change has meant that the relations between civil judicial work 
and economic construction and the market economy are growing 
more and more closely linked, and civil judicial work is 
directly effecting the wider and wider expansion of the scope of 
economic construction and market economic services. 
  3) Administrative judicial work is steadily expanding. Last 
year, there were a total of 1602 administrative cases tried, 
with 1532 cases settled. Among the settled cases, 370 judgements 
maintained the original administrative conduct, while in 533 
cases the ruling granted removal, with these two outcomes 
totalling 64.95 percent of the cases; in 397 cases there were 
judgements of recision, and changes to the original 
administrative conduct, amounting to some 25.91 percent of 
settled cases. 
  People's courts at all levels, in the course launching 
economic, civil, and administrative judicial work, are using 
judicial measures to adjust economic relations, and are 
emphasizing the mastering of the following points: 
  First, steadfastly focus on the Party and state major 
policies and plans, give prominence to key points of work. 
Throughout the province courts are conscientiously implementing 
various central policies touching on the deepening of reform and 
the broadening of opening, the establishment of a market 
economic system, the strengthening of macro-level regulation and 
the maintenance of social stability, and conscientiously 
focusing on the core in judicial work, and defining the key 
points of work. Courts at all levels are conscientiously 
implementing the party committee transmitted provincial court 
leading party group "Views on Fully Utilizing Judicial Functions 
To Strengthen State Macro-level Regulation, Opposing Corruption 
and Maintaining Social Stability," taking as the main goal of 
work having the socialist market economy provide legal 
guarantees and services, and taking the key points for 
consideration in working to be the difficult points and points 
attracting attention that arise in reform and opening and the 
development of the economy, strengthening economic, civil, and 
administrative case judicial work closely related to macro-level 
adjustment and the market economy, and ensuring the smooth 
implementation of the center's major policy decisions. In the 
course of work coordinated rectification of the financial order, 
throughout the province courts in accordance with the law and in 
a timely manner settled 4918 cases involving borrowing and 
lending, recovering for banks and credit unions mature and 
overdue loans totalling 843,913,000 RMB, and at the same time, 
on issues touching on financial management they provided 
judicial suggestions to relevant departments, and promoted the 
standardization of call borrowing and credit activity. 
  Second, establish law enforcement concepts and judicial 
principles that are suitable to a market economy. In order to 
adapt to the developing and changing new circumstances, courts 
at all levels are being guided by liberated thinking, and 
replacing concepts, while strengthening investigative research. 
When it comes to some current legally sluggish objective 
circumstances, research issues of handling how to master 
policies and suit the law, and establish law enforcement 
concepts that are suitable to a market economy, upholding the 
concepts of a national legal system and a unified market, 
conscientiously resisting and overcoming local protectionism; 
the concept of the equality of the positions of (legal) parties, 
and the legitimate rights and interests of equally protected 
Chinese and foreign litigants; it is necessary to affirm the 
effectiveness of respecting the concept of the litigant's 
autonomy of opinion, under the premise of inviolable legal 
stipulations, and no harming of the legitimate rights and 
interests of the state, society and other people, while 
displaying consistency when it comes to real opinions held among 
the litigants; protecting the concept of equitable competition, 
realizing the superiorities and inferiorities of the main body 
of the market, ensuring the orderly movement of the market 
economy. At the same time, in the course of work upholding the 
four principles, and correctly handling the relational 
principles between the partial and the whole, establishing whole 
concepts, and relying on the law in handling disputes; the 
principle of using reform to promote development, through trying 
of cases, implementing the promotion of reform measures; 
carrying out policies and implementing unified legal principles, 
and where the legal and policy stipulations are not clear, using 
the principle of the "three favorables," seek truth from facts 
in handling matters; the principle of comprehensively 
administering, through launching such activities as judicial 
suggestions, etc., and promoting the standardization of various 
types of activities and social stablility. 
  Third, base ourselves on judicial procedures, increase 
strength of services, expand the scope of services. Throughout 
the province courts are continuing to overcome the phenomenon of 
"handling cases in isolation," and at the same time as they base 
themselves on judicial procedures, and handle more cases, and 
handle cases properly, they are linking various working 
characteristics of judicial work, increasing the strength of 
services, and expanding the scope of services. In addition to 
work such as continuing to launching the establishment of 
judicial liaison stations, legal service offices and local 
judicial liaison officers at large-scale enterprises, rural and 
township enterprises and related departments, helping train 
legal talent, systematizing contractual relations, integrating 
judicial cases and issues that are found in the course of 
investigative research, and timely putting forward of judicial 
suggestions, they have also launched special services, such as 
taking the initiative for financial departments to settle loans 
on a legal basis, and actively assist enterprises in setting 
debts on a legal basis, supporting tax organs in legally 
collecting taxes, etc., and in the course carrying out these 
various specialized services in assisting enterprises in setting 
debts in accordance with the law, they were able to recover for 
enterprises debt liabilities totalling 620,083,000 RMB, and to 
resolve the large number of contradictions and disputes that 
arise in the course of economic activity, maintaining the normal 
economic order, and having an ameliorative social effect. 
  Fourth, strengthening execution work. Courts at all levels 
are taking marshal cases as the major content of building 
economic services, and are strengthening the work involved in 
executing cases. Over the year as a whole there were 18,245 
executed cases of various types, an 11.62 percent increase over 
the past year in the total monetary amount of the executed case 
target. Among these, executed civil cases amounted to 10,031, 
and executed economic dispute cases totalled 3,519. Last year, 
some new circumstances emerged for executing work: first, there 
was a reduction in the number of cases executed. This because 
since 1992, throughout the province courts have launched several 
campaigns to concentrate on unification of execution, and have 
put in order a large set of long-pending cases, while a great 
many courts have basically cast off the millstone of "executing 
difficulties," and executing work is heading towards 
normalization and standardization. At the same time, courts at 
all levels, are actively working diligently at linking aspects 
of trying and executing cases, and investigation and executing, 
and there has been a substantial increase in litigants 
voluntarily carrying out their own obligations. Second, the 
difficulties of executing cases are increasing. The principle 
reason is that after the state strengthened macro-level 
regulation measures, enterprise operating funds have normally 
been tight, and some enterprises are in a production slump, 
their benefits are not good, with the result that the phenomenon 
of enterprises' chain of debt has again appeared, and this has 
increased the difficulty of executing cases. Third, 
administrative organs applications for case execution are 
increasing, making up 21.65 percent of cases. In order to 
support administrative organs in administering in accordance 
with the law, ensuring the orderly carrying out of state 
adminstrative management, a large number of courts are adopting 
organizational and work-related measures, to ensure the 
execution of these cases. The total execution mark target was 
350,020,000 RMB, with the return and removal of illegal 
construction amounting to 51,600 km2. [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66180 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar027___94024" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  31 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL </F>
<F P=101> NORTHWEST REGION </F>
<H3> <TI>   Role of Armed Forces in Xinjiang Stressed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Role of Armed Forces in Xinjiang Stressed </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Emphasis on Stability </H4>

<F P=102> 94CM0225A Urumqi XINJIANG RIBAO in Chinese 31 Jan 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0225A </F>
<F P=104>  Urumqi XINJIANG RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Correspondent Wu Yadong (0702 0068 2639): "Need </F>
To Increase Understanding of the Importance of Concentrating on 
Stability, Paying Close Attention to Political and Legal Work is 
Wang Lequan's (3769 2867 3123) Emphasis at Autonomous CPC 
Committee's Conference on Political and Legal Work"] 
  [Text] At the Autonomous Region's CPC Committee Conference 
on Political and Legal Work, which ended on 29 January, 
Autonomous Region CPC Committee Deputy Secretary and Deputy 
Chairman Wang Lequan emphasized the need for further enhancing 
party leadership of political and legal work to increase 
understanding of the importance of concentrating on stability 
and paying close attention to political and legal work. 
  He said it is necessary to concentrate hard on the position 
and role of political and legal work from the high plane of 
maintaining the concept of class struggle and strengthening 
dictatorship, from the high plane of safeguarding modernization, 
and from the high plane of maintaining the unity of the 
motherland and opposing ethnic separation. The most important 
concern for CPC committees and all levels in leading and 
supporting political and legal work is leading and supporting 
political and legal departments in maintaining the basic line of 
"a single center and two basic points," and leading and 
supporting political and legal departments in eradicating 
impediments and interference in strict enforcement of the law. 
It is necessary to uphold a combination of expert work and the 
mass line, closely relying on the masses of all nationalities to 
concentrate on stability. CPC committees and governments at all 
levels must give energetic support to working conditions. All 
jurisdictions must also show sufficient concern and support for 
the real difficulties of political and legal departments, making 
a needed tilt in favor of political and legal departments in the 
allocation of operating expenses and providing material support 
to increase inputs into political and legal departments. 
  In a speech at the beginning of the conference, autonomous 
region CPC committee standing committee member and political and 
legal committee secretary Li Fengzi [2621 6646 3320] said that 
the emphasis in the 1994 "severe blows" battle should be on 
"breaking big cases, striking at gangs, and pursuing escaped 
convicts." Criminals who have committeed serious crimes that 
hurt the people's welfare, damage the social and economic order, 
and endanger public safety such as murder, robbery, rape, grand 
larceny, and the production and sale of drugs must be resolutely 
punished severely and quickly according to law. Each 
jurisdiction must set its own emphasis as conspicuous local 
problems warrant, focusing on crimes that can be attacked in a 
concentrated way such as robbery, car-jackings and police 
officers putting up roadblocks to collect fines and fees, and 
hit and run offenses, as well as criminal activities about which 
there is strong public reaction. A targeted, planned, and 
step-by-step struggle that has specific goals and specific 
actions must be organized promptly. An unrelenting battle must 
be waged to eliminate pornography and eradicate the "six evils." 
A resolute attitude and strong measures must be taken against 
disgusting social acts that the public strongly opposes like 
prostitution, drug taking, and gambling to bring them under real 
control, cracking down on them severely and stamping them out 
according to law, punishing them strictly in accordance with 
regulations, and positively not allowing them to run rampant. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66181 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar027___94025" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  30 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL </F>
<F P=101> NORTHWEST REGION </F>
<H3> <TI>   Role of Armed Forces in Xinjiang Stressed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Role of Armed Forces in Xinjiang Stressed </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    PLA Brings Stability, Prosperity </H4>

<F P=102> 94CM0225B Urumqi XINJIANG RIBAO in Chinese 30 Jan 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0225B </F>
<F P=104>  Urumqi XINJIANG RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by correspondents Yang Gongcheng (2799 0501 2052) </F>
and Ou Shijin (2962 0013 6855): "Masses of All Nationalities in 
Xinjiang Support the Army With Absolute Sincerity; Comfort 
Border Posts. No Stability and No Prosperity But For the PLA"] 
  [Text] On lunar New Year's eve, Wang Dengming, a soldier 
stationed in Xinjiang, sustained severe injuries while valiantly 
trying to control a scared horse in the county seat of Bachu 
County. Gulishahan, a woman teacher of Uygur nationality in the 
county nationalities middle school, flagged down a vehicle to 
take him to the hospital where she removed her watch and gold 
ring as collateral for the hospital admittance fee and gave 
Young Wang a 300 ml blood transfusion. According to a briefing 
from the Xinjiang Military Region Mass Work Department, moving 
deeds in support of the army like Gulishanhan's are too numerous 
to cite among the minority nationality masses in Xinjiang. 
  "Without the PLA, Xinjiang would not be stable or 
prosperous." All nationalities in Xinjiang personally feel the 
importance and role of the people's army. Enthusiasm for loving 
the country and supporting the armed forces is at an all-time 
high. A large number of minority nationality peasants and 
herdsmen, who became rich first in recent years, have used 
various means to express their feelings of gratitude to kindred 
soldiers. Yakufu, a Uygur individual entrepreneur in Urumqi City 
whom the army helped escape from poverty to become wealthy, 
enthusiastically provided the army with premium quality service 
when the first "support-the-army" restaurant opened in the 
autonomous region's capital. Thanks to his instigation, 
"support-the-army travel agencies," "support-the-army shops," 
and "support-the-army" bus stations spread very quickly 
throughout the urban area, becoming a major feature of the 
frontier city's "twin supports." Ten years ago, Uygur 
nationality peasant Kawuzi had been rescued by officers and men 
of the garrison army in Pishan County when struggling with 
outlaws. Afterward, he used pear, peach, apple, and grape 
nursery stock that he himself had cultivated to build an orchard 
for their unit, and he looked after it for them. During the past 
several years, a "support-the-army service team" voluntarily 
organized by minority nationality people has been active in 
cities and towns and farming and pastoral areas north and south 
of the Tian Shan, enthusiastically eliminating worries and 
solving difficulties for the garrison forces. At New Year's time 
in 1994, when garrison forces in Kuqa, Usu, and Turpan conducted 
winter bivouac training, wherever they went, they were warmly 
received by the masses of all nationalities. 
  In the Xinjiang Military Region, guard duty is grueling and 
stremuous. Realizing that border patrols travel great distances, 
and that the terrain is steep and the climate ugly, the local 
minority peoples have set up "troop quartering places" in their 
yurts where they accept free of charge officers and men who trek 
long distances on patrol. At border defense stations like 
Hongshanzui, which is a "lonely island in a snowy sea," and 
Hongqilafu, which is a "forbidden zone for life" after heavy 
snows block the mountains each year, the local minority peoples 
use horse-drawn sledges to deliver newspapers, magazines, and 
mail to officers and men, and to pick up and send officers and 
men up and down the mountains. Many herdsmen deliver to sentry 
posts vegetables, grain and meat that they have stored in their 
own homes. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66182 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar027___94026" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  30 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> REGIONAL </F>
<F P=101> NORTHWEST REGION </F>
<H3> <TI>   Role of Armed Forces in Xinjiang Stressed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Role of Armed Forces in Xinjiang Stressed </PHRASE></F></HT>
<H4>    Clerics Visit Peoples Armed Police </H4>

<F P=102> 94CM0225C Urumqi XINJIANG RIBAO in Chinese 30 Jan 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94CM0225C </F>
<F P=104>  Urumqi XINJIANG RIBAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by correspondent Hao Hong (6787 4767): "Clerics </F>
Visit People's Armed Police Officers and Men"] 
  [Text] Urumqi Dispatch A clerics lunar New Year 
comfort group organized by the autonomous region Islamic 
Association, and the autonomous region Islamic Korean Teaching 
Academy, as well as some other units in the regions paid a 
comfort call on the Second Dadui of the Second Zhidui of the 
Xinjiang People's Armed Police Headquarters. 
  Xierifujiang Damaolaaji, a member of the autonomous region's 
People's Political Consultative Congress and a member of the 
All-China Islamic Association; Maantaishuo, a delegate to the 
autonomous region's people's congress, and the People's Armed 
Police commander, have made enormous indelible contributions in 
protecting Xinjiang, building Xinjiang, and safeguarding the 
unity of the motherland for which Muslims of all nationalities 
thank them. In the new year, our clerics and Muslims of all 
nationalities must diligently implement the party's religious 
policies, resolutely serve the leaders of the party and 
government, safeguard social stability and the unity of 
nationalities, and oppose hostile forces inside and outside 
Xinjiang and the infiltration and sabotage of ethnic 
separatists, making a contribution to the advancement of ethnic 
unity and the unity of the army and the people. 
  The commander of the Second Zhidui of the People's Armed 
Police Xinjiang Headquarters said on behalf of all officers and 
men that during the coming year, greater efforts would be made 
in the performance of all security work to create a favorable 
and serene environment for the people of all nationalities. 
  Maimaiti Sailai, CPPCC member and deputy director of the 
Chinese Islamic Association presented a silk banner and 
souvenirs to the People's Armed Police officers and men on 
behalf of Muslims of all nationalities. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66183 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar027___94027" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  7 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> MILITARY, PUBLIC SECURITY </F>
<H3> <TI>   Vignettes of Serviceman Crimes </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Vignettes of Serviceman Crimes </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0217A Beijing BEIGUO FENG [NORTH COUNTRY] in Chinese No 
2, 7 Feb 94 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0217A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing BEIGUO FENG [NORTH COUNTRY] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Xiao Ye Da Wa (1420 6851 6671 1216): "Servicemen </F>
Who Ended Up in Court -- Servicemen Crimes Committed During the 
Economic Upsurge"] 
  [Text] The armed forces are an armed group that carries out 
special political missions. The General Political Department 
requires that every PLA officer and enlisted man be politically 
qualified, militarily superb, have a fine work style, provide 
vigorous support, and be strong in battle. From the first day 
that a serviceman puts on a military uniform, he is subject to 
strict military training and receives proper instruction in 
political ideology, the law, and discipline. For many years, 
servicemen have been the pride of the age and models in 
upholding the law. 
  Faced with the onslaught of the upsurge in the commodity 
economy, and faced with the technicolor world in the wake of 
deregulation, servicemen have been put to all sorts of tests. 
Military camps are like small boats beset from all sides in 
resisting the various enticements of this deregulated world. 
Since the income of those in military camps is rather meager, 
since the environment is pretty much closed, and since some 
servicemen exceed their means, pursue a life of luxury, have a 
poor sense of marriage ethics, and conceal firearms and 
ammunition, serviceman crimes sometimes occur. 
  According to expert study, serviceman crimes have certain 
inherent characteristics that merit deep thought on the part of 
servicemen and troop unit grassroots cadres. How is it that 
servicemen who have received military unit indoctrination and 
training for many years take a road of crime? What enlightenment 
can we gain from their actions? The writer visited one 
military camp and one family after another in a quest for the 
answer. Because of security considerations and the request of 
military units themselves, the writer has concealed servicemen's 
true names and units. 
  A. Upon entering the military camp everybody performs his 
duty and contribute his youth. Poverty becomes a demon that 
lands servicemen in court. 
  Seeing the wonderful opportunities that deregulation 
presented, he forgot the uniform he was wearing and his not so 
superb swimming ability. Throwing caution to the winds, he dived 
in. He drowned, of course. 
  Back then when he hoodwinked everybody and served as plant 
manager with pride and elation, I interviewed "A." Today, when 
he is in jail, I have made him the living subject of an article. 
  "A" was a 26-year old career noncommissioned officer. Like 
other charming entrepreneurs, "A" exploited his youth and his 
vigor. When he saw that a regiment-operated enterprise -- a beer 
bottle factory -- was verging on bankruptcy, he volunteered to 
sit with dignity in the armchair of the plant manager. "A" 
signed a contract with the regiment requiring that he turn over 
20,000 yuan to the regiment each year. 
  From then on, "A" pulled out all stops, working feverishly 
with the workers in the plant from morning till night. To his 
surprise, the beer bottle plant did not work out as he had 
expected. Despite their sweat, because of competition from local 
concerns, lack of managerial personnel, inept administration, 
high product costs, and poor sales, not only did the plant not 
make money, but losses continued year after year. The plant was 
on the verge of paralysis once again. 
  "A" was an intelligent man. When he saw that all his efforts 
were to no avail, he began to ponder new approaches. With the 
plant's official seal and bank account number in hand, "A" 
traveled about in the name of sales promotion, sometimes being 
gone for one or two months on end. Although they felt the 
situation was a little strange, the regimental leaders felt that 
inasmuch as the plant had been contracted to "A," too many 
inquiries would be wrong. Furthermore, "A" always handled 
matters rather well. The contract he signed was in the regiment, 
so if he did not make money, they need not worry that he would 
renege on his obligations. So they did not pay close attention. 
  Before long, it was the end of the year, but when the 
regiment joyfully sought out "A" to have him honor the contract, 
they received a subpoena that a civilian court has issued 
because the beer bottle factory violated national law by 
engaging in speculation. 
  In order to earn some money, and eager for a quick return 
and 
instant benefit, "A" had used the beer bottle factory's official 
seal and bank account number to sign contracts everywhere. He 
ran a speculation scam. His own wallet was full, but the other 
parties to the contracts appealed to the court one after 
another. "A" was taken into custody by the local public 
security organization and punished according to law. 
  Since childhood, he had had a special feeling about 
money. When he left an out-of-the-way mountain village and came 
to a large metropolis with a thicket of towering buildings, his 
hands itched.... 
  Wei Xiaoling was a brash young cadre who might have been a 
comer but for this case. Wei Xiaoling had been born on a barren 
tract of land in the Taihang Mountains of Shanxi. After coming 
to the capital with a military unit, he was very happy, and 
worked very hard. He wanted to accomplish something in order to 
escape from the poverty of a peasant's life. His personnel file 
was filled with "excellents." He was one of the outstanding 
squad leaders in the entire army, and he was to be sent to a 
college to study. His illustrious record, and his striking 
appearance won him women's affection. In the fourth year after 
becoming a soldier, Wei Xiaoliang found favor with the daughter 
of a county magistrate to whom he became engaged. With such a 
gorgeously attired young woman on his hands, Wei Xiaoliang 
became preoccupied with his own lack of money. Naturally, his 
family did not have a cent they could give him to spend, so he 
looked longingly at all the fine things in the city. 
  The unit in which Wei Xiaoliang served was a luxury military 
hostel where fine cigarettes and good liquor were in plentiful 
supply and not strictly controlled. On the first occasion, he 
stole half a case of Maotai whiskey and a carton of Red Pagoda 
cigarettes with no trouble at all. He sold them to a privately 
owned shop. Unscathed, several days later Wei Xiaoliang took two 
cartons of Shilin cigarettes. His appetite was becoming bigger 
and bigger. By taking the opportunity that being on duty every 
night afforded, within a month he managed to steal 5,600 yuan 
worth of cigarettes and liquor. 
  But people who frequent mountains are bound to encounter a 
tiger sooner or later. When the shiny handcuffs snapped shut, 
clasping together hands that reeked of money, tears streamed 
down Wei Xiaoliang's face, and he was filled with agony. He said 
to the correspondent who interviewed him: "Nowadays it takes 
money to do anything. It is expensive to go out with friends, 
and I did not want to be too shabby. I come from a poor family. 
If I did not entertain and buy clothes for my girl friends, they 
would look down on me. But the little I got in allowances was 
not enough to buy a pair of socks. Vanity did me in!" 
  When thievery occurs in a military unit, it is mostly 
because 
of problems in the indoctrination that the unit gives. Quite a 
few cadres at the grassroots level are not very capable, and are 
not honest themselves. They take advantages of enlisted men. 
They do not dare take charge of their unit boldly. Consequently, 
petty theft constantly occurs in some units at the grassroots 
level. 
  The holder of a lot of authority over motor vehicles, 
he felt he should use it well today when a commodity economy was 
enveloping China. His philosophy was that one should exploit 
whatever resources one has, whether motor vehicles or something 
else, never thinking that he himself might be exploited by motor 
vehicles. 
  "W" and I were from the same village. He was not a high 
ranking officer, just a first lieutenant commanding a car 
company. But "W" had very great authority. He controlled more 
than 40 large trucks and 23 other motor vehicles. For the 
previous two years, W had done everything by the book. He was 
not prone to act rashly. But one day a second rate peddler 
sought him out to ask that he make a vehicle available to go to 
a place to bring back cigarettes. "W" refused at first. He said, 
" I am a member of the Communist Party and I am also a military 
cadre. I cannot do such an illegal thing." Then, the peddlar, 
who watched his every word and expression, took out a stack of 
"e pluribus unum" and stuffed it into the company 
commander's depleted pocket. "We'll divide up the money we make 
30 to 70. Don't worry. I will certainly not treat you unfairly. 
You don't have to do anything. Just depend on the insurance that 
a military license plate provides. Stay at home and take a cut." 
At the sight of the money, "W" finally wavered. He selected a 
good vehicle and, under cover of darkness, he personally drove 
it to the city's outskirts. Inevitably, military units have 
strict disciple, and for "W" inevitably was the first time he 
did this. "W" was very apprehensive. No sooner had the vehicle 
left the point where the cigarettes had been sold than public 
security enforcement personnel searched it. As soon as "W" saw 
that matters had taken a bad turn, he fled in the vehicle, the 
ear-splitting sound of police whistles rending the night air 
behind him. "W" drove the vehicle faster and faster, finally 
taking into a one-way street. Just then, a Huang He automobile 
came racing like lighting from the opposite direction. "Bang," 
the two vehicles collided head on and quickly exploded into a 
roaring fire. 
  The correspondent went to the hospital to see W who had 
escaped death only by the skin of his teeth. Tears streaming 
down his cheeks, he told me repeatedly not to let his family 
know, and not to use his real name if I wrote a report. I 
understood his feelings, and I respected his request. 
  B. A relatively insulated environment, a monotonous cultural 
life, and strict military camp discipline cause a substantial 
number of servicemen to commit crimes for women. 
  He was a young military doctor who had been assigned to 
a unit hospital in a remote area. When a pretty patient 
appeared, his desires were aroused, and he exchanged the 
penicillin in the syringe for a powerful narcotic. 
  Medical Doctor Ding's hospital was tiny, and it was also 
located in a god-forsaken place. He had always attended male 
military patients from his own outfit and family members who 
came to the unit (most of whom were also middle aged), but he 
had never taken care of any young female patients. 
  One day, the fiancee of a soldier in Third Company came to 
the hospital with a severe case of influenza. Doctor Ding was 
very much taken with this young and beautiful young woman, so he 
diagnosed her illness and arranged for her stay in the hospital. 
The young woman's illness was not serious, but the military 
doctor insisted on freeing a bed for her use. The soldier was 
very relieved and said to his fiancee, "Since Dr. Ding says so, 
a hospital stay is certainly necessary. Stay for a while." 
  Once the young woman was in the hospital, Dr. Ding busied 
himself even more in looking after her, thinking to win the 
young woman's love through his actions. Dr. Ding was nearly 30, 
and still a bachelor, so naturally this weighed on his mind. For 
several days in a row, the principle the young woman followed 
was "you may be hot, but I am not." Dr. Ding was very 
discomfited. 
  One day, Dr. Ding came to give the young woman a shot. When 
the young woman's tender white behind was exposed to Dr. Ding's 
eyes, his hands could not be restrained from stroking it. When 
the young woman angrily rebuked him, instead of repenting his 
error, Dr. Ding replaced the penicillin in the syringe with a 
highly sedative narcotic. Very quickly the young woman lapsed 
into a lethargic sleep, and Dr. Ding threw himself on her 
anxiously.... 
  When Dr. Ding was sent before the court, he murmured: "When 
I 
was studying to be a doctor, I learned better, but life in the 
armed forces is too confining. I indulged in fantasies all day 
long, and made a mistake without thinking." 
  C. Military personnel frequently have rifles and cartridges 
in their possession, and they also often know military secrets. 
Officers and men who are unable to resist blandishments 
frequently shed tears on this sacred land. 
  Military regulations explicitly provide that military 
personnel may not keep ammunition in their possession. However, 
young and happy-go-lucky soldiers do not pay sufficient 
attention to this regulation. 
  On an incomparably soft and gentle morning, with a 
single crisp rifle shot, a young and blameless trainee platoon 
leader crumpled in a pool of blood. The freshly flowing blood 
was as bright as the shoulder patch on the shoulder that the 
shot just went through calling people's attention to his youth. 
He was only 21. 
  Little Beans, a soldier in his platoon, was responsible. The 
very first time, he did live firing, Little Beans, who had liked 
to play with guns ever since he was a child, held back two 
cartridges and hid them in his pocket when no one was looking. 
Three months passed, but aside from taking them out secretly and 
feeling them from time to time, Little Beans never did anything 
with them. Every day, he watched the chirping little birds 
circling above the guard post. He felt utterly bored. Finally 
one early morning when he was on guard duty, he put the two 
rounds into his rifle magazine. 
  Little Beans drew a bead on a little bird hopping on top of 
the guard post. As the little bird hopped around, Young Beans' 
rifle tracked it left and right, up and down. Just then, the 
trainee platoon leader came along quietly to check on the 
sentry. When Little Beans saw that familiar stern face in the 
sight of his rifle, in a moment of panic, he involuntarily 
pulled the trigger. 
  Instantly, the bullet struck the young trainee platoon 
leader. Thus, the trainee platoon leader, who was just doing his 
job, fell beneath the muzzle of his own comrade in arms. Little 
Beans was also disciplined and punished according to law for 
this. 
  Many officers and soldiers keep ammunition without thinking 
that it might fall into the hands of criminal elements, endanger 
the safety of the country and society, or even cause some 
irrecoverable loss. It was for this reason that the three 
general staff departments specially issued "Regulations 
Prohibiting Individuals From Concealing Firearms and 
Ammunition." Article 163 of the criminal code also contains 
explicit provisions. Nevertheless, there are always individual 
military personnel, particularly young soldiers, who pay no 
attention to the law of the land. They use various means to 
conceal ammunition. They may use it to make jewelry, or to show 
off, or to commit some act in violation of the law whose purpose 
they can tell no one. In the end, everyone of them ends up 
either hurting others or hurting himself. 
  What began simply in order to show off erudition 
unexpectedly ended up with the disclosure of military secrets to 
an enemy agent. 
  The writer met Yang Qun at a reform-through-labor farm in 
the 
capital. A pair of gold wire-rimmed glasses propped on his nose, 
his face thin and pallid, his body reedy, he looked as though 
the wind could blow him away. Yang Qun had been the secretary in 
charge of news at a certain combined arms army. He began talking 
about the crime he committed, which it was too late to repent. 
  He was a person who liked to promote himself, particularly 
to 
strangers. He was fond of showing his erudition. Since he worked 
in a military organization, Yang Qun naturally new numerous 
military secrets. In addition, Yang Qun was a news secretary, 
who had extensive contact with all sorts of people in civilian 
life. 
  Yang Qun said, "On a summer's day, I went into the city to 
give an article to the daily newspaper. When the editor saw me 
in uniform, he had me sit down to chat. When I saw how friendly 
this big editor was, I started to chat with him. In the course 
of the conversation, he casually inquired how many men were in 
our unit, and he asked about the tanks, guns, and even new model 
weapons. At first I did not think much about it. I just babbled 
on. We became good friends. Later on, he frequently came to the 
unit to spend time with me, and he had me show him the base and 
the unit's equipment. As a good friend, I went through the units 
concerned to satisfy his wishes. He observed very closely, and 
he was anxious to have me take his picture in front of some new 
model weapons as a souvenir. For comrades in civilian life to 
have some feeling of mystery about a military camp is 
understandable, so I did not realize at all that he had a 
criminal motivation." 
  Yang Qun looked very resentful talking about this. He went 
on 
to tell the writer, "At that time, I too became somewhat aware. 
I felt that he was sly. He particularly wanted me to write 
articles about the army, and every time he also wanted materials 
to read. Many materials that had nothing to do with the articles 
I wrote, he also insisted on having, returning them to me after 
several days. I never imagined that he was stealing military 
secrets through me and giving them to a foreign spy 
organization." 
  When this spy was arrested by our public security personnel, 
Yang Qun was also taken away in a police car. At that time, Yang 
Qun still did not know all the details of the matter. 
  In talking about it, Yang Qun had a sorrowful expression. 
  D. Servicemen come from all over the country. Fellow 
villagers are particularly close to each other in a strange 
place. Who could every imagine that so many stories that should 
not occur do occur between two fellow villagers? 
  When the one villager met the other, both shed tears. 
What better way to express themselves than to drink together. 
While drinking, they became bombastic, and when they finished 
drinking, they committed a monstrous crime. 
  In the military court, he lowered his noble head. In 
recalling this bloody lesson, the 28 year old first lieutenant 
named Chen said from his innermost being, "It was my fellow 
villager who did me in; it was drink that did me in!" 
  Chen and Zhao had grown up together on the same street, and 
they had gone to the same kindergarten, primary school, and 
middle school. Still later, they entered military service 
together and came to the same city to serve in the same unit. 
Even later, they happened to go to the same academy. Friendship 
between the two became stronger and stronger. But good things 
never last long. After graduating from military school, the two 
went their separate ways, one being posted to Wuhan and the 
other to Jiangsu. Even though they kept in touch by telephone, 
the former feelings of closeness were hard to sustain. Finally, 
Zhao had a sudden opportunity to go on a temporary duty 
assignment to the small city where Chen was located. The two 
met, tears streamed down their cheeks, and they poured out the 
events in their lives to each other. Finally, Chen invited Zhao 
to drink in a hotel. They drank from noon until sunset, and when 
the two left the hotel, they were staggering and casting surly 
looks at everyone. Then a woman comrade riding a bicycle bumped 
Zhao. Ordinarily, both would have said they were sorry and that 
would have been that. But on this occasion, how could Chen "see 
a fellow villager be put upon!" He hit the young woman in the 
nose with his fist, blood splattering in all directions. Feeling 
he still had not slaked his hatred, Chen drunkenly beat the 
young woman with his fists and feet till she was almost dead. 
Passersby sent the young woman to a hospital where she died from 
injuries to her internal organs. 
  Once he was sober, Chen realized how great a crime he had 
committed, but it was too late to repent. 
  E. As indoctrination in the "two-five" common law 
intensifies, servicemen come to understand the weapon of law, 
but a substantial number of officers and men are still law 
illiterates. When sent to military court, they are still 
unknowing. 
  After opening one letter, he felt exhilarated. After 
opening 300 letters, he became a prisoner. 
  Because of his outstanding work record, Young Fan was 
selected battalion mail clerk. Every day several hundred letters 
passed through his hands with never a mistake. Two years passed, 
but Young Fang's desire to go to school remained unfulfilled. He 
was still doing the same old job. Young Fang felt life was 
stultifying, so he sought a little stimulation. 
  One day, he received a thick letter addressed to another 
soldier. Looking at the graceful handwriting on the envelope and 
the hospital return address, Young Fang felt that the letter had 
certainly been written by a young woman. Then the idea of seeing 
what was inside the envelope occurred to him. He locked the door 
and closed the windows, and secretly opened the envelope. Sure 
enough, it was a love letter from a young woman, and a pretty 
color photograph was enclosed. The emotion that the young woman 
expressed between the lines filled Young Fang's empty heart with 
a feeling he had never known. He quietly concealed the 
photograph and, after reading the letter several times, he 
burned it. When other letters came later on, Young Fang read 
them in the same way without inhibition, and if they contained 
photographs or money, he took them. After he had read more than 
300 letters, the families of many cadres and the fiancees of 
many soldiers who had been the victims demanded "an explanation" 
from the military unit. 
  After receiving one after another such "law suits," the unit 
CPC committee began to watch Young Fang's behavior. The next 
time that Young Fang opened a young woman's love letter, he was 
seized on the spot by the regimental security section. Young 
Fang was sentenced to one year in prison. 
  Servicemen carry out special missions. Serviceman crime is 
bound to weaken their fighting strength. Therefore, serviceman 
crime is a matter than cannot be ignored. As a result of 
investigation and research, the writer believes that greater 
education in the legal system, improving serviceman morale, 
providing servicemen with greater information, increasing cadre 
and soldier ability to follow a correct social orientation, 
fostering lofty ideals in them, intensifying moral concepts and 
disciplinary regulations are matters of far-reaching importance. 
  I believe that servicemen who have gone through great 
tribulations will once again become models in upholding 
discipline and abiding by the law. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66184 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar027___94028" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-027 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  1 February 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> TAIWAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Public Surveyed for Happiness, Success </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Public Surveyed for Happiness, Success </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0211A Taipei TIANHSIA [COMMONWEALTH] in Chinese No 153, 
1 Feb 94 pp 50-54, 57 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0211A </F>
<F P=104>  Taipei TIANHSIA [COMMONWEALTH] </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Chiang Hsueh-ying (1203 7185 1758): "Are the </F>
People of Taiwan Happy?"] 
  [Excerpts] [passage omitted] In order to know the domestic 
public's state of mind in a changing era, reflect the current 
domestic social mood, and provide a reference for deliberation, 
TIENHSIA Magazine conducted a telephone public opinion polling 
project on "views on the value of success," especially directed 
at the mass of the people throughout the entire Taiwan area. 
  "Quite happy, but success is not essential" is the general 
feeling ... of Taiwanese about their lives. 
  The survey results showed that among all interviewees, fewer 
than 5 percent of the people thought that they were "unhappy" 
with their current lives, while nearly 5 out of 10 people (49.9 
percent) felt they were happy. 
  Comparatively, to the question "Do you feel you are 
successful?", 22.7 percent of those interviewed responded 
"unsuccessful," while fewer than 2 in 10 (18.6 percent) said yes. 
  After all, what is "success" in the minds of Taiwanese 
today? 
  The survey result showed, that among the eight elements of 
"success," the importance of "happy and conjugal family life" 
was ranked number one (60.5 percent), far higher than other 
items, while physical and mental health (43.6 percent), the 
ability to do what one wants (36.5 percent) and smooth 
work/successful career (36.2 percent) were also among the most 
favored items. At least in the priority ranking reflected by 
the public, the "sense of utility" of Taiwan society seems to be 
not as serious many people had imagined. 
  In addition, since Taiwan has gradually moved into a 
prosperous society, the importance of "personal financial 
prosperity" has dropped significantly (10.1 percent), and is no 
longer an important target by which most people judge "success." 
"Social status and fame" has become the least important factor 
in judging success (3.0 percent). One interviewee laughingly 
said, "I'm not campaigning for the legislature, why do I need 
fame and status?" 
  What is a matter for rejoicing is that the key elements for 
success stressed by the respondents are just what people feel 
are the most satisfactory parts--nearly seven out of 10 people 
feel satisfied with their family life, while over half expressed 
satisfaction with their personal physical and mental health 
situation, and were happy with the things they want to do. 
Besides this, there were more than 4 out of 10 who believe they 
are making contributions to the society and are helpful to other 
people. 
  By comparison, "social status and fame," "self development 
and making the most of one's ability," and "smooth work/a 
successful career" are items which respondents ranked as low in 
satisfaction. However, looking at the positive side, strong 
self-development and career ambition only reflect the fact that 
Taiwan is still a youthful, motivated society. 
  TIENHSIA's survey results also showed that the higher the 
self-expectation, the greater the possibility of 
disappointment--among interviewees, there were fewer than four 
out 10 people who thought their current achievements matched 
their expectations. 
  What deserves deeper thought is that, according to cross 
analysis based on formal schooling, people with higher education 
have a lower rate of attaining their self-expectations. The only 
exception is at the levels higher than the institute. As a 
person at the highest educational level self-mockingly put it, 
"The fact that one can receive an education in an institute is 
in itself a sort of achievement in China society, which strives 
for scholarship, industry, agriculture, and commerce." 
  In Taiwan, where education is popularized and opportunities 
are quite equal, most people (35.6 percent) found fault in 
themselves, blaming themselves for not working hard enough, 
followed by the "working environment does not provide the 
opportunity for making the most of myself" (2.5 percent), and 
too rapid changes in the times and society (22.0 percent). 
  One point of interest is that differences in age have the 
greatest effect on responses to this question. Younger people 
think it is due to themselves "not working hard enough," while 
their elders think it is due to "too rapid changes in the times 
and in society." The biggest yoke for the young and for people 
in the prime years of 31 to 40 is "family"; young people 
complain the most that the "working environment does not provide 
the opportunity for making the most of myself," while people in 
the 51 to 60 age group, facing the final sprint, complain about 
their own "lack of ability." 
  Besides the obvious results showed by the entire survey, 
further study to analyze the connections among each item and the 
backgrounds of interviewees can uncover much of significance 
that is hidden. 
  "Success" does not equate to "happiness"; this result is 
worthy of further study. 
  The percentage of interviewees who thought of themselves as 
"happy" was much higher than the percentage of people who 
thought of themselves as "successful." This may conceal the 
traditional concept of Chinese as generous in expressing joy but 
reluctant to brag of success. "Success" does not necessarily 
bring "happiness," while "happy" people do not necessarily 
consider themselves "successful." 
  The most obvious example is: Interviewees with super high 
income (annual income over two million) consider themselves 
successful at a higher rate than ordinary people do (28 
percent); but the percentage who consider themselves "happy" is 
much lower than that for ordinary people (36 percent). 
Contrarily, although homemakers think of themselves as "happy" 
at a higher rate than others (56 percent), this comes with a 
lower rate of considering themselves "successful" than others do 
(16.9 percent). 
  Although a "happy family," "physical and mental health" and 
"being able to do what one wants to do" are not only the most 
important goals for "success" in people's minds, they also are 
the things people consider most satisfying about their lives, 
and analytical results showed that these three items have a much 
greater effect on "happiness" than on "success." 
  Relatively, "success" has the most obvious connection with 
"work/career," "making the most of one's abilities" and 
"personal financial prosperity," and traditional concepts of 
value. In other words, although a happy family, physical and 
mental health and being able to do what one wants can make 
people happy, these are often considered necessary conditions 
for "success," while smooth work experience, successful career, 
maximizing one's abilities and personal financial prosperity can 
make people feel genuine "success." 
  But if we look at the interviewees' backgrounds, in a Taiwan 
which still holds to traditional concepts of value, it is not 
surprising that males over 50 years of age with high education 
records who are professors or chief managers and have high 
incomes (yearly income over one million) would have a higher 
rate of regarding themselves as "successful." 
  Another interesting survey finding is that women put greater 
stress on "happiness," while men put more emphasis on "success." 
According to cross-analysis by gender, female interviewees 
(especially homemakers) think of themselves as "happy" at a 
higher rate than men do. While male interviewees have a more 
extreme response to success, their rates of thinking themselves 
successful or not are both higher than for women. This is 
another example of how "success" does not equate to "happiness." 
  Generally speaking, what kind of people are happy? What kind 
of people are not happy? 
  Cross-analysis showed that a sizable proportion of the 
people 
who consider themselves "happy" are women aged between 31 to 50, 
with a history of higher education (college graduate at 
minimum), professionals (doctors, lawyers...), homemakers, 
having high income but not "super high" (yearly income between 
one to two million). 
  Among "unhappy" people, a high percentage of them were 
concentrated in the 51 to 64 age group, low educational level 
(elementary school and below), homemakers (also in the high 
happiness group, but also an extreme reaction), self-employed, 
low income (less than 200,000) or super high income (yearly 
income over two million). 
  Another key to determining whether one is happy or unhappy 
are the differing "ideas of value." 
  Happy people pay much greater attention to life objectives 
such as family, health, and "ability to do what you want," than 
do unhappy people. Unhappy people pay much greater attention to 
"personal financial prosperity" and "making a contribution to 
society" than happy people do. 
  To analyze the difference further, the things pursued by a 
happy person are usually things one can obtain by 
self-adjustment, accomplished by an individual alone, usually 
not involving comparison or competition with others. But those 
things pursued by unhappy people, that is, financial prosperity 
and making contributions to society, are things very easily 
affected by the external environment, opportunities, and 
comparisons with other people. Since there are many factors 
which can be controlled by external conditions, it is more 
difficult to obtain happiness. 
  As for age level, the most complicated group are those aged 
between 51 to 64. Although this group thought of themselves as 
"successful" at a high rate (21.5 percent), their rate of 
"happiness" was lowest (37.9 percent) of all age levels. 
  Also, of all age levels, these are the people with the 
lowest 
rate of satisfaction concerning their current situation. This is 
true regardless of whether one is talking about a happy family, 
ability to do what one wants, making the most of one's 
abilities, health, or financial situation. They are the least 
satisfied in each. This is the group which believes they work 
the hardest, with a much higher rate (45.1 percent) believing 
they have reached their goals than do the younger people. 
However the percentage of them who think they are better off 
than they were five years ago (35.3 percent, with the average 
being 52 percent) and the percentage of them who felt they were 
happy (34 percent, with the average rate being 44.5 percent) are 
far lower than for other age levels. In addition to the 
emotional indication that "the setting sun is wonderful, but 
dusk is approaching," the abrupt changes in Taiwan's politics, 
economy and society and changing concepts of values may shock 
and pressure them. 
  The group with the most extreme range of views concerning 
happiness or unhappiness, success or failure, are seniors over 
65, differing more than any other age level. Among their views, 
the greatest differences lay in their children's attitudes and 
ways to support them. [passage omitted] 
  How is "success" defined? There was no unanimous response. 
But each person's answer was enough to affect their own 
happiness. 
  "In recent years, what things in your life have increased in 
importance?" The answers: a happy family, physical and mental 
healthy, being able to do what one wants to do. These were 
followed by work, career, contributions to society and financial 
prosperity. 
  Having passed through an era of economic boom and 
experienced 
a complete reorganization of the political, economic, and social 
order, most Taiwanese no longer worry about "the problem of 
getting enough to eat and clothes to wear." Looking back at 
family and self, being average seems to have become the common 
expectation of most people. 
  On the whole, pursuing "happiness" instead of "success" will 
be the "new life attitude" for Taiwanese in the future. 
  This survey was conducted between 16 and 18 January by means 
of systematic sampling and telephone interviews throughout the 
whole of Taiwan. There was an effective sample of 1,282, with a 
confidence level of 9.5 out of 10, and an error rate of plus or 
minus 2.68 percent. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66185 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar028___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-028-L </AU>
JPRS 
China 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Future War Scenarios </ABS>
<DATE1>   5 May 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<H3> <TI>     INTRODUCTION </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    INTRODUCTION </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   11111111 </F>
<F P=103> 11111111 </F>
<F P=104></F>



<TEXT>
CSO 

    [Text] In the 20th Century, except for World War II, 
there has been no major event of more far-reaching impact on the 
world than the breakup of the Soviet Union, which both 
politically and militarily marked the end of an era, indicating 
that the "Cold War" between the two great camps and military 
blocs was over. 
  But while this bloc confrontation was over, the world was 
not 
yet peaceful. Just as people of goodwill were breaking free 
from the dark clouds of "nuclear war," the Gulf War broke out on 
17 January 1991, bringing the nightmare of war to rouse us once 
again from our sound sleep. As we all know, while this 43-day 
regional war by multinational forces led by the United States 
undoubtedly won a military victory, it did not win peace. 
  Not only was the Gulf War a warning, but it also clearly 
brought home the point to many statesmen and strategists about 
the complicated and confusing post-Cold War military order, so 
that they seized the time to quickly revise their strategies. 
  This is the threat of regional [diquxing] and local 
[jubuxing] wars. 
  Statistics show that in 1992 alone, over 30 local wars and 
armed conflicts of varying size broke out throughout the world. 
  The regional distribution of these wars and conflicts was 
three in the Balkans, 10 in the former Soviet Union, five in 
South and West Asia, four in the Mideast, seven in Africa, and 
one in Latin America. 
  As to the intensity of these wars and conflicts, the larger, 
longer, and wider-impact ones included mainly Bosnia-Herzegovina 
in the Balkans, South Ossetia in Georgia, along the banks of the 
Dniester River in Moldova, the Naikar Region in Azerbaijan, 
Afghanistan in Southwest Asia, Lebanon in the Mideast, and 
Angola and Mozambique in Africa. 
  As to the nature of these wars and conflicts, 25 were civil 
wars, and five were wars between nations. 
  While the incidence of local wars and armed conflicts 
throughout the world averaged only three per year in the 1970s 
and 1980s, six occurred in the first year of the 1990s, another 
six broke out in 1991, and this number rose sharply to 30 in 
1992; such an alarming rate! 
  Moreover, the Gulf War showed that contemporary local and 
regional wars are characterized particularly by high intensity, 
efficiency, and technology. Their combat input and great 
destructiveness both leave one speechless. Taking the Gulf War 
for instance, 29 countries were directly involved. The United 
States spent $61.1 billion (of which $54.649 billion was paid by 
other countries), sent in more troops than in either the Korean 
or Vietnam wars, and used high-tech weaponry of the 1980s and 
1990s, such as satellites, the C[.sup]3[/]I system, "patriot" 
missiles, and stealth bombers, causing direct damage to Iraq of 
more than $200 billion in a short 43 days. The widespread use 
of modern high-tech weaponry has brought great change to combat 
style and tactics, with the trend being toward multi-dimensional 
and combined service arm coordination, omni-directional attack, 
and troop transfers across large areas. 
  So to adapt to these developing circumstances, all major 
countries throughout the world have clearly speeded up their 
pace of military adjustment. It could be held that this is the 
single most significant and far-reaching strategic postwar 
adjustment, involving all areas such as military strategy, 
force-building principles, weaponry, and development policies of 
all countries. 
  As to military strategy, all major countries throughout the 
world are putting more emphasis on countering regional armed 
conflicts and local wars. For instance, the United States has 
shifted its defense priority to preventing the rise of regional 
powers, to deal with regional crises and wars. The White House 
plans to complete in five years a sharp cutback of its global 
strategic deployment, reducing its troop strength from the 
current 2.06 million to 1.65 million, as well as dismantling and 
closing nearly 30 percent of its overseas military bases. 
Based on this, its combat plans are focused on set ideas, such 
as fighting Iraq, North Korea, China, Iran, or Russia, 
intervening in coups in the Philippines, countering terrorist 
attacks against its allies, and coping with wars of aggression 
launched by new global enemies. 
  As to force-building principles, all major countries 
throughout the world are putting their military-development 
priority on reinforcing their rapid-reaction [kuaisu fanying] 
troops and raising their contingency combat capability, making 
this the first link in their quality force-building. So while 
the United States is cutting 25 percent of its troop strength, 
it is raising the percentage of its rapid-reaction troops from 
20 percent to 40 percent by raising troop strength from 230,000 
to 550,000. The Pentagon has also set up a special 
"contingency command" to control all rapid-reaction troops on 
its territory. The French Army, whose rapid-reaction troops 
originally had over 47,000 troops in five divisions, has now 
decided to add one or two new such divisions, to be used to 
reinforce its overseas intervention capability and take part in 
allied "frontline combat." The German Army, while maintaining 
its six mobile-deployment brigades, is in the process of 
organizing two special divisions. Britain has turned its 24th 
mobile brigade into a rapid-reaction troop and is preparing to 
add another rapid-reaction army. 
  As to weaponry development, all major countries throughout 
the world are focusing their financial and material resources on 
developing high-tech, high-quality, and high-performance 
weaponry, to raise their mobile-combat command efficiency, 
mobile capability, and comprehensive strikeforce. The 
C[.sup]3[/]I system is in widespread use by all countries' 
military commands, with the prediction being that by the end of 
the century, it will combine diversified land, sea, air, and 
outer space reconnaissance methods, to form an all-year, 
all-weather, all-directional three-dimensional decision- making 
and command network, thus ensuring that commanders-in-chief and 
commanders at all levels can respond sensitively to all complex, 
explosive events. The mobile-capability development direction 
is toward large-scale air and sea transport, to ensure the 
deployment in the minimum time of rapid-response troops to any 
place on the globe. The U.S. military can now move in 48 hours 
brigade-size troops by air to any crisis point in the world, as 
well as flying six divisions to European battlefields in 10 
days. The development of a comprehensive strikeforce gives 
primary emphasis to airstrike capability, and secondarily to 
areas such as the development of advanced armored weaponry, 
high-precision guns, anti-armor weaponry, individual (plane, 
ship, and tank) night vision, friend-and-foe recognition 
systems, and terminal equipment. 
  Up to this point, we have roughly sketched the general 
outline and development direction of the military trends in 
today's world. Quite obviously, since the old world order of 
military balance was broken, we have begun to enter a "Spring 
and Autumn and Warring States Age" of disputes among all with 
separatist fiefdoms. Strategists generally hold that this order 
will last for 10-15 years. In other words, from the end of this 
century to the beginning of the next, the principal theme of 
world military confrontation will be local or regional wars 
throughout the globe. Thus, whoever gains the initiative in this 
transition period will get the decisive seat in the future 
military order. 
  The Italian strategist Niccolo Machiavelli made the famous 
statement that: "All [nations] with military prophets triumph, 
and all without fall." 
  In which case, what kind of wars will the Chinese Army face? 
And can the Chinese Army win local wars? These are questions 
that we need to analyze systematically and demonstrate fully. 
<H5>  I. LOCAL WARS THAT CHINA WILL FACE </H5>
  As far as the Chinese Army was concerned, 1993 was a very 
unusual year. The Central Military Commission, which had just 
been reorganized, held an enlarged session at the beginning of 
the year in Beijing. At this meeting, the Central Military 
Commission made crucial post-Cold War decisions on matters such 
as the Chinese Army's force-building guiding ideology, strategic 
principles, and training direction. After the large 
million-troop cutback and shift of force-building guiding 
ideology to a modern track in 1985, this was another crucial 
strategic reorganization for the Chinese Army. 
  At this meeting, Military Commission Chairman Jiang Zemin 
stated clearly that "we certainly will win high-tech local wars 
on contemporary terms!" 
  It was decided at this meeting that the overall number of 
troops would not be cut back further and that the quality 
force-building priority would be placed on adjusting the 
established system and developing and upgrading weaponry. 
  The conference gave crucial strategic place to intensified 
education and training to improve the army's mobile-response 
capability to cope with sudden incidents [tufa shijian] on 
modern terms.... 
  The world's military intelligence experts well know the 
significance of such a series of crucial decisions made at this 
time by this military superpower with a population of 1.1 
billion and an army of 3 million. It may be said that before the 
breakup of the Soviet Union, the Chinese Army still regarded the 
Mideast, Falkland Islands, and Afghanistan wars as a particular 
type of combat to be understood and studied, or that it had made 
only an insignificant strategic adjustment because of them. 
But after the breakup of the Soviet Union, since the Gulf War 
in particular, the Chinese Army now takes local and regional 
wars as a real threat and a future key combat style to be 
studied and demonstrated, as well as having raised the nature of 
the matter from a campaign scale to a strategic level. It may 
thus be inferred that this crucial adjustment had long since 
been an established general plan in the minds of the commanders 
that was just waiting to be called out, or a carefully 
considered option. It shows that the Chinese Army is making 
active preparations for coming local or regional wars. 
  Considered from its deeper immediate setting, this 
adjustment 
has clear aims. That is, in the complicated and confusing 
military order, the Chinese Army has faced up to its overt and 
potential adversaries. The hotspots where local wars or armed 
conflicts might break out are growing gradually more evident, in 
some cases even deteriorating steadily. 
<H5>  The Overt Adversary -- The World's Top Military Power, the </H5>
United States 
  While the conflict of strategic interests between China and 
the United States was overshadowed for a time by the "tripartite 
great-power" relationship, it is now surfacing steadily since 
the breakup of the Soviet Union. As grave antagonisms and 
differences exist between China and the United States in areas 
such as ideology, social system, and foreign policy, it has been 
impossible for Sino-U.S. relations to essentially improve for 
quite some time, with a duality beginning to exist. That is, 
along with mutual cooperation and advantage, a state of mutual 
wariness exists. While China cannot yet pose an immediate 
strategic threat to the United States, the United States has 
still included China in its "regional defense strategy" as an 
anticipated target of operations. 
  The United States is now adjusting its deployment in the 
Asia-Pacific region, in which the adjusted deployment will form 
a "fan-shaped strategic structure," with U.S. territory as the 
"base of the fan," and the U.S.-Japan-South Korea alliance as 
the fan's key ribs. Its frontline deployment will change from 
South Korea, Japan, and the Philippines to Alaska, South Korea, 
Japan, and Guam. While the U.S. plans to cut its overall troop 
strength in the Asia-Pacific region from 200,000 to 180,000 in 
five years, as well as closing 34 bases and adjusting 48 others, 
as to its key direction in Northeast Asia, the United States is 
going to keep and consolidate 16 bases in Japan and 15 in South 
Korea. So while the adjustment will reduce the U.S. military's 
overall troop strength in the Asia-Pacific region, leaving it 
without a large-scale regional combat capability, it will have a 
limited naval and airstrike capability, which supported by 
strategic mobile forces on U.S. territory will give it more than 
enough capability to fight a medium-scale local war. 
  After the year 2000, the Asia-Pacific region is likely to 
gradually become a U.S. strategic priority. A concerned U.S. 
figure notes that: "The evolving global economic and S&amp;T 
development trend is shifting the economic focus from Europe to 
the Pacific region, with an accompanying shift in the global 
political focus. East Asia is going to become the heartland of 
world economics and S&amp;T. By the 21st century, whoever 
controls 
East Asia will control the world." So as to U.S. global-strategy 
considerations, the United States absolutely cannot tolerate the 
rise of a powerful adversary in East Asia. In 1992, the U.S. 
military's Asia-Pacific general headquarters held a special 
forum on the implementation of "a new military strategy" for the 
Asia-Pacific region, pointing out that: "The Chinese Army's 
ever-growing overall might is having a severe impact on the 
military balance in the Asia-Pacific region. The Asia-Pacific 
region now has more than 10 local-conflict hotspots and many 
border disputes, with a great possibility of touching off future 
local wars. The U.S. military stationed in the Asia-Pacific 
region, in addition to remaining vigilant against the Russian 
Army, also regards China, North Korea, and Vietnam as key 
operational targets. The U.S. Seventh Fleet sees the rapidly 
growing Chinese Navy as one of the key adversaries posing a 
significant threat to the United States in the region." 
  Aimed at the U.S. strategic deployment and the increasingly 
tense situation in the South China Sea, China is correspondingly 
adjusting its maritime defense and naval development strategy, 
substituting a "sweeping maritime strategy" for its accustomed 
"offshore defensive strategy." Its focus is on the mid-range 
maritime space beyond 200 nautical miles, to ensure the security 
of its 200 nautical miles of territorial waters. So the Chinese 
Navy has been equipped in recent years with a number of 
highly-automated special craft with advanced technology, such as 
new ships, long-range bombers, and anti-sub patrol boats. It is 
predicted that within five years, China will have an 
aircraft-carrier formation. Meanwhile, China's publication and 
application of a new generation of training laws and regulations 
represented by the new "Naval Affairs Training Regulations" are 
bringing its naval operations closer to an integrated sea, air, 
and land combat level. In 1991, 451 Chinese naval vessels took 
part in long-range navigation drills, more than half of which 
were conducted in the Pacific Ocean. Chinese nuclear submarines 
not only have carried out 90 round-the-clock days of 
self-sufficiency assessment long-range drills, but also have 
completed their first out-of-island long-range drills. So it 
can be visualized that the Chinese Navy will acquire a carrier 
formation before long to achieve its goal of a "sweeping 
maritime strategy." 
  An overall analysis of the military antagonism between China 
and the United States could lead to the following basic 
conclusions: 
  1. China and the United States, focused on their respective 
economic and political interests in the Asia-Pacific region, 
will remain in a sustained state of confrontation. 
  2. For quite a long period of time, this confrontation will 
be in the state of a strong U.S. and a weak China, with quite a 
large gap in comparative might. 
  3. While there is litle possibility of direct warfare 
between 
the two armies, there are a great many indirect-engagement 
factors and timespaces, mainly problem spots such as Korea, 
Taiwan, Hong Kong, the South China Sea islands, and Tibet. 
  4. There is little possibility of a large or medium-sized 
land war breaking out between China and the United States, with 
indirect clashes being mainly naval and air operations. 
  5. The factors that might set off changes in this state of 
confrontation are: a) The Russian Army's stand, being the one 
most likely to impact a change of status. b) Whether the ASEAN 
countries might form a joint military force. Such an alliance 
directed against China would be even more disadvantageous to 
China. But if such an alliance does not happen or is directed 
at the United States, while it could not essentially reverse the 
state of affairs, it would be much more favorable to China. c) 
The stand of Japan and South Korea. While Japan and South 
Korea are now U.S. military allies, we cannot exclude the 
possibility of certain changes due to ever-sharpening economic 
conflicts. Even if these two countries remained neutral, that 
would affect the achievement of U.S. strategic objectives. d) 
Taiwan. If Taiwan and Mainland China could reach a foreign 
policy consensus on upholding our territorial sovereignty, the 
situation would be somewhat different. 
<H5>  A Comeback by a Powerful Adversary -- Japan </H5>
  Quite obviously, the Japan of today cannot be called a 
military power. The internationally recognized evaluation 
criteria for a so-called military power require four generally 
essential factors: the possession of overall national might and 
combat potential exceeding ordinary countries; the possession of 
active-service military personnel and advanced offensive 
weaponry exceeding that of ordinary countries; military might 
exceeding defensive needs, with the military means to pursue 
national intentions; the existence and operation of military 
might that can have a significant impact on one's region and 
even on the world military order. Of these four generally 
essential factors, Japan is not equipped with at least two, the 
second and third. 
  But in a local war, Japan could still be regarded as a 
powerful adversary. Moreover, as time passes, it would certainly 
not be hard for this nationality that is very good at doing 
others in to replay its powerful bushido style and 
become a military superpower in one leap. 
  Since the 1980's, Japan has carried out a series of crucial 
adjustments in its military strategy, cautiously approaching its 
objective of becoming a political and military power. 
  In 1980, Japan formally set forth its "comprehensive 
security-guarantee strategy," openly including for the first 
time military-force development in its national security 
strategy. 
  In 1981, it set forth for the first time its "forward 
defense 
strategy," holding that "as soon as an enemy approaches to 
attack," it "will be annihilated at sea," which was a crucial 
shift from "territorial defense" to "oceangoing defense." 
  In 1987, Japan went on to propose an "at-sea air defense," 
showing signs of an oceangoing triphibious defense system. 
  And in 1991, a Japanese "defense white paper" implied that 
"military might is the ultimate guarantee of national-security." 
Not long afterwards, the Japanese Diet forced through a "Bill 
on Cooperative Action in UN Peacekeeping," which was a first 
step in breaking with its postwar constitution. 
  In national-defense force-building, the development route 
that Japan is taking is one of "small size but high quality." 
Japan now has 151,000 troops in its land self-defense force, 
with 13 divisions and 1,230 tanks; 43,000 troops in its naval 
self-defense force, with 326,000-ton naval vessels, including 58 
corvettes and 14 submarines; 46,000 troops in its air 
self-defense force, with 430 combat aircraft, including 261 
fighters and 74 ground attack planes. It needs to be noted that 
the Japanese military has always seen its air force as a 
strategic strike force to be given priority development. While 
its combat aircraft may be few in number, they are certainly 
high in quality. For instance, its major fighter, the F-15J, 
is currently the world's most advanced fighter. Since the Gulf 
War, Japan has made plans to purchase 20 KC-10 tankers, as well 
as buying E-3A airborne warning and control aircraft, 
super-long-distance radar, and "patriot" missiles. Once equipped 
with these, the Japanese Airforce will have the capability to 
strike targets thousands of km away, covering Russia's Far East 
coastal zone, the Korean Peninsula, and China's southeast 
coastal zone, thus making the transition from a defensive to a 
combined offensive-defensive strategy. 
  Japan's military might can be summed up as more than enough 
for territorial defense, but still not enough for independent 
overseas involvement. Restricted by a number of factors, for 
some time to come the Japanese military will not have the 
independent might for external combat but will continue to rely 
on a joint Japanese-U.S. defense for joint combat. 
  So while there is quite obviously not much possibility in 
the 
short term of a direct military conflict breaking out between 
China and Japan, incidents in the South China Sea islands and on 
the Korean Peninsula might touch off local firefights between 
the two sides. At such a time, the problem for the Chinese 
Army would be how to cope with the Japanese air force. 
<H5>  An Unpredictable Super Assassin -- Vietnam </H5>
  From 1986 to 1991, Vietnam completed a four-year 
"retrenchment" strategy of major adjustment. It cut its troops 
by 600,000, reducing its military spending from $2 billion to 
$1.3 billion. The reorganized Vietnamese military has 
generally shifted from strategic offense to strategic defense, 
as well as having formed a more rational defense system. But 
from an analysis of its parts, the retrenchment includes some 
expansion, with a clear feature of this Vietnamese military 
adjustment being "army cutbacks with naval advances." While 
cutting back its army, the Vietnamese military rebuilt its 937th 
air regiment and its 126th naval-marine brigade. It totally 
reassigned its 372nd army division, 954th naval-air regiment, 
and 172nd naval-vessel brigade to Da Nang in central Vietnam, 
strengthening its naval-strike and anti-submarine capability. 
The Vietnamese Communist Party's "Sixth Congress" declared 
that "defending our maritime territory and marine resources has 
become the major substance of our two great strategic missions 
in the new era of national defense and economic development." So 
for now and some time to come, the Vietnamese military will make 
its navy and airforce its development priorities, to speed up 
its maritime expansion. 
  The Vietnamese Navy now has 40,000 troops, with 103 combat 
ships, including eight corvettes, eight guided-missile ships, 16 
torpedo boats, and three tank-landing craft, in addition to 
almost 1,000 auxilliary ships and armed fishing boats. Its 
airforce has over 400 aircraft of various types, including 270 
combat aircraft, of which 10 are the more advanced Su-22s. 
  Since the breakup of the Soviet Union, while Sino-Vietnamese 
relations have normalized, the major conflict over the Spratly 
Islands has certainly heated up steadily. Since China published 
its "Territorial Sea Law" in February 1992, it has given sharp 
attention by the countries bordering the South China Sea, with 
the first to be affected being Vietnam, which has the most to 
gain in the South China Sea. Vietnam not only has sent more 
ships to patrol and guard the Spratlys, speeding up the 
renovation of all of its occupied-island defense works and 
permanent-residence sites, but also has ordered from Russia a 
number of guided-missile corvettes and fighter planes. And it 
has sought to buy from Western countries, such as the United 
States, F-16 fighters and small naval vessels that can be used 
for offshore combat. Meanwhile, it has conducted repeated 
anti-landing and anti-naval strike military exercises targeted 
at the Chinese Navy, with its posture being one of great 
determination, "vowing to defend the Spratlys to the death." 
  If the Vietnamese authorities do not make any concessions on 
the Spratlys, a Sino-Vietnamese war is inevitable. As to 
might, while the Vietnamese military is not yet up to 
independent combat with the Chinese Navy and Air Force, this 
"superkiller" can certainly play a desperado role in the course 
of resolving the Spratlys problem by acting most aggressively 
against China. As to China, the great distance and our lack of 
a carrier formation mean that while it would certainly not be 
too hard for us to recover the Spratlys, it would certainly be 
very difficult for us to defend them. But one very clear point 
is that the Chinese Army does not have much time to resolve the 
Spratlys problem. 
<H5>  The Potentially Greatest Threat -- India </H5>
  In 1986, India paid a very high price to buy one of 
Britain's 
largest aircraft carriers, the Hermes, making the Indian Navy 
the only one in Asia to have two carriers. This put India on 
the throne as Asia's first military power. 
  This was the result of nearly three decades of self-imposed 
hardships by India to wipe out its national humiliation of 1962. 
Since the Sino-Indian War, India had shifted its 
national-defense strategy from peaceful coexistence to a focus 
on arms development, trying to gain great-nation status in 
international affairs through steadily increasing its military 
might. In this nearly three decades, except for a local armed 
conflict with Pakistan in the early 1970s, as India had suffered 
almost no major domestic troubles or foreign invasions, its 
military strength had grown steadily, sharply raising its 
overall combat capability. The Indian military now has 1.3 
million troops, over 700 combat planes, more than 100 naval 
ships, 3,000-plus tanks, and the capability to develop and 
produce medium-range guided missiles and nuclear missiles. 
Quantitatively, while the Indian military is not yet up to the 
size of the Chinese Army, it has certainly outdone us 
qualitatively, particularly having clearly surpassed China in 
areas such as naval and air force equipment, oceangoing combat 
capability, and border-position construction. As the Indian 
military has repeatedly threatened, "the Indian Army of today is 
no longer what it was in 1962." 
  At present, the major direct threats to China by the Indian 
military are medium-range missiles and more advanced fighter 
planes. In February 1988, India launched its first cruise 
missile with a range of 240 km and a payload of 1,000 kg. In May 
1989, it fired another rocket-type medium-range missile [Agni], 
with a payload of 1,000 kg and a range of 1,500-2,400 km. This 
made India the seventh country to have cruise missiles, and the 
sixth to have medium-range missiles. The rocket-type missile 
in particular has an advanced guidance system with high target 
accuracy, capable of delivering nuclear warheads to southern 
China and all of Pakistan. In addition, India's possession of 
the capabililty to produce nuclear missiles with "rocket"-type 
guidance is a threat of concern to the whole world. Since the 
1980s, the Indian Air Force has become the fourth most powerful 
in the world, having a reputation as "South Asia's iron fist," 
of which the major signs are its third- and fourth-generation 
aircraft on active duty. Its major aircraft types are the MiG 
0-23MF, the MiG-29 and Mirage-2000 fighters, the MiG-23BN, the 
MiG-27, and the American Tiger fighter-bomber. Meanwhile, since 
1985, India has begun to acquire airborne warning and control 
aircraft. So the Indian Air Force has all-weather and 
long-distance air-combat and ground-strike capability, having 
made the transition from air-defense to a combination of offense 
and defense. 
  We see India as a potential adversary mainly because India's 
strategic focus remains on the Indian Ocean and Southeast Asia. 
But while India has never changed its territorial demands 
against China, still forcibly occupying a large piece of China's 
southwestern border territory, India does not yet have the 
overall national and military might for a large-scale invasion 
of Tibet or a deep incursion into our hinterland. If India sets 
its strategic targets at a limited depth of charges into our 
positions of 100 or 200 km, while it might reach these strategic 
targets, the loss would outweigh the gain, and it would 
ultimately not be able to hold them. Meanwhile, China has not 
taken back our lost territory by force because "while we could 
win, we could not hold." In which case, we can draw the 
following conclusions: 
  1. There is little possibility of a large-scale military 
conflict or local war breaking out between China and India in 
the short term. The shape of the antagonism will be mainly 
friction surrounding the Tibet problem. 
  2. Once a war does break out between China and India, its 
intensity and impact will be no less than medium-scale. 
<H5>  A Still-Imposing Deterrent Force -- Russia </H5>
  As the successor to the former Soviet Union, while Russia 
has 
lost its superpower status as an equal to the United States, it 
remains a world military power with the largest territory in the 
world, rich S&amp;T forces, and enormous military potential. As 
to 
military confrontation, for now and quite a long time to come, 
except for the United States, there still will be no other 
country in the world that is its equal. 
  Russia now has 2.8 million troops, 75 percent that of the 
former Soviet Union which, even when reduced as planned, will 
remain at a size of 1.5 million. Meanwhile, Russia possesses 
over 80 percent of the former Soviet Union's nuclear weapons, 
with conventional weapons also about the same as the United 
States overall. The second nuclear disarmament treaty signed by 
the United States and Russia in early 1992 will reduce both 
sides' strategic nuclear warheads by two-thirds within a decade, 
cutting the United States' back from 12,000 to 3,500, and 
Russia's from 10,800 to 3,000, sharply reducing both sides' 
first-strike nuclear capability and danger for the first time. 
But despite this, as both sides will still retain enough nuclear 
warheads for "mutual destruction," it is easy to see Russia's 
might. 
  On 16 March 1992, Yeltsin signed a presidential order, 
deciding to establish a Russian Federation national-defense 
force. Then on 7 April, Yeltsin also announced to the Russian 
Congress that Russia was immediately beginning to reorganize 
Russia's military, which was the start of Russia's 
force-building process, as well as an adjustment of its 
force-building ideology and strategic theory. 
  It has been disclosed that Russia's new military strategy is 
composed of four essential elements: 1) The fundamental 
military strategy proposition. Russia holds that the 
Russian military's future basic mission will be to ensure the 
inviolability of Russia's sovereignty, territory, and borders. 
2) The basic military strategy substance. Russia sees 
its neighboring countries as its major combat targets, regarding 
war with neighboring countries as the basic grounds for its 
combat preparations. 3) The fundamental military strategy 
principle. While Russia has made not taking the initiative 
to launch attacks against its neighboring countries its key 
military-strategy principle, it also emphasizes that defense 
means an active initiative and that its operational aim is 
firmly and clearly to "not allow war to move onto Russian 
territory" and to "be capable of inflicting such heavy losses on 
enemies that it will be hard for them to recover." And in 
order to achieve this operational aim, the Russian military 
needs to "have powerful combat capability and mobility." 4) 
The basic estimate of the future-war form. Russia 
holds that there is very little possibility of a nuclear war 
breaking out in the world in the future, so that conventional 
war will be the basic form of future wars. 
  Russia is the strongest of all countries bordering China, 
being the country that occupies the most Chinese territory, and 
the one with the most complex historical entanglements with 
China, with many border points still disputed by both sides. But 
while Russia's reorganized military will pose a direct threat to 
China, the current outlook is that Russia's domestic and foreign 
affairs have not been finalized, with quite grim economic 
conditions, and very sharp conflicts among nationalities and 
with other CIS countries, so that for the next decade, Russia 
will be too busy to pay attention to the east, still doing as 
much as possible diplomatically to cooperate better with the 
Asia-Pacific region. So while there is very little possibility 
that Russia will use military force against the Asia-Pacific 
region, it needs to be pointed out that as a militarily great 
nation, Russia's existence per se has an indispensable impact on 
the world order, with Russia's every word and deed remaining of 
great nation significance. 
<H5>  A Constantly Heating-Up Periphery -- Hotspots That Could </H5>
Touch Off Local Wars 
  In the two-plus years since the breakup of the Soviet Union, 
the Asia-Pacific region has been calm and tranquil, a scene of 
prosperity, and highly unique in the midst of the sharp 
turbulence in the world order, with an air of "prospects being 
uniquely good in this area." It almost seems that in the 
replacement of the old order with the new, the Asia-Pacific 
region has only opportunities but no challenges. In which case, 
how might this situation change in the future? For China in 
particular, as the key "strong point" in Asia's political and 
military struggles, what will the situation be like? 
  The Central Military Commission's judgment is that the 
situation will be exceptionally grim. 
  There are now eight hotspots directly threatening China's 
security, unity, and territorial integrity, which might touch 
off local armed conflicts or even wars. 
<H5>  The Ever-Sharpening South China Sea Conflict </H5>
  In May 1992, the China Maritime Petroleum Company signed an 
oil contract in Beijing with the U.S. Crestone Energy Corp. for 
the Vanguard Bank in the Nansha [Spratly] Islands. This brought 
an immediate reaction from several Southeast Asian countries, 
the strongest one coming from Vietnam. Vu Ngoc Hai, Vietnamese 
Communist Party Central Committee member and Minister of Energy 
Resources, said insolently at a high-level Vietnamese Communist 
Party meeting that: While China needs Vietnam to help it cope 
with U.S. peaceful evolution, it still collaborates with the 
United States in development right under Vietnam's nose (on 
Vietnam's continental shelf), showing that China's ultimate 
target remains the collapse of Vietnam. Just as Vietnam resisted 
France for eight decades and the United States for two decades, 
we should be prepared now to resist China for 10 decades! This 
signaled another heating up of the Nansha Islands problem on the 
heels of China's publication in February [1992] of its 
"Territorial Sea Law." 
  Since the 1970s, most of China's island reefs and maritime 
space in the Nansha Islands has been swallowed and carved up by 
certain peripheral countries, with the current state being one 
of six countries in seven parts in rivalry and tripartite 
confrontation. While the countries directly involved in the 
dispute constitute six countries and seven sides, that is China, 
China Taiwan, the Philippines, Malaysia, Vietnam, Indonesia, and 
Brunei, the division of interests is tripartite, with one being 
China and China Taiwan, another Vietnam, and the third the four 
countries of the Philippines, Malaysia, Indonesia, and Brunei. 
The Nansha Islands include over 230 island reefs of varying 
size, with an island area of 20,000 sq km, and a maritime space 
of 820,000 [as published] sq km. At present, except for six 
reefs, such as Taiping Dao [Itu Aba Island] and Yongshu Jiao 
[Fiery Cross Reef], all of the rest are occupied by neighboring 
countries. The occupied maritime space is over 1.8 million sq 
km, including 510,000 sq km of basin area, with oil and gas 
reserves topping 10 billion tons. 
  Vietnam has the biggest appetite, occupying 23 island reefs, 
as well as stationing troops on 10, and building permanent 
defense works. It has the most vested interests in the Nansha 
Islands, as well as posing the greatest threat to China. Since 
1978, Vietnam has cooperated with Western oil companies, 
drilling eight oil and gas wells in China's traditional maritime 
space in the South China Sea and stealing over 2 million tons of 
oil per year. The Philippines was the first country to get 
involved in the Nansha Islands, starting in May 1971, first 
illegally occupying eight islands, such as Zhongye Dao [Thitu 
Island], Xiyue Dao [West York Island], Nanyue Dao [Loaita 
Island], Beizi Dao [Northeast Cay], Nanshan Dao [Mahuan Island], 
and Feixin Dao [Flat Island], and seizing the two large 
oil-storage basins of Le Bank and northwest Balawang, for an 
area of 36,000 sq km. In 1978, the Philippines announced that 
it was including some Nansha Island reefs in the Philippines 
territory, with the included maritime space reaching 410,000 sq 
km. Beginning in 1983, Malaysia has sent troops to seize 
island reefs such as Danwan Jiao [Swallow Reef], Xingzai, and 
Nanhai Jiao [Mariveles Reef], as well as including 270,000 sq km 
of maritime space in its national territory. Indonesia has cut 
out 40,000-50,000 sq km of China's traditional territorial seas, 
with Brunei demanding to extend its continental shelf into the 
South China Sea, to take over about 3,000 sq km of China's 
traditional territorial seas. In addition, Japan, South Korea, 
and the United States have made their own respective plans for 
the South China Sea. 
  At present, as the former Soviet Navy has withdrawn from Cam 
Ranh Bay, the various Southeast Asian countries have begun to 
show signs of forming an alliance against China. Once China uses 
force to protect its national sovereignty in that area, a quite 
large-scale local war will be unavoidable, at which time the 
South China Sea will become a second Persian Gulf! 
<H5>  In Case South Korea Announces the Use of Force Against North </H5>
Korea 
  Since North Korea announced that the state of "nationwide 
war" was over, while all have breathed a little easier, this 
"state of nationwide war" in North Korea aimed at the joint 
U.S.-South Korean military exercises seems to be a warning that 
the hopes for peaceful reunification of Korea are even more 
remote. While North and South Korea have intensified contacts 
in recent years, conducting repeated talks on peaceful 
reunification, their sharp ideological standoff and huge gap in 
economic might, plus U.S. influence, pose many difficulties to 
the unification progress. 
  Concerned figures hold that peaceful reunification of Korea 
would very possibly end up just as the reunification of East and 
West Germany, with one side wiping out the other. As to Kim Il 
Sung who is accustomed to a "family-type" rule, this would in 
any case be something that he would not like to see occur. As 
the announcement of a "nationwide state of war" shows North 
Korea's absolutely uncompromising hardline stand, the use of 
force by South Korea to achieve reunification is certainly not 
an impossibility. 
  If a Korean war broke out, strategic interests would make it 
very hard for China and the United States to look on 
unconcerned. As to China, North Korea's existence is a buffer 
zone in the Sino-U.S. confrontation, with room for advantage. 
But if North Korea was lost, the U.S. strategic frontline, 
through a U.S.-Korean alliance, would press right up against the 
Yalu River, posing an understandable threat to China. This 
shows that a deterioration of the situation on the Korean 
Peninsula would very likely touch off a large-scale local war 
similar to that of the 1950s. 
<H5>  Confrontation on the Roof of the World </H5>
  In 1988, a Chinese military officer who had taken part in 
the 
mission to fortify our border against India said that: "It seems 
that the Indian Army wants to fight sooner or later." 
  Ever since the 1950s, territorial disputes have existed 
between China and India, with a nine-sq-km piece of Chinese 
territory still occupied by India. The two sides fought a 
medium-scale local war in 1962, resulting in a crushing defeat 
for India. But after 26 years of development, India has become 
an Asian military power in one leap, with its expansionary 
ambitions heating up again, so that it renewed its territorial 
demands on China in 1988, threatening to "avenge its humiliation 
of 1962," pushing both sides for a time to the verge of war. In 
the last two years, as the Indian Government has adjusted its 
policy, while Sino-Indian relations have eased somewhat, it 
remains hard to predict whether border disputes can be resolved 
peacefully. 
<H5>  A Territorial Rift of 9.6 Million Sq Km </H5>
  In addition to peripheral hotspots, China's internal 
separatist tendencies similarly threaten our national security 
and territorial integrity, also being likely to touch off local 
armed conflicts and wars. So both ethnic and regional 
divisions are generally subject to meddling by outside forces, 
meaning that if a conflict broke out, outside armed intervention 
and even military support would be hard to avoid. This faces the 
Chinese Army with a very immediate and pressing mission of 
anti-separatism. 
  Taiwan. This island that has been under KMT 
control for over four decades has always been clouded by 
"Taiwanese independence." The U.S.'s regard for and emphasis on 
Taiwan as its ideal "strategic platform" in the Western Pacific 
has provided strong backing for "Taiwanese independence" forces. 
Since the breakup of the Soviet Union, to maintain U.S. 
strategic interests in the Asia-Pacific region, the United 
States has brazenly broken a "commandment" by selling F-16 
fighters to Taiwan, making great waves. Shortly afterwards, 
France sold Mirage-2000 fighters to Taiwan, adding fuel to the 
flames. The Netherlands, Britain, and Germany were hurrying to 
catch up, stopping only when they saw the strong response from 
the mainland Chinese Government. While this disturbance has 
not touched off a military conflict, it has created greater 
obstacles for peaceful reunification across the Taiwan Strait. 
But if the "Taiwanese independence" forces were to evolve to the 
point where Taiwan declared independence, that would very likely 
force the mainland to use military force, inevitably bringing 
the flames of war to the Taiwan Strait. 
  Hong Kong. The Hong Kong matter became a focus of 
discussion by all of the delegates to the Eighth NPC in 1993 [as 
published]. While the mainland criticism was apparently 
directed at Hong Kong Governor Chris Patten, it was actually a 
case of "beating the dog to pay back its master," as a warning 
to Britain and the United States. With the approach of 1997, 
when the mainland will exercise sovereignty over Hong Kong and 
the mainland army will be stationed in Hong Kong, Britain and 
the United States are absolutely unreconciled to giving up in 
vain. So Britain and the United States are generally doing all 
they can to create obstacles and chaos, holding that further 
meddling in Hong Kong's affairs will pave the way for 
interference in China's internal affairs. This means that we 
cannot exclude the possibility of Hong Kong becoming the fuse of 
a local confict in the transition period. 
  Tibet. Ever since the founding of the PRC, Tibet 
has contained separatist forces that have worked in concert with 
the Dalai Lama's group of internal and external forces in exile 
to repeatedly create tensions in Tibet. In recent years, 
incited by Western hostile elements, Tibetan separatists have 
become more active, bringing signs of more tension to the 
situation. The Tibet matter is not only a priority of Western 
nations to incite rebellion, but is also a key pretext on which 
Indian expansionary forces rely, so that if the situation 
deteriorates, the struggle will be exceptionally sharp and 
complicated. 
  Xinjiang. The death of Wang Zhen [then PRC Vice 
President] in March 1993 lost China its senior commander with 
the most influence on the great northwest. While Xinjiang 
independence forces never got very far for four decades or more 
during Wang Zhen's lifetime, they now have an opportunity to 
raise their heads. In addition, since the breakup of the Soviet 
Union, Kazakhstan has become independent, having already made 
territorial demands on the Chinese Government, which have been 
echoed both internally and externally, being a bad omen for the 
Xinjiang situation. 
  Inner Mongolia. Concerned figures have disclosed 
that in the last two years, a few Inner Mongolian separatists 
have made three separate contacts with Outer Mongolian officials 
and are making surreptitious plans for the establishment of a 
"Greater Mongolian Republic." But these separatists have been 
proceeding very cautiously, due mainly to the changing Russian 
situation. If Russia remains stable and reinforces its 
cooperative relations with China, a wave of Mongolian separatism 
would be a very dangerous option. But if Russia continues in 
upheaval, or surreptiously supports Inner Mongolian separatists, 
the situation will deteriorate sharply. 
  Analyzed according to the fundamental viewpoint of McKinny's 
geopolitical theory, in international competition, the fewer 
neighboring countries the better, and the more neighboring 
countries, particularly bordering ones, the worse. China is 
located in the center of the Asia-Pacific region, with over 
40,000 km of borders on its periphery, including more than 
18,000 km of coastal defense line and more than 22,000 km of 
land borders, bordering on 12 countries and in sight of others 
across seas. This particular and crucial geographic position 
makes it very easy for China to become the focus of much 
conflict in international competition and very apt to be drawn 
into local disputes of one nature or another. This is a very 
adverse aspect that China will have to face up to in its future 
development, as well as an even more severe test facing the 
Chinese military. 
  In which case, the matter of concern is: Does the Chinese 
Army have the capability and assurance to win the local wars 
that it will face? 
  Before beginning this analysis, let us first give a brief 
summary: 
  Through nearly 66 years of force-building history, the 
Chinese Army has indisputably become a military force in today's 
world on an initial modernization scale, holding a decisive 
position in the world military order. As to its capability in 
local warfare, the Chinese Army has had a series of brilliant 
military successes. 
  In the 1950s, the young Chinese Army was first drawn into 
the 
largest-scale local war since World War II. Despite its 
inferior equipment, it still carried out a fearless battle 
against the world's top military power, the United States, 
giving the insufferably arrogant United States a crushing defeat. 
  In the early 1960s, the Chinese Army conducted a 
self-defensive counterattack against India under rare 
high-altitude conditions, in which the valiant and indomitable 
Chinese Army directly targeted the Indian capital of New Delhi, 
knocking down the Indian military's arrogance and ensuring 
almost three decades of peace on the Sino-Indian border. 
  In the late 1960s, the Chinese Army had a confrontation on 
its northern border with a military superpower, the former 
Soviet Union, conducting a self-defense counterattack on Zhenbao 
Island, upholding our national dignity and territorial integrity. 
  In the mid 1970s, the young Chinese Navy carried out a test 
of strength with a great disparity of might against Vietnam in 
the Paracel Islands, giving a deserved return blow to Vietnam's 
hegemonist ambitions. 
  In the late 1970s, the Chinese Army operated beyond our 
borders for the first time, carrying out a limited strategic 
strike to penalize Vietnam, which was a severe blow to the 
little tyrant. 
  In the late 1980s, China and Vietnam had another clash in 
the 
Spratlys, in which the Chinese Navy took only 28 minutes to 
inflict heavy losses on the Vietnamese military, fighting a 
"clean, neat, and very brilliant" battle. 
  These operational examples certainly show the Chinese 
Government's solemn and just stand in defending national 
sovereignty and capability in settling local conflicts. While 
this shows that the Chinese Army has accumulated certain 
experiences in fighting local wars, it needs to be noted that 
these wars were still "yesterday's wars," greatly different from 
today's high-tech local wars under modern conditions. So for the 
Chinese Army, fighting a high-tech local war on modern terms 
remains a brand-new problem, being an unprecedented test. Of 
course, the Chinese Army's advantages and disadvantages and 
strengths and weaknesses in future local wars are certainly not 
unmeasurable unknowns. We can now evaluate them as follows: 
  Strengths: 1) The Chinese Army has a quite 
powerful nuclear backing. As for local wars, its nuclear force 
is a nuclear threat to contain adversaries. 2) The Chinese Army 
has a quite strong missile-strike capability, with almost all 
countries on its periphery within its range of coverage. 3) As 
the local wars that the Chinese Army will face are "on its 
doorstep," it has geographic and popular advantages. 4) The 
Chinese Army has always maintained a huge superiority in 
conventional weapons. 5) The Chinese Army has first-rate and 
good-quality officers and men. 
  Weaknesses. 1) The Chinese Army has not yet been 
able to establish an advantage in its "soft casualty-infliction" 
capability. 2) Our command and advance-warning system remains 
quite backward and inefficient. 3) Our naval and air force 
equipment remains quite weak, leaving our triphibious-warfare 
capability falling short of our ambitions. 4) The Chinese Army 
still does not have a large-scale tactical rapid-mobility 
capability, making it quite hard to achieve strategic surprise. 
  It is thus obvious that in future local wars, the key to 
success will be how well the Chinese Army plays its strengths up 
and weaknesses down, in quest of the best strategic and tactical 
means suited to its particular features. 
<H5>  II. A STRONG BUT IMPOVERISHED MILITARY FORCE </H5>
  It has been revealed by persons in the know that not long 
ago, a team of high-ranking specialists and technicians from 
China made three secret visits to the Ukraine. The purpose of 
these visits was to check out the Ukraine attack carrier of the 
"Varyag Class." This ship has a displacement of 67,000 tons. It 
can carry 24 Su-27 bombers [as published] and MiG-29 fighters. 
It can control 50 times as much water area as a destroyer. If 
China is able to purchase this carrier, it will be able to 
offset 500 Taiwanese, Vietnamese, Philippines, Indian or 
Malaysian aircraft .... 
<H5>  Chinese Military's Dream of an Aircraft Carrier Dashed Once </H5>
More 
  The Chinese military has dreamed of an aircraft carrier for 
half a century. The strategic locations for world struggles in 
the future are the oceans. In recent years, one of the major 
reasons for a number of failures in China's dealings with 
foreign countries has been that its naval assault force is too 
weak. It has already been 10 years since Deng Xiaoping proposed 
that the Chinese Navy switch its strategic philosophy from one 
of "coastal defense" to one of "offshore defense." However, 
China still does not have this sort of offshore defense 
capability. Therefore, effective offshore defense must rely 
on an ocean-going control force and deterrent force. Currently, 
China must rely on a few dozen "old and weak" destroyers, 
escorts, and a hundred or so submarines. With this equipment 
and the quality of its men, in combat capability, the best China 
can do is maintain equality with Taiwan, the Philippines, 
Indonesia, Malaysia, and Vietnam. It does not have any great 
superiority. Therefore, if China wants to control the South 
China Sea and recover the tens of billions of tons of petroleum 
reserves there, it must have an aircraft carrier. 
  "How much more money do we need?" a military officer asked 
out loud. 
  "Just for the carrier, it would take almost all of our 
military expenses for a year. But this is just for the floating 
hull. To fully equip it with aircraft, VTOL command systems, 
electronic early warning systems, weapons systems, 
communications systems, and command and coordination systems and 
to give it conventional maintenance and repair capabilities, 
every year it would also take all of our military expenses for a 
year," replied the experts. 
  Mao Zedong said that China should have her own aircraft 
carrier. That was 20 years ago. Denq Xiaoping also said that 
China should have her own aircraft carrier. That was 10 years 
ago. However, because China is poor, she does not yet have her 
own aircraft carrier. 
  Aircraft carrier, aircraft carrier, without an aircraft 
carrier our military development cannot be considered to have 
achieved modernization. Without an aircraft carrier we cannot 
really be considered a military power. Without a strong naval 
force, we are unable to play the same role in international 
affairs as the major nations. These are strong cries from the 
hearts of the Chinese military men. 
<H5>  China's Military Expenditures Are Pitifully Small </H5>
  In a press conference with foreign reporters in 1993, 
Foreign Minister Qian Qichen stated, "China's military 
expenditures as a percentage of the gross national product were 
2.2 percent in 1985. Last year they were 1.6 percent. This year 
they are estimated to be 1.5 percent. Military expenditures per 
capita are about six dollars. In the United States it is 
$1,100, and in Japan it is $300. This year China's military 
expenditures budget comes out to $7.3 billion. That of the 
United States is $274.3 billion, and Japan's is $3.37 billion. 
England and France spend about that much as well. Calculated 
per person in the military, the average for China is $2,291, one 
eighty-seventh of what the United States spends and one 
fifty-fifth of what Japan spends and one fifty-fourth of what 
England spends. There are also inflation factors. In 1980 
China's military expenditures were 18 billion yuan, and in 1993 
42.5 billion. Military expenditures only rose 116 percent while 
inflation rose 130 percent. 
  From this data we can see that China's military expenditure 
per person is only one two-hundredth that of the United States. 
It is only one-fiftieth that of Japan. In Taiwan, when an 
enlisted man retires, he can receive enough resettlement 
expenses to open a small shop. A colonel on the mainland would 
not receive enough to buy commercial housing the size of a bed. 
Because China is poor, the book Garland at the Foot of 
the Mountain revealed to the people of the country a list 
of bills owed by a martyr, stirring up quite a reaction around 
the country. Because China is poor, it has carried out a number 
of reductions in force, but the living expenses of the units 
are already very low, so the clothing and food expenses saved by 
the reductions in force are not enough to meet inflation. If 
they do not reduce the size of the military they are poor, and 
if they reduce the military they are still poor. 
<H5>  The Chinese Army, Navy, and Air Force </H5>
<H5>  The Chinese Army </H5>
  Without a doubt, the Army is the pride of the Chinese armed 
forces. Both in the past and in the present, it has always 
maintained its position as the strongest of all the branches in 
the Chinese military forces. It has world famous 
accomplishments in battle. Today, it not only still ranks as 
the largest in the world in numbers, but in conventional weapons 
and equipment it ranks among the best in the world. It almost 
has no match in Asia. 
  The population of China is 1,024,900. The regular armed 
forces have 4.45 million men (including the Railway Construction 
Corps). The length of service is three years for the army, four 
years for the air force and army technical personnel, and five 
years for the navy (technical personnel may volunteer for up to 
15 years). 
  Army: Size is 3.6 million men. 
  Main force units (field armies): 
  About 305 armies, each army is usually composed of three 
divisions. The entire Army includes 11 armored divisions, 118 
infantry divisions and 40 field artillery, anti-tank artillery 
and anti-aircraft artillery divisions. There are also 16 
Railway Construction Corps and Construction Engineering 
Divisions and 50 independent divisions under the direct command 
of the central government. 
  Local units (deployed in the 29 provinces, cities, 
autonomous regions; each administrative district having two to 
three divisions). 
  Eighty-five infantry divisions and 130 independent 
regiments (including border defense forces). 
  The weapons and equipment of the Army include former Soviet 
Union LS-2 heavy tanks, T-34 and China-produced 59-type 
medium-sized tanks, totalling 11,000 tanks. There are also 600 
of the model 60 and model 63 amphibious tanks and model 62 light 
tanks. There are 2,000 model 531, 55, and 56 armored personnel 
carriers. There are 16,000 guns and howitzers which are 76-mm, 
85-mm, 100-mm, 122-mm, 130-mm, and 152-mm. These include the 
Soviet-made Su-76, Su-85, Su-100, Su-l22 and Su-152, as well as 
the China made K-76 model 122-mm advanced guns of various 
models. There are Frog surface-to-surface missiles, 32,000 
mortars of 60 mm, 82 mm, 120 mm, and 160 mm. There are 3,500 
field rocket launchers of 107 mm, 130 mm, 140 mm, and 180 mm. 
There are 57-mm, 75-mm, and 82-mm recoilless rifles. There are 
76-mm, 85-mm, and 100-mm anti-tank guns. There are Pur-64 
Firebox anti-tank missiles. There are model 58 and 56 14.5-mm 
anti-aircraft machine guns and 37-mm, 57-mm, 85-mm, and 100-mm 
anti-aircraft guns. 
  Force deployment: 
  China has eight military regions. They are made up of the 
29 individual military districts. The main force units are 
deployed in the military regions. However, they are still 
commanded and assigned by the Central Military Commission. 
China's Army Divisions are divided into A class (first-line 
units), B class (these only have a small number of tanks and 
some of the transportation is done using horses) and C class 
(smaller number of tanks, guns, equipment, and men). The local 
unit divisions are all C class divisions. 
  The main force units and the local units are distributed 
roughly as shown below (not including artillery forces and 
engineering forces): 
  Northeast: Shenyang units, subordinates are the 
Heilongjiang, Jilin and Liaoning Military Districts. Possesses 
three armored divisions, 18 infantry divisions and 17 local 
divisions including two to three divisions of border defense 
units. 
  North China: Beijing units, subordinates are the Hebei and 
Shandong Military Districts. Possesses five armored divisions, 
28 infantry divisions and 12 local divisions. 
  Northwest China: Lanzhou units, subordinates are the Gansu, 
Ningxia, Qinghai and Shaanxi Military Districts. Possesses one 
armored division, eight infantry divisions, and four local 
divisions, including two to three divisions of border defense 
forces. 
  Xinjiang: Urumqi units, subordinates are Eastern, Northern 
and Southern Xinjiang Military Districts. Possesses six 
infantry divisions and eight local divisions, including two to 
three divisions of border defense units. 
  Southwest: Chengdu units, subordinates are Sichuan and the 
Tibet, Guizhou, and Yunnan Military Districts. Possesses 15 
infantry divisions and 11 local divisions, including two to 
three divisions of border defense forces. 
  Guangzhou units, subordinates are the Guangdong, Guangxi, 
Hainandao, and Hunan Military Districts. Possesses 12 infantry 
divisions and 11 local divisions, including two to three 
divisions of border defense forces. 
  Central China: Wuhan units, subordinates are the Henan 
and Hubei Military Districts. Possesses 11 infantry divisions 
and three paratroop divisions and seven local divisions. 
  East China: Jinan units, subordinate is the Shandong 
Military District. Possesses one armored division, eight 
infantry divisions, and three local divisions. 
  Nanjing Units, subordinates are the Anhui, Jiangsu, and 
Zhejiang Military Districts. Possesses one armored division, 
six infantry divisions and six local divisions. 
  Fuzhou Units, subordinates are the Fujian and Jiangxi 
Military Districts. Possesses six infantry divisions and six 
local divisions. 
  Within the ground forces there also several million 
reserves. The Chinese Militia' is divided into two classes. The 
first is the backbone militia, with members from 16 to 30 years 
old. They have served their military service or are about to 
enter the military. They form an armed militia. There are 
around five million men forming 75 backbone militia and 2,000 
regiments. The other class is the ordinary militia. The 
members are from 17 to 48 years old. There are several million 
of these, including urban militia. They receive a certain amount 
of basic training, but usually are not issued weapons. Some 
militia are assigned air defense missions. 
  Civil Production and Construction Corps, about four million 
men. They are organized like military units and work in border 
regions. 
  What does the army rely upon to protect this wide beautiful 
country of ours? Three treasures -- tanks, missiles, and 
infantry. 
  Tanks: The new model 80 main battle tanks stretch from the 
mountains to the sea in combat exercises. 
  Tanks are the "kings of ground warfare." The model 80 tank 
is a third generation tank. It is one of the best in the world. 
China already has the capability for large batch production of 
these tanks. However, because of budgetary restrictions, this 
new model 80 main battle tank (four different model numbers) as 
well as a new armored combat vehicle developed jointly with 
foreign cooperation is only supplied in small numbers to our 
units and for export. Most other new model armored equipment is 
also only issued to a small number of group armies. 
  Rocket launchers stand like forests and the rockets like 
sharp arrows pointed at the blue sky. China's combat readiness 
units and missile attack forces, are primarily the Second 
Artillery Forces, the Air Force and defense forces. 
  Equipment of the Second Artillery Forces: 
  Intercontinental Ballistic Missiles: Four CSS-3 missiles 
with 
a range of 7,000 kilometers, and a one- to three-megaton 
warhead. It is believed that the CSS-4 is already under 
production. It has a range of 13,000 kilometers and a warhead 
of five to ten megatons. 
  Intermediate Range Ballistic Missiles: From 65 to 85 CSS-2 
missiles with a range of 2,500 kilometers and a yield of one to 
three megatons. 
  Secondary Intermediate Range Missiles: About 50 CSS-1 
missiles with a range of 180 kilometers and a yield of 15,000 
tons. 
  China has already newly copied and domestically produced 
portable air defense missiles, HT system anti-tank missiles, and 
it also possesses HQ, HN, FM, RF, and PL system intermediate- 
and short-range surface-to-air defense missiles. These allow 
Chinese ground forces to begin moving toward modernization. 
  Air Force Equipment: Three air regiments with a total of 
90 B-6 medium bombers. 
  Defense Forces: 1. Ballistic missile warning phased array 
radar set up in West China. 2. Air Force defense system: 
Provides limited defense for major cities and industrial areas, 
military facilities and military industries. There are around 
4,000 Navy and Air Force fighters, about 85 Red Flag 2 
surface-to-air missiles and more than 10,000 anti-aircraft guns 
tasked with this mission. 3. In Beijing and other major cities 
there are shelters and dispersal systems. These were built 
during the Cultural Revolution. 
  China's rapid-reaction forces, should they ever be needed, 
can assemble at any location in China within a very short time. 
Also, the Army's newly established Army Air Corps can, 
according to the plan, equip each group army with a helicopter 
regiment. In combat they can provide air mobility, support, 
combat command and casualty transport. There is no denial that 
there have already been some major changes in high mobility and 
integrated combat capabilities, command capabilities and 
strategy and tactics. 
<H5>  The Chinese Navy </H5>
  Back in the early 1970's, the Chinese Navy had already 
begun to draw up an offshore defensive strategy. 
  The Navy has a total of 360,000 men, including 38,000 in 
the Naval Air Force and 38,000 in the coastal Defense Units. It 
has 55 main surface combatants and 100 attack submarines. 
  1. Submarines: Two Han class nuclear powered fleet 
submarines, one G class missile conventional submarine, and 97 
conventional powered submarines. These include 74 R class 
submarines, 20 W class submarines, two Ming class submarines 
and one 5-1 class submarine. 
  2. Surface ships: Eighteen destroyers, all armed with 
ship-to-ship missiles, including 14 domestically produced Liuda 
class and four refitted Soviet Gordy class Anshan model 
destroyers. 
  Twenty-seven escort ships, including fourteen domestically 
produced Jianghu class armed with ship-to-ship missiles, four 
refitted Soviet Riga class Chengdu models, and four Jiangdong 
class armed with ship-to-air missiles, and five Jiangnan class. 
  Ten old model escort ships, built by Japan, England and 
Australia. 
  There are 182 attack launches armed with ship-to-ship 
missiles. These include 90 domestically produced Soviet-type 
Huangfeng class, 90 Soviet-type Wenzi class and domestically 
produced Hekou class, one Henan class and one Hema class. There 
are 46 submarine chasers, including 25 Hainan class, 20 
Kronshtadt class and one U.S.-built 173 foot model. 
  There are 398 gun patrol boats including 15 Shanghai-I, 350 
Shanghai-II, six Hekou class, 25 Shantou class and two Shandong 
class hydrofoils. 
  There are 225 torpedo launches, including 70 P-6, 130 
Huchuan class hydrofoils, and 25 P-4 (there are also 40 in 
reserve). 
  There are about 100 coastal and river patrol boats. 
  There are 17 T-43 class ocean radar boats. 
  There are 15 U.S- built 511-1152 LSTs, 17 mechanized 
landing ships, 16 infantry landing ships, about 300 universal 
landing craft and 150 mechanized craft. 
  There are 500 small coastal and river defense boats. 
  Naval deployment and bases: 
  North Sea Fleet: About 500 ships and boats, including two 
submarine squadrons defending the area from the mouth of the 
Yalu south to Lianyungang. The headquarters is at Qingdao. 
Other bases are Luda, Huludao, Weihai and Chengshan. 
  East Sea Fleet: About 750 ships and boats with authority 
over waters north to Lianyungang and south to Dongshandao. The 
headquarters is in Shanghai. Other bases are Zhoushan, Xiamen, 
Fuzhou and Dachendao. 
  South Sea Fleet: About 600 ships and boats defending the 
area from Dongshandao to the border with Vietnam. It has a 
submarine squadron. The headquarters is at Zhanjiang, and 
other bases include Shantou, Guangzhou, Haikou and Yulin. 
  There are 38,000 men in the Naval Air Force. Equipment 
includes about 800 combat aircraft based along the coast. It 
has three bomber divisions and six interceptor divisions. Its 
equipment and aircraft include 150 B-5 torpedo bombers and 
Soviet Tu-2 light bombers, about 600 fighters which include F-5, 
F-6, F-7, A-5 and Soviet MIG-19 fighters as well as Jianzhen-6 
reconnaissance aircraft. It has 20 Soviet Be-6 hydroplanes, 40 
Zhi-5 helicopters and about 60 light transport aircraft. The 
Navy's fighters are assigned to the air defense system. 
  In order to meet naval combat requirements, in the 1980's 
the new models of missile escorts and destroyers with which the 
units were equipped began to appear along China's coast. A 
number of long ocean-going cruises were conducted in the 
Pacific, to Antarctica and the Indian Ocean. 
  The new 3500-ton missile destroyer. This destroyer is 
equipped with the Haiying-2 ship-to-ship missile, the latest 
anti-submarine systems and a satellite navigation system as well 
as an armed helicopter pad which can accommodate Zhi-9 take offs 
and landings. It is expected that the new generation larger 
destroyer will be launched by the end of this century. 
  The 053HZ missile escorts deployed in 1986: There are two 
models of this vessel. This model carries the SY-l ship-to-ship 
missile and one 100-mm gun. It also has eight C-801 systems. 
  The other model of the 053HZ is equipped with an eight tube 
Ocean Sidewinder ship-to-air missile launcher. This new model 
escort is also equipped with a six-tube chaff propulsion 
apparatus, and anti-submarine deep water mines, anti-submarine 
torpedo tubes and tow-type array sonar. 
  Another new model escort: This has also added China's 
first vertical launch system and a new model ship-to-air fire 
control system as well as new air search radar. This allows for 
a marked improvement in the degree of automation of the vessel's 
electronic equipment and power system. 
  Because the Chinese Navy is responsible for protecting 
ocean trade and ocean transport routes and special economic 
zones as well as maintaining a balance of naval power with other 
areas, since the 1980's, it has begun to emphasize the 
development of large fleets and long-range deployment and has 
conducted amphibious landing combat exercises. 
  The superiority of the Chinese Navy lies in its submarine 
fleet. 
  The submarine fleet has always been the pride of the 
Chinese Navy. China now ranks third in the world in the number 
of submarines, second only to the United States and the former 
Soviet Union. It has more than 100 conventionally powered 
submarines, second in the world. 
  China's nuclear submarines and patrol missile submarines. 
These can carry 12 nuclear ballistic missiles with yields from 
200 to 5,000. They can attack most targets in the world and can 
cruise for long periods of time under the ocean. This is part 
of China's nuclear deterrent forces. 
  The submarines currently in service in China's Navy are of 
many types. They number among the most in the world. However, 
in level of submarine design and construction, China cannot 
compare with the United States and Europe. China does, however, 
possess a complete research and production system which does not 
require any outside assistance. This is the motive power which 
will allow for the development of even newer models of surface 
and underwater combat vessels in the future. Therefore, China 
pays special attention to its submarine forces, especially its 
missile submarine forces, which are a key element of the PLA 
Navy. 
  The submarines currently in service in the Chinese Navy are: 
  1. The W class. The first submarine China built on its own 
was the Soviet W (Whiskey) class submarine. This class was 
based on a modification of a German U-2l submarine captured 
during World War II. 
  2. The R class. The R (Romeo) class is the backbone of 
China's submarine forces. Those built earlier were called the 
031 model ES3B. Those built later were the 033 models. The R 
class is slightly larger than the W class submarines and is more 
streamlined. There was also some improvement of the conning 
tower, which is slightly smaller than that of the W class. The 
overall length is 76.8 meters, and it is 7.3 meters across the 
beam. The displacement is about 1400 tons on the surface and 
1800 tons submerged. It has a continuous cruise time of 60 
days. It can operate in a fixed position for ten days. Its 
combat radius is 1800 nautical miles, and its cruising speed is 
nine knots. Maximum cruise distance is 9,000 nautical miles. 
  3. The Wuhan class 
  In 1981, China completed refitting the 033 model 
submarines, adding anti-ship missiles. These were given the 
designator ES5G, and were also called the Wuhan class. The 
major difference in the Wuhan class is installation of C-801 
model missiles inside the cowling bulging along the side of the 
ship on either side of the conning tower. The submarine must 
first surface and raise the launcher before it can launch. Its 
external dimensions are similar to those of the 033 model. 
However, it is heavier than the 033 model, with a displacement 
of 1650 tons on the surface and 2100 tons submerged. The power 
equipment is also the same as that of the 033 model. 
  4. The G Class 
  China's first guided missile submarine was the Soviet G 
(Golf) class guided missile submarine. Its serial number is 
200. Its keel was laid in 1962, and it was completed and 
launched in 1964. 
  The G class submarine is 98 meters long and 8.5 meters 
across the beam. It has a displacement of 2350 tons on the 
surface and 2950 tons submerged. It is powered by 6,000 
horsepower, and it cruises at 17 knots on the surface and 13 
knots submerged. It has a combat radius of 20,000 nautical 
miles. 
  5. The Ming class 
  The Ming class is a modification of the 033 model. It was 
used to replace the 033 model submarines. It is called the 035 
model. The external shape is similar to that of the 033 model, 
although it is just slightly smaller and heavier. The first 
three of these submarines were of the ES5C/D class and were 
completed between 1971 and 1979. After 1987, modifications were 
the ES5E class, which were slightly larger. 
  6. The Han class 
  The Han class is China's first generation nuclear powered 
submarine. China began developing a nuclear powered submarine 
in the late 1950's. Construction work on the first nuclear 
powered submarine began in November of 1968. It was launched on 
26 December, 1970. Following launching it went though more than 
200 tests in the category of dock tests, surface tests, shallow 
water tests and deep water tests. All together it sailed 20 
times over 6,000 nautical miles before completing these tests. 
In was placed in service on 1 August 1974. It is called the 
Changjiang I, and it marked China's entry into the nuclear 
submarine age. 
  7. The Xia class 
  The Xia class is China's first nuclear powered strategic 
missile submarine. Work on its construction began in 1978, and 
it was launched in April 1981. It was placed in service in 
1987. It has been claimed that the second of this class 
submarines was launched in 1982. 
  China really needs an aircraft carrier. However, because 
of the lack of finances, she is not able to build or buy one. 
To construct a 30,000 to 40,000 ton class aircraft carrier 
would require at least 2 to 5 billion yuan. Lack of finances not 
only block aircraft carrier plans, China does not even have the 
capability to build a cruiser or a VTOL fighter. Supplemental 
support facilities for this carrier would cost another one 
billion yuan. 
  In Huangpu in Guangzhou, there is an old dilapidated 
aircraft carrier. It looks like a dock. It just floats there. 
People with nothing to do walk in small groups across its 
massive deck. 
  This goes back to 1989, when the Chinese Navy purchased 
this carrier from Australia to dismantle. Because it is a 
decommissioned aircraft carrier, China bought it for the price 
of a scrap vessel and placed it here for reference. For Chinese 
scientific personnel who have only seen an aircraft carrier on 
paper, having first hand material when beginning from scratch is 
of the utmost importance. These few years, the Chinese naval 
design personnel have looked at it and studied it, and there are 
often large groups of scientists of different specialties and 
from different agencies who will draw up blueprints, study it 
and look at it. 
  China's simulation flight deck was done using the deck of 
this aircraft carrier. 
  Now, that aircraft carrier which was used for drafting and 
observation is still there for people to make use of. 
  This is still China's only aircraft carrier. 
  Another area where China's navy has superiority is its 
marine forces. Most of the personnel come from the Army. This 
branch has the capability of amphibious combat and high 
mobility. It will play an extremely major role in placing 
military forces ashore in combat. Currently, although the 
Chinese Marine Force is not large, the Chinese Navy has a strong 
transport capability, and based on China's original battle order 
deployment, most of the vessels would be concentrated in the 
North Sea Fleet and East Sea Fleet, but the South Sea Fleet has 
recently been equipped with two Yukang class LSTs (China has a 
total of three) and in the 1980's, the newly-built Jingsha class 
amphibious troop transports. It is not difficult to see that at 
the present time, the situation in the Nansha Islands is forcing 
China to begin to consider providing necessary support for naval 
battles such as providing air support. 
  According to statistics, the Chinese Navy has more than 60 
large landing ships which in the middle 1990's will be able to 
transport 75,000 troops and 400 tanks and armored personnel 
carriers to locations several hundred kilometers within 60 to 90 
days. This does not include the vessels belonging to eight 
reserve divisions and several mobile air transport divisions. It 
can requisition 460 vessels of 1000-ton class or larger, with 
310 to 315 as dry cargo vessels as well as civilian boats which 
can supplement personnel supply. 
  China has also built new model intelligence gathering 
boats. In recent years China has built a series of intelligence 
gathering boats based on research vessels and ice breakers which 
China currently possesses. The largest of these is the 
Xiangyanghong-9. Another large intelligence gathering boat is 
the Dadi class. This class of vessel was designed to track task 
fleets. It has an ingenious prow and is capable of fairly high 
speeds. China's defensive strategy is currently in transition 
toward a deep water defensive strategy. However, this 
strategy only calls for conducting combat on an effective scale 
several hundred kilometers from land, and not several thousand 
kilometers. 
  Foreign military experts predict that by early in the next 
century, the Chinese Navy will emphasize construction of large 
combat ships with advanced equipment. Next, by the year 2020, 
it will construct two to three light aircraft carriers with a 
displacement of 20,000 to 30,000 tons. It will build or 
purchase VTOL fighter aircraft for aircraft carrier use. It 
will also purchase or build a batch of ships to form a carrier 
group. By the year 2040 it will have achieved or approached 
the combat capabilities of the United States, and will be able 
to go any place in the world to conduct missions. 
  This is a difficult challenge facing the Chinese Navy. 
India has already purchased two British-built aircraft carriers 
and is preparing to buy another and to build three of its own. 
The Japanese Naval Self Defense Force already has more 
destroyers and escort ships than China or India. Focusing on 
Chinese superiority in submarines over India, Japan has 
developed a first rate anti-submarine force. It recently passed 
a law to allow for forces to be sent outside of Japan. Actually, 
it already ranks sixth in the world. 
<H5>  The Chinese Air Force </H5>
  On the eve of the establishment of the New China, the 
PLA only had one air squadron and eight field anti-aircraft 
artillery regiments responsible for air defense combat. After 
the formal establishment of the Air Force in November of 1949, 
organic units were assigned from the Army, and the backbone 
cadre was made up of outstanding officers and men, some 
intellectuals and technical personnel from the former 
Nationalist Air Force. First of all, they established some 
flight schools and then set up units. By 1956, they had already 
formed a large batch of air divisions. After 1957, the air 
defense forces and air forces combined, and the Air Force added 
anti-aircraft artillery forces, search light forces, radar 
forces and ground-to-air missile forces. Since 1978, Air Force 
units have phased out old equipment, improved the manning 
system, and added combat personnel, resulting in a more 
professional and ideal organization. By the 1980's, the PLA Air 
Force had become a modernized combat force capable of 
independently conducting the air defense mission over national 
territory, and also capable of coordinated land, sea and air 
combat. 
  The more than 40 years of its development can be divided 
into three major stages. The first stage is from 1949 to 1953 
which was the tempering stage of its establishment and the 
Korean War. This was followed by the overall construction and 
development stage of 1954 to 1976. The third stage was the new 
stage ushering in an entirely new era. Our Air Force now has 
air forces, anti-aircraft artillery forces, ground-to-air 
missile forces, radar forces and communication forces. These 
are the primary forces used by our Air Force in aerial combat 
and to attack surface targets from the air. 
  The Air Force currently has 590,000 men, including 220,000 
in strategic units with 5,200 combat aircraft. 
  China is divided up into ten military air districts. Its 
headquarters is in Beijing. There are a number of air 
divisions, with each division having three air regiments and 
each regiment having three squadrons. They are equipped with the 
following types of aircraft: 
  Medium bombers: 95 B-6 and a small number of Soviet Tu-4 
aircraft. 
  Light bombers: About 450 B-5 and Soviet Tu-2 aircraft. 
  Fighter bombers: About 500 MiG-15 and A-5 aircraft. 
  Fighters: About 3,900 F-5, F-6 and F-7 aircraft. 
  Reconnaissance aircraft: About 130 Jiancha-6 and Hongcha-5 
aircraft. 
  Transport aircraft: About 550 fixed-wing aircraft including 
about 300 Y-5/AN-2 aircraft, about 100 Soviet-type aircraft 
including Li-2 aircraft, and 50 1-4 and 1-18 aircraft. There are 
also some An-12, An-24, An-6 and Tu-18 aircraft, 18 British 
Tridents and some DC-3 and C-46 aircraft. When necessary, Air 
Force transport units can obtain support from China Civil 
Aviation Administration. That administration possesses about 
500 aircraft, including some 150 large transport aircraft. 
  Helicopters: 350, including Zhi-5/Mi-4 AND Zhi-6/Mi-8, l3 
French Super Wasps and 15 French Skylarks. 
  Trainers: These include Chujiao-5 and 6, MiG-I5UTI, FT-5 
and FT-6 aircraft. 
  The air-to-air missiles used by the Air Force are similar 
to Soviet AA-2 Atoll weapons. In China they are called 
Sidewinders. The Air Force also has three airborne divisions. 
  Prior to the 1980's, the Air Force was poorly equipped. In 
March of 1980, in order to meet the requirements of Deng 
Xiaoping's directive that "in future wars, being backward will 
mean that one will be passive and will be beaten," the Air Force 
drafted a "Five Year Plan for Major Equipment for the Air Force" 
and "Some Ideas on Developing Major Equipment for the Air Force 
in Ten Years." Based on these ideas, beginning in 1980, the 
equipment with which our Air Force has been equipped include the 
interceptors the F-7II, F-7IIH, F-8, F-8I, F-8III, and F-8II. 
Ground attack aircraft have included the A-5I and the A-5II. 
Bombers include the B-6 equipped with second generation 
navigation, bombing and gun systems. Transport aircraft include 
the Y-8 and the Tu-154M. Helicopters include the Zhi-9, the 
Blackhawk and the Super Puma. There are also several types of 
drone aircraft. These aircraft have such equipment and weapons 
as air-to-air missiles, airborne radar, fire control systems, 
communications and guidance equipment and flight control 
systems, all of which are greatly improved. In 1986 the A-5 
series aircraft flew over the reviewing stand at Tiananmen at 
the ceremonies celebrating the 35th anniversary of National Day, 
amazing people around the world. 
  At a major foreign air show in 1988, the A-5 smartly 
performed acrobatic maneuvers. When the aircraft flew upside 
down at 80 meters in front of the reviewing stand, a general 
from a certain friendly nation remarked to the delegation from 
China, "This is something for you to be proud of, and is 
something for us to be proud of." 
  This was China's supersonic ground attack aircraft which 
attracted a tremendous amount of attention at the 37th World Air 
Show in 1987. However, it is now out of date, and has become a 
trainer aircraft for basic flight schools. 
  In October of 1986, an imported Blackhawk made its first 
flight successfully to Motuo in Tibet, attracting worldwide 
attention. A night flight exercise by the Super Puma helicopter 
excited the officers and men of the Air Force. 
  The F-8III aircraft is even better liked. It is equipped 
with a 500-mm antenna fire control radar, optic nerve fire 
control system, externally hung missiles, rockets, a new 
Wopen-15 engine, canon-launched ejection equipment and strange 
shaped large fuel tanks. It has all weather combat capability. 
  In 1993, China purchased 20 of the newest Su-27 modernized 
fighters from Russia. 
  This is the aircraft that was the star of the 1989 World 
Air Show. At that time, when the military experts of the United 
States and its allies saw that aircraft, they were amazed, and 
said that "After seeing the Su-27 made by the Soviets, we no 
longer feel that Western military aviation technology is as far 
ahead as we first believed." No wonder that later when the 
United States sold F-16 fighters to Taiwan they frankly stated 
that "in consideration of the recent purchase of a group of 
advanced fighter aircraft by China from Russia, we have come to 
this decision in order to maintain the balance of power on 
either side of the Straits." 
  China's Air Force equipment is overall about 15 years 
behind the level of the West. In 1989, the Western arms embargo 
against China has had an effect on China's purchase of combat 
aircraft and spare parts. However, the A-5M improved 
electronics eguipmient, the K-8 joint research, the A-7M export 
model impoved electronics system and the improved missile 
attack system of the Hong twin-engine bomber as well as the 
Y7-2000 pressurized aircraft research have all proceeded 
smoothly. It is worth mentioning that in order to allow the 
Chinese Air Force and Navy to develop toward long range and blue 
water, China has obtained U.S-built Beech aerial refueling pods 
and bolt type refueling hoses. This has allowed China to obtain 
aerial refueling methods. At the same time, the Chinese Air 
Force is continuing to search for a suitable aerial early 
warning system. It has purchased a British built Liemi [3756 
6617] early warning system and Suo'en [4792 1869] super 
detection level search radar and circumference steering radar. 
This may be installed on the Y-8 and Y-12 to make them early 
warning planes. In addition, the Chinese Air Force is importing 
and copying more advanced missile technology so these can be 
produced in China. The new Thunderbolt short range air-to-air 
combat missiles will allow the Chinese Air Force to markedly 
improve its short range aerial combat capabilities. 
  After the Gulf War, China accelerated the pace of 
development of new model aircraft. The purpose was to put 
direct pressure on the United States. While the United States 
was embroiled in the Gulf War and getting effective bombing from 
its F-117 fighter bombers, in the fall of 1992, an imitation 
which was an even superior fighter bomber was made at a certain 
location in Southwest China. 
  This was a ray of 21st century light shining on the Chinese 
Air Force. 
<H5>  First Rate Officers and Men </H5>
  A British general who had been in the Korean War stated 
that "I have been a soldier all my life, and I have fought the 
Germans and I have fought the Chinese. I have seen U.S. and 
Soviet forces fight. German Troops are very good, but the best 
in my opinion are the Chinese troops. I really admire them." 
  The Chinese Revolutionary Military Museum. The Chinese 
People's Liberation Army was founded on 1 August 1927 in the 
Nanchang Uprising. It has fought numerous battles through land 
reform, the war against Japan, the war of liberation, the Korean 
War, and in protecting its borders. This is a history of blood 
and fire. This is a history of development from nothing into 
something, from small to large, and from weak to strong. Here 
in this museum there is a special display for each historical 
era. No one who visits here will ever forget those historical 
objects soaked in gun smoke, blood, and sweat. 
  The old Mauser pistol that was first fired by He Long is 
here. It was this pistol that aroused the powerful army from its 
sleep. 
  The red flag from Jinggangshan is here. It ignited the 
fierce fire of China's revolutionary rural villages that 
surrounded the cities. 
  There are grass sandals from the Long March here. They are 
a silent record of the songs of victory of a generation of 
heroes. 
  There are swords here which were snatched from the hands of 
the Japanese Bandits. One wonders how many Chinese compatriots 
died under those swords. And finally, the Eighth Route Army 
held that sword against the throats of the Japanese Bandits. 
  There are fragments of a U.S. U-2 plane here. It was shot 
down by our People's Air Force from 20,000 meters in Chinese 
territorial air space shortly after the founding of our nation. 
Before these historical objects, before all these battle flags, 
everyone who visits is filled with emotion, thoughts and 
imaginations. Perhaps you would also feel something, and 
suddenly raise your hand and shout: "No one has ever been able 
to defeat the PLA." This is true. This is not a moot point; it 
is a fact. This is not hope; it is history. 
  It was this impoverished army which once relied on knives 
and spears to do battle with Nationalist regulars, to do battle 
with the most barbaric Japanese imperialists, with the U.S. 
imperialists who were armed to the teeth, with the bearded 
invaders from India, the tanks of the Soviets who invaded 
Chinese Zhenbaodao, and the ungrateful students of China from 
Vietnam who invaded. No matter who they fought, they were never 
defeated. 
  It was this impoverished army that used knives and spears 
in a struggle against the enemy with rifles and guns, that wore 
grass sandals on their feet in a race with enemy trucks, that 
used small caliber weapons against modernized aircraft cannons. 
With a difference in weaponry that is impossible to imagine, 
they fought the enemy with unimaginable boldness and tactics, 
and as a result they won victories that many people found 
unimaginable. 
  In their progress toward modernization, Chinese military 
personnel are aiming at the commanding ground of science and 
technology in future wars. It is accelerating the process of 
changing over to a military which is more specialized, more 
educated and younger. In almost 14 years time, the percentage of 
general ranking officers with a college degree has increased 
from l0 to 70 percent. It has implemented a system where 
military officers are given basic, intermediate and high level 
officers training on a periodic basis. This has allowed 90 
percent of military officers in military and political command 
positions to maintain a grasp of combat command under modern 
conditions. The Chinese military personnel are now moving 
toward future battlefields with a brand new appearance. 
<H5>  III: HOW CAN MILITARY FORCE BE USED TO RECOVER TAIWAN </H5>
<H5>  The Historical Footnote of the "Taiwan Independence" Movement </H5>
  9 December 1991. Taoyuan Airport, Taiwan. A middle-aged man 
in a western suit had just gotten off a 747 which had arrived 
from Los Angeles and was heading for the exit. 
  The girl at the Customs desk politely asked him for his 
passport. This man with a scar across the left side of his face 
and a cigar hanging out of his mouth arrogantly pulled out his 
blue passport and gave it to her. She looked at the picture of 
this man called Li Decai. The picture did not show any scar. 
She looked at the man again, and he reminded her of someone. 
  "Would you come with me, please." She led the middle-aged 
man into the Customs Inspection Office. 
  There, even though this man who called himself Li Decai was 
very calm and answered all questions smoothly, he had been 
caught with a fake passport. Actually, this man was Zhangxian 
Hongjin, the "Chairman of the Taiwan Independence League" for 
whom an arrest warrant had been issued l4 years ago by the 
Taiwanese "Garrison Command" and the "Procuracy of the Supreme 
Court" for the crime of insurrection. 
  The headquarters of the "Taiwan Independence League" had 
always been in Los Angeles. For the past several years it had 
claimed that it was going to "move the League back to Taiwan." 
  "Excuse me, sir, but aren't you the Chairman of the Taiwan 
Independence League, Zhangxian Hongjin?" 
  "Yes, I am Zhangxian Hongjin." 
  Seeing that his fake passport had been detected, there was 
nothing for him to do but tell the truth. "I'm sorry, but you 
are under arrest!" An officer in police uniform came out from 
an inner office and brought out a warrant for his arrest. He 
looked as if he had been waiting for this for a long time. 
  "Excuse me, but are there any members of the Democratic 
Progressive Party here?" asked Zhangxian Hongjin looking at the 
officer with the warrant, as if this were part of a plan. 
"Please do not do anything that would harm Taiwan. You should 
act in the best interest of Taiwan. My purpose for coming to 
Taiwan is to establish the `Independent Nation of Taiwan' with 
my brothers and sisters in Taiwan." 
  "You are not mistaken, otherwise, we would not have been 
here to meet you. You ride in my car," said the policeman very 
politely and humorously. 
  On January 17, 1992, Taiwan Police Headquarters charged him 
with "plotting insurrection" and arrested him on that day. The 
charges were that while he was chairman of the Taiwan 
Independence League, Zhangxian Hongjin had ordered others to 
mail letter bombs and carry out violent activities, and that he 
was guilty of being the mastermind behind these activities. 
  At his trial, Zhang did not admit any guilt. However, he 
did not express any anger. He maintained himself as a proud 
general unflinching in a crisis. He asked, "Do you people have 
no regard for public opinion?" 
  That is true, over the past several years, Taiwan 
Independence activities have become more and more expansive. 
  Since February of 1991, there has been an increase in 
Taiwan Independence activities. These activities have shifted 
from covert to overt actions and from independent action to 
concerted actions. The "Committee for the Campaign for Taiwanese 
Sovereignty and Independence" of the Democratic Progressive 
Party has been coming out with all sorts of propaganda materials 
such as English and Chinese language literature and video tapes 
and has been trying to sell such Taiwan Independence materials 
abroad as "Taiwan is independent and is not part of the 
People's Republic of China which has its capital in Beijing" and 
"Our country's sovereignty does not include the Chinese mainland 
and Inner Mongolia." They have also attempted to "align with 
blocs in Taiwan and overseas who support this political 
platform" to "work together to promote this campaign." 
  In May of 1991, authorities in Taiwan announced that "the 
period of mobilization for the suppression of insurrection" 
would come to an end as of 1 May. On this basis, they attempted 
to achieve a position of equality with us as an equal political 
body," and used this to promote "flexibility in diplomatic 
affairs" and "expand space for survival in international 
affairs." They fantasized about using the "Taiwan experience" 
for the "peaceful transition on the mainland." They called for 
such things as one country "two capitals" and "mutual 
recognition," which are nothing more than insisting on two 
Chinas, one Taiwan, one China. 
  In September of 1991, several people advocating Taiwan 
Independence held a so-called "Peoples Constitutional 
Conference" which passed a "Draft of a Taiwan Constitution" 
which publicly called the name of its country "The Republic of 
Taiwan." A number of people advocating Taiwan independence got 
together and in two days time they had a short debate, and with 
only half of the people present casting votes, they hastily 
passed the so-called draft of the constitution. How can this be 
called representative of the will of the people? This is a 
serious incident splitting up the nation, splitting up the 
people and seriously trampling the will of the people on both 
sides of the Straits. 
  Around 13 September 1991, there were more than 50 
businessmen in Taiwan who went to the United States to 
demonstrate for Taiwan's entry into the United Nations. A 
spokesman for our Foreign Ministry said that "Taiwan's attempts 
at joining the United Nations are absurd and futile." 
  On 4 October 1991, several prominent members of Taiwan's 
Democratic Progressive Party spoke at a number of different 
gatherings claiming that "The Republic of Taiwan" had been 
placed into the party platform of the Democratic Progressive 
Party. They claimed that this was a forgone conclusion and 
publicly announced that the Democratic Progressive Party was the 
party of "Taiwan Independence." 
  This must have been what Zhangxian Hongjin was referring to 
as public opinion, especially this announcement by the 
Democratic Progressive Party. Since the decision of the 
"Taiwanese Independence League" to "move the League back to 
Taiwan," Taiwan's Democratic Progressive Party has actually 
established a "support committee" for the return of the 
Taiwanese Independence League back to Taiwan. After Zhang's 
arrest, the Democratic Progressive Party has issued a call for 
leniency in his case. 
  However, the judge asked him if he would like to hear what 
public opinion was following the Democratic Progressive Party 
writing the "Taiwanese Independence Movement" into their 
platform. 
  Then, witnesses read materials attacking this action which 
had been received by the Democratic Progressive Party following 
this action, and of the results of polls. 
  At a roundtable discussion held on 29 September, a 
businessman in industry stated directly that the people in 
industry and commerce find the "demands" for Taiwanese 
Independence "unacceptable." 
  A large number of political and legal scholars on Taiwan 
all pointed out that risking the security of the people of 
Taiwan in such a manner is an irresponsible and dangerous 
action. Fu Kuncheng, professor of law at National Taiwan 
University, stated that an opposition party, no matter what its 
political stand, must have the concept of the same nation. The 
advocacy by the Democratic Progressive Party for "an independent 
Taiwan" is very dangerous and is irresponsible. 
  An editorial in Taiwan's UNITED DAILY NEWS stated that "the 
Democratic Progressive Party had better stop before it's too 
late." The editorial also stated that the reason the people 
oppose Taiwan independence is that it is a dead end. Also, it 
is a risk filled with many dangers. It is taking a political 
risk gambling the welfare of 20 million people. 
  The editorial also asked if the authorities on Taiwan could 
treat with appeasement and accommodation a traitorous clique 
like the Taiwan Independence Party which publicly claims its 
intention of fostering rebellion, and allow it to get away with 
whatever it wants. 
  On 14 October, on the mainland, Tang Shubei, a spokesman 
for the State Council Taiwan Affairs Office, expressed serious 
concern over the actions toward splitting the country by the 
Democratic Progressive Party. The Chinese Government has warned 
on a number of occasions that the government of China will not 
sit idly by if they continue to pay no heed and act on their 
own, continuing to act to divide the people and sell out 
national territory. 
  On 14 October in Taiwan, a spokesman for the Nationalist 
Party Central Committee expressed his disappointment with the 
new party platform of the Democratic Progressive Party, stating 
that the Nationalist Party would strongly denounce this action. 
  The Supreme Procurorate in Taiwan stated that it would wait 
until evidence was gathered by its investigative bureau before 
it could determine whether specific facts warranted charging 
anyone with the crimes of insurrection. 
  The opinion in Hong Kong was that it was not clear yet 
whether or not these actions constituted anything to fear. The 
headlines in Hong Kong's ECONOMIC DAILY read "Taiwan 
Independence Opportunism is a Reckless Gamble Doomed to Fail." 
  The Hong Kong TIANTIAN DAILY ran the headline "Taiwan 
Independence Party Is Cutting Its Own Throat." 
  The Hong Kong NANBAO ran the headline "Democratic 
Progressive Party Is Instigating Insurrection in Taiwan." 
  The Hong Kong OVERSEAS CHINESE DAILY ran the headline 
"Democratic Progressive Party and Taiwan Independence are 
Committing Suicide Together." 
  The Hong Kong XINBAO and XINGDAOBAO also ran articles 
harshly criticizing the Democratic Progressive Party for 
ignoring the interests of the nation and the people and for 
cutting the legs out from under the Nationalist Party. 
  An article in Taiwan's GONGSHANG SHIBAO under the banner of 
"We Strongly Denounce the Democratic Progressive Party's 
Advocacy of Taiwan Independence," stated that this action by the 
Democratic Progressive Party was "the ravings of a madman and 
has already reached a point where it is totally unreasonable." 
  These extremists "are counter to the will of the people, 
this 
is an extremely frightening attitude." 
  The Taiwan XINSHENG RIBAO stated that "The tactics by the 
Taiwan Independence movement are to gradually spread the demands 
for an independent Taiwan through making them public, making 
them part of society and making them international. They are 
taking advantage of loopholes in freedom of speech for actions 
aimed at Taiwan independence." 
  Finally, during the trial, the judge also quoted what Zhang 
had said in "Work and Direction of the Taiwan Independence 
Movement in the Present Stage." This article stressed that "If 
we are going to achieve a successful model for Taiwan 
Independence, we must use planned mass riots." The court decided 
that based on this evidence, the defendant "clearly" intended 
using force to promote "Taiwan Independence," "usurp national 
territory," and that he had taken action toward that goal. 
  This is the small footnote to the Taiwan Independence 
incidents in the early 1990's. 
  It is worth adding that when making this small historical 
footnote, in addition to the generations of hard work on both 
sides of the Straits and the exchanges between the two sides 
over the past several years, there are also the cherished hopes 
of Chiang Kaishek and his son. 
  Look at the following materials: 
  In an item from Hong Kong on 14 September 1979, according 
to statistics of the Taiwan Ministry of Interior, in that year 
there were 163,102 persons who went to the mainland to visit 
relatives, and there were 2,628 persons who went to Taiwan from 
the mainland. 
  From January through August of 1989, there were 370,000 
persons from Taiwan who visited the mainland to see relatives. 
In 1988 there were 300,000. Since November 1988, more than 
2,100 people have been granted permission to go to Taiwan to 
visit sick relatives or attend funerals. 
  In 1989, the Taiwan Sports Delegation made its first visit 
to Beijing. 
  From January through June 1989, trade between the two 
totalled $1.74 billion, a 57-percent increase over the same 
period in 1988. Taiwanese investment on the mainland continues 
to grow, and from January through June, 135 joint ventures were 
approved in the province of Fujian alone, with a joint venture 
investment of $124 million. 
  As of February 1991, the number of compatriots from Taiwan 
who had gone to the mainland to visit relatives, as tourists, on 
tours and to do business had reached one million. The total 
amount of indirect trade between the two sides had grown from 
$80 million in 1979 to more than $4 billion. 
  By 1992 more than 2,857 Taiwan businesses had invested in 
the mainland. The total investments were $3.6 billion (actually 
$20 billion). Seventy percent of this was concentrated in 
Guangdong and Fujian provinces. The other 30 percent was in 
other places such as Jiangsu, Shandong, Anhui, Beijing, 
Zhejiang, Sichuan, Liaoning, Jiangxi and Hainan. The primary 
projects were such labor intensive industries as raising eels, 
lumber processing, shoe manufacturing, umbrella manufacturing, 
clothing, chemical industries, electronics and textiles. 
  On 26 September 1991, when some people on the island of 
Taiwan began to deny that they were Chinese, Jiang Weiguo 
published an article in the United States stating that "Some 
people have fabricated the concept which separates the regional 
interests of Taiwan from the overall interests of China into two 
opposing factions. They claim that this is the universal common 
demand of the people living on Taiwan. They state that attempts 
to unify China are abandoning the wishes of 20 million people on 
Taiwan." Jiang Weiguo continued to criticize this. He said that 
the mainland and Taiwan are intimately tied together, and that 
"united they enjoy common prosperity and peace, and divided both 
sides are in danger and in difficulties." He felt that "those 
who are advocating splitting are laying the way for major powers 
(to invade China)." 
  He hoped that "all Chinese at home and overseas will not 
divide themselves by provinces, not divide themselves by 
political factions, but should, based on the fact that we are 
all Chinese, work to promote the giant undertaking of uniting 
China." 
  He felt that all Chinese on either side of the Straits and 
all over the world have three common desires. First is that 
Chinese people can only be peaceful at home and strong in 
foreign affairs if there is one single China. Second is that 
they all hope that they can have a good life. Third is that they 
can gain the respect of the entire world. 
  While making this small historical footnote, the Taiwan 
Nationalists authorities admit that "the unification of China is 
the common aspiration of all the Chinese people. It is also the 
best way of uniting all Chinese people to work together for the 
advancement of the Chinese race and a strong country." 
<H5>  "Taiwan Independence" Would Be the Fuse for "Recovery by </H5>
Force" 
<H5>  Taking Back Jinmen, With a Salute to the Spirits of its </H5>
Heroes 
  [Page 25 of original missing] 
  The most important thing in this offensive struggle was to 
have boats. There had to be boats. The key to victory or defeat 
was whether or not the boats, which could only transport the 
first echelon forces, would be able to return quickly after 
transporting the first echelon units and quickly carry the 
second echelon units. In order to accomplish this objective, 
three staff officers from the army headquarters were to be sent 
out with the first echelon units. Their mission was to be 
responsible for supervising and speeding up the return trip. 
However, because they had not been completely right about the 
sea conditions, the three staff officers tell a rough story. 
  The story of Staff Officer Li, who had accompanied the 
244th Regiment: Until the landing forces had secured a position 
on the beachhead, the fire was too fierce, and the workers on 
the boats all lay down to dodge the bullets, and it was 
impossible to organize the ships for the return trip. When the 
units had established a position on the beachhead, and when the 
tide had gone down to expose an additional 10 m of beach, all of 
the boats had run aground. The 244th Regiment could only keep 
on attacking, there was no hope of any help from protective 
forces. All Li could do was take it on his own to order the 
boat workers to do their best to free the boats. They only 
pushed off a few wooden boats, because they could not budge the 
motorized boats. A mortar shell came flying in, blowing Li to 
bits, and of the boats which had been freed, only two made the 
return trip to Lianhua harbor. No one knows what happened to 
the others. 
  The story of Staff Officer Lin who accompanied the 251st 
Regiment: Fortunately, he noticed that the tide was receding 
rapidly, and as soon as they reached the shore, he immediately 
ordered the ships to return, making the soldiers wade ashore. 
One third of the boats, twenty of them, stayed in the water and 
did not become grounded. However, just after these boats had 
left Jinmen, they were intercepted by two Nationalist gunboats. 
The boats did not have any protective weapons, and in the 
battle, staff officer Lin tried to protect the boats. After 
turning over command to the senior man, he took over one of the 
boats and rammed one of the gunboats, taking it to the bottom 
with him. 
  Many of the boats carrying the 259th Regiment also became 
grounded because it took more time to accomplish their landing. 
However, staff officer Wang pointed his pistol at the head of 
one of the battalion commanders, making him assign a company to 
push the grounded boats back into the water. More of this 
regiment's boats were saved than any of the other's. If these 
boats had been able to return without any problems, it is 
possible that the outcome of the battle would have been 
different. However, these boats became lost and sailed into 
Nationalist controlled waters, and were mistaken for Nationalist 
support boats by our long range artillery and all of them were 
sunk. Staff officer Wang was able to use his pistol to force 
the commander of the 3rd Battalion to send troops to help free 
the boats, and he used similar methods to force six soldiers to 
remain on the boats to protect them on their way back, but he 
was unable to signal the coastal artillery that they were 
friendly forces. Regrettably, he was killed by fire from his 
own forces. 
  With the second echelon forces unable to follow, the three 
regiments could only fight on their own. The bloody battle 
lasted three days and nights. The brave PLA landing forces had 
no supply and had no support. Under extremely difficult 
conditions, the isolated forces fought a bloody fight, causing 
heavy casualties among the Nationalist forces. During these 
three days and nights, it was almost one bloody battle after 
another. Each engagement was worse than the one before. This 
kept up until they ran out of ammunition and lost their 
position, and almost all the 10,000 heroic soldiers died bravely 
in the battle. Some jumped into the ocean and drowned, and some 
of the wounded were taken prisoner. 
  However, the Jinmen campaign was a defeat. This is one of 
the few mistakes in the general's life. It is also something he 
has regretted his entire life. 
  The next battle of Jinmen is perhaps not worth mentioning, 
not worth fighting. This battle is after all the first step on 
the way to Taiwan. This step will be taken by salvoes by the 
coastal artillery. However, these salvoes will not be like 
the conventional guns and "propaganda guns," but will be small 
homing missiles. Each missile will seek out the combat 
headquarters on Jinmen. They will all be aimed at the artillery 
placements and combat vessels on Jinmen. They will all hit 
their targets, and each will cause a great deal of damage. They 
will give no heed to ordinary battleworks, scattered troops or 
light weapons. They will hit only key places, a strike of 
several hours could paralyze the nerve network on the island, 
and the naval force would be able to mop up with no trouble at 
all. 
<H5>  Will the Primary Battle To Recover Taiwan Be Fought on </H5>
Taiwan? 
  Taiwan is situated more than 100 kilometers off the 
southeast 
coast of the Chinese mainland. The Pacific Ocean is to its 
East, and it is surrounded by the Penghu Islands, Diaoyu 
Islands, the Chiwei Islands, the Pengyu, Lanyu, and Huoshao 
Island. It covers 30,000 square kilometers and has a population 
of 20 million. The size of the Taiwan Straights is just enough 
to fit the island of Taiwan. The city of Xiamen is 170 nautical 
miles from Kaohsiung on the southern end of the island. The 
city of Fuzhou is 150 nautical miles from the port of Jilong on 
the northern end of the island. 
  The beautiful island of Taiwan, it has been the sacred 
territory of China since ancient times. In 1624 and in 1626, 
the Dutch and the Spanish colonialists invaded Tainan and 
Jilong, and from these two areas, expanded their invasion. At 
the end of the Ming Dynasty, in 1661 Chinese hero Zheng 
Chenggong led a large force which recovered Taiwan. Following 
the Sino-Japanese War in 1891, Taiwan was forcibly occupied by 
the Japanese invaders. During the miserable years of colonial 
rule under occupation by the Japanese Imperialists, the struggle 
of the compatriots on Taiwan to return to the embrace of the 
motherland never ceased. Including the Taiwan aborigine 
uprising in Taichung, there were more than 20 fairly large-scale 
battles, and as many as 100,000 people were killed. Following 
the end of World War II in 1945, according to the Cairo 
Declaration and the Potsdam Agreement, suzerainty over Taiwan 
was restored to China. Taiwan had been returned to the bosom of 
China. When the mainland was liberated in 1949, the Chiang 
Kai-shek clique fled to Taiwan, and in 1950, the United States 
imperialists used armed force to invade our sacred territory of 
Taiwan. 
  Taiwan has a history of being invaded, and the Chinese 
people on both sides of the Straits have no further desire for 
the fire and smoke of battle. 
  War means destruction. Whether armed might is used to 
recover Taiwan or whether peaceful reunification methods are 
used, the final goal of the mainland is to unite the people and 
material resources of the Chinese people, to vigorously develop 
the economy of China and to make the Chinese race stronger. 
Based on this principle, the recovery of Taiwan must not damage 
the economic structure of Taiwan. Therefore, no matter what the 
circumstances, a destructive recovery of Taiwan cannot be 
undertaken. It is possible to foresee that the main 
battlefields will not be on the island. The main battle may 
take place in the waters not far offshore from Taiwan. It is 
predicted that it would be in the waters near the Penghu 
Archipelago. 
  Naturally, the final decisive fighting will still have to 
be a struggle for each individual mountain, city or village. 
However, in the bloody fighting, neither nuclear weapons nor 
chemical weapons will be used, but only conventional weapons. 
As an old teacher once said, "This fight is with our own 
people, so there should be limits. Some way should be found to 
avoid a lot of killing." 
  The Taiwanese are even less willing to see the destruction 
of the battle in their own backyards. With the assistance of 
the United States, they want to fight a "battle of extinction" 
on the ocean. They want to wipe out the Communist Navy in the 
Taiwan Straits. 
  Thus, the will of both sides has determined that the battle 
for the recovery of Taiwan will be fought at.... 
<H5>  The Taiwan Strait Would Be an Integrated Test of Naval and </H5>
Air Forces 
  Imagine this: The fierce battle is a naval and air battle in 
the Taiwan Straits. This would be a battle pitting warships 
against aircraft. At such a time, the South Sea Fleet and the 
West Branch of the East Sea Fleet would be the first echelon 
units. The plan would be to join up at the Penghu Gulf. They 
would not want the Nationalists to use that old tactic of theirs 
again, "get the fighting over with before the second echelon of 
Communist forces can arrive." 
  Therefore, formations of squadron after squadron of F-14 
Tomcat fighters and bombers with F-16 fighters flying cover 
could swarm like bees toward the fleets. The bombs would fall 
like rain. The thousands of guns in our Navy Fleet would lay a 
dense barrage of tens of thousands of rounds per minute. The 
sky would be filled with yellow nitrate smoke. The exploding 
fragments would fall like hail from the sky raising ripples all 
over the surface of the water. The enemy aircraft would dive as 
if hit in a mad attack of the fleet. Some planes would trail 
plumes of smoke on their way to plunge into the ocean. But as 
one echelon goes past, it would be followed up by another 
echelon right behind it. Two of our transport ships have been 
hit. One is already closing the three sealed hatches and on the 
other ships, the soldiers are using their field packs to try to 
stop the water from pouring in. There in the hold of the ship, 
they would be helpless and curse the admirals. This "general" is 
really too much, for all these years he has just been a synonym 
for the Nationalists. 
  Puff after puff of black smoke would dot the decks of the 
cruisers and destroyers leaving dents and holes behind them. 
  Imagination, after all, is only imagination. What would 
the reality look like? 
  As one of the "Four Tigers" of Asia, Taiwan not only has 
strong economic might, but it also has a fairly respectable 
military strength. Its equipment and technologies are mostly 
superior to those of the mainland, mostly advanced U.S. 
equipment. After diplomatic relations between the United States 
and Taiwan came to an end, because of its considerations for the 
establishment of an "independent defense" system, under the 
guiding philosophy of the Taiwanese military to "substitute for 
time with quality," military expenditures grew every year. These 
expenditures have grown from $278.4 million in 1979 to $1.1 
billion in 1993. It has emphasized its Air Force and Navy. 
  Taiwan has 248 primary combat aircraft, the main force of 
which are the F-5E and the F-l04G interceptors. These are 
second generation fighters. Their combat capabilities are not 
quite as good as the F-8. Their overall combat strength is less 
than that of the mainland. However, after their imported 150 
F-16 and 60 Mirage fighters and their additionally planned 130 
self-designed IDF aircraft are used to equip their units, their 
Air Force will overall be better and will be of a new generation 
of aircraft. At such time, the Taiwan forces will possess 350 
third generation new all-weather combat aircraft. This will 
make it even more difficult for the mainland to win and maintain 
air superiority over the straits. 
  Taiwan forces currently have more than 300 combat vessels, 
its main force combat ships are patrol boats, guided missile 
boats, destroyers, guided missile escorts, submarines, LSTs, 
mine sweepers and supply boats. Its overall combat capabilities 
are greater than one of the mainland fleets, but less than two 
of the mainland fleets. It has fewer submarines than the 
mainland and does not have a nuclear submarine. 
  We can see from the above that the various forces do not 
have the strategic capability of conducting an attack on the 
mainland. This fact is an integral part of the long term guiding 
philosophy of the various forces of "a strategy to maintain the 
status quo" and defensive warfare. However, from the combat 
regions in the Taiwan Straits, the Taiwan military has a fairly 
high density of weapons to use to defend against an attack from 
the mainland, and these weapons are fairly modern. Within a 
limited period of time, it will be difficult break down the 
defenses of the Taiwanese forces. Therefore, this engagement in 
the Taiwan Straits would be a fierce modernized battle. 
<H5>  How Large of a Force Will China Use? </H5>
  Air Forces: There are a total of 490,000 men and about 5,200 
combat aircraft in the Chinese Air Force. If the 38,000 men and 
the 800 land based combat aircraft of the Naval Air Force are 
included, the air supremacy force would be 6,000 aircraft. 
Since this is no longer the 1950's when the talk was to push 
old Chiang Kai-shek "into the ocean," these aircraft should be 
enough to recover Taiwan. If Taiwan threw 80 percent of its 
combat aircraft into the battle, this would be 280 advanced 
third generation fighters. Then, for the mainland to take and 
maintain air superiority, it would have to use at least 40 
percent of its aircraft, deploying almost 2,400 aircraft along 
the Southeastern coast. From sheer numbers alone, this would be 
a ten-to-one margin, and would assemble a force of absolute 
superiority. However, from the viewpoint of quality, at least 40 
percent of China's Air Forces would have to be third generation 
aircraft. 
  China would have to use at least 1,000 fighters, at least 
400 of which would have to be F-8 aircraft. 
  At the same time, they could also deploy around 600 bombers 
including around 80 B-6 medium bombers, around 250 B-5 light 
bombers and around 300 fighter bombers to be used for an attack 
on Taiwan forces' positions on the beachheads. In addition, 
there should also a certain number of Jiancha-6 reconnaissance 
aircraft, Be-6 seaplanes, Zhi-5 helicopters and some transport 
aircraft. 
  Navy: At a minimum, the North and South Sea Fleets would 
have to be used with an independent submarine squadron with 
almost 750 combat vessels and more than 100 landing craft. The 
landing units would be 100,000 men. In their deployment, 
consideration should be given to a pincer attack from two 
different directions as well as preventing the U.S. Seventh 
Fleet from providing assistance. 
  Attention should be given to the fact that making the best 
use of submarine superiority is the key to victory in a battle 
in the Straits. It is also the most effective means for the 
mainland to deliver a crushing blow against the Taiwan Navy. 
Furthermore, the surface vessels of the mainland's Navy will 
mainly conduct a containment attack against the Taiwan Navy, and 
an even larger force will be used in support fighting and in the 
landing combat. In this way, it would be easier to gain control 
of the initiative in combat as quickly as possible. 
  China currently has more submarines than all other nations 
except for the United States and the former Soviet Union, third 
in the world. It currently has more than 100 conventionally 
powered submarines, second in the world. 
  China's submarine forces were built up fairly early. 
  Back when the former Soviet Union Pacific Fleet was using 
the port of Lushun, they began to train China's submarine 
student classes. On 20 August, 1953, China established a 
submarine school in Qingdao and asked the Soviets for an old C 
class submarine. This was the first submarine in China's Navy. 
  On 19 June 1954, China established an independent submarine 
Dadui in Qinghai with four submarines transferred over from the 
Soviets. Two of these were S (Stalinetz) class offshore 
submarines and two were M (Malodaki) class coastal submarines. 
Later, the Soviets continued to deliver a number of submarines, 
until China's Navy had four 5-I submarines, four Shchuka model 
submarines and four M-12 Submarines, as well as one M-IV and M-V 
submarines. During this time, the Soviets supplied 
technology on pressurized hulls, propellers and air defense 
systems. China began to develop its own submarines. So far, 
China has built a fairly large number of Soviet type submarines 
and has designed three types on her own, including two types of 
nuclear submarines. 
  In a battle using armed force to recover Taiwan, all of 
China's submarines would be used. These include the W class, the 
R class, the Wuhan class, the G class, the Ming class and the 
Xia class submarines. 
  The W class submarine is 76 meters long and 6.5 meters 
wide. It has a displacement of 1,080 on the surface and 1,320 
submerged. It can carry 14 torpedoes or 24 mines. It has 4,000 
horsepower, and maximum surface speed is 18 knots. Submerged, it 
uses two electric motors, 2700 horsepower, for a maximum speed 
of 14 knots. Its combat radius is 1,800 nautical miles with a 
maximum range of as much as 2,400 nautical miies. 
  Up until the mid 1980's, the W class submarines patrolled 
the waters of the Xisha [Paracel] Islands periodically. These 
submarines are still used for training. 
  The R class is slightly larger than the W class and it is 
more streamlined. The conning tower is also improved, slightly 
smaller than on the W class. This submarine is 76.8 meters long 
and 7.3 meters wide. It has a surface displacement of 1,400 
tons and a submerged displacement of 1,800 tons. At speeds of 
nine Knots it has a maximum cruising range of 9,000 nautical 
miles. The 033 model of this submarine is armed with 28 mines 
or 16 torpedoes. Its electronic equipment is fairly advanced. 
Some of the 033 models can be equipped panoramic sonar systems 
including passive sonar rangers and cyclic vision sonar 
listening devices which can detect all sonar transmissions 
within the two to fifteen kilohertz range. They can also track 
three targets at the same time within a 120 degree sector. In 
1980 during a visit to Shanghai by the British Navy, some 
personnel toured a 033 model submarine. They noticed that the 
ship had a large number of machine guns, which were said to be 
for use in offshore naval patrols. 
  The greatest difference in the Wuhan class is that there 
are C-801 missiles installed in the bulging cowlings on either 
side of the conning tower. To launch these missiles, the 
submarine must first come to the surface and raise the missile 
launcher before the missiles can be launched. The external 
dimensions are about the same as those of the 033 model, but it 
is heavier than the 033 model, with a surface displacement of 
1,650 tons and a submerged displacement of 2,100 tons. The 
power equipment is also similar to that of the 033 model. 
  The C-801 is also called the Yingji (YJ-l) model. It is a 
high subsonic speed low altitude sea sweeping multiple use 
anti-ship missile. It is China's newest anti-ship missile. It 
uses inertial mid flight guidance and active monopulse radar 
terminal guidance. When it approaches the target, it dives to 
attack it, and hits the target near the water line. Launch 
range is 8 to 40 kilometers. There is now an improved model, 
the C-802, which has a solid state booster and replaces the 
original solid state engine with a turbojet engine, so an air 
intake has been added to the missile. There has been no change 
in the type of guidance or in the flight altitude. Minimum and 
maximum launch ranges are 15 and 150 kilometers respectively. 
  According to materials made public by China, the Wuhan 
class has a crew of 53 men. It can submerge to 200 meters and 
has a continuous cruise capability of 45 days. At speeds of 
nine knots it can travel 14,000 kilometers. 
  The G class submarine is 98 meters long and 8.5 meters 
wide. It has a surface displacement of 2,350 tons and a 
submerged displacement of 2,950 tons. It has 6,000 horsepower 
which can drive the submarine at 17 knots on the surface and 13 
knots submerged. Combat radius is 20,000 nautical miles. 
  Because it is equipped with the CSS-N3 Julang (JL-l) 
missile developed by China on her own which is larger in 
diameter than the SSN-4, there are only two missile launchers in 
the conning tower. 
  The Julang-1 model missile is the only underwater launched 
missile the outside world is aware that China possesses. 
Supposedly it is a modified version of the Dongfeng-3 or 
Dongfeng-4 land based missile. It has a two-stage solid fuel 
rocket, and the warhead has a yield of 2 megatons. Launch range 
is about 2,700 kilometers. In addition, the G class submarine 
can carry 12 torpedoes. 
  The Ming class shape lies somewhere in between the cigar 
shape of the 033 model and a teardrop shape. It is 76 meters 
long and 7.6 meters wide. It has a displacement of 1,584 tons on 
the surface and 2,113 tons submerged. The power system is 
similar to that of the 033 model. It has speeds of 15 knots on 
the surface and a maximum speed of 18 knots submerged. Cruising 
range is about 7,000 nautical miles. It can submerge to about 
300 meters. The crew size is 58 men. 
  It can carry 16 torpedoes or 28 mines. Its electronic 
equipment is similar to that of the 033 model, and includes a 
reconnaissance type or reconnaissance disc type horizon search 
radar, stopping lights and electronic support equipment and 
Atlas or Phoenix type active and passive sonar. The Ming class 
has good underwater capabilities, but is expensive to build. 
  The Han class submarine is shaped similarly to the U.S. 
SSN-671 Unicorn class submarine. Its teardrop shaped body is 
suited to high speed submerged cruising. It uses a cross-shaped 
rudder. It has a submerged displacement of about 5,000 tons. 
It is about 100 meters long and 11 meters wide. It has a 
pressurized water reactor pile, single shaft drive, and a 
maximum speed of 25 knots submerged and 30 knots on the surface. 
  The Xia class is about 120 meters long and about 10 meters 
wide. It has a submerged displacement of about 8,000 tons. It 
has a pressurized water reactor pile, and power is rated at 
about 90 Megawatts. It is a single shaft drive, and maximum 
submerged speed is about 22 knots. It has a crew of 84. It can 
submerge to a depth of 300 meters. 
  Its primary weaponry includes 12 CSS-N-3 JULANG missiles. 
These are two-stage solid fuel missiles. They may be in the 
midst of being replaced with multiple warhead CSS-N-4 missiles. 
There are also six 21-inch torpedo launch tubes in the nose of 
the submarine. 
  China cannot compare with the United States and European 
nations in the level of submarine design and construction. 
However, it does possess a complete research and production 
system which does not require any assistance from foreigners. 
Furthermore, this is precisely the motivation for future 
development of new underwater combat vessels. Therefore, China 
is paying special attention to its submarine forces, especially 
missile submarine forces which are the key branch of the PLA 
Navy. 
  The Second Artillery forces are a strategic attack force. 
They already have a certain number of intercontinental ballistic 
missiles, medium-range and sub-medium range missiles. Its 
intercontinental ballistic missiles include four CSS-3 missiles 
with a range of 6000 to 7000 kilometers and carry a warhead of 
from one to three megatons. It is believed that the CSS-4 has 
already gone into production. It has a range of 13,000 
kilometers and carries a five to 10 megaton warhead. The medium 
range missiles include 65 to 85 CSS-2 missiles with a range of 
2500 kilometers and carry a one to three megaton warhead. The 
sub-medium range missile is the CSS-1 of which they have about 
50. It has a range of 180 kilometers and carries a 1.5 kiloton 
warhead. 
<H5>  The Outlook Would Be Better If We Had an Aircraft Carrier </H5>
  In November of 1991, China's International Leading Edge 
Weapon Exposition was jointly hosted by the General Staff 
Department of the PLA and the Commission for Science and 
Industry in National Defense at the Military Museum. It was only 
open to persons in the military, industry and government. At 
the naval exhibition, the exhibit of a model of an aircraft 
carrier and an aircraft carrier task force by the Naval 
Development and Testing Center attracted a large group of 
Chinese men of vision. The spokesman explained in detail the 
dream and equipment of a future Chinese aircraft carrier. It 
was then that the listeners understood that building an aircraft 
carrier was not as simple as building a ship in the tens of 
thousands of tons class, but that it involved the national 
industrial level of a series of technologies as well as 
supplying it with a large amount of support systems. 
  In general, an aircraft carrier group has four major parts: 
1) The hull of the carrier. This is the sea and air mobile 
platform; 2) The various fighters, bombers, anti-submarine 
helicopters, AWACs and patrol and reconnaissance aircraft 
carried on the carrier; 3) The carrier's radar, missile, 
electronic warfare, guns and flight deck and take off and 
landing equipment as a single major system; 4) Support vessels, 
destroyers, escorts, submarines, landing craft, contingent of 
marines and supply and support vessels. 
  This conceptual synthesis is the proper concept of a 
carrier combat group. Only this type of carrier task force would 
have the assault force to control the seas and control the 
skies. 
  At this exhibition, the Deputy Commander of the Navy, Li 
Jing, the Commander of the Air Force Wang Hai, the chairman of 
the Commission for Science and Industry in National Defense Ding 
Henggao and his vice chairmen Xie Guang and Ye Zhengda remained 
at the carrier exhibit for a long time and provided a great deal 
of support. 
  People are aware that to build a carrier task force like 
the one described above the cost would be astronomical. 
  From what we have heard, early in the next century, the 
Chinese Navy plans to possess two carrier task forces. The 
carriers constructed would be 40,000 to 50,000-ton medium-sized 
aircraft carriers similar to the Soviet Kiev-class aircraft 
carriers. There would be 20 to 28 aircraft parked on the flight 
deck. The flight deck would be 70 meters long. It would use 
steam to launch the aircraft. Everything being equal, these two 
carrier task forces would cost an estimated 70 billion yuan. 
  There are three critical technologies in aircraft carriers. 
The first is the development of carrier aircraft and mastering 
take-off and landing technology. The second is the development 
of anti-submarine technology, solving the problem of underwater 
threats to the carrier. Secondary to this is the problem of task 
force air defense. This requires phased array radar technology. 
The third critical technology just happens to be a weakness of 
the Chinese Air Force. 
  Facing an increasingly serious situation in the Nansha 
Islands, the Chinese Navy has contacted a number of nations 
trying to find some way to solve the problem of beefing up their 
anti-submarine systems. In 1985, the Chinese Navy purchased a 
French Duux-5 sonar for the possible purpose of the 
anti-submarine research so urgently needed for missile nuclear 
submarines. It is estimated that there has been some progress 
made on this. In 1988, the Chinese Navy contacted the Italians 
expressing a great deal of interest in Italy's sonar combat 
systems and multifunctional control consoles. In addition, the 
Chinese Navy is also interested in the French PIVAIV stable 
anti-submarine equipment. They have already tested the French 
MINCIN inertial guidance systems on surface vessels. In 1986, 
the United States Navy agreed to sell towed phased array sonar 
equipment to China. 
  Research on carrier aircraft includes carrier fighters to 
gain control of the skies and providing air defense for the 
carrier force, carrier bombers to carry out bombing assault 
missions, and carrier AWACs to track enemy targets and to guide 
and control their aircraft to intercept and bomb targets. 
<H5>  Will the United States Become Involved? </H5>
  As the policeman of the world, the United States military 
acts as a nuclear umbrella for Taiwan. Should there ever be a 
military threat against Taiwan, they would never stand idly by, 
no matter what Taiwan's position might be in the fighting. 
They would certainly use such an opportunity to express their 
concern and support for Taiwan. 
  From considerations of global strategy, the United States 
would not allow a strong opponent to arise in East Asia. In 
1992, CINCPAC convened a special symposium on the problem of a 
"New Military Strategy" for the Pacific Region. It was pointed 
out at this symposium that "the overall strength of the Chinese 
military is continuing to grow and seriously affects the 
military balance in the Far East. There are currently more than 
10 regional confrontational hot spots and a number of border 
conflicts in the Far East with a high possibility of leading to 
local wars in the future. In addition to being on the alert to 
Russian forces, the U.S. forces stationed in the Far East will 
also have the Chinese, Koreans and Vietnamese as primary 
adversaries. At the same time, the U.S. Seventh Fleet will view 
the rapidly expanding Chinese Navy as one of the primary 
adversaries constituting the greatest threat in that region. But 
to what degree would the United States become involved? Simply 
the largest task force outside the country is responsible for 
the primary strategic mission in the Western Pacific. 
  The Seventh Fleet includes the task forces of the Seventh 
Fleet, the Carrier Strike Force, the Fifth Carrier Group, the 
Seventh Carrier Group and 60,000 Marines. It is the world's 
largest fleet deployed to the front, and it conducts its mission 
in the waters of the Western Pacific, South Pacific, Indian 
Ocean, and Arabian Sea 11,000 nautical miles from the U.S. 
coast. If reguired, it can also expand its scope from the 
Central Pacific to the African Coast and from the Kurile Islands 
to the North Pole. 
  It is made up of about 70 or 80 ships, including 50 ships 
which are based at facilities in Guam and Japan. These forward 
deployed units are the heart of the Fleet. They possess a great 
military strength and always maintain a high combat readiness 
posture. The other 20 ships in the Fleet are deployed at bases 
in Hawaii and on the West Coast. The Seventh Fleet is 
specifically equipped as shown below. 
  Ships: Two to three aircraft carriers, three to four 
cruisers, 18 to 20 destroyers and escorts, seven or eight 
submarines, one amphibious combat command ship and one fleet 
flag ship, five to eight amphibious landing ships and landing 
ships, 18 mobile supply ships and 16 advance assembly ships. 
  Naval Aircraft: 250 carrier-based and other ship-based 
aircraft, 10 land-based multiple use aircraft, and 160 to 170 
Marine aircraft. 
  Marines: Marine expeditionary forces include marine 
divisions, marine air regiments, marine expeditionary brigades, 
unit services, support groups and marine expeditionary forces. 
  On any given day of the year, 50 percent of the forces 
under the command of the Seventh Fleet are performing missions 
throughout the Western Pacific and the Indian Ocean. However, 
should the order ever be given, they could reach the waters of 
the Taiwan Strait in a very short time. 
  Yet, if the United States tried to use this opportunity to 
surgically remove the Chinese Navy or to carry out a plan of 
"plundering the Chinese Waters," we want to effectively warn 
them that they will have to have an even larger carrier fleet. 
<H5>  What Will Be the Final Outcome of the War? </H5>
  The key to what will determine the final outcome of an 
armed recovery of Taiwan will be the result of the confrontation 
between the armed forces from either side of the Taiwan Strait. 
If the Mainland is able to destroy the Taiwanese Navy and Air 
Force within the preset amount of time, then the authorities on 
Taiwan will give up trying to resist in order to avoid the 
destruction of war on their island. If the mainland is not able 
to destroy the main body of resistance of the Taiwanese forces, 
then they will not be able to conduct a landing, and the 
situation will be very grim. There is one other possible 
situation, where the mainland is only able to attack a portion 
of the targets in the preset period of time, and the defensive 
system of the Taiwanese forces is about to fall but has not 
completely fallen. At such a time, there could be strange and 
complex changes in the situation, and the United States and 
other external factors could generate a major influence on the 
situation. 
  In summary, the problem of the return of Taiwan is better 
resolved by peaceful means than by armed force. 
<H5>  IV: WILL WE BE ABLE TO REENACT THE GLORY OF 1962 </H5>
  History often repeats itself. However, in the face of the 
military power which has arisen in Asia -- India -- people 
cannot help having a certain reservation about this law of 
history always repeating itself. 
  Actually, looking over the more than 2,000 kilometer border 
between China and India, it is very easy for people to come to 
the conclusion that of the two sides opposing each other across 
this border, the Indian forces appear to have overwhelming 
superiority. At the first outpost at the Sino-Indian border 
there are two opposing fortifications, with the Chinese to the 
north and the Indians to the south, only 27 meters apart. Not 
far away there is a postal facility in the neutral zone. Every 
day, the surface mail between these two countries must be 
exchanged here. The border defense forces of the two countries 
must stand guard during the exchange of the mail. When this is 
done, the guards from both sides must enter the neutral zone 
where they almost come face to face. When relations between the 
two countries were normal, the troops from either side would 
often call out "hello, hello" to those on the other side and 
even exchange small gifts. 
  In the 1960's and 1970's, the Indian border troops gave the 
Chinese troops the impression of being poor and dirty, and they 
would take out a pack of cigarettes to give to them. After the 
1980's, the Chinese forces suddenly noticed that this batch of 
bearded soldiers had suddenly straightened up, changing into 
nylon uniforms which were all the same. The old clumsy former 
Soviet rifles they carried had been exchanged for impressive 
British arms. Looking further back into Indian territory, road 
after road stretched out, forming a modern transportation 
network. Every weekend, sedans would arrive one after another 
carrying the families of the troops to the front line. While 
they were enjoying themselves, the Chinese troops had to do 
without such pleasures. 
  When the Sino-Indian border heated up in 1989, Chinese 
units were rushed in to beef up defenses, and both sides were 
facing each other. Although no shots were fired, quite a few of 
the Chinese officers and men had to be taken to a field hospital 
to be treated for frost bite, but the Indian forces did not seem 
to be affected. 
  Naturally, the situation in the skies was even more tense, 
with the Indian's deploying almost 200 combat aircraft while the 
Chinese did not have any combat aircraft except for a few on 
standby. The air power ratio was 200 to none. This was an 
unthinkable situation. Imagine what would have happened to the 
Chinese front line defense units if the Indians had actually 
attacked over the entire front. 
  It goes without saying that the Chinese troops became aware 
that the old "feeling of superiority" was gone. 
  This is the current situation at the Indo-Chinese border. 
<H5>  A Historical Flashback </H5>
  Before we attempt to analyze the balance of forces for the 
next engagement between India and China, we should look back at 
the situation during the 1962 border war. 
  Historically, the Indo-Chinese border has never been 
formally delineated. However, over the long process of amicable 
coexistence between the peoples of the two countries, and in 
accordance with the scope of political control of both 
countries, a 2000-km commonly recognized boundary was formed. 
The western end started from the north in the Kunlun Mountains 
and ran south to where Ali in Tibet, Ladakh in Kashmir under 
actual Indian control, and India's Ximaxie'erbang [0823 7456 
0253 1422 1620] all come together. The middle section runs from 
this triangulation to where China, India, and Nepal all come 
together, generally following a line along the southern foot of 
the Himalaya Mountains and the plains along the northern bank of 
the Brahmaputra and east to where China, India, and Burma come 
together. 
  In 1944, the British Colonial planners convened a 
conference in Shimla in northern India. At the conference, the 
representative of the British government, Henry Macmahon, and 
the representative of the Tibetan authorities, Xiazha Bianjue 
Duoji [1115 2089 6708 6030 1122 0679], secretly exchanged notes 
without the knowledge of the Chinese central government 
representative, Chen Taifan, and created the "MacMahon line" 
which placed historical Chinese areas of Menou, Luoyu, and 
Xiachaou into British India, attempting to occupy 90,000 square 
kilometers of Chinese territory. 
  Although the notorious "Macmahon Line" has never been 
recognized by any Chinese government, it is the cause of the 
border dispute between China and India. 
  From 1951 to 1953, the authorities of independent India 
took advantage of the period when New China had just been 
established and while it was fighting the United States and not 
paying attention to its border with India to dispatch troops to 
control the south of the "Macmahon Line" and into what has been 
traditionally Chinese territory north of the traditionally 
customary boundary and revised the official maps of India at 
that time, indicating that the illegal "Macmahon Line" was an 
"accepted border," thus attempting to fix and legalize their 
occupation of Chinese territory. Later, the Indians continued 
to advance into Chinese territory on the eastern, central and 
western sectors, occupying a large amount of territory including 
Jianmani, Juwa, Qure, Shenbuqi Pass, Blinsanduo, Xiangli, 
Labudi, and Balijiasi in Tibet. 
  In a letter to premier Zhou Enlai on March 20, 1959, 
India's Premier Nehru made formal territorial demands against 
China totalling 125,000 square kilometers, approximately the 
size of the province of Fujian. Premier Zhou Enlai rejected 
these demands on behalf of the Chinese Government. Thereupon, 
the Indian Government began to use armed might to carry out its 
"policy of advancement" and began to make preparations for a 
large scale attack on China. That same year, the Indian 
Army took over the defense of the entire Indo-Chinese border 
region. 
  In October of 1962, the Indian Defense Ministry announced 
the establishment of a new army, the Fourth Army, and named Army 
Chief-of-Staff General Lahiri as the commander of the new army. 
  Prior to launching the assault, India had one brigade, six 
infantry battalions, one machine gun battalion and a number of 
detachments totalling more than 5,600 men on the Western sector 
of the border with China. Of these, 1,300 men were deployed in 
43 strongholds inside of Chinese territory. 
  The eastern sector was India's main direction of attack, 
and they had deployed four battalions of the Seventh Brigade and 
four battalions of the Fourth Artillery Brigade in Chinese 
territory north of the "Macmahon Line" at Kejielang, Bangshankou 
and south of there in Dawang and deploying the headquarters of 
the Fourth Army and the Fourth Division in Tisibuer, south of 
the traditional border. The total Indian force along the 
eastern sector was 16,000 men and the eastern and western 
sectors combined totalled 22,000 men. 
  On 17 and 18 October, the invading Indian forces launched a 
fierce artillery assault on the Chinese border defense units on 
the eastern and western sectors, unilaterally initiating a large 
scale armed conflict. 
  On October 20, the Indian forces launched an all-out attack 
on Chinese territory on the eastern and western sectors. On 
that day, border defense units in Tibet and Xinjiang received 
orders to counterattack, opening the curtain on the self-defense 
counterattack on the Indo-Chinese border. 
  The first stage of the counterattack lasted from 20 to 28 
October. Chinese border defense units separately launched all 
out counterattacks on the invading Indian army on the eastern 
and western sectors. They also concentrated a superior force 
along the primary direction. In just eight days, they had 
wiped out 86 percent of the army strongholds along the western 
sectors, and drove out the Indian forces which had invaded the 
Kelangjie and Dawang areas, killing some of them. 
  On 24 October, the Chinese government issued a three-point 
proposal to stop the fighting, to reopen peace talks, and for a 
peaceful solution to the Sino-Indian border question. At the 
same time, Premier Zhou Enlai sent a letter to Nehru, with the 
hopes that the Indian government would make a positive response 
to the three-point proposal. 
  On 28 October, the Chinese border defense units obeyed the 
call of the government and halted its counterattack against the 
invading Indian forces. 
  However, the Indian authorities publicly rejected the 
peaceful proposals of the Chinese Government and demanded that 
the situation at the border region be restored to what it was 
prior to 28 September 1962, with India occupying a large piece 
of Chinese territory. On 26 October, the Indian leaders 
announced a "state of emergency" for the entire nation, forming 
a cabinet to "cope with the emergency situation." Their 
determination was for a long war with China. 
  On 4 November, Premier Zhou Enlai sent one more letter to 
Nehru, hoping that the Indian government would consider the 
Chinese three-point proposal. However, on the same day, the 
Indian Government announced the establishment of a "national 
defense commission" and a "national defense production 
commission" to carry out mobilization for war and increase the 
number of forces at the Sino-Indian border areas. By the middle 
of November, the Indian Army had deployed a total of two 
divisions, nine brigades, and a large amount of artillery and 
armored forces in the border area, totalling 30,000 men. 
  On 14 and 16 November, the Indians once more conducted a 
fierce assault along the entire border. 
  From 16 to 21 November, the Chinese border defense forces 
conducted the second stage all-out counterattack against the 
invading Indian forces. In this battle, the Chinese border 
defense forces successfully utilized the concentration of a 
superior force to conduct a pincer movement and flanking attack, 
penetrating deep into the Indian forces, so that the Indian 
forces were being attacked at many points and could neither 
protect their front or rear. The Chinese forces smoothly 
achieved their objective of driving all the Indian forces out of 
their territory. 
  This 31-day local war ended at the tragic cost of the lives 
of 8,700 Indian troops. The perfected combat capabilities of 
the Chinese forces in traditional warfare and especially their 
abilities in hand-to-hand fighting and in night fighting amazed 
all the Indian troops. This attitude of awe remained in the 
hearts of the "bearded troops" for a very long time. 
<H5>  The Next War Will Not Be So Easy </H5>
  With the present state of the Chinese and Indian forces, in 
the next war the form and strength of both sides are nothing 
like they were in 1962, both sides are clear on this point. The 
war in the 1960's was typical traditional surface warfare. 
There was no sign of the Air Force on the battlefield, let 
alone missiles or even any armored forces worth mentioning. The 
primary weapons engaged were semi-automatic infantry rifles, 
assault guns, light and heavy machine guns, 60- and 80-mm 
mortars and 122-mm howitzers. The mobility of the units was 
mainly marching and running. 
  This combat form was no different in nature than the war 
against the Japanese or the Civil War. It could not even be 
compared to the Korean War of the 1950's. Under these 
conditions, the numbers of troops and the use of tactics were 
the key decisive factors. However, at that time, the Indians 
lost on both these counts, so they paid the price. 
  What, then, will he next war be like? People who 
understand the world military developments over the last 30 
years will all reach the following conclusion. The next war 
between China and India will be an air and land integrated war 
fought under conditions of a nuclear threat. 
  The so-called "air and land integrated" warfare is a joint 
battle conducted by all branches and forces of the military. It 
is a primary type of modernized military action. The branches 
of the military usually taking part in the combat are the Air 
Force, Army, Second Artillery (missile units) and the types of 
forces are the infantry, armor, artillery, communications, 
engineers, chemical defense, paratroops and special forces. 
  Based on the geographical conditions of the combat area, 
the branches and forces thrown into combat by both sides will be 
different. For instance, the border area of India is high 
plateaus and mountains, so there will commonly be used air 
forces, infantry, artillery, paratroopers and engineers, while 
it is difficult to make the best of the "king of ground 
battles", the tanks, in that type of terrain. However, in more 
open areas deep in either side, the armored forces might become 
primary assault forces. Both sides are nuclear powers, so while 
fighting a conventional war, the nuclear threat of the other 
side can never be eliminated. This is one of the major 
characteristics of modern warfare. 
  It is very obvious that both the Chinese and the Indians 
have the capability to conduct "air and land integrated" three 
dimensional warfare. In addition to the composition of their 
forces, both sides have the various branches and types of 
forces, in their strategy, they have both absorbed the essence 
of the "great depth" theory and the United States military air 
and land integrated combat" theory into their campaign theory. 
They have also long been using it in joint military training 
and in campaign exercises. 
  It is not difficult for us to suppose that in the next 
battle which might occur on the roof of the world there would 
appear various types of weapons and forces. 
  In the air: The air battle which will primarily be fought 
with such second and third generation aircraft as the F 8-II, 
F-10, MiG-29, Su-27, F-l6, and Mirage-2000 aircraft will be a 
dazzling engagement. Also, the B-6 and Jaguar high altitude 
bombers and fighter bombers will be responsible for conducting 
firepower assaults on targets deep in enemy territory. The 
short and medium range missiles and paratroop forces will become 
the primary forces for attacking fortifications and major 
targets deep in enemy territory. The air over the battlefield 
will be filled with high power multiple frequency band radio 
waves, to deal a fatal "soft kill" to the enemy. 
  On the Ground: New large caliber self-propelled guns and 
multiple barrel rocket guns such as the 152-mm self-propelled 
cannon, the 206-mm self-propelled mortar, the 130-mm 
self-propelled rocket gun will play a major role in suppression 
firepower. Flocks of armored helicopters will become the nemesis 
of close attack surface targets. Model 80 and T-72 main battle 
tanks will be responsible for defense in-depth and for carrying 
out high speed penetrations. Engineers with such advanced 
equipment as rocket mine laying vehicles will quickly be able to 
erect obstacles against the attacking enemy. Infantry forces 
will all use highly accurate, rapid firing light universal 
automatic weapons. They will also be equipped with one-man 
anti-tank missiles, recoilless rifles, mortars and night vision 
devices. We can see from the primary use of the weapons 
described above that the space taken up by the battlefield in a 
future war between China and India will be many times larger, 
perhaps as much as ten times larger, and the concentration of 
firepower and the destructive power will be as much as 100 
times greater. The switching back and forth from offensive to 
defensive will also be more rapid. Battlefield postures will 
change in an instant. Whichever side is victorious, the cost 
will be tremendous and tragic. It is just that the winner will 
receive some sort of compensation and the loser will lose any 
possibility of compensation. To sum it all up, the next war 
between China and India will not be an easy matter for either 
side. 
<H5>  When Might a War Between China and India Break Out </H5>
  Does India have the capability at the present time to 
launch an attack in-depth locally in China's Tibet and Xinjiang? 
Is it as some scholars maintain, that faced with the tremendous 
threat from India that China may have permanently lost 
suzerainty over some of its territory? 
  On the surface, the situation seems to have reached a 
crisis and reached a stage where "we have to fight." However, 
deeper analysis indicates that the situation is still far from 
such a stage. 
  As everyone knows, in both the past and present, anyone who 
presses the button of war will have to pay the price. 
Furthermore, this tremendous cost will undoubtedly be a burden 
passed on to the people of that country. It is very clear that 
India does not yet have the capability of paying that price. 
In the process of carrying out their "expansionist policies," 
the Indian authorities are actually facing a number of factors 
and obstacles which are keeping them from doing as they wish. 
  The first of these is their economic straits. If it can be 
stated that at the present time, India's military forces are 
comparable with China's, then in overall national strength, 
especially in economic competition, India has been left far 
behind by China, about 20 years behind. 
  In agriculture, from 1986 to 1992, India's grain production 
has increased at an annual rate of 2.4 percent. If we take 
annual grain production to be three percent and annual 
population increase to be two percent, then it will take at 
least 20 years for India to reach the level of 362 kilograms of 
grain per person per year. 
  In June 1991, India's foreign reserves were only about $1 
billion, only enough for two weeks' imports. Foreign debt, 
however, was more than $70 billion. It takes 30 percent of the 
income from exports to pay the capital and interest on this 
debt. They have a trade deficit of as much $5 billion. 
  The grim economic situation has forced the Indian 
Government to concentrate its main energies on improving the 
economy and working to reform the economy. However, from the 
degree and effectiveness of the reforms, the disparity between 
China and India will continue to grow. At the end of 1991, China 
had already accumulated in $120 billion worth of foreign 
exchange. Since 1984, India only had a total of less than $1 
billion. It is clear how difficult the steps of reform are for 
India. Therefore, for a fairly long time, for the next 15 to 20 
years, India's overall national strength will not be able to 
compete with that of China. 
  Next is strategic pressures. In the strategic posture of 
South Asia, India is caught between China and Pakistan. It is 
in a disadvantageous position of facing two fronts, one on the 
East and one on the West. Pakistan relies on support from China 
for its security, and China also hopes that Pakistan will 
restrain India. Therefore, after the breakdown of the Soviet 
Union, India's strategic intentions are to maintain military 
superiority and sufficient pressure over Pakistan and a defense 
against China. 
  In 1991, India deployed four armies, 10 infantry divisions 
and an additional armored division, 15 mechanized divisions and 
one infantry divisions to the India-Pakistan border at Kashmir 
to be responsible for strategic mobility against Pakistan. 
One-third of its air forces are also deployed against Pakistan. 
Along the border with China, however, there is one infantry 
division and one air wing on the western sector. On the eastern 
sector there are two mountain divisions and a small amount of 
air forces. Naturally, this is not to say that India sees 
Pakistan strategically as its primary enemy, but that it 
indicates that under pressure from different sides, India was 
forced to adopt its current "transitional" deployment. 
Therefore, with India's current strategic deployment being what 
it is, India does not have the capability of launching an attack 
on China. 
  Also, to achieve its "naval strategy" Indian forces have 
already used their primary financial resources on equipment for 
their navy and air forces, allowing for a rapid increase in its 
naval combat threat and basically establishing India in the 
position as "King" of the Indian Ocean. However, a war between 
China and India would be primarily fought on the ground. It 
will be very difficult for India to take any advantage of its 
naval superiority, and India does not have any clear superiority 
over China in ground warfare capabilities. Should war break 
out, the Indian forces are not very confident of winning. 
  We can imagine from this that in the next ten years or so, 
it is not very likely that a local war of any large scale will 
break out between China and India. The first ten years of the 
next century will be a more dangerous period. 
<H5>  What Kind of Attack Could the Indian Forces Launch? </H5>
  The cause of any border conflict between India and China 
would be the direct result of the territorial dispute. There 
will not be any major changes on this point for quite some time 
to come. Could the Tibetan problem which has attracted so much 
attention become a critical juncture? This is not a remote 
possibility. After they split off, India has been the only 
country on which the Tibetan splittist elements could depend. 
For the Indians, support of the Tibetan splittists could have 
even more benefits, so they are happy to do it. In addition to 
these two possibilities, any greedy attempts would be 
overstepping one's bounds. 
  From the angle of the Indian authorities, and an analysis 
based on general combat principles of modern limited war theory, 
India's combat objectives can be determined to be the 
destruction of major targets on the Tibetan border and the 
Chinese defense system so the Chinese forces would be unable to 
pose a threat to attack India, thus establishing clear military 
superiority within the Indo-Chinese border areas. This would 
both be both an advantageous and realistic combat objective. 
Its focus is on attacking the vital forces of the Chinese 
military and not on occupation. In this manner, after the 
attack has achieved its effect, the forces would withdraw from 
combat very quickly to avoid falling into a quagmire of 
prolonged combat. Also, they would not be burdened with 
occupying territory (unless the value of the territory was worth 
the price of the fighting). When the Chinese forces had once 
more assembled in Tibet and posed a threat to the border areas 
and influencing the superior position of the Indian forces, 
they would launch another attack. This is called a "pugilistic" 
strategy. It will become India's fundamental key in the next 
war. 
  Based on the strategy and tactics mentioned above, India 
will have to throw at least four to five mountain infantry 
divisions, more than two artillery divisions, two to three tank 
divisions, one to two airborne divisions and 500 combat aircraft 
into the battle, totalling around 200,000 men. It will naturally 
also require large numbers of medium and close range missiles 
and ground-to-air missiles. 
<H5>  What Will Be the Result of the Chinese Counterattack? </H5>
  For possible counterattacks against the Indian forces, some 
of the Chinese forces stationed in Tibet and Xinjiang will be 
far from enough. Therefore, within a number of weeks, the 
Chinese military will deploy two or more group armies to Tibet 
and southern Xinjiang. Using current mobile capabilities, it 
will take at least three weeks to complete emergency defensive 
deployment. However, it could first deploy one or two 
rapid-reaction divisions along the primary axis to stop the 
Indian advance. 
  By the time the Indian forces have completed preparations 
for assault, it is estimated that the Chinese military could 
assemble 80,000 to 100,000 men in Tibet and southern Xinjiang as 
well as more than 400 fighters. Long-range bombers may be 
deployed in the interior for direct support of combat zones in 
Tibet. Even if the Chinese forces are outnumbered, 
concentrating the force along the primary axis of attack will at 
least allow them to hold their own for a period of time, 
providing more time for reinforcement units. 
  Clearly, focussing on the strategic intentions and combat 
characteristics of the Indian forces, the Chinese forces will 
defensively concentrate on preventing the Indian forces from 
breaking through deeper into Chinese territory and maintaining 
major defensive positions on the front line and deeper back, 
forcing the Indian forces to fight in areas south of the border. 
  However, if the main force is deployed on the border front 
line, not only will it be difficult to support them there, but 
they could easily be surrounded and wiped out by the Indian 
forces. Therefore, the major foothold of Chinese forces in their 
defensive combat should be mobile attack defense, and not 
positional defense. That is, along the main axis of attack by 
the Indian forces to form an echelon deployment, and when the 
Indian forces break through a short distance into our territory, 
we should attack their flanks or rear follow-up units, and 
encircle and wipe them out before the Indian forces have a 
chance to gain a foothold. 
  The central factor which will determine the defensive and 
counterattack capabilities of the Chinese forces will not be the 
number of men or the strength of the force, but will be whether 
or not constant supply can be ensured. Similarly, the Indian 
forces will make attacking the Chinese rear supply bases and 
supply lines their primary objectives. 
  Most of the supplies to units stationed in Tibet travel 
over the Sichuan-Tibet road or the Qinghai-Tibet road, with some 
being air lifted. Troops, material and weapons all follow these 
three transport routes. Should these routes be cut off, the 
units in Tibet would be in dire straits. 
  In the early stages of the war, as the surface forces 
become engaged along the border, the Indian air forces and 
missile forces will launch a firepower assault on transport 
routes and primary airfields and bases in the rear in order to 
prevent the Chinese strategic mobility forces from assembling 
and to allow the Indian airborne assault forces and tank forces 
to go through breaches in the front lines and quickly penetrate 
and encircle major strongpoints in the rear. The Chinese forces 
in their defensive positions may ensure the major strongpoints 
and supply routes in the rear at the cost of losing front line 
positions. 
  The offensive and defensive fighting at this stage will 
primarily be fought in the air in an attempt to gain control of 
the air. Judging from the current strengths of the air forces 
of both sides, the Indian forces have more than 700 combat 
aircraft, most of which are second generation primary combat 
aircraft with a small number of third generation primary combat 
aircraft, but they have superiority in fighters and early 
warning and command. The Chinese have as many as 4,000 combat 
aircraft, with an even smaller proportion of third generation 
aircraft. They have superiority in bombers and total number of 
aircraft. 
  If war should break out, and there is no change in this 
ratio, then the Chinese forces would have to sacrifice numbers 
in exchange for control of the air. In this manner, the early 
stages of the war would center around the struggle over control 
of the air, and it would be a bitter and prolonged struggle. 
There would also be additional losses among the Chinese ground 
forces. Only after the Chinese had gained control of the air 
would there be any possibility of the Chinese forces being able 
to organize for a strategic counterattack, and the first stage 
would then be finished. 
  In the early stages of the war, the ground forces on both 
sides might launch attacks in areas 50 to 100 kilometers inside 
Tibet. Because the Indians would have lost control of the air, 
in order to ensure the air security of its ground forces, the 
Indian forces will primarily use surface-to-air missiles for an 
air defense umbrella. However, the artillery, tanks and 
helicopters would be primarily responsible for conducting 
firepower assaults on the ground. 
  During this period, whether or not the Chinese ground 
forces responsible for holding the major strongpoints behind the 
front lines would be able to hold back the Indian attack and 
gain time for the strategic counterattack is the key to overall 
victory or defeat. As is illustrated in the foregoing 
description of the infantry firepower of both sides we can see 
that China has as a slight superiority, especially in artillery, 
where the Chinese are not only superior to the Indians in 
technology, but in numbers as well. Therefore, the Chinese are 
fairly confident in the abilities of their forces to defend 
strongholds behind the front lines as well as make preparations 
for the strategic counterattack. 
  Attention must be paid to the fact that during their 
attack, the Indian forces will place a great deal of stress and 
possibly even too much reliance on firepower, and in addition to 
conducting a great deal of firepower preparations, there must be 
strong firepower support during the entire attack. Should the 
firepower cover ever be cut off, the attack would come to a 
halt. Conversely, for the Chinese forces, the most important 
mission in smashing the Indian attack would be to destroy the 
heavy firepower weapons and forces providing cover such as 
tanks, helicopter gunships, support artillery and heavy machine 
guns. Therefore, the Chinese ground forces must have sufficient 
one-man anti-tank missiles and surface-to-air missiles in 
addition to their current inventory as well as advanced personal 
night vision devices to enhance their night fighting 
capabilities. 
  In the later stages of the fighting, it will be up to the 
final strategic counterattack to completely crush the Indian 
assault. When the Chinese forces successfully assemble a force 
several times that of the Indian forces, and have a firm hold on 
air dominance, the time will be ripe for the strategic 
counterattack. At this time, the Chinese forces will have two 
options: The first option will be to break through the Indian 
frontal assault with the goal of routing the Indian forces. The 
second option will be to conduct a thrust or airborne actions 
behind Indian lines, including targets in India itself, and 
wiping out Indian forces there. Clearly, the second option 
falls in line with common combat principles. But the greatest 
danger is that it might lead to an escalation of the war. 
Whatever the choice, it must be made considering the situation 
at the time. Furthermore, one point is very clear. The final 
objective of the strategic counterattack will to be to end the 
ability of the Indian forces to pose a threat to China and to 
make the Indian authorities abandon their territorial demands 
against China. As for the number of enemy killed, this is only 
one condition necessary for achieving the strategic goal, "how 
excellent are forces which can conquer without fighting!" 
  In order to achieve the element of surprise in the 
counterattack and in order to achieve a rapid end to the 
fighting, the airborne actions will be coordinated with the 
attack on the front. This is a major tactic of counterattacking 
by the Chinese army. If the crack Indian divisions are 
surrounded and wiped out or suffer serious casualties, the 
situation will change very quickly. If the strategic 
counterattack is fought off by the Indian forces, the war will 
become mired down in a prolonged standoff. 
<H5>  Invisible Superiority Cannot Be Ignored </H5>
  It must be added that in space technology, the Chinese 
enjoy a clear superiority, and they may always have this 
superiority. India's space technology began in 1957. And while 
it has developed rapidly over the ensuing 30 plus years, its 
carrier rocket technology and its launch capability are still no 
match for China's. For example, India had only directly or 
indirectly launched l0 satellites by the end of 1989. Only two 
of these are still operating normally. The other eight have 
already become useless either because of malfunctions, or have 
reached the end of their time limits. It will take at least to 
the end of this century or the beginning of the next century for 
India to reach China's current level of space technology. By 
that time, China will already have begun to develop a space 
shuttle. The war in the Persian Gulf has made it clear that 
space technology has an important influence on wars. At the 
time, in order to monitor every move by Iraq and to determine 
the locations of major targets, the United States borrowed a 
number of satellites such as "Big Bird," "Lock Eyes" and "Hockey 
Ball" to provide the air forces and surface forces detailed 
intelligence information and so that Iraq was almost completely 
exposed to the eyes of the multinational force. We can see from 
this that in a war between China and India, superiority in space 
technology will allow the Chinese forces to be more effective 
and more precise in their force deployment, axis of attack and 
firepower. 
  In summation, can the Chinese forces repeat their glory of 
1962? Can they win a counterattack battle with India under 
modern conditions? The answer is affirmative. It is only that 
they will have to pay a higher price than in 1962. 
  It must be stressed that the consistent stand of the 
Chinese Government has always been that it will not make changes 
because its forces have become stronger, that it will primarily 
use peaceful means for a political settlement to resolve the 
territorial dispute. The Chinese Government has never provoked 
an armed conflict. Last year Premier Li Peng visited India, 
indicating that relations between China and India were moving 
toward a new stage. This illustrates the Chinese Government's 
honest intentions to actively develop friendly and cooperative 
relations with its bordering countries. It makes the statement 
to every Chinese soldier that war is a choice made only when it 
is forced upon us, and that best strategy is for a peaceful 
resolution of territorial disputes. 
<H5>  V: HOW TO COPE WITH THE THREAT FROM THE NORTH </H5>
  On a cold winter day 23 years ago, on the frozen ice of the 
Usuri River, there was an engagement between Chinese border 
defense forces and Soviet border defense forces, with a wide 
disparity in the size of forces. The Chinese forces which had 
never seen a T-62 new model tank relied on their spirit to 
"fight for the territorial integrity of the motherland," using 
82-mm recoilless rifles, 40-mm rocket launchers, infantry 
anti-tank mines in a life-and-death struggle with the Soviet 
forces. Although at the cost of over 100 lives, they fought 
back the Soviet provocation and captured a T-62 tank. The value 
of this tank is fully manifest in the later tank development in 
the Chinese forces. 
  At the time, while the Soviet General Staff was at a loss 
about what to do to get back the tanks which had been damaged, 
more startling news came in. During the assault, several dozen 
border defense soldiers had frozen to death in the snow. 
  Following a detailed investigation, they selected three 
divisions at random for an experiment in the snow. They quickly 
came to the conclusion that the reason these troops had frozen 
to death was that they had had no training on sleeping outside 
in below zero temperatures. Fortunately, several regular combat 
divisions were unable to reach the area by the time of the 
attack, or else even if the fighting had not escalated, the 
number of non-combat casualties would have reached four digits. 
  Both sides gained something and lost something in this 
fight. 
  Several months later, there was another clash between 
Chinese border defense forces and Soviet forces in the northwest 
border regions of Xinjiang. This time, the Soviets placed 
almost an entire battalion of regular combat elements into the 
battle, not border defense forces. The result was the death of 
an entire company of Chinese border defense forces. 
  This is from official records. There are some unofficial 
records, which are rumors and speculations which state that 
after this clash in Xinjiang, the Soviet forces intensified 
their forces and the forces breaking into Xinjiang territory 
reached an entire mechanized division. However, they were 
surprised by a huge mushroom shaped cloud which came down on 
their heads. After this, the Chinese Government announced that 
an atom bomb had been successfully exploded in western China. 
There was nothing the Soviet authorities could say. 
  Whether official records or unofficial records, it seems 
like it was only yesterday that it happened. 
<H5>  The Adversary Is Still Our "Older Brother" </H5>
  Even while the former Soviet Union was in ascendancy, 
China's forces were never really afraid of this military 
monster. This is the temperament of the Chinese people: never 
bow down to any outside pressure. Therefore, during the more 
than 20 years from the deterioration of relations between China 
and the Soviet Union to the break up of the Soviet Union, there 
were major forces facing each other across the Chinese Soviet 
border, ready to fight at the touch of a button. At that time, 
the Soviets had deployed one quarter of their combat units along 
their Far East border with China, and China deployed 75 percent 
of its forces to defend its Northern border. Although 
large-scale armed conflict or war never broke out, both sides 
paid a tremendous price for maintaining a combat readiness 
system and military balance to be able to "fight early, fight a 
large-scale war, and fight a nuclear war." 
  From conventional ammunition alone, it is possible to see 
the overall situation. Once China's vast military industrial 
production system had been turned up to high production to 
prepare for war with the Soviet forces, in a very short time of 
a few years, it allowed the 7.62-mm ammunition, various types of 
anti-tank rocket ammunition and bomb reserves of the Chinese 
military to reach a level where there was enough to fight a 
medium-scale war. There was more 7.62-mm ammunition alone than 
could be used in 10 years. This was a price to pay. Naturally, 
compared to the Soviet Union, the Chinese paid a much smaller 
price. 
  Today, the Soviet Union has been dismembered and the cold 
war is over. However, the greatest potential threat to China 
still comes from the north. The basic reason for this is that 
the Russians have inherited almost 80 percent of the military 
strength of the former Soviet Union. It is still the second 
strongest of the foremost military powers in the world. 
Furthermore, the Russians have a history of chauvinism. They 
are people with a strong expansionist nature. They will not be 
happy to be a second-class military power. In addition, 
Russia and China have historically "had border disputes," so 
just the existence of Russia alone is a great threat. The 
Russians are in the difficult position of internal struggles and 
economic straits. They are actively promoting peaceful 
diplomacy, and the military forces are undergoing a large-scale 
reduction. It looks as if they are nothing to be afraid of. 
However, when they are through this crisis and have escaped form 
the difficult conditions, they will begin recovery; it is hard 
to tell what the situation will be. 
  For China, the threat from the North underwent a basic 
change with the breakup of the Soviet Union. In addition to 
Russia, there are also Mongolia and Kazakhstan. Mongolia has a 
long land border with China. It also abuts Inner Mongolia. In 
January 1992, the Second Session of the 12th Mongolian Peoples' 
Congress passed a new constitution changing the name of the 
"Mongolian Peoples' Republic" to "Mongolia." The reason was 
primarily that Mongolia has a 2,200 year history, counting the 
785 years from the founding of Mongolia by Genghis Khan to the 
present day, and of these 785 years, the name of the country was 
Mongolia for 718 years. The name "Mongolians Peoples' Republic" 
is only 67 years old. We can see from this that Mongolia has 
begun its advance toward its goal of "Greater Mongolia." Such a 
result would directly lead to ripping Inner Mongolia from the 
map of China. Militarily, Mongolia is still no match for China 
on its own. There are only 24,500 Mongolian soldiers. It has 
21,000 men in the army with 650 tanks, 135 armored 
reconnaissance vehicles, 520 infantry combat vehicles, 450 
armored transport vehicles, 750 field pieces of various models, 
100 anti-aircraft guns, and 300 items of surface-to-air missile 
equipment. There are 3,500 men in the Air Force with more than 
30 fighters, 41 transports, and at least 10 helicopters. 
Obviously, Mongolia can only be considered to be a piddling 
country. Therefore, the only way it can achieve its goal of a 
"Greater Mongolia" is through stirring up sentiment for a racial 
division. 
  Kazakhstan has already had border territorial disputes with 
China. Most of what was once the western sector of the 
Sino-Soviet border is now the Sino- Kazakh border, which is more 
than 1,600 kilometers long. 
  In October 1991, the Kazakhstan Premier stated, while 
talking of the Sino-Soviet border dispute, "the way I see it, 
these lands were handed down to us generation after generation. 
We must not cede a single inch to any outsider." Beginning in 
the summer of 1991, the local governments of the Republic of 
Kazakhstan, for the purpose of "developing the economy on one 
hand and protecting national borders on the other," organized 
the herdsmen to go the borders to graze their herds there, 
disputing grazing facilities built in the area, seriously 
disrupting the situation along the Sino-Kazakh border and 
attracting the close scrutiny of the Chinese Government. Lying 
within the Republic of Kazakhstan is the Eastern Border Defense 
Military District, subordinate to the former Soviet Union 
National Security Council, and tasked with the responsibility 
for security on the Chinese border. The Republic of Kazakhstan 
does not currently have the ability to build an army of its own, 
so on one hand, it is calling for keeping a unified armed border 
force within the independent nations and on the other hand, is 
also calling for common control over the unified armed border 
forces. We can see from this that this Eastern Border Defense 
District could very possible become the basis for the 
Kazakhstanis to build their own army. 
  Both Mongolia and Kazakhstan could cause trouble for China, 
but neither is capable of doing anything militarily. The real 
threat is Russia. 
<H5>  Are the Russian Forces as Frightening as They Are Said To Be? </H5>
  Russia's military might is currently second in the world. 
This point is not to be doubted. However, occasionally there 
are a number of articles describing the Russian forces which 
miss the mark in quite a number of ways. In these articles, 
there is quite a bit of deliberately making them seem better 
than they really are. As for those who like to glorify data and 
use the names of weapons to scare people, if we had them go try 
to take on the Russians, they would be defeated and never know 
what had happened to them. The army of the former Soviet Union 
began in the thirties to use the "invisible" division type of 
structure. This system saved the Soviet Union, allowing it to 
escape defeat in World War II. They still use this system. At 
the beginning of World War II, one of the major errors of the 
German high command was in its calculations of the numbers of 
Soviet combat divisions. They had no understanding at all of the 
Soviet "Second Force." Therefore, they calculated 182 divisions 
according to the Soviet Union's conventional military 
establishment, while the Soviet Union actually had 303 
divisions. As a result, the German forces became mired down in 
a situation where "the more we fight the Soviet Red Army, the 
more of them there are." 
  The so-called "division system" is a double manning system. 
Each division commander has two deputy division commanders 
under him. One of these deputy commanders has a secret title, 
"commander of the second unit." Each regiment, battalion, and 
company works the same way. In this manner, when getting ready 
for war, one division can become two divisions overnight. 
  Similarly, during the cold war, the Soviet Union 
successfully used a series of tricks and deceptions to cover up 
its own weaknesses, and make it impossible for the United States 
to determine what was real and what was not. During the Cuban 
crisis, Khrushchev made the threat that with the push of a 
single button, capitalism will be blown to bits. When he made 
this statement, however, the Soviet rockets still had a major 
defect. The guidance system was completely unreliable and could 
not be deployed. When the United States began to deploy an 
anti-missile system, the Soviet Union had not considered this 
yet, but in a military parade, the Soviet Territorial Defense 
Forces displayed a huge rocket, making people believe it was an 
anti-missile missile. Actually, this rocket should have been 
with the Strategic Rocket Forces. There are any number of such 
deceptions. 
  There is a strategic deceptions bureau in the Soviet Army, 
whose function is to fabricate deceptions for security 
requirements. It has almost unlimited authority. It receives 
its orders from nowhere but the Kremlin. The misconceptions it 
creates last not for a few hours, but for a few years, for 
decades. 
  Early in the 1980's, a young German named Lewster flew a 
small civilian plane through the air defense network of the 
Warsaw pact with no problems at all and safely landed at the 
airport in Moscow. This not only shocked the authorities in the 
former Soviet Union, but also amazed the rest of the world. 
What had happened to the Russians' air defense system? Not 
long after that, the Soviets had announced that the Soviet 
Minister of Defense had been fired. This actually illustrates 
that there were frightening holes in the Soviet Union's air 
defense system. 
  In a large-scale exercise called "Lightning" in 1989, the 
battalion commander of a motorized battalion in the Soviet Army 
was relieved on the spot. The reason is silly and unbelievable. 
After this battalion commander received orders to "advance 
toward the assembly area," he did not take immediate action, but 
convened a battalion meeting to take a hand vote to see at 
exactly what time they should begin the advance. As a result, 
that battalion was two hours arriving at the assembly area. 
This incident, to a certain degree, reveals the problems in 
quality of some Soviet officers and problems with efficiency of 
military command. 
  As for weapons and equipment, the weapons of the various 
forces of the Soviet military have been far inferior to the 
Americans' for a long time. A small number of conventional 
weapons were not even as good as China's. Following the 
war in the Persian Gulf, China tackled the technology concerning 
a "stealth" bomber, and very quickly came out with her own 
model. This is something the Russians have never figured out. 
On the other hand, because of economic difficulties, a number of 
pieces of equipment they have been able to develop they have not 
been able to produce or use to equip the units. For example, the 
Yak-141 supersonic VTOL interceptor, which is best in the world, 
has been cancelled from the plans because of the poor economy. 
The Su-37 interceptor was only able to go into production after 
foreign cooperation. Because of the shortage of spare parts, 
the Air Force Tu-22 bomber has a readiness rate of only 30 to 40 
percent. Some have been grounded for more than six months. 
  From the late 1980's to the early 1990's, China enjoyed 
quite a few benefits in its flexible foreign policy. It was able 
to obtain advanced technology from the West, and coupled with 
low cost weapons from the Russians, they found it possible to 
upgrade the weapons and equipment of the Chinese forces into the 
next generation. Currently, the Chinese military forces are 
grasping the favorable opportunity when Russia has not yet 
"recovered" to accelerate the pace of advancing to next 
generation weapons and equipment, striving to reduce the degree 
by which it lags behind major military powers as quickly as 
possible. 
  Another factor worth noting is the serious amount of talent 
flow from the Soviet Union. This could have a fatal influence 
on future defense development in Russia. 
  Since the breakup of the former Soviet Union, more than 
70,000 top experts and technicians have already left the 
country, including 30,000 to the United States, 30,000 to 
Israel, 4,000 to Germany and 6,000 to France. These experts are 
a large part of the military's top technical people. Recently, 
the United States Strategic Defense Planning Agency drew up a 
plan to obtain as quickly as possible the scientific and 
technical personnel conducting the "Missile Defense Plan" for 
the former Soviet Union. Japan, Korea, Taiwan, and Libya are all 
doing all they can to obtain scientists and technicians from the 
former Soviet Union. We can see that because of political and 
economic difficulties, the flow of talent out of Russia is 
continuing. This will undoubtedly have a dampening effect on 
Russian military development which was not so great to start 
with. It may be believed that it will almost be impossible for 
the Russians to recapture their dream of being a military 
superpower. 
<H5>  Increasingly Less Pressure on Beijing </H5>
  During the time of the Sino-Soviet confrontation, there 
were a total of about 40 divisions of Soviet forces in the 
border region with China, called the million-man army. At that 
time, China estimated that there were nine axes along which the 
Soviet forces might break through. The one that worried China 
the most was a breakthrough along the China-Mongolia railroad 
where they would threaten China's heart, Beijing. This was 
because at the time the Soviets had as many as 180,000 troops 
stationed in Mongolia, constituting a direct threat to Beijing. 
  In 1981, the largest-scale live exercise in the history of 
its army was conducted in North China. This exercise was 
conducted with this strategic thought in mind. The area selected 
for the exercise was Zhangjiakou, northwest of Beijing. The 
exercise campaign was a campaign counterattack against a Soviet 
tank division and mechanized infantry forces which had broken 
through inside Chinese territory. In the exercise, they designed 
firepower assaults against temporary fortifications of 
concentrated tanks and mechanized infantry and infantry forces 
following tanks and combat vehicles on an assault on the enemy 
in makeshift defenses. They trained in coordinated combat 
between air forces, airborne forces, artillery forces, and 
infantry forces. 
  This large-scale military exercise reflected the concern of 
the Chinese over a Soviet attack on Beijing. 
  Following the breakup of the former Soviet Union, all of 
the Soviet forces in Mongolia withdrew, and one of the hidden 
dangers along the Sino-Mongolian border was eliminated. It was 
as if Beijing had been freed of a heavy burden. There were also 
major changes in the nine possible axes of breakthrough of the 
Soviet forces into China. Given the current status of the 
Russian military, it does not constitute a direct military 
pressure on China. The primary reason for this is that China's 
strategy has not constituted a direct threat to Russia, and 
correspondingly, Russia's strategic direction is not for the 
time being aimed at China. Secondly, the Russian armed forces 
are currently undergoing major restructuring and reform, and its 
peripheral forms are very complex. In addition to maintaining 
an alert to the West, it also wants to prevent the rise of the 
Ukraine as a political force. 
  From strategic considerations, the guiding philosophy of 
the Russians in building their army is "limited sufficiency," 
increasing its rapid-reaction capability to effectively resolve 
regional conflicts. Therefore, it will continue to reduce in 
total numbers its strategic military weapons and its 
conventional units, while maintaining a highly effective and 
highly capable strategic mobile force. 
  In strategic deployment, the Far East regions will not be 
weakened. However, the primary opponent will no longer be China 
alone, but will be a number of countries including the United 
States, Japan and Korea and China. Its primary defensive forces 
will be reduced in the western and central portions of Russia 
itself. Its combat strategy is "be capable of war outside the 
country, ensure territorial security." 
  In view of the situation described above, at the present 
time it is very difficult to predict what kind of war, on what 
kind of scale, along what kind of axis and in what area the 
Russian military might launch against China. Viewed from the 
present situation, China's Northeast is the primary sector where 
the two forces are facing each other. The largest and 
best-equipped military regions of both sides lie on either side 
of the border. The Russians have their Far East Military 
District with 22 mechanized divisions, two tank divisions, two 
artillery divisions, one airborne brigade, one campaign tactical 
rocket brigade and 585 combat aircraft. The Chinese have the 
Shenyang Military Region which has more men, tanks, armored 
vehicles, artillery of various types and its Air Force more 
combat aircraft than any other of China's military regions. 
Therefore, the possibility of a future armed conflict or local 
war between China and Russia is greatest for this region. 
<H5>  What Will We Use To Resist the Iron Forces of the Russians </H5>
  It is very difficult to imagine a future war between China 
and Russia. This is because of the multitude of changeable 
factors between these two countries, and the changes are very 
rapid, such as weapons upgrading, changes in combat concepts, 
use of new tactics, influences of political and diplomatic 
methods; all of these could cause the situation to change into 
something completely different, or the reverse might be true. 
However, when we place the object of our imagination outside of 
specific command warfare, it becomes of more practical value. 
  A war between China and Russia would be a three-dimensional 
war with coordination between all forces, with ground combat the 
primary method. There does not seem to be much dissent with 
this point. However, the important question is whether such a 
war between two nuclear powers would be fought without nuclear 
weapons. It is usually judged that the possibility of a nuclear 
war between two countries is extremely small, or nonexistent. 
  Although both countries lie within the nuclear strike zone 
of the other side, each has the capability of conducting 
destructive nuclear retaliation. However, the consequences of a 
major nuclear war would be "destroying the enemy and destroying 
oneself as well." However, this cannot eliminate the possibility 
of a nuclear shadow casting its pall over a conventional war. 
There are two prominent factors. One is the possibility that 
the Soviet forces could use tactical nuclear weapons to create a 
breach in our defenses. The second is the use of tactical 
nuclear weapons to stop an assault by the first echelon units or 
echelon formations which are attacking defenses in depth. This 
is a method which the Chinese forces could possibly use, 
especially on its own territory. Naturally, the Chinese 
government has stated time and again that it would never be the 
first to use nuclear weapons under any conditions. In other 
words, if the Russians do not use nuclear weapons in their 
attack, the Chinese forces would not break their promise. 
  We can reach a basic conclusion form all of this: Neither 
the Chinese nor the Russians had better push the nuclear button, 
but the nuclear trump card has not lost its deterrant role. 
  In a modern war primarily fought on the ground, the Russian 
"trump card" would obviously be the "king of the land battles," 
the tank. The Russians not only have more tanks than the 
United States, totalling almost 50,000, but they are 
leading-edge tanks. The area where a war between China and 
Russia could break out just happens to be the wide open spaces 
of the Northeast plains. This is where the tanks could really 
show their stuff. In number or quality of tanks, China is number 
three in the world, after Russia and the United States. 
However, in the next five years, it will be very difficult to 
surpass the Russians. Therefore, the very acute question facing 
the Chinese military is what can we use to hold back this iron 
wave of the Russian forces? 
  The reason the Russian attack is described using the term 
"iron wave" is that after World War II, concentration of tanks 
to break through defenses and for high-speed penetration has 
been the universally adopted method of attack of all countries. 
The military forces of the former Soviet Union have almost 
redefined the use of concentrations of tanks to an art. Their 
famous campaign theory of "great depth, wide front" and the 
various campaign and tactical principles related to this are all 
based on the use of concentrations of tanks. Even though the 
survivability of tanks is seriously challenged in a ground war 
under modern conditions, under conditions of coordinated combat 
of all forces, there is still nothing which can replace the 
breakthrough capability of concentrations of tanks. Also, for a 
fairly long time, the Russian military has been unable to 
gradually move to primarily aerial breakthrough as have the 
Americans. They primarily rely on the family of tanks left over 
from the former Soviet Union to fight primarily a ground 
assault. 
  With this precondition, it is not difficult to imagine that 
when the Russian forces launch a sudden attack into China, the 
Chinese defense forces stationed in hilly and flat regions will 
be facing a high-speed attack by hundreds and thousands of 
tanks. Furthermore, prior to this tank assault, they will have 
to withstand 40 to 60 minutes of aerial, missile, and collective 
artillery bombardment. The entire battlefield will be a wall of 
fire, everything will be torn up, and tanks and armored vehicles 
as thick as ants lined up in combat formation will come rumbling 
forward in a cloud of dust. There could also be swarms of 
helicopters covering the sky. This is what the Russian attack 
would look like, and it is not an exaggeration. 
  Naturally, how to resist attacks by concentrations of tanks 
is not a new problem for the Chinese military. 
  From the late 1960's to the 1980's, the Chinese forces have 
been doing research taking the forces of the former Soviet Union 
as their primary adversary. They have conducted a great deal of 
research and many exercises for battles against their primary 
breakthrough methods of concentrations of tanks. They have made 
fairly thorough preparations for actual combat and combat zone 
constructions, especially research in multiple force resistance 
of an enemy attack by concentrations of tanks under conditions 
of inferior equipment. It can be said that it has been very 
effective. Under the guiding philosophy of "dig holes deep, 
store grain everywhere, never seek hegemony," in the 1960's and 
1970's the Chinese forces constructed large amounts of permanent 
defensive fortifications so they would always be ready to "fight 
an early war, fight a large war, fight a nuclear war" along the 
axis of possible Soviet invasions. These fortifications are 
already there to be used to resist an army of Russian tanks. 
  Some people believe that when an infantry division can hold 
off a tank division, then a stable defensive structure can be 
constructed, with strong fores not being too strong and weak 
forces not being too weak, so both sides will be equal on the 
battlefield. This view is not unreasonable, and actually the 
Chinese forces already have this type of capability; it is just 
that it is not just a pure infantry division fighting (in actual 
combat, there is also no such thing as an attack by a pure tank 
division), but is a joint forces coordinated combat. 
  What then are the present and future technical and tactical 
means with which the Chinese forces can hold off an attack by 
concentrations of tanks? 
  For offensive weapons, the various types of anti-tank 
missiles are the most effective and the most threatening 
"killer." Currently, the Chinese forces not only have anti-tank 
missile detachments universally assigned throughout their 
infantry forces, but the Army Air Forces also have 
air-to-surface anti-tank missiles. Second, the Chinese forces 
have sufficient numbers of tanks and armored combat vehicles 
which are less than first rate, and quite a few which are first 
rate. In a defensive war, tanks and armored vehicles positioned 
in hidden locations will pose a threat to advancing enemy tanks 
which is second only to anti-tank missiles because tank to tank 
effectiveness is one to one. Third are helicopters and 
attack aircraft. Normally, the most effective weapons against 
tanks are aerial weapons which attack the tops of the tanks 
which offer a large target and a high hit rate. Also, the armor 
is weaker on top. However, without air superiority, it is 
difficult to bring these weapons into play and China does not 
have helicopters and attack aircraft in the numbers and quality 
of the two previous types of anti-tank weapons. Fourth is to 
bring the various types of anti-tank artillery into play. In 
addition to the heavy suppression guns, the artillery pieces 
which can be used directly against tanks are the 85-mm gun, the 
82-mm recoilless rifle and the 105-mm recoilless rifle. Fifth 
is the infantry one-man rocket launcher. In close-range combat, 
the one-man rocket launcher is a great threat to tanks, non only 
are there large numbers of these weapons, but they are easily 
carried and can often deal a fatal blow from a blind spot 
outside of the tank's vision. 
  Large mine fields made up of various types of anti-tank 
mines are primary defensive weapons and tactics which restrict 
the movement of enemy tanks. The Chinese forces currently 
possess all types of anti-tank mines. They also have high-speed 
mine laying methods such as rocket mine laying and aerial mine 
laying. Methods used in conjunction with mine field construction 
include such obstacles as anti-tank trenches, dragon's teeth, 
and abatis. Along the primary defensive axes, a mixed obstacle 
area is usually set up which is more than 50 meters wide and 
more than 200 meters deep. On plains, defensive battles at the 
regimental scale and higher, a large scale anti-tank network of 
defensive positions are usually constructed and combined with 
the obstacle zone to form a single area 2,000 to 3,000 meters 
wide and 1,500 to 2,000 meters deep. In the positions, there is 
a criss cross pattern of trenches with mine fields scattered 
throughout. In addition, these are various types of fixed 
obstacles, forming a complex variable network defensive system. 
This provides ideal concealment, mobility and firing positions 
for the various anti-tank weapons. When tanks enter them, it is 
very difficult for them to move, it is difficult for them to 
protect their flanks, and it is difficult to protect against 
attacks from every direction. This type of network defensive 
system also makes it possible for individual soldiers to attack 
tanks. Because the mobility of the tanks is limited, and 
because they have to keep moving laterally and turning, the 
infantry forces scampering through all the tunnels can use 
magnetic mines, demolition and explosive charges against the 
tanks, and can even conduct an assault against the tanks, making 
it impossible for the tanks to defend themselves. 
  As for tactics, the Chinese forces will ordinarily intercept 
advancing enemy tanks along the primary axis of attack by 
conducting long-range, intermediate-range, and close-range 
firepower blockades. When the tanks have advanced to within 40 
kilometers and are massing, the attached defensive artillery 
groups and army airborne units will conduct firepower harassment 
against the tanks. When the tanks have entered the 3,000 meter 
sector and deployed, the anti-tank missiles and direct-aim 
artillery pieces will begin firing. At the same time, 
suppression guns will conduct a firepower assault, trying to 
disrupt the tank formation. When the tanks have advanced to 
within 1,000 meters and have begun to fire on the defensive 
positions, the intermediate- and close-range anti-tank firepower 
will switch over to firing at the second echelon tank forces. 
At this time, the infantry forces and the other troops in the 
positions will be concealed, and when the tanks charge up to the 
obstacle zone 500 meters from the positions and the enemy 
suppression fire is extended to areas inside the defensive 
areas, the various close-range anti-tank weapons will all be 
thrown into the battle. 
  To prevent the enemy from changing direction, the defensive 
units will usually have under their command a strong reserve 
consisting of tanks, armored combat vehicles, helicopter 
gunships, and missile detachments that can carry out high-speed 
blocking actions against the enemy axis of attack. 
  It must be strongly emphasized that because the trend toward 
"aerializing" modern ground combat has already begun, and 
because the firepower assault mode of army air forces plus 
concentrations of tanks has already been formed, the stability 
of infantry ground defenses are determined by their ability to 
defend against aerial attack, and the individual soldier's air 
defense weapons and positional air defense weapons are crucial 
equipment. However, this just happens to be a current weakness 
of the Chinese ground forces. 
<H5>  The Idea of an Aggressive Defense Must Be Carried Out </H5>
  If Russia throws one tank division and two mechanized 
infantry divisions into combat in the first stage of its 
strategic attack, its surface assault strength would be around 
500 combat vehicles and 30,000 combat personnel. It would be 
unimaginable to rely purely on a frontal defense against a 
high-speed mobile combat force with such strong firepower as 
this. 
  The so-called aggressive defense refers to the need to 
conduct a strong assault on the enemy flanks, rear, or second 
echelon forces at the same time as the frontal defense to 
quickly break up the enemy's assault. When possible, we must 
surround and wipe out enemy forces that have broken through. 
This is what is known as a "defensive attack." 
  Therefore, while the Chinese forces are carrying out a 
frontal defense against the Russians, they should prepare to 
launch a counterattack on the attacking Russian tanks and 
mechanized infantry forces. This mission is usually the 
responsibility of the campaign reserves under the control of the 
group army. There is a fairly wide choice of directions and 
methods of campaign counterattack. Based on the deployment of 
the Russian forces and the conditions at the time, the three 
following situations at least must be considered. 
  First, conduct a flank attack on the attacking enemy, wiping 
out its first echelon units. The Chinese campaign reserves will 
be mainly composed of tanks and mechanized infantry forces. 
When the Russian forces are assaulting frontal defenses, the 
Chinese campaign reserves will began flanking actions against 
them. When the Chinese suppression firepower is bombarding the 
Russian second echelon forces, the reserve forces should launch 
a flanking assault on the Russian forces when the assault of 
Russian first echelon units has been slowed or stopped. In this 
manner, even if they are unable to completely wipe out the 
Russian first echelon units, they will completely break up the 
Russian's first assault. The advantages of this method are that 
it breaks down the morale of the enemy, it is easy to 
accomplish, and chances of success are higher. 
  Second, conduct fairly large scale attacks on the Russian 
rear forces so that the first and second echelons that have 
broken through can be surrounded and wiped out. This method 
requires twice as many reserves, and tanks act as the primary 
forces for the penetration attack, followed by mechanized 
infantry forces. It is possible to have this method evolve into 
a strategic counterattack, when the situation permits, using one 
to three divisions of rapid- reaction forces to launch an 
assault on positions deep within the Russian Far East Military 
Region, aiming at the command center of the Far East Military 
Region. This would mean that the fires of war had reached 
Russian soil. If it is possible to make the attacking Russian 
forces retreat quickly, abandoning their earliest strategic 
objectives, it is also possible that it would cause the Russian 
forces to form an attack on an even larger scale. 
  Third, conduct an attack on the Russian rear supply 
facilities. Large scale tank battles require large amounts of 
fuel. To provide services for the distant combat of the 
attacking forces, the Russian forces would need to set up at 
least three field pipelines and one to two mobile supply routes. 
These would be the lifeline of the attack forces. Should this 
be cut off by the Chinese forces, the attack would be paralyzed. 
In an attack on the Russian rear supply routes, the Chinese 
could use a large number of forces and methods. Air forces, 
missile units, tank and armored assault forces, and campaign 
artillery groups could all be used. This would be a tremendous 
threat to the Russians. 
  In addition to the forms described above, depending on the 
terrain conditions of the combat zone, the Chinese forces could 
also make an issue of the assault defensive system, deploying in 
advance sufficient forces on either side of the primary axes of 
the Russian assault to form pocket defenses. In accomplishing 
this, the key problem is how to conceal this from the Russian 
reconnaissance and monitoring systems and how to mislead the 
Russians. 
  In sum, there are a number of topics the Chinese can study 
concerning how to deal with large Russian tank forces. However, 
as their equipment and technical measures become more and more 
modernized, the Chinese forces will become even more confident 
of success. 
<H5>  VI. CAN THE THREE GORGES PROJECT BE PROTECTED? </H5>
  "The 900 miles of the Three Gorges, 900 twists and turns, 
9,000 boats, 990,000 nets, 90,000 new homes, 90,000,000 mu of 
orchards, and 900,000 new residents sing beneath the bright 
sunny skies." The boats float upon the waters in the Three 
Gorges reservoir, loaded with tangerines, apples, vegetables, 
and pharmaceuticals. There has been another bountiful harvest 
around the Three Gorges reservoir. 
  My friends, when you hear this song, do you think about some 
of the events that came up while the idea of the Three Gorges 
was discussed? 
<H5>  Forty Billion Cubic Meters of Water Hanging Over Their Heads </H5>
  Fourteen different "Feasibility Studies of the Three Gorges 
Project," -- stacked on top of each other they would be one 
meter high. When the People's Congress approved these reports, 
the vote was not unanimous. At that time the report only 
mentioned that "of 412 experts, 402 have signed this report. 
Nine experts are in opposition to this report and have not 
signed it. These nine experts who did not sign the report had 
sufficient reason for their reservations. They could bring out 
pile after pile of detailed reports to make the experts who did 
sign the report feel that the pen they signed with was heavy 
indeed. There was one reason that was commonly held and which 
carried a great deal of weight: They would not be responsible 
for hanging the "Sword of Damocles" -- made up of 40 billion 
cubic meters of water -- over the heads of the tens of millions 
of people downstream on the Chang Jiang. 
  Back in September of 1969, when the Deputy Chairman of the 
Hubei Provincial Revolutionary Committee, Zhang Tixue, once more 
proposed the Three Gorges Project to Chairman Mao, Chairman Mao 
pointed out, "We are not now thinking about the Three Gorges, we 
are getting ready for war." He asked Zhang Tixue, "Would you be 
afraid to have 20 billion cubic meters of water hanging over 
your head?" 
  Does this statement mean that Chairman Mao was opposed to 
the 
Three Gorges? In 1956 he wrote in a poem, "building a rock wall 
will block the river in the west, cutting off the rain water 
from the mountains, turning it into a lake. The goddess should 
remain in good health, and the world will be amazed." The 
construction of the Three Gorges Reservoir to bring prosperity 
to all of the descendents of the Yellow Emperor was his lifetime 
ambition. 
  Similarly, several experts did not sign the feasibility 
report, but this was not to oppose the building of the 
reservoir. From 1959 until the report on the construction of 
the Three Gorges had been reviewed and passed by the National 
People's Congress, a span of 30 years, research and testing of 
air defense for the Three Gorges project continued unabated. 
  It would make sense that military experts would have the 
best 
reasons to cast dissenting votes. However, professor Yin 
Zhishu, deputy chairman for science and technology of the 
General Staff Engineer Command did sign the report. He also 
continued scientific research and testing for air defense of the 
Three Gorges Project. He said that he signed the report because 
Sandouping was selected as the site for the dam, and if the 
original site, Nanjinguan, had been selected, he would have 
refused to sign. He said, "It was extremely fortunate that 
Sandouping was selected. From Liantuo to Nanjinguan there are 
20 kilometers of narrow gorges and there are three 90 degree 
turns; this greatly reduces the peak flow at the dam. When the 
reservoir is at its maximum water level of 175 meters, if the 
dam should collapse and the water in the reservoir be released, 
the maximum water level at Shashi would be 45.75 meters, 1.25 
meters below the top of the levee." However, this view of his 
caused him to be criticized by others in the military. "This is 
risk-taking. Do you really think that an enemy would only bomb 
your Three Gorges and would not bomb your levees?" 
  This is true. At his home the night before he signed the 
report, several of his old comrades-in-arms kept repeating what 
had happened in the past. 
  During the 100 years from 1849 to 1949 there had been seven 
major floods on the Chang Jiang, averaging one every 14 years! 
  There were especially large floods in 1860 and 1870. There 
were major breaks in the levies of the Xinjiang, inundating more 
than 30 counties and resulting in several million deaths. 
  In the major flood in 1931, in the area of the middle 
reaches 
of the river, 50.9 million mu were covered and 145,000 people 
died. Hankou was flooded for an entire month. Boats sailed in 
the streets of the city, and the Beijing to Hankou railroad was 
washed out. 
  In the major flood in 1935, in a single night in the middle 
and lower reaches of the Hanjiang, 30,000 people were drowned. 
Also, 30,000 people were drowned in the middle and lower 
reaches of the Lijiang. 
  The most unforgettable flood was in the summer of 1949 when 
their units were being led south through Hebei and Hunan and 
came up against a major flood in the Chang Jiang. This flood 
was comparable to the flood in 1931 when more than 140,000 
people drowned. 
  The purpose of the reservoir was to eliminate flooding 
disasters, but building the reservoir could possibly cause a 
flooding disaster. 
  It is true that there are two sides to everything, one 
favorable and one unfavorable. The Three Gorges Project will 
be, after all, a world class major reservoir covering l9 
counties and cities in two provinces. From Sun Yatsen to Mao 
Zedong, from the Nationalists to the Communists, from American 
Hydraulic Engineering expert Safanqi [5646 0416 1142] to all the 
decedents of the Yellow Emperor in China, who has not dreamed of 
damming up the Three Gorges? Who has not dreamed of holding 
back the Chang Jiang to create prosperity for the people? 
  In choosing between disadvantages and advantages, the 
representatives of the National People's Congress saw that the 
advantages outweighed the disadvantages and finally passed the 
resolution (to build the Three Gorges Project). The thing is, 
when they passed this resolution, they placed a tremendous 
responsibility on the shoulders of the Chinese military to 
protect the Three Gorges Project. This responsibility concerned 
the safety of several hundred million fellow countrymen. It 
involved the overall growth of the nation. It was every bit as 
critical as fighting a local war! 
  The threat of future wars did not keep work from beginning 
on 
the Three Gorges Project. 
  Neither did the beginning of work on the Three Gorges 
Project 
reduce the possibility of war. 
  The heavy responsibility of defending the Three Gorges 
during 
wartime naturally fell upon the shoulders of our soldiers. 
  Can the Three Gorges Project be preserved in the event of a 
future war? 
<H5>  Where Lies the Danger in the Three Gorges Project? </H5>
  Once work begins on the Three Gorges Project, it will 
necessarily become a major strategic project in any future war. 
Therefore, a series of defensive measures for the Three Gorges 
Project will all have to be considered in terms of strategic 
importance. Because the Three Gorges Project is located in the 
interior, and since it is a fixed military strategic target 
which is easily attacked and difficult to defend, defenses will 
have to be passive. Therefore, the establishment an infallible 
defensive system is a very complicated problem of system 
engineering. 
  The decision to finally begin work on the Three Gorges 
illustrates that the Chinese have sufficient confidence and 
determination in its defense. The military is at least 70 to 80 
percent confident. Otherwise, they would be playing games with 
the lives of several million people. 
  How a defensive system for the Three Gorges Project is to be 
established has naturally become a key state secret. We cannot 
describe its specifics, but from the public statements of a 
number of military experts concerning research reports, we can 
make a few approximations and guesses. 
  When will the period of danger begin? 
  The Three Gorges Project will last into the next century. It 
will not be completed until the year 2008. This is a span of 15 
years, but no one can say for sure if China will be involved in 
a war in the next 15 years. No one can say what kind of changes 
will occur in the world military struggle during these 15 years. 
China recently announced that the flow of water would begin to 
be cut off in 1997. That is to say, the period of danger will 
begin in 1997. Cutting off the flow will not cause the water 
level upstream to reach the maximum height of 175 meters, but 
after the flow has been cut off, the water level will be 
sufficient to constitute a threat downstream. Therefore, the 
various defensive deployments should be basically completed in 
1997 to deal with any situation that might develop. 
<H5>  What Kind of Attack Might Be Launched Against the Three </H5>
Gorges? 
  There are many different methods that could be use to attack 
the Three Gorges, but an analysis of the results of an attack 
and the conditions under which the assault would be launched 
shows that there are four major possible methods. 
  Strategic Nuclear Warhead: This could be launched directly 
form the enemy's own soil, and a direct attack by a single 
warhead could achieve the objective of destroying the dam. If 
MIRV warheads were used, not only would the probability of a 
direct hit be greater, but the capability of breaking through 
defenses would be greater. It would be easily accomplished. 
The risk of this method is that it would be subject to 
international pressure and nuclear retaliation by China. 
  Conventional Missiles: These are launched with better 
mobility, are easy to prepare, have less effect, and usually 
require a number of missiles to make direct hits to accomplish 
the objective of breaking through defenses. 
  Aerial Bombardment: This is the use of long-range bomber 
groups to conduct a bombing assault on the Three Gorges Dam. 
This would be a reasonable move in a major war. The hit rate 
would be much higher than for a bridge or building. Naturally, 
in the use of air forces, the major difficulty would be solving 
the problem of air defense. Unlike the first two methods, 
bombers would be facing attacks by aerial combat and surface 
firepower. 
  Demolition: This is using crack special forces detachments 
to 
perform destructive demolition on the Three Gorges Dam. Since 
World War II, this has been a method easily imagined by military 
strategists. The most outstanding advantage to this method is 
that it is covert, sudden, and highly reliable. The 
disadvantages are that it would be an extremely complex mission 
to organize, it would take a fairly long time to conduct 
simulation training, and the technical requirements would be 
very high. 
  From current military developments in countries around the 
world and their strategic relationships with China, the 
countries that are capable of using the methods of attack 
described above and that constitute a threat to the Three Gorges 
Project are the United States, Japan, Russia, and India. This 
is to say that these countries are the ones the Three Gorges 
Project must be protected against and that special deployments 
against the attack capabilities of these nations must be 
conducted. If we can defend against attacks from these four 
nations, then it would be an easy task to defend against other 
nations. 
<H5>  The First Sky Network: Anti-Missile Missile Defense System </H5>
  The objective of future local wars will not be the Three 
Gorges. The Three Gorges will, however, be a primary target in 
future regional wars. 
  Since the Three Gorges Project will be a major strategic 
target, its strategic defensive deployment must be placed within 
the national strategic defense system, and it must not be an 
independent defense system. 
  The significance of this is that this network will not only 
protect the Three Gorges but will also cover major cities along 
the Chang Jiang such as Chengdu, Wuhan, Zhenzhou, Nanchang, 
Nanjing, and Shanghai, as well as such strategic centers as 
Sichuan, Yunnan, Guizhou, Hunan, Henan, Anhui, Zhejiang, 
Jiangxi, Fujian, and Guangdong -- a large portion of China. 
  The primary mission of this network will be to intercept 
outside the atmosphere ballistic missiles coming from all 
directions. Its deployment will not require a special 
adjustment. This is because the deployment of China's 
anti-missile missiles is a mixture of fixed launch points and 
mobile launch points. They are ground based or sea launched. 
The Second Artillery and the naval submarine forces are 
responsible for launching anti-missile missiles. There are 
currently two major weapons which they use. 
  The first is the CZ-AI anti-missile missile. It is much 
smaller than the Changzheng-I and the Changzheng-II, with which 
people are familiar. It is also much less expensive, but can be 
used for interceptions inside and outside the atmosphere. 
Flight time is less than that of the Galosh missile. It has 
cruise capability and is equipped with a rocket engine capable 
of multiple start-ups and shut downs. After launch, the engine 
is shut down, and the missile glides while awaiting further 
guidance instructions. Then the engine is restarted for powered 
intercept. 
  Second is the CZ-B-01 anti-missile missile, which began 
being 
deployed in the 1990's. This is a terminal intercept missile 
based on modifications to the SZ-12 surface-to-air missile. The 
missile is equipped with a new high-speed two-aspect target 
tracking radar. It has supersonic intercept speeds and can 
reach its target within five minutes. It is claimed that the 
missile can destroy all types of ICBMs, including the U.S. MX 
missile. 
  The keys to how well this sky network will operate are the 
reaction speed and precision of the system. To improve the 
combat capabilities of this system, the Chinese are developing 
better radars, planning to set up a large combat command phased 
array radar in the area of the Nanling Mountains, and will set 
up three phased array control radars in Taian in Shandong (where 
the three provinces of Zhejiang, Fujian, and Jiangxi come 
together), in the Huangling Mountains, and in the Xichang area 
of Sichuan. This system will be capable of monitoring and 
tracking Trident missiles launched from U.S. submarines in the 
Pacific. To improve radar surviveability, they will also 
actively develop mobile phased array radars. 
<H5>  The Second Sky Network: Three-Dimensional Intercepts Within </H5>
the Atmosphere 
  In certain ways, the second "Sky Network" is the key to the 
defense system. One reason for this is China's current 
relatively superior capability for interceptions within the 
atmosphere, and China's technology and equipment could easily 
meet strategic requirements. On the other hand, there are many 
possible means of enemy attack within the atmosphere, and 
defense is more difficult. Therefore, protection of air space 
within the atmosphere is an extremely critical link. 
  Defense systems for inside the atmosphere are divided into 
high, medium, and low altitude defenses. High altitude refers 
to air space over 2,000 meters above the earth. Medium refers 
to altitudes between 500 and 2,000 meters, and low refers to 
below 500 meters. The forces primarily responsible for this 
defense mission are the Second Artillery, the Air Force, the Air 
Force Surface Air Defense Forces, and the Army Air Defense 
Forces. The primary weapons are surface-to-air missiles, F-7, 
F-8, and Su-27 combat aircraft, one-man anti-aircraft missiles, 
and various types of anti-aircraft artillery and machine guns. 
  We can imagine that there will be a relatively large number 
and a complex mix of men and weapons composing the second Sky 
Network, so a special deployment will be required. The basic 
principles of this deployment will be a sequentially dispersed 
deployment of the following forces, listed in order of proximity 
to the Three Gorges Dam: ground forces air defense units, Air 
Force air defense units, Second Artillery units, and Air Force 
aerial combat units. Their missions will be as follows: The 
Second Artillery will be primarily responsible for high altitude 
defense. Medium and low altitude defense will be the 
responsibility of the Air Force and Army air defense units. 
  It must be stressed that militaries throughout the world are 
paying more and more attention to the role of surface-to-air 
intercept missiles. The experience of the Gulf War was that 
advanced intercept missiles are the most effective air defense. 
The technical level of the surface-to-air missiles with which 
Chinese units are now equipped cannot yet meet defensive 
requirements. 
  Exactly what kind of missiles will be used? Military experts 
have conducted conscientious research and testing, and from the 
standpoints of economics, effectiveness, and feasibility, they 
believe that they will opt for the Soviet Galosh intercept 
missile. This is a modification of the "Gelifeng" [2706 6849 
0023] intercept missile. It uses a two or three stage solid (or 
liquid) fuel rocket with greater power and higher rate of 
intercept. It is capable of high altitude intercepts, and it 
has a much higher precision than rocket artillery. 
  Beginning in 1964, four of these defensive systems were 
deployed around the perimeter of the Soviet Union. Each 
defensive system was divided into two groups, and each group had 
eight intercept missile launchers (for a total of 64 launchers), 
one large tracking radar, and two intercept missile guidance 
radars. Two of these were dismantled in 1982, and by 1988, 
because the "Sentinel" intercept missile system has been shut 
down, the Galosh is the only anti-missile system in the world 
with active capabilities. 
  This sort of system in the area of the Three Gorges would 
not 
be much different than the one in Moscow. It would be formed of 
two defensive systems, one each on the north and south banks. 
Each system would be composed of three launch groups and each 
launch group would have nine launchers, for a total of 54 
launchers. This is sufficient for a missile defense barrier in 
the area of the dam. However, as a wartime strategic defense 
system, it still has some serious shortcomings, primarily the 
following three: 
<H5>  The Nerve Center of the Sky Network: the Shenzhou </H5>
C[.sup]3[/]I System 
[page 51 of original missing] 
...land-based non-nuclear intercept missiles including 70 
exosphere re-entry interceptors (ERIS) and 30 upper atmosphere 
defense interceptors (HEDI) using Changzheng missile launch 
silos. 
  2. Monitoring and Tracking: In addition to using current 
early warning satellites and early warning radar, terminal 
imaging radar and three surface transmission surveillance and 
tracking radars will be deployed. 
  3. Combat Management (C[.sup]3[/]I): This will be composed 
of target early warning centers, combat control centers and 
communications centers with early warning satellites, 
communications satellites, and early warning radars. 
<H5>  The Defense System Must Be Built in Stages </H5>
  The overall defense system can be built in six stages as 
work 
progresses on the Three Gorges dam. 
  The first step will be taken in 1994. This will be the 
deployment of land-based long-range intercept missiles in 
conjunction with current early warning sensors. This can be 
accomplished with current technological capabilities, and will 
provide a certain priority defense and will also be able to deal 
with accidental launches, third country attacks, and terrorist 
attempts. 
  The second step will be taken in 1996. Without violating the 
ABM treaty, a new generation of air surveillance systems will be 
deployed to improve early warning detection and identification 
capabilities against a missile attack and to lay a foundation 
for future defense systems to handle larger scale and more 
complex attacks. At the same time, a certain number of air 
force and air defense units will be deployed. 
  The third step will be taken in 1998. A system will be 
deployed to protect national command authorities against a 
missile attack (to include a submarine launched missile attack). 
It will include the use of short range interceptors and ought 
to employ a multiple capability surface-to-air missile system 
which can be used against ballistic missiles, cruise missiles, 
and bombers. Improved versions of the Shenzhou and Changzheng 
anti-missile missiles are candidates for this stage. 
  The fourth step will be taken in the year 2000. In this 
stage, the scale of the defense system will be expanded and will 
include additional anti-missile missile launch sites, additional 
numbers of interceptors, and improved sensors that will be able 
to handle countermeasures. All air force and air defense units 
will be in position. 
  The fifth step will be taken in the year 2004. It will 
consist of the addition of space-based interceptors to conduct 
boost stage and post-boost stage intercepts. 
  In the year 2008, when the Three Gorges project will be 
completed, the sixth step will be taken. This will be the 
addition of space-based and land-based directed energy weapons. 
  While deploying the air defense system, in addition to armed 
security units to protect the dam, it will also be necessary to 
deploy two or three regiments of army special forces to deal 
with any intrusion by groups of enemy agents. These steps will 
basically meet the requirements of a three-dimensional defense. 
<H5>  No Defense Is Perfect </H5>
  Imagine, in a certain month of a certain year, war finally 
breaks out. 
  On the first day, missiles swarm like bees. Our 
C[.sup]3[/]I system is totally activated and the intercept 
rate is 99 percent. The missiles become casualties of war, 
exploding in the atmosphere. 
  The next day, the war suddenly cools down, and electronic 
pulse blips appear on a number of radar screens. 
  On the third day, a long-range missile attacks the dam. It 
is recognized by almost none of the surveillance systems. Why 
did the C[.sup]3[/]I system become blocked? 
  Computers determine that the C[.sup]3[/]I system was 
damaged. 
  The reserve system is turned on. It will not operate. 
  The emergency system is activated. It will not operate 
either. 
  None of the three sets of C[.sup]3[/]I reserve equipment 
will operate. Why is this? 
  This is what could possibly happen in future local wars. 
Even now, a number of military powers already possess means and 
capabilities to deal with three- dimensional defense systems. 
They all fall into the following categories of high science and 
technology. 
  1. Direct laser radiation from a satellite to damage all air 
defense electronic equipment. 
  The former Soviet Union began research on laser weapons in 
the early 1960's, and it had a huge development plan. In the 
1970's, it spent nine times as much as the United States on high 
energy laser weapons, totalling as much as $10 billion. After 
the 1980's, it was spending three to four times as much as the 
United States. As for the scope of the Soviet laser weapons 
development plan, the Americans sighed, "to match the scale of 
the Soviet laser weapons plan, the United States would have to 
spend about $1 billion per year." 
  The United States has already set up more than eight large 
development plants and test sites as well as 15 large research 
centers. There are more than 10,000 scientists, engineers, and 
technicians conducting laser weapons research operations at 
almost 30 facilities. Most of their work is concentrated at the 
missile test center in Texas. In addition, they have 
established high power infrared laser experimental stations in 
Florida, the northern and central Appalachians, Mount Ranier, 
Death Valley in California, the Alaskan Peninsula, and at Keboke 
[4430 0130 0344], 100 kilometers south of the Brooks Range. 
These are responsible for developing and testing various types 
of directed energy weapons as well as related research and 
testing. 
  Japan also has a group of outstanding scientists who are 
conducting research on laser weapons. For example, a physics 
professor at the leading Sendai Institute of Physics is working 
on a particle beam weapon and another professor is working on it 
with him. Both are famous scientists well known in the Western 
scientific community. They are conducting high energy 
industrial laser research and have made great accomplishments in 
using lasers to cut and weld metals. In 1968, physicist Okada 
Kimisa [Gangtian Junzuo 1511 3944 0689 0146] made and operated 
the world's first hydrogen fluoride laser. This laser and the 
similar deuterium fluoride laser can both be used as laser 
weapons, especially space-based laser weapons. In 1970, 
physicist Fumi Taro [Shi Tailang 0670 1132 6745] and other 
scientists presented a report on gas kinematic carbon dioxide 
laser weapon research, with progress in this area of research 
almost equal to that of the United States. 
  In the early 1980's, a U.S. reconnaissance satellite 
detected 
that the former Soviet Union was building a directed energy 
weapon at Sary Shagan, and the United States believed that it 
was a type of iodine laser. In addition, a gas kinematics 
carbon dioxide laser had already been put into use at Luoyiqike 
[5012 0122 7871 0344]. The United States believes that the 
laser in Sary Shagan has already destroyed a number of reentry 
missile warheads. Also, the former Soviet Union has also 
developed land-based lasers for air defense missions. It is 
widely believed in the West that the former Soviet Union already 
possesses the ability and technology to manufacture space 
weapons. On 13 October 1985, Secretary of Defense Weinberger 
stated in a speech to the World Affairs Commission in 
Philadelphia that "the Soviets currently possess land-based 
laser weapons that can jam our satellites. By the end of the 
1980's, they may possess prototypes of land-based laser weapons 
that can shoot down ballistic missiles. In the early 1990's, 
the Soviets will begin experimenting with their use as part of a 
large scale deployment system. The Soviets place top priority 
on airborne lasers, primarily for use in anti-satellite warfare, 
protection of major space facilities, and dealing with incoming 
cruise missiles. It is estimated that they will begin small 
scale deployment in the 1990's. 
  According to an article in Japan's READER'S DIGEST, the 
United States continues to do research on gas kinematics lasers, 
discharge lasers, chemical lasers, eximer lasers, X-ray lasers, 
gamma ray lasers, and argon ion lasers. The types of lasers 
being researched by the United States and the former Soviet 
Union are about the same. However, U.S. officials believe that 
it is possible that their lasers are somewhat better than those 
of the former Soviet Union. The former Soviet Union possesses 
several pioneer lasers, and their operational level is very 
high. The X-ray laser is an example. The Soviets discovered 
during thermonuclear atmospheric testing back in 1958 that the 
X-rays produced by thermonuclear blasts can render ICBMs 
ineffective. This was the basis which later led to the 
development of X-ray lasers. In 1972, Soviet scientists 
published papers on the principles of X-ray and gamma ray 
lasers. It was not until 1980, however, that the United States 
first achieved an X-ray laser from a nuclear explosion. The 
Soviets have done a great deal of work on X-ray optics and on 
non-nuclear aspects. They have manufactured large pulse lasers 
which use conventional explosive blasts to be the energy source 
to produce pulse lasers. It is estimated that this type of 
laser could be placed into use in the 1990's. 
  Russia believes that the United States has installed a high 
power high energy laser near the Kennedy Space Center. This 
could be used for anti-missile or anti-satellite missions. To 
achieve its needs, the United States is paying special attention 
to the development of airborne lasers. In the 1990's, the 
United States could begin limited deployment of these on the 
space shuttle for anti-satellite and anti-cruise missile 
missions and to protect airborne equipment. 
  The United States estimates that the Soviets may have 
conducted experiments on laser generators and their killing 
mechanism on their "SALUD-5" space station to develop 
space-based laser weapons. The Soviets may very possibly test 
space laser weapons in the early 1990's. These may have power 
rated in the megaWatts with ranges of as much as 100 to 1,000 
km. The former Soviet Union has on a number of occasions 
conducted laser target firing tests, shooting down missiles in 
flight. An U.S. laser expert believes that the best data on the 
damage to target meterials and mechanisms of lasers are found in 
Soviet articles. 
  Naturally, just developing a laser is not enough to make a 
laser weapon. A series of other technologies are also required, 
such as a small, effective, and strong power source, as well as 
modern microelectronics technology, digital signals processing, 
and digital communications technology. The Japanese have made 
marked progress in all of these aspects. For example, Japan 
claims that for its magnetic train, it has already developed a 
rocket driven magnetic flux kinematic generator that within a 
short time will be capable of developing 15 megaWatts of 
electricity. This type of small, light, mobile power source can 
supply lasers and other beam weapons, but the West does not yet 
have them. Only Japan does. Used in satellites, this 
technology could bring the realization of space-based laser 
weapons one step closer. 
  In sum, the space technology of some superpowers is capable 
of firing laser weapons from satellites at targets on the 
earth's surface or satellites orbiting in space. 
  2. Particle beam weapons on satellites to cause 
C[.sup]3[/]I radar surveillance and tracking systems to fail. 
  The United States also began developing particle beam 
weapons 
in the 1960's. In the early 1970's, it had further defined this 
research and development plan, and from reports in the past few 
years, it has invested as much as $3 billion in particle beam 
weapons research. It is currently estimated that the current 
amount far exceeds this figure. There are approximately 2,000 
or more top physicists working in 350 labs conducting research 
on particle beam weapons. 
  Beginning in 1967, the former Soviet Union has been 
conducting particle beam experiments at its nuclear test site 
at Semipalatinsk. According to reports, the Yefuliemofu [0673 
1133 0441 5459 1133] Institute in Leningrad spent two million 
rubles to construct the "ANGELA-5" [1344 0766 2139] reactor 
pile, which may be concerned with solving the problem of a power 
source for particle beam weapons. A large accelerator was 
constructed at Saluowa [5646 5012 3907] in Gorky for use in the 
development of particle beam weapons. Particle beam targeting 
tests have been conducted there. The electron beam bombardment 
of ICBM reentry vehicles and high energy explosion and solid 
matter experiments conducted in the laboratory at Leningrad 
University illustrate that new progress has been made in 
research on the distortion mechanism of particle beams. As of 
1988, the former Soviet Union had conducted eight electron beam 
transmission tests on its space vehicles. The former Soviet 
Union also joined with France in conducting electron beam 
radiation experiments from high altitude space survey rockets at 
altitudes of 100, 110, and 130 km. The beams were transmitted 
several dozen km. A small group of scientists led by professor 
Bafulofusiji [1572 1133 3157 1133 2448 1015] are currently 
intensifying their research on proton beam weapons. They 
recently tested a plasma beam generator, providing an even 
better material basis for particle beam weapons research. 
  Through this research and testing, the former Soviet Union 
has explored the feasibility of particle beam space weapons. It 
has also made marked advances in its research on particle 
sources and particle flows. According to estimates, it will 
still be quite some time before the former Soviet Union has 
particle beam weapons capable of destroying missile boosters or 
missile warheads, though it is working on this. However, it is 
possible that they will have tested in the 1990's a prototype 
particle beam weapon to be used to destroy electronic equipment 
on satellites. 
  3. Attacks on spaced-based systems by satellite high-energy 
microwave weapons. 
  Actually, the Japanese have been interested in the 
destructiveness of high energy microwave weapons for a long 
time. They began developing super high-energy microwave 
radiation tubes in the 1970's. Furthermore, they have already 
conducted thorough secret research on how to make weapons from 
high power microwaves and on the killing mechanism of microwave 
beams. The Japanese began developing microwave weapons earlier 
than the United States. Also, they have a large-scale research 
plan for high power microwave radiation tubes. According to 
reports, they are further along than the United States in 
research on strong microwave generation and transmission and on 
its interaction with matter. The microwave generator Japan 
tested in 1970 produced microwave pulse power in the 1000 
megaWatt range, with efficiency as high as 30 percent. In 1983, 
they tested one in the millimeter wave (30 to 300 kHz) frequency 
range, and the radiation tube generated pulse power of up to 100 
megaWatts. Such success in millimeter wave radiation tube 
research makes further progress possible in microwave weapons 
research. The Japanese government believes that the former 
Soviet Union has made similar progress in radio frequency 
technology, and that before very long, Russia may develop a 
prototype of a short-range microwave weapon. If the Japanese 
microwave weapon does not soon enter the practical use stage, 
they may fall behind the Russians. 
  The report on "Soviet Military Strength" published in 1984 
by 
the U.S. Department of Defense also held that Soviet "radio 
frequency technology is currently in a stage where it can begin 
developing close-range microwave weapons prototypes. The 
weapons systems of many Western nations provide little defense 
against such weapons. They could not only destroy critical 
electronic elements, but could also cause disorientation or even 
physical damage to humans." The United States also estimates 
that in the 1990's Russia could test land-based microwave 
weapons that could destroy satellites. If the United States 
does not quickly conduct practical tests of this type of weapon, 
it could lose superiority in the field. 
  We can see from an analysis of these situations that the 
United States, Japan, and Russia all have the capability to use 
microwave weapons against our sky-based systems for destructive 
experimental attacks that could be conducted secretly. 
<H5>  We Must Establish a Foothold in Earth Orbit </H5>
  We can see that the greatest weakness of a three dimensional 
defense lies outside the atmosphere in space and that the most 
effective method of using defensive missiles is for intercepts. 
Unfortunately, although China's space technology is second only 
to the United States and Russia, it does not have sufficient 
capabilities to establish a stable foothold in earth orbit. 
  Compared to the situation in the United States and Russia, 
the state of development in China is extremely critical and 
urgent. 
  Russia is a satellite superpower. The former Soviet Union 
conducted an average of 70 to 100 launches every year, with from 
one to several satellites per launch. They have launched eight 
satellites with a single rocket. They have more satellites than 
any other country, and it is estimated that as of 1982, of all 
of the the 2,915 space vehicles launched by the various nations 
of the world, 1,780, or 61 percent, belonged to the Soviet Union 
(33 percent belonged to the United States). Of these Soviet 
satellites, 73 percent were for military use. The Russians have 
more satellites than any other nation, but their satellites do 
not last as long as U.S. satellites. The Russians are using 
numbers against quality, and while continuing to maintain their 
numbers, are constantly improving their quality. For example, 
in the five years from 1979 to 1984, the life expectancy of 
Soviet photoreconnaisance satellites increased by 50 percent to 
the 30 to 50 day level. 
  The Russians are putting a great deal of emphasis on 
building 
up the reconnaissance and surveillance capabilities of space 
systems. They are also paying a great deal of attention to the 
combat applications of military satellites. Their 
photoreconnaissance satellites constantly keep a close watch on 
military conflicts throughout the world and related events. For 
example, after the United States invaded Grenada, the former 
Soviet Union immediately launched the Universe-1504 satellite, 
which passed over the airspace of that country every day 
performing reconnaissance and surveillance. During the armed 
conflict in Salvador, the Universe-1471 and Universe-1496 
satellites were assigned to fly over that country to conduct 
reconnaissance and surveillance missions. The former Soviet 
Union also launched a number of satellites for surveillance of 
the situations in Lebanon, Chad, the South Atlantic, and Iran. 
Although the former Soviet Union must also pay attention to the 
construction of communications satellites, it does not place the 
same reliance on communications satellites as the United States 
in its communications with allies in Europe, Africa, the Middle 
East, and other areas of the world. At least 70 percent of the 
overseas communications of the United States is carried by 
satellites. While the former Soviet Union was trying to develop 
satellite communications, its military leaders still possessed 
various surface communications channels directly to their units. 
Therefore, even if their communications were destroyed, their 
communications abilities would undergo minimal damage. 
  The former Soviet Union began conducting anti-satellite 
research in 1964. In the beginning they used maneuvering and 
docking techniques with the Universe satellites and manned 
spacecraft for preliminary anti-satellite design. In October 
1968, they began anti-satellite flight testing. By the end of 
1971, they had conducted seven tests. Through this testing, 
they had an initial understanding of the technology of 
approaching, recognizing, and destroying enemy satellites. To 
preveng a deleterious effect on concurrent summit talks that 
were focussed on signing a SALT treaty, the former Soviet Union 
halted its test launches of interceptor satellites after its 
launch of Universe-461 on 2 December 1971. 
  In the fourth year of the SALT agreement, 1976, which was 
also the year before the period of the agreement was over and a 
year in which the follow up SALT negotiations were stalled and 
making no progress, the former Soviet Union began once again to 
develop and test killer satellites. By the end of 1982, it had 
conducted 11 new anti-satellite tests. Through this testing, 
the Soviet Union, on the basis of its experience in its overall 
success and failure, constructed the only actual anti-satellite 
weapon system in the world at that time. 
  There are basically two types of anti-satellite satellites 
that have been tested by the former Soviet Union. One type is 
the same-orbit anti-satellite satellite. Between 1968 and 1971, 
the former Soviet Union used 55-9 rockets to launch an 
anti-satellite satellite equipped with radar detection 
equipment. This was one of the same-orbit type. This type of 
satellite is sent into the same orbit as the target satellite. 
On its second orbit, it begins to accelerate, and when it nears 
the target satellite, the command system sends an order and the 
warhead portion explodes, sending out large amounts of fragments 
and destroying the target. According to U.S. analysts, five of 
seven tests of this type of weapon were successful. Its 
designed purpose is to attack U.S. near-earth orbiting 
satellites such as the KH-11 "Big Bird" photoreconnaisance 
satellite. The second type of killer satellite is the 
transorbital zooming satellite. Because the first method of 
intercept requires the satellite to orbit twice to achieve 
intercept, it is a chasing attack method, which wastes time. 
The former Soviet Union also tried having the satellite killer 
use transorbital methods on its initial orbit to zoom up to the 
target orbit and achieve intercept on the first attempt. 
According to some evaluations, in the seven tests between 1976 
and 1977, three of seven such tests were successful. 
  These two types of intercept combat are single target 
methods. Tests of multiple launchings against multiple targets 
and single launches against multiple targets have not been 
conducted. Furthermore, the former Soviet Union's current 
anti-satellite satellites are primarily geared for low orbits. 
They do not yet have satellites capable of striking high orbit 
satellites. Because of this, they currently do not pose a 
threat to U.S. early warning and communications satellites in 
high orbit. 
  The Galosh anti-missile system also has an anti-satellite 
capability. After the anti-satellite missile has been launched 
toward the orbit of the enemy satellite, it pursues the 
satellite in this orbit. When it nears the satellite, the 
nuclear warhead automatically explodes, producing a shock wave, 
thermal radiation, and electromagnetic pulse, which can destroy 
the satellite. The aiming and tracking subsystem of this system 
is radar, which can detect a target more easily than the U.S. 
heat-seeking method. However, the Soviet anti-satellite 
missiles can be launched within one hour of an F-15 fighter 
taking off and reach their targets 10 minutes later. 
  The surface-to-air missiles that the former Soviet Union 
currently possesses, such as the SA-12, not only have a certain 
anti-missile capability, but they also have a limited 
capability to intercept satellites orbiting near the United 
States. In addition, the former Soviet Union may use the 
capabilities of electronic stations it is currently developing 
to jam or deceive enemy satellites, or it may use jamming and 
destruction of enemy satellite ground stations to achieve the 
equivalent result of destroying enemy satellites. The former 
Soviet Union has claimed a number of times that it can store 
"space mines" in a certain orbit, and upon command these space 
mines can be moved near enemy satellites and exploded to destroy 
them. 
  The basic methods to fill in these shortcomings in the Three 
Gorges Project defense system are to accelerate the development 
of space technology and improve space capabilities. Currently, 
we also need to adopt a number of other supplemental methods to 
deal with critical situations which may occur in the near future 
(around 10 to 20 years). 
  First we can adopt two of the simplest anti-satellite 
methods. 
  First is the "shotgun approach": 
  This would be using our satellites to scatter steel balls 
along the orbit of U.S. combat satellites in the direction 
opposite that of the satellite's rotation. If a 30 gram steel 
ball were travelling at 15 km per second, it would pierce 15 cm 
into the shell of the U.S. satellite's steel shell. This method 
would not cost much, but would be fairly effective. 
  Second is the smearing approach: 
  This would to be to spray dust at the reflective mirror of a 
U.S. or Japanese satellite, causing the mirror to be lopsided so 
that laser weapons could not be focussed. This measure is also 
fairly simple, but care must be taken to avoid attack by the 
enemy satellite during approach. 
  Secondarily, we could use two methods which are not cheap 
but 
are most effective -- those of space-based interceptors. 
  First, the "small bomblet" program: 
  These are a type of smart bomb only weighing only 1.5 to 2.5 
kg. Each of these "small bomblets" could cost $100,000 
(including the cost to put them into orbit). To increase the 
intercept rate, the number of bomblets would have to be 100 
times the number enemy missiles, which would mean one million 
bomblets, for a total cost of $10 billion. 
  Second, "small honeybee method": 
  This would be deploying 10,000 to 12,000 inexpensive light 
intercept missiles in orbit. Signals would be sent to them by 
three geosynchronous communications satellites. Whenever any of 
these destructive implements is positioned over our own 
territory, the communications satellite would automatically stop 
sending a signal, and at this time the destructive implement 
would automatically enter a critical state. It could 
independently launch at incoming missiles. This type of light 
destructive implement could be launched into orbit with the Shen 
IV carrier rocket, launching 100 at a time. Every destructive 
implement would cost $1 million. If these were only to protect 
against accidental launches, deploying 100 in orbit would be 
enough. 
  In sum, if the Chinese are bold enough to construct the 
Three 
Gorges dam, they have the capability to protect the security of 
the dam. 
<H5>  VII: CROSSING THE YALU ONCE MORE </H5>
  Of all the many hot spots around China, the Korean peninsula 
cannot be regarded as anything but the hottest of them all. 
Because of the geopolitical relationship, China is forced to 
expend a great deal of effort to try to stabilize the situation 
there to prevent the fires of war from burning to its own back 
door. Without doubt the establishment of diplomatic relations 
between China and South Korea was a major step by China to 
achieve strategic stability. Although it angered North Korea, 
from the consideration of long-term interests, the advantages 
outweighed the disadvantages. Experienced observers are all 
able to see that South Korea does represent a threat to China. 
Should South Korea invade the North, the Chinese would still 
support North Korea. This is something that could very possibly 
happen. 
<H5>  The South Korean "G7 Project" </H5>
  The level of science and technology in South Korea is only 
equivalent to 9.8 percent that of the United States and 12 
percent of that of Japan. It ranks 38th in the world in basic 
sciences. Looking at the drastically changing situation, if 
South Korea does not lay a scientific and technical foundation 
toward becoming a developed country in the next year or two, and 
if it fails to ensure its own independent technology within the 
next five or six years, then in the 21st century it will be 
looked down upon as being subservient to developed nations. To 
meet these requirements, the South Koreans have proposed the 
goal of becoming a developed nation by the year 2000 -- the "G7 
Project." 
  The goal of the G7 Project is to raise South Korea's science 
and technology level to the advanced levels of the seven western 
nations by the 21st century. This project has 14 primary 
technological targets including super-integrated circuit 
transistors, wide area communications network technology, 
electric cars, artificial intelligence computers, sensing 
technology, new medicines and agricultural chemicals, leading 
edge production equipment, new energy sources, biological 
engineering, new materials, high-definition televisions, new 
generation reactor piles, new generation transport equipment and 
parts, and environmental protection. This project will formally 
begin in May of this year and will last for 10 years. This 
project will cost more than 4.75 trillion wan. 
  To accomplish the goals of this project, the South Koreans 
have adopted a policy of "four domestic lines and four foreign 
circles." 
  The "four domestic lines" are: l) Increase the size of the 
teaching staffs at scientific and technical colleges and 
universities and set up branch colleges and universities; 2) 
Revise college and university systems, increasing the numbers of 
students recruited into scientific and technical colleges and 
universities; 3) Allow some university students to study for 
their doctorates to develop talent as early as possible; and 4) 
Establish additional scientific and technical high schools 
(there are currently 10). All of these are interconnected, and 
by the 21st century, South Korea should become an educated 
society with 150,000 scientists, of which 10 percent are to be 
world class. 
  The four foreign circles are to strengthen scientific and 
technical foreign relations, recruiting 2,000 scientists to come 
to Korea to work, and to cooperate in science and technology 
with foreign nations. 
  In the U.S. circle, there is drafting a "Patents and Secrets 
Protection Agreement," establishing a "U.S.-Korean Scientific 
and Technical Consortium," and forging a common "Strategic 
Defense Plan" with the United States. Only by combining U.S. 
science and technology with Korean production technology will 
they be able to put a stop to Japan's "technology monopoly." 
  In the Japanese circle, on the basis of a science and 
technology cooperation agreement signed in 1988, South Korea and 
Japan will jointly select and conduct common research projects, 
and they will continue to prod Japan to transfer high technology. 
  In the West European circle, South Korea hopes to enhance 
common research in projects selected through the Council of 
Defense Ministers and the Committee on Scientific and 
Technological Cooperation of the major nations in West Europe 
--England, France, Germany, and Italy. 
  In the former Soviet Union circle, on the basis of a 
scientific and technical agreement signed with the former Soviet 
Union, it is stipulated that in the next five years, South Korea 
will conduct joint research with the former Soviets on 48 
leading-edge technology projects. It will also invite between 
200 and 400 ranking Soviet scientists to take part in the "G7 
Project," and it will invite 20 Soviet scientists to come to 
South Korean universities and research components to lecture. 
After the dismemberment of the Soviet Union, the Russian 
Federation has promised to continue to honor this agreement for 
scientific cooperation. 
  The "G7 Project" is like an atomic explosion on the Korean 
Peninsula. 
  A "cooperation is survival, separatism is death" campaign 
for 
technological cooperation has appeared in Korea. 
  The Korean Gold Star and Sam Sung corporations have decided 
to exchange the 3,500 patents they possess unconditionally and 
without compensation. They will keep no secrets from each other 
and will work together to deal with pressures from foreign 
enterprises. 
  This year, the three major Korean shipbuilding companies, 
the 
Modern Heavy Industries Company, the Dayu [1129 1342] 
Shipbuilding Company, and Sam Song Heavy Industries abandoned 
their estrangement and competitive struggles and joined forces 
in a bid for five supertankers for the Saudi Arabian National 
Shipping Company, in competition against Japanese and European 
Shipbuilders. 
  The United States and Japan have continued to provide 
technology for almost 4,000 items for South Korea. They worked 
together in the development of almost 1,000 production 
technologies to increase international competition. 
  China did not become part of South Korea's technology 
circles, but on 24 August it announced the establishment of 
diplomatic relations with South Korea. There are two 
explanations in diplomatic circles concerning the establishment 
of diplomatic relations between China and South Korea. 
  One is that due to the high cost of labor at home, the South 
Koreans were attracted by cheap labor in China. South Korean 
exports to Europe, the United States, and Japan are not doing 
well, and China is a market with a tremendous future. 
  The second explanation is that the establishment of 
diplomatic relations between China and South Korea changes the 
strategic picture in Asia. Asia will become a new economic 
block with China as the hub. This economic block, which is 
connected to the Korean Peninsula, Hong Kong, and Taiwan, will 
serve to constrain Japan to a certain degree. Japan's DAILY 
NEWS also believes that "because of the establishment of 
diplomatic relations between South Korea and China, the next 
strategic structure in East Asia has already been formed, and it 
is a triangle formed with China, Japan, and Korea at the 
corners. This new triangular structure, with the addition of 
the Southeast Asian nations, which have made amazing progress, 
will form a four-sided structure, becoming the basic layout of 
Asia as it races toward the 21st century." 
<H5>  North Korea's "Century Paradise" Plan </H5>
  At the same time South Korea was announcing the development 
of the "G7" project, the North Koreans proposed the 
establishment of a Korean type of socialist century paradise, 
calling it the "Century Paradise" plan. 
  Generalized in the simplest terms, the specific content of 
this Century Paradise plan is to "realize the dream of all 
Koreans eating rice, having meat in their soup, having good 
clothes and living in good houses." 
  To achieve this plan, the assembly made three separate 
domestic policy decisions. The first was to strengthen 
socialist propaganda. The second was to make changes in state 
leadership, and the third was to revise the party charter. 
  Concerning the question of socialism, in the words of the 
assembly communique, "a series of events currently occurring on 
the world stage are eddies along the journey of mankind toward 
the new democratic order. Therefore, we should have an 
optimistic view of the current world situation. Even if others 
should give us boundless treasures, we would not abandon 
socialism and chose another path. Socialism is more dear to us 
than life." 
  The communique also stated that "Korean Socialism is the 
responsibility of the people themselves, according to their 
actual situations, to guide their own strengths establish the 
most outstanding socialism. Korean Socialism does not mimic any 
other extant form or experience and does not depend on the 
strength of others. Rather, it will solve new problems of 
theory and practice after the establishment of the socialist 
order according to its own methods. It is an independent 
socialism." 
  The communique further stated that "improving the food, 
clothing, and lodging of the people is the plan for socialist 
and Communist construction which will have to be accomplished 
under conditions of ever-intensifying plotting by the enemy and 
even more complex situations. Carrying out this plan will 
better display the superiority of the Korean type of socialism 
where all are happy and live as equals, and it will realize the 
dream of the century of all Koreans being able to "eat rice, 
have meat in their soup, wear good clothes, and have good homes." 
  The lifestyle of the Korean style of Socialism is all of the 
people of the country closely united around the party and the 
leaders to form a large revolutionary family, all living 
together a life of collectivism. All people must be highly 
organized and perform in an orderly manner, all as one, living 
and working in accordance with the revolutionary requirements. 
They must oppose ease and comfort, laxness, luxury, and 
splittism. From the clothes they wear to the hats they wear, 
they must conform to the requirements of the revolutionary era. 
They must pay attention to discipline, have a sense of 
propriety, and be noble-minded yet simple. 
  They have conducted large-scale changes in administrative 
arrangements of party and government leaders. The premier and 
vice-premiers have been changed, and an old premier who had left 
office before his term was completed was asked to serve again. 
They also have placed some persons with a real understanding of 
economics into important positions. 
  They have carried out some fairly major changes in the Party 
Charter. For example, they have removed the word "Marxist," 
giving prominence to overall ideology. They have given 
"National Defense" a chapter of its own and have written into 
the Charter that "the people are to be armed, all forces are to 
have cadres, and the armed forces are to be modernized." 
  We can see from this that this is a major move by North 
Korea 
directed at South Korea. 
  To achieve this paradise of the century, North Korea has 
become bold and asked the outside world for economic 
cooperation. They are cooperating with the United Nations 
Development Planning Office and are jointly establishing their 
own first international bank with the Ruby Group in Hong Kong. 
It is especially worth noting that they even before China had 
announced the special economic zone in Jilin's Hunchun area, 
they established a free economic trade zone in the Mengjin and 
Xianfeng areas in the north with an area of 621 square km. They 
also announced that Mengjin, Xianfeng, and Qingjin were free 
trade ports and that they hoped to negotiate with China 
questions concerning the development of the Tumen River delta. 
  In December 1991, the premiers of North and South Korea 
signed the "North and South Korea Agreement of Understanding, 
Mutual Nonaggression, and Trade" for joint development of 
resources, peoples' development, exchange of materials and 
investment cooperation. They established joint investment 
factories. They hoped that the director of the World Peace 
League would go to the North and invest there. 
  The socialist and capitalist camps on the Korean Peninsula 
have begun a competition and struggle not involving guns. 
<H5>  Cracks in the Formation </H5>
  In the international competition in science and technology, 
there are two opposing blocs. The first bloc is formed 
primarily of the United States, Japan, and Western Europe. This 
bloc has an obvious superiority in the fields of science and 
technology. The "second bloc" is composed of a number of major 
third world nations such as the "Four Dragons": Asia, China, 
India, and Brazil. They have invested large amounts of manpower 
and material into science and technology to improve their level 
of science and technology as well as overall national strength, 
and they have achieved startling accomplishments. The former 
Soviet Union has a good scientific research foundation and lots 
of talent, but due to many years of political unrest and its 
dissolution, there has been an outflowing of its talent. It has 
had a stagnant economy, and its competitiveness in science and 
technology has been seriously weakened. It is currently in the 
midst of changes and adjustments. 
  Because of this, the scientific and technical struggle going 
on in the Korean Peninsula is more precisely a battle between 
two major blocs than a competition between two major camps. 
  However, these blocs are not completely solid, and in the 
south of the peninsula, some cracks have occurred in the first 
bloc. 
  The United States and Japan are currently economic 
superpowers. However, because the Japanese do not have the role 
of "policeman to the world," as the United States does, for 
several decades they have concentrated on economic development. 
In less than 10 years, the Japanese economy has grown to a 
point where it constitutes a threat to the economy of the United 
States. 
  According to statistics, in 1951 Japan's gross national 
product was one-twentieth that of the United States, and in 1978 
Japan's nominal gross national product was $971.7 billion and 
that of the United States was $2.25 trillion. In the world's 
nominal gross product for 1988, the United States represented 
24.4 percent with $4.88 trillion, and Japan represented 14.3 
percent with $2.86 trillion. The Japanese nominal gross 
national product was 59 percent of that of the United States. 
Through the struggle for South Korea's G7 project, in less than 
10 years, its gross national product will basically approach 
that of the United States. In early 1989, the average per 
capita income in Japan was more than $23,000, about $5,000 more 
than that of the United States. Japan's foreign reserves were 
$89.26 billion in May of 1989, which was 3.4 times those of the 
United States. Japanese investment was $60.4 billion in 1985, 
and by 1989 its overseas investment was $250 billion. 
Furthermore, it has become the world's largest creditor nation. 
The speed with which the Japanese economy grew and the size of 
the assault has startled and frightened the United States. 
  Therefore, a struggle over the first place in the world 
economy has developed within the United States and Japan bloc. 
Japan is no longer content with the space in its small island 
nation of only three million plus square kilometers. The United 
States similarly cannot allow a small island nation to outdo it. 
  The earliest struggle is an economic war. The fuse that 
ignites the war is the sale of Japanese automobiles in the 
United States. Not only have the Japanese cars taken over the 
U.S. market, but under the Japanese automobile assault, a number 
of U.S. automobile plants have folded. Even the largest, 
General Motors, has gone into bankruptcy, with 150,000 people 
losing their jobs. Facing this situation, the U.S. Senate has 
proposed to the president a bill to boycott Japanese goods, 
prohibiting the import of Japanese automobiles to slow down the 
Japanese economy. 
  The night before the U.S. President was to sign this bill, 
the Prime Minister of Japan flew to the United States and 
visited the White House, where he engaged in a number of secret 
negotiations with the president. The content of these talks 
were never made public. However, after the talks, the United 
States never announced the Senate's bill, and the Japanese 
exported no more cars to the United States. They join together 
and combine to do even greater business. 
<H5>  Imagine: A Bloody "Peaceful Korean Reunification" </H5>
  The fifth session of the North and South Korean talks on 
"peaceful reunification" are currently being conducted in 
Pyongyang. In the previous sessions of talks, the two sides 
reached a unanimous agreement on their hopes and determination 
for peaceful reunification that was publicly announced to the 
world. However, there still exist great differences over the 
post- reunification name of the country, political personnel 
arrangements, military manning, and the position of the Korean 
Workers Party. 
  The North Koreans want to use the name "Korean Peoples' 
Republic," while the South Koreans want to use the name of 
"Korea." As for political personnel arrangements and military 
manning, the North Koreans demand equal representation, while 
the South Koreans demand a ratio based on economic strength. 
Both sides agree that the capital should be decided through a 
vote by the people. As for the position of the Korean Workers 
Party, both sides agree that this party should be removed from 
power and that North and South Korean parties should be equals. 
However, as for how Communist Party members should be handled, 
the North Koreans demand that the party cadres all be placed 
into leading government components at various levels, while the 
South Koreans resolutely oppose this. 
  Because the North Korean "Socialist Paradise" plan has 
continued to proceed very slowly and the South Korean "G7" 
project has seen some preliminary results, the North Koreans 
have been placed at a disadvantage in the talks. 
  While people are still guessing at the outcome of the fifth 
round of talks, good news comes out of Pyongyang concerning 
"peaceful reunification." Next, the South Korean military, 
including planes and tanks, march in a very orderly manner into 
North Korea, without a shot fired at the border. The Peoples 
Army commanders at the front lines have received an order signed 
by their leader, and at the same time they have heard the good 
news broadcast from Pyongyang Radio on "peaceful reunification" 
and welcoming the South Korean compatriots' return to the 
motherland. 
  However, shortly after crossing the border, the South Korean 
units very quickly detain the commanders of front-line units at 
the regimental level and above. 
  Very quickly, the units receive the internal news that 
leaders and top governmental personnel have been detained. 
  Pyongyang finally transmits the sound of rifle and artillery 
fire. 
  Then, a large number of units engage in armed fighting with 
the South Korean units. However, because the front-line defense 
positions have been broken through and the South Korean military 
is not using the same weapons it used 40 years ago, unable to 
hold their ground, the defenders take to their heels. 
  The so-called "peaceful reunification" is nothing more than 
a 
military coup. It is a plot cooked up by the United States and 
Japan for the South Koreans to swallow the armed forces of North 
Korea. They take advantage of the opportunity afforded by the 
negotiations for a group of agents composed of South Koreans and 
Americans to capture by surprise high-ranking North Korean 
generals and government officials and force them to sign orders 
for the front- line units. 
  When the Peoples' Army becomes aware of what has happened, 
it 
conducts a brave armed struggle against the invading South 
Korean forces. 
  The world's major newspapers and radio and television 
stations all announce the same news: Civil war has broken out in 
Korea. 
  The United States and Japan use this opportunity to once 
more 
manipulate the United Nations into deciding to send U.N. "World 
Peacekeeping Forces" to Korea. The so-called U.N. Peacekeeping 
Forces are actually composed of military units of the United 
States and Japan. The United States directly uses three 
mechanized infantry divisions, one motorized infantry division, 
one armored division, and one airborne division, totalling 
104,000 men. In addition there are the 40,000 men in military 
units stationed in South Korea and the 65,000 men in units 
stationed in Japan, for a grand total of 210,000 men. At the 
same time, the Seventh Fleet is sent from the Western to the 
Eastern Pacific. Japan sends in two motorized infantry 
divisions, the Seventh Tank Division, one naval self-defense 
force fleet, and one air army, totalling 100,000 men. 
  These joint forces of 300,000 men together with the 600,000 
men in the South Korean army come pressing into North Korea. 
Their final objective is to take North Korea by military force 
and then expand to the northern border with China. This help 
toward "Korean Unification" is just the first step in the U.S. 
and Japanese plan for world hegemony. 
  The total size of the North Korean army was originally 
840,000 men. However, in the past several years, to concentrate 
even more finances on the "Century Paradise," there have been 
two reductions in force, totalling 340,000 men and leaving only 
500,000 men. Furthermore, the 200,000 man front-line units have 
basically lost their combat effectiveness. Thus, the 
300,000-man people's army in the interior is no match for the 
united forces of the United States, Japan, and South Korea. 
  In less than one month, the North Korean units retreat 
toward 
the border with China, and some units even cross over into China. 
  It goes without saying that, regarding the civilians, anyone 
who is a member of the Korean Workers' Party and cadres at all 
levels have basically all retreated with the military units to 
the Tonghua Special District and the Yanji Korean Autonomous 
Prefecture in Jilin Province in China. 
<H5>  Old Scores Are Not Yet Settled: Crossing the Yalu Again </H5>
  The North Korean Peoples' Army and government officials from 
various levels that have retreated to the north form a 
provisional government of North Korea, representing the 
government in unified leadership over the Peoples' Army. 
  The provisional government makes an urgent and emergency 
request for armed support from the People's Republic of China. 
  The Chinese government is placed in a dilemna because of 
this. It could send troops, but China is currently 
concentrating its forces for economic development, and it has 
established diplomatic relations with South Korea. Because of 
the trade agreements, it is trying to relax tensions with the 
United States and Japan. It could not send troops, but North 
Korea is an old friend and a close neighbor. Back in the 1950's 
when the People's Republic of China had just been founded and 
was very poor, it helped North Korea defeat U.S. imperialism at 
the cost of hundreds of thousands of men. Now that China is 
rich, it cannot forget its old friends. In other words, with 
almost two million North Koreans pouring into China, the only 
reasonable thing to do would be to help them get back home. 
  There would be no alternative but to resolutely send troops 
and help Korea resist the United States once again. There are 
four reasons for this. First, China and North Korea are old 
friends who rely on each other. Second, the objective of the 
United States and Japan in jointly invading North Korea is not 
only to take over the Korean Peninsula but also is world 
hegemony. If we were to sit and watch, the next step would be 
even more difficult to deal with. Third, whether or not the 
United States crossed over, several hundred North Korean 
refugees swarming across the Tumen River would have a tremendous 
affect on economic development in the area. At a time when 
China had just entered into a critical period of cooperative 
development with Taiwan, such a loss could possibly be even 
greater than that of supporting the Koreans. 
  The final reason is that there is an unsettled debt from the 
1950's. 
  That is the debt of the Fifth Campaign to Resist the United 
States and Aid Korea of the 1950's. 
  After the Volunteer Army entered Korea, beginning on 25 
October 1950, it conducted counterattacks and strategic 
counterassaults against the "United Nations Forces" led by the 
United States and against the South Korean forces. In seven and 
one-half months, it conducted five campaigns, pushing the U.S. 
forces from the Yalu to the 38th parallel and smashing the 
assault launched by the "United Nations Forces" and South Korean 
forces against the Democratic Peoples' Republic of Korea, 
winning a tremendous victory in the first stage of the Campaign 
to Resist the United States and Aid Korea. 
  The first campaign pushed the U.S. forces south of the 
Ch'ongch'on-gang. 
On 19 October 1950, after MacArthur led the U.S. forces to take 
Pyongyang, they became swollen with arrogance, and 130,000 men 
advanced up the eastern and western routes toward the northern 
border of Korea. 
  The original plan and deployment for the Volunteer Army to 
enter Korea to fight was to first, when the enemy had advanced 
to Tokch'on and Yongwan, organize an east-west line of defense. 
In the early period it would only fight a defensive campaign to 
stabilize the situation. It would join forces with the Peoples' 
Army for a counterattack after being supplied with new weapons 
and equipment. Because the U.S. advance was very quick, they 
occupied areas the Volunteer Army had planned to occupy. 
Therefore, the original defensive deployment plan could not be 
carried out. On 21 October, Peng Dehuai met with Kim Il-song in 
a cave in the north and studied the situation, discussing combat 
questions. 
  The Volunteer Army conducted its first campaign along two 
lines in the east and west, beginning on 25 October and ending 
on 06 November. This campaign delivered a devastating assault 
on the South Korean 6th Division, the 1st Division 12th 
Battalion, and the U.S. 1st Cavalry 8th Battalion. It was also 
a damaging blow to other U.S. and South Korean forces, killing 
more than 15,000 men and pushing them back to the south of the 
Ch'ongch'on-gang and completely destroying MacArthur's plan to 
have control of all of Korea before Thanksgiving. The Volunteer 
Army won an early victory. 
  The second campaign pushed the U.S. forces to the 38th 
parallel. 
  After the first campaign, MacArthur felt that there were not 
very many Chinese in the fighting and that it was merely a 
symbolic force. He still continued to conduct his plan to "wipe 
out all resisting forces in North Korea." MacArthur actively 
redeployed, getting reinforcements from South Korea and Japan, 
preparing to launch a new attack, and attempting to wipe out the 
Chinese Volunteer Army and the North Korean Peoples' Army. Peng 
Dehuai, in accordance with the strategic mission given to him by 
Mao Zedong, held a meeting of the Military Commission of the 
Chinese Communist Volunteers on 13 November. At the meeting a 
plan was decided upon that would attempt to lure the enemy deep 
into the defensive area and to concentrate a superior force to 
wipe out the enemy. The eastern front would lure the enemy to 
the area of Changjinho while the western front would lure the 
enemy north of Ch'ongch'on-gang and north of a line from Kujang 
to Yongwon, first wiping out the forces on the flanks and then 
expanding the combat successes. 
  The Volunteer Army 38th Army was deployed to "lure in and 
beat out," and on the evening of 25 November, it began advancing 
on two fronts toward the South Korean Army 7th Division. 
  There was another counterattack along the eastern front, and 
by the first 10 days of December, the U.S. 8th Army had been 
beaten back by the heavy assaults of the Volunteer Army from 
north of the Ch'ongch'on-gang to south of the 38th parallel. 
From 12 to 24 December, all of the invading forces on the 
eastern and western fronts had been driven out of the territory 
north of the 38th parallel. The attack MacArthur launched to 
bring the fighting in Korea to an end by Christmas not only was 
unable to hold North Korea but was driven back 260 kilometers. 
MacArthur had underestimated the combat capability of the 
Chinese Volunteer Army and had overestimated his own forces. He 
split up his forces in a reckless advance and lost his cool. 
This is why he lost. 
  The third campaign was to drive the U.S. forces south of 
Seoul. 
  Following the second campaign, the United States massed 11 
divisions and three brigades from five armies. It set up layer 
after layer of defenses at the 38th parallel to stop the 
Volunteer Army and the Peoples' Army from continuing to advance 
southward and to gain a chance to rest and prepare a new 
assault. The first defense line of the U.S. deployment was west 
of the southern bank of the Imjin-gang southwest of Munsan, 
stretching to the 38th parallel and then along the 38th parallel 
to the East China Sea. They primarily used defense works 
already there that were held by the South Korean army. The 
second line of defense extended west from Koyang northwest of 
Seoul through Uijongbu, Kap'yong, and Ch'unch'on to the banks of 
the East China Sea and was manned by U.S. and British forces. 
There were no in-depth second line mobile defenses. 
  The Volunteer Army proposed a stable advance plan, deciding 
to seek opportunities north and east of Seoul to wipe out the 
enemy and deal him a new blow, thus worsening his sense of 
defeat. They primarily attacked the front- line defenses and 
the South Koreans, isolating the U.S. and British forces in the 
Seoul area. 
  The third campaign of the Volunteer Army was the first 
large-scale attack against enemy prepared defenses since 
entering Korea. It was conducted in ice and snow, with supply 
difficulties and with hurried preparations. After seven days 
and nights of constant assault, the Volunteer Army had advanced 
80 to 100 km and killed more than 19,000 enemy troops. 
  The fourth campaign was to resist the U.S. counterassault. 
  After the third campaign, the Volunteer Army's five 
divisions 
and one detachment of Peoples' Army forces set up defenses from 
Suwon to Hoengsong and north of P'yongch'ang to provide cover 
for the main force in the areas of Koyang, Uijongbu, Kap'yong, 
Yonch'on, Kimhwa, and Kumsong. On 15 January, to salvage the 
situation, Ridgeway took advantage of a moment when the 
Volunteer Army was exhausted, having difficulty with supplies, 
and restructuring. He launched a probing attack along the 
western front with a portion of his forces. At the same time, he 
quickly brought veterans from the United States to Korea in 
preparation for a counterattack, attempting to push the 
Volunteer Army back across the 38th parallel and re-take Seoul. 
By fierce resistance on the western front and counterattacks 
from the eastern front, the Volunteer Army held back the U.S. 
assault. 
  This campaign was fought while the Volunteer Army had not 
yet 
reorganized or been resupplied but was instead rushed into a 
defensive position. However, all of the officers and men 
manifested the outstanding spirit of bravery and perseverance, 
fearing neither sacrifice nor fatigue, and fought continuously. 
They fought back the fierce U.S. assault. The Volunteer Army 
actively held its defenses and conducted counterattacks and 
guerrilla defense, killing large numbers of U.S. and South 
Korean soldiers. They also made a planned shift to the north, 
and the entire campaign, from 27 January when the Volunteer Army 
switched over to defensive fighting until 21 April, lasted for 
85 days. A total of 78,000 men were killed, wounded, or 
captured, and the average daily advance was less than 1.5 
kilometers, thus winning time and providing cover for the combat 
reserve 19th Corps and 3rd Corps to advance and assemble and 
creating advantageous conditions for the next campaign. 
  The fifth campaign forced the U.S. forces to switch over to 
a 
strategic defense. 
  On 11 April 1951, President Truman ordered MacArther removed 
from his position as commander of the U.N. forces and replaced 
him with Ridgeway. He also named James Van Fleet commander of 
the 8th Army. During early and mid-April, after the U.S. forces 
had advanced to the 38th parallel, because of heavy casualties 
and extreme fatigue, they switched over to a defensive posture 
when they discovered that the Volunteer Army strategic reserves 
had arrived at the front. 
  To allow the Volunteer Army to reorganize, the Central 
Military Commission decided to adopt a policy of rotating 
combat. They selected groups of units from inside China to go 
to Korea and ordered the 19th Corp and 3rd Corp into Korea 
immediately. In the middle of April, at the orders of the 
Central Military Commission, Peng Dehuai determined that the 
primary mission of the fifth campaign targeting the defensive 
deployment of U.S. forces was to be an all-out assault on enemy 
forces in the area west of the Pukhan-gang and north of Seoul. 
The assembled forces along the western front conducted the 
major assault, cut the enemy forces in two, and rounded the two 
flanks to encircle and wipe out the enemy. 
  The assault on the west flank pressed toward Seoul. 
  The counterattack on the eastern front dealt a heavy blow to 
the South Korean forces. 
  By 21 April, the Volunteer Army had fought continuously for 
a 
number of days and had used up all of its rations and 
ammunition. Furthermore, the rainy season was approaching, and 
several rivers behind them would make combat and the transport 
of supplies difficult. Therefore, they stopped their assault 
and on the 23rd began to move to the north. At the same time 
they requested that the Central Military Commission approve this 
action. Mao Zedong cabled a reply to Peng Dehuai approving the 
retreat and reorganization. He also instructed that, regarding 
where they should lay up, as long as the enemy was ready to 
attack, the further to the north the better, provided they did 
not cross the line between P'yongch'ang and Yonch'on. 
  After the Volunteer Army and the Peoples' Army began 
retreating to the north, the U.S. forces immediately gave chase 
with a "special task force" of 13 divisions from four armies, 
sending motorized infantry, artillery, and tanks along the 
highways to pursue our retreating forces. The Volunteer Army 
was unprepared for this rapid pursuit by the enemy and was 
unable to give itself effective cover when switching over to 
defensive combat. Also, due to excessive casualties, unit 
actions were limited, and some units were caught in a passive 
situation while switching over to defense. On the 24th, the 
180th Division of the 62nd Army received orders from the Corps 
to provide cover for the transport north of the casualties 
southwest of Ch'unch'on. They became encircled by enemy 
artillery and were wrapped up. 
  This is an old grudge of the 180th Division of the 62nd 
Army. 
Although the fifth campaign was very successful overall, and 
despite the thorough victory of the Campaign to Resist the 
United States and Aid Korea, this "division's grudge" is a black 
mark in the history. 
<H5>  What Will Replace Small Caliber Infantry Rifles? </H5>
  During the Korean War in the 1950s, small caliber infantry 
rifles were used to counter the enemy's air power and artillery. 
What weapons will be used in the next Korean War? 
  During the last Korean War, the fighting at Kamryong had to 
be the cruelest and fiercest of the war. From 14 October 
through 25 November 1954, through 43 days and nights of fierce 
fighting and over an area of 3.7 square kilometers occupied by 
two companies, the U.S. military poured in over 1.9 million 
artillery shells and 5,000 bombs, destroying fortifications on 
two mountain tops and lowering those peaks by two meters. This 
was the fiercest and most unusual battle fought in a small area 
in the history of warfare. However, during this battle, the 
weapons used by the two sides were, apart from the U.S. 
military's aircraft, artillery pieces, and incendiary shells, 
the Volunteer Army's machine guns, infantry rifles, bangalores, 
and hand grenades. 
  However, in the next war, the weapons of the previous war 
will not be in evidence. 
  When the time comes, U.S. E-3 Watchtower early warning 
aircraft, F-117, F-15, and F-16 fighters, French Mirage 2000 
fighters, EA-6B electronic warfare aircraft, and Nighthawk 
F-117A stealth aircraft will be airborne. There will also be 
carpet-bombing B-52 bombers and B-2 "stealth" bombers, which are 
superior to the B-52. These aircraft will not be dropping 
conventional bombs filled with TNT. They will be carrying 
nuclear-tipped bombs, air-to-air missiles, and air-to-surface 
missiles. For example, the YF-22 fighter can engage in aerial 
refueling, and in a 10-hour period it can complete six sorties. 
It only requires an 18-minute interval between take-offs for 
refueling and rearming, and its cruising speed is between 1.4 
and 1.8 mach. To reduce its radar profile, the YF-23 [as 
published] does not have weapons racks on its underside -- all 
of its weapons are carried within the aircraft. It carries 
advanced radar-guided intermediate-range air-to-air missiles, 
Sidewinder infrared-guided air-to-air missiles, and a 20-mm 
cannon. The aircraft uses stealth technology and can perform 
360 degree rolls, 45 degree angled flight, and vertical climbs. 
China and North Korea will oppose this aircraft with the F-8, 
F-10, and Su-27 fighters, as well as A-5 attack aircraft. 
  On the ground, satchel charges will not be used to destroy 
fortifications. U.S., Japanese, and South Korean M-1A1 and 
M-1A2 advanced tanks will contend with Chinese T-80s and T-85s. 
Blackhawk helicopters, anti-tank missiles, and anti-tank rocket 
launchers will also be involved in these tank battles. These 
nemeses of the tank will make armored combat even more difficult. 
  The U.S. and Japanese infantry will use Apache and Comanche 
helicopters against our infantry and will be equipped with 
highly accurate individual weapons that fire at rates of 1,000 
rounds per minute. They will be equipped with one-man missiles 
to use against tanks and aircraft. They can mount helicopters 
at any time under any conditions and reach any designated point. 
They can also conduct the most effective mobile combat against 
enemy tanks, aircraft and ground units while in motion. 
  In the next war in Korea, the satellites of both sides may 
join in. 
  The fighting at sea will be even more complex. The Seventh 
Fleet, the Japanese 88th fleet, and China's special task force 
will be the primary forces in this naval battle. The Seventh 
Fleet possesses the most advanced carriers and the most advanced 
ship-borne aircraft. Although the 88th Fleet does not have an 
aircraft carrier, its fleet coordinated combat capabilities are 
first in the world. Although China's task force is young, 
because it will include advanced missile escorts, a submarine 
fleet, and outstanding officers and men, as well as a large 
number of aircraft flying out of the Jiaodong Peninsula that can 
effectively coordinate in combat with the fleet, it is hard to 
say what the outcome would be. 
<H5>  Would It Be Better To Cross the River or the Sea? </H5>
  This question has been raised: If Chinese forces went to 
Korea again, would they take the same route as before? 
  Chinese military experts believe that if in the next war in 
Korea a major force of 400,000 U.N. troops and 400,000 South 
Korea troops press toward the Korean-Chinese border, it would be 
best to send troops across the sea and not across the Yalu. 
  Why do they say this? 
  There are advantages and disadvantages to crossing the 
river. 
The advantage is that we could rely on China's substantial rear 
support. 
  That is to say, if we do not cross the river from north to 
south, then we would lose the advantage of being able to rely on 
the large rear supplies of the Chinese forces. 
  However, the disadvantages of crossing the river are even 
more obvious. If we try to launch a push across the board, we 
could not do it, and if we tried to penetrate with a large 
force, we would not be able to penetrate. If we used small 
units, then even if they did penetrate, they would not be able 
to gain a foothold. 
  If we sent troops across the sea, we could avoid the enemy's 
strengths and attack his weaknesses, stabbing a dagger directly 
into the enemy's heart. Combining with the units on the 
northern front, we could form a pincer attack, cutting off and 
encircling the enemy, fighting a war of annihilation. 
  If we are to cut the Korean peninsula in two, where would we 
cut it? There are two different possible plans. 
  The first is to begin at the 38th parallel. The advantage of 
beginning here is that after the landing, it would be possible 
to take advantage of the reinforced existing defensive 
fortifications along the South Korean border front to 
effectively solidify a landing position and prevent an attack by 
the enemy from the south. This would accomplish the objective 
of isolating and surrounding the enemy. However, the 
disadvantage of beginning here is that the landing battle would 
be very fierce, and after the landing the rear supply lines 
would be too far away. Therefore, we would be taking on too 
much to handle and would be wrapped up by the enemy. 
  The second place to land is along a line from Sinanju to 
Namp'o. The disadvantage of this plan is that after the 
landing, there would be no existing fortifications to use, and 
we would have to rely completely on the landing units themselves 
to gain a foothold. However, the advantage of this plan is that 
it is nearer to the Chinese mainland. At the same time, the 
landing combat would be easier to fight, because this area is a 
fine example of the territory around Pyongyang. The masses 
would provide a good foundation. When U.S. forces arrive, they 
may not gain a firm foothold. Therefore, if we were able to 
land here and carry out a rescue plan, using special forces 
units to rescue the North Korean government leaders, it would be 
possible to call on the North Korean people to organize new 
groups of units as quickly as possible, especially those crack 
troops that have already retired. If they and the masses 
remaining in North Korea are all organized, they can fight a 
peoples' war. In this manner, the Korean military line of "arm 
all the people, have cadre throughout the military, and 
modernize the entire military" will play a critical role at the 
critical moment. All people are soldiers, and in a very short 
time they can organize at least 100,000 new Korean militia 
forces. 
  The final selection is for the latter plan. In this war, 
China's Special Police Force will play an unexpected role. This 
is because the United States and Japan will never have dreamed 
that the Chinese would adopt such ferocious tactics. As a 
result, they will very quickly rescue the North Korean leaders 
who under house arrest. They will activate the North Korean 
combat readiness radio and television stations, and the leaders 
will give televised speeches to the people. All of the people 
will be soldiers and will very quickly organize a new militia. 
  Coordinating with the North Korean People's Army, the 
landing 
follow-up units in the second and third echelons will land 
without problems. 
  Coordinating with the North Korean Peoples' Army, the 
Chinese 
and Korean forces will achieve the strategic combat policy to 
"defend against the south, attack in the north". 
  The united forces of the United States, Japan, and South 
Korea that will have already rushed up to the Yalu will see the 
fire in their own backyard and will quickly send troops to the 
rear. Thus, the original northern fortress will not exist. 
This will make it possible for the Chinese units aiding Korea 
to move to the south. 
  Finally, one million men from the units in China's northeast 
military region, the 200,000 men of the Korean Peoples' Army 
forces that have already moved into northeast China, and another 
800,000 new Korean forces formed from the Korean refugees will 
form a force of two million men moving from the north to the 
south on the Korean Peninsula, with the Chinese and Koreans 
wrapping up the Americans. 
  The battle to encircle and wipe out the enemy will be 
carried 
out on the ground and in the air in the region of Myohyangsan, 
Nangrimsan, and Kwanmosan. At the same time, on the Yellow Sea, 
a startling sea and air battle will occur. 
  These are not the encirclement and counter-encirclement 
human 
sea tactics of the 1950's, and it will not be like the Gulf War. 
This is a combination of high technology and low technology; a 
three-dimensional war with both modernized weapons and 
conventional weapons used side by side. The various countries 
will all use the most modern weapons. The United States will 
use the fourth generation fighters and tanks it used and 
improved during the Gulf War. Japan will bring out many weapons 
it has not revealed before. China will also use the weapons it 
has updated over the past several years as well as its newest 
weapons. Some will be experimental weapons that have not yet 
been used to equip the units. However, most of the Korean 
forces will still be basically equipped with conventional 
infantry weapons. 
  How should such a war be fought? Are we up to the task? 
<H5>  How Should the War Be Fought, How Will We Complete the </H5>
Encirclement? 
  The war will be an unusually strange one, an unusually 
difficult one, and an unusually cruel one. This is because it 
will have the three following characteristics: 
  First, this will be an especially strange war. 
  Just as some have asked, how is it possible to match up 
modern missiles and infantry rifles, AWACs and hand radios, or 
satellite weapons and air raid bunkers? How can the latter 
elements be used? 
  However, facts demonstrate that this hypothesis is wrong. If 
we say that such things are of no use in desert regions and wide 
open spaces like the Persian Gulf, nonetheless, in mountain 
forest regions or in high mountains and valleys, it is a 
different story. The Korean Peoples' Army and the Chinese PLA 
will miraculously bottle up an 800,000-man modernized motorized 
infantry in this region. Although they might not be able to 
wipe out this force, they will have stopped it. The Korean 
people under the guiding philosophy of arming all of the people 
will dig many air defense tunnels. Furthermore, these will be 
able to withstand atom bomb attacks and will play a major role. 
Inside these tunnels there will be stored various types of 
weapons, equipment, and food. The U.S., Japanese, and South 
Korean forces will be caught by surprise, and there will be 
another Vietnam-type war here. 
  Second, this war will not be over in a very short time but 
will be fought with difficulty. 
  Both sides may spend several months see-sawing back and 
forth, or the war may last even longer. Neither side will be 
able to defeat the other side easily. The U.S., Japanese, and 
Korean forces will want a quick end to the war, but they will 
not be able to use many of their weapons. Their missiles cannot 
just blow up rocks in the mountains and fish in the river. The 
Chinese Navy will have a rough time of it in the naval battle. 
However, once the Chinese military has a firm foothold in the 
Pyongyang area, the Navy task force will immediately retreat 
back to its bases. Here, the U.S. and Japanese naval 
superiority will be lost, because we have anti-missile ballistic 
defense systems and advanced coastal defense systems. We also 
have a good of science and technology. "The second bloc" is 
composed of a number of major C[.sup]3[/]1 system. Unless 
they want to directly declare war on China, they will not dare 
to come cause trouble. 
  Naturally, this war will also be unusually cruel. This is 
because U.S. bombs can blow off the top of a mountain and the 
missiles of the U.S. forces can drill into caves. The price 
paid by the Korean and Chinese militaries will be great. But 
there will be too many mountain tops, too many caves, and too 
many people. The United States will not be able to use its 
bombs to level all of the mountains on most of the Korean 
Peninsula. To recover the caves one by one and to regain the 
mountain tops one by one will require hand-to-hand fighting. 
Once the Americans leave their aircraft and tanks, they are 
really paper tigers. In many places, the United States will not 
be able to use its tanks. The U.S. Army relies on helicopters 
for basic mobility. However, the one-man anti-aircraft missiles 
of the Korean and Chinese militaries are sufficient. Because of 
this, the U.S. Army will lose almost as many men in helicopters, 
going down with their helicopters, as the Koreans will lose in 
the caves. 
  Do we have the capability of doing this? Can the wishes of 
the generals be realized? 
<H5>  A Strange Force on the Sea </H5>
  When the war is raging in Korea and both sides are engaged 
in 
close hand-to-hand combat, the early warning systems of both 
sides will suddenly see a strange force on the sea. It will be 
a huge armada flying no country's flag. They will be coming out 
of the north toward the east coast of Korea. They will be 
heading toward the combat zone. 
  Who are they? 
  They are not the Americans, the Japanese, the Chinese, nor 
the Koreans. 
  Could it be the French? No! 
  Could it be the English? No! 
  It appears to be the Russians. Only they have a fleet this 
large. Only they have such an advanced fleet. 
  But they have in the past very clearly expressed their 
neutrality on the Korean question. 
  Then why are they coming? 
  They are either coming to put out the fire or to beat 
someone 
back. 
  But could they put out the fire? With three large nations 
fighting, they could not. 
  Then they have come to beat someone back. 
  Who have they come to beat back? If they have come to help 
the North Koreans and Chinese, then the Chinese and Koreans 
might very quickly send the United States and Japan home, or at 
least back to South Korea. 
  If they have come to help the United States and Japan, then 
the Chinese and Koreans are finished. 
  Everyone is just waiting and watching.... 
<H5>  VIII: THOROUGHLY RESOLVE THE PROBLEM OF THE SOUTH CHINA SEA </H5>
ISLANDS 
  If one were to ask what is the main place where the Chinese 
military faces a local conflict, the answer would be the South 
China Sea. 
  For China, the resolution of the South China Sea Islands 
problem is a "major national affair" of increasing urgency. 
  In February 1992, after the announcement of China's 
"Territorial Waters Law," the various ASEAN nations and Vietnam 
all bought advanced fighter aircraft such as the F-16 and 
Mirage-2000 and quickly built up their naval air forces. They 
also accelerated their offshore petroleum exploration and 
military deployments on the seas and islands they already 
occupy. They are well prepared to fight China to the end in the 
South China Sea and swear to protect their interests. 
  Recently, Vietnam asked to join ASEAN. Vietnamese leaders 
visited the ASEAN nations to further enhance cooperation. There 
is a trend toward Vietnam uniting with ASEAN against China. As 
the situation develops, there is the possibility that other 
nations such as Japan or the United States will become involved 
in the South China Sea to protect their major shipping lanes and 
strategic interests in the South Pacific. 
  To prevent the South China Sea conflict from escalating, the 
Chinese government has already made concessions and worked hard 
with all parties. 
  At the end of 1989, Premier Li Peng visited Malaysia and 
proposed using friendly means to hold negotiations on 
differences existing between the nations concerned. Until this 
happens, it would be best to table this question. 
  In June and July of 1991, while Chairman Yang Shangkun was 
visiting Indonesia, he stressed the use of peaceful means to 
resolve the dispute and advocated joint development of the 
islands. 
  During those same months, a spokesman from the Chinese 
Foreign Ministry, Wu Jianmin, described at a press conference 
the stand of the Chinese government on the question of the 
Nansha Islands, advocating setting the dispute aside and jointly 
developing the Nansha Islands. Up until the Eighth National 
Peoples' Congress this year, the Chinese government continued to 
reiterate its stand calling for negotiations to resolve the 
dispute and peaceful joint development. 
  However, experienced observers note that the Chinese 
government's current stand is to sacrifice economic interests in 
exchange for sovereignty and territorial integrity, and it is 
seeking the rights and interests of a peaceful environment along 
its periphery. 
  What China means by its proposed "joint development" is that 
while recognizing that the Nansha Islands are Chinese territory, 
the various nations concerned could jointly share in the ocean 
resources of the Nansha waters. This is just like the fable of 
Kong Rong giving the larger pear to his younger brother; it is 
an obvious concession. There is still a certain degree of 
difficulty in resolving the dispute and protecting sovereignty, 
and there are many complicated factors. 
  First, China does not like war. If there is a one percent 
chance of peace, it would rather work 100 percent toward peace 
and have a worldwide reputation of being a powerful nation that 
does not force its will on smaller nations. 
  Second, China is now trying to take advantage of favorable 
circumstances and is working all-out for economic development. 
If war breaks out in the South China Sea, it will interfere 
with the speed of development. 
  Third, Chinese leaders who are well versed in military 
tactics know very well that "the first ploy is planning, next 
are diplomatic efforts, next is the use of force, and next is 
attacking cities. Attacking cities is only done as a last 
resort. Therefore, good military strategists can defeat the 
forces of others without combat and take cities without long 
sieges. They can destroy countries without prolonged fighting." 
Although the Nansha Islands are Chinese territory, to use 
military force is not in her best interests, and it would not be 
a good strategy to go on a long expedition. 
  Fourth, Chinese naval and air power are the weakest of its 
military forces. They are not sufficient to recover lost 
territory with military might. From the military standpoint 
this is the most important factor. This is also the fundamental 
reason that Vietnam and the ASEAN countries have dared to set 
foot on the Nansha Islands. 
<H5>  Is There Any Hope for a Peaceful Resolution of the Conflict? </H5>
  The next century will be one of struggle over control of the 
oceans. This is commonly recognized by the strategists of all 
nations. Scientists believe that not only do the oceans cover 
70 percent of the surface of the earth, but also their abundant 
resources are far greater than those of the land. Although land 
resources are being constantly diminished and will soon be 
exhausted, it can be stated that in the next century, whoever 
controls the oceans will control the world. Therefore, over the 
past several years, not only have a number of major countries 
begun to expand their influence on the oceans, even some 
developing countries have shifted the focus of their strategy to 
the oceans, making the establishment of a quality naval force of 
primary strategic importance. China is no exception. 
  Why is this so? 
  From 1973 to 1982 the United Nations convened the Third Law 
of the Seas Conference. After heated debate, the conference 
finally passed the "United Nations Law of the Seas Treaty." The 
passing of this "Treaty" has caused the world-wide struggle over 
the seas to become more intense. On the basis of Themistocles' 
famous saying of 2500 years ago -- "whoever controls the oceans 
controls everything" -- all are planning on three properties: 
  According to the "Treaty," the extent of territorial waters 
of coastal nations cannot exceed 12 nautical miles (one nautical 
mile is 1.852 km). This extends the distance of territorial 
waters over what had previously existed. This is the first 
property. This has caused people to reconsider the value of 
islands in the ocean. 
  The second property is the "maritime exclusive economic 
zones" -- no more than 200 nautical miles beginning at the 
territorial waters reference line. The coastal nations enjoy 
sovereign rights over all natural resources in their exclusive 
economic zones with rights to economic development and 
exploration. They also have the right to build and use 
artificial islands, facilities, and structures, as well 
jurisdiction over ocean sciences research, environmental 
protection, and man-made facilities. 
  The third property is the continental shelf. The continental 
shelf refers to the natural extension of territorial lands 
outside of territorial waters and all the way to the underwater 
areas and sea bed along the rim of the continental shelf. 
Normally, this does not extend more than 200 nautical miles 
from the territorial waters line, but in any envent it is not to 
exceed 350 nautical miles. Coastal nations have sovereign 
rights to mineral and bilogical resources within this scope. 
  The forebears of the Chinese people did not fail to leave us 
these three properties. According to the stipulations of the 
"Treaty," China can demarkate a maritime exclusive economic zone 
and continental shelf of 3 million square km -- our territorial 
sea. However, we do not no what fraudulent claims our neihbors 
will secretly make. 
  The deepest causes of the Nansha Islands problem derive from 
these properties and this struggle over maritime resources. For 
Vietnam and the ASEAN countries, the Nansha Islands problem 
concerns their own development and tremendous economic profits. 
However, for China it signifies much more. 
  China has only 2,808 square meters of ocean per capita -- 
eight percent of what Japan has! 
  China's territorial lands to territorial waters ratio is 
10:3, while for Vietnam it is 1:2, and for the Philippines and 
Indonesia it is as much as 1:10. 
  It has been revealed by experts that the oil and gas 
reserves 
under the South China Sea are about 35 billion tons, with most 
of the three major basins on the China continental shelf. The 
extracted value of this would be several tens of billions of 
dollars. This undoubtedly has a tremendous attraction for all 
countries involved in the dispute over the Nansha Islands. 
  However, according to estimates by the Japanese Institute of 
Energy Economics, future petroleum requirements in the Pacific 
region will increase at the rate of 2.4 percent per year until 
the year 2000. This will reach 4.88 billion tons. Therefore, a 
number of international observers believe that the South China 
Sea has the greatest possibility of becoming the second Persian 
Gulf, whether because of the oil under the ocean or an outbreak 
of war. 
  The announcement of the Chinese "Territorial Waters Law" and 
the contract between China and the United States for joint 
exploration of oil and gas resources in the Nansha Islands are 
two practical and important steps by the Chinese government on 
the problem of the Nansha Islands. It not only once more 
expressed the determination of the Chinese government to protect 
its territorial sovereignty, but at the same time it also 
signals that the Chinese government may adopt measures and 
methods other than a peaceful resolution of the dispute. 
  In April of this year, deputy chairman of the Central 
Military Commission General Liu Huaqing, in the company of 
political commissar of the East Sea Fleet Admiral Lian Yaoqian, 
reviewed the East Sea Fleet and requested that the officers and 
men increase their vigilance to be ready for war. He also 
requested that they increase their awareness to protect the blue 
national territory, establishing new merit for China's Four 
Modernizations. 
  For every move by China, Vietnam and the ASEAN countries 
immediately react in kind. This is especially true of Vietnam. 
On the one hand, Vietnam "protested" through diplomatic 
channels, and on the other hand it used various tools to enhance 
its antagonistic propaganda toward China, attacking China by 
name as "invading Vietnamese territory," "worsening the tense 
situation in the area," and being the worst threat "in the 
Nansha Area." At the same time, Vietnam believes that China may 
take "further action" concerning the Nansha Islands. Because of 
this, the Vietnamese military has increased its combat readiness 
activities directed against China in the Nansha Islands. 
  In May 1992, The Vietnamese Army Chief-of-Staff and Navy 
Commander convened a military meeting in Ho Chi Min City to 
reevaluate China's naval and air force strengths and formulate a 
new combat plan for naval and air support in the Nansha Islands 
waters. 
  According to the spirit of collectivism in Ho Chi Min City, 
the Vietnamese Air Force has, beginning in early June, conducted 
a number of exercises to support combat in the Nansha Islands 
organized with China as the adversary. They have restored Su-22 
reconnaissance activity over the Nansha Islands and Zhejiang 
province -- activity that had been stopped for a year. 
  The Vietnamese Navy has also tightened control over the 
Nansha waters, expanding its patrolled zone from three to five 
nautical miles from the islands and reefs it occupies to 10 
nautical miles. It also has stepped up actions to pursue and 
drive out Chinese fishing boats. 
  The stands of the ASEAN countries involved in the Nansha 
Island dispute are very much the same as the Vietnamese policy. 
In July 1991, the ASEAN countries convened a "Discussion 
Conference on the Nansha Islands Question" in Indonesia. Its 
basic theme was the "south pole model," advocated by Malaysia 
and the Philippines, for the joint development of resources in 
the South China Sea. This would be the freezing of sovereignty 
and sharing of resources. Thus, the South China Seas face the 
danger of becoming "International Waters." 
<H5>  The Nansha Islands Issue Should Not Be Dragged Out </H5>
  Due to the serious disputes and sharp military opposition 
over the sovereignty question, there are still great obstacles 
to the peaceful "recognition of sovereignty and joint 
development" of the Nansha Islands hoped for by the Chinese 
government. The possibility of military conflict or war still 
exists. 
  For China, the most important matter is when and how to 
resolve the question. 
  How much longer will the Chinese government be able to put 
the Nansha Islands problem aside? According to the "statute of 
limitations" in international law, when one country occupies the 
land of another for a fairly long time and effectively rules 
this territory without any interference, then after a number of 
years it can legally take over ownership. The length of time 
for this varies; normally it is considered to be 50 years. 
  The final time limit for the Nansha Islands is the year 
2020. 
However, from current developmental trends, the question of the 
Nansha Islands is becoming more and more an "international" 
question, with the nations involved in the dispute accelerating 
its internationalization. Should it become an "international" 
question, China would no longer have sufficient grounds to use 
military force to recover the islands. Militarily, it could be 
faced with a "multinational force" under the name of the United 
Nations. At such a time, there would be a change in the nature 
of the strategic situation that would be disadvantageous to 
China. 
  Therefore, the 1990's are the key time for resolving the 
Nansha Islands question. Once they are over, China may have 
lost a historical opportunity. 
  China may use any one of the following three methods: 
  One is peaceful diplomatic methods. The effectiveness of 
this method is determined by the extent to which the nations 
involved are willing to make concessions on the question of 
principles and interests. Currently, it looks as if this would 
be fairly difficult. Another is the use of armed force to 
recover the islands. This method looks simple, but it is 
actually very complicated. Furthermore, after the islands are 
recovered, troops will have to be stationed there for a long 
time to hold them. Otherwise, after the major force moves back 
north, the other countries will come back again. 
  Another method is to use military might to apply diplomatic 
pressure, forcing the other side to make concessions. The 
disadvantage to this is that it could lead to a new "cold war" 
in Southeast Asia. 
  From current developmental trends, all of these three 
methods 
fall into the realm of possible choices. According to foreign 
speculation, "the possibility that the Chinese military will use 
force is becoming more and more obvious." 
<H5>  Obstacles to the Use of Military Force </H5>
  "If the Chinese want to retake the islands of the South 
China 
Sea, they would gobble them up like a hungry tiger." This is 
how military experts describe what would happen in a war in the 
South China Seas. 
  From a tactical model at the China Navy Institute of 
Strategic Studies, we can clearly see that the previous 
description by military experts is not a major exaggeration. If 
the Chinese Navy launches an assault on the Nansha Islands, it 
will still be faced with a number of thorny problems. According 
to an analysis of the basic factors of "timing, geography, and 
populace," the Chinese could be at a distinct disadvantage. 
  Timing. Because the Chinese Navy has not yet finished its 
modernization process, it has not yet achieved the level of 
equipment that it should have. In particular, it does not have 
its first aircraft carrier. Therefore, now is not the best time 
to solve the problem of the Nansha Islands. 
  Geography. Although the Nansha Islands are Chinese 
territory, 
they are far from the mainland and are surrounded by Vietnam, 
the Philippines, Malaysia, Brunei, and Indonesia. It is more 
than 1,000 km from China to the Nansha Islands, but from the 
Philippines or Malaysia it is only a little over 100 km. This is 
without a doubt a "tiring journey" for the Chinese Navy, and its 
combat lines and rear support lines would be very long. If a 
task force were organized and sent to the Nansha Islands, it 
would take more than 100 vessels just to support the combat 
ships. This would mean that one-third of the fleet's attack 
force would be used for support. 
  Populace. On resolving the question of the Nansha Islands, 
China is in opposition to "alliances" about to be formed. If 
Taiwan were to take China's side, the situation would be 
optimistic. If China and Taiwan are unable to maintain a 
consistent line regarding foreign nations, then there is no way 
China could have the advantage of the "populace." The United 
States could directly or indirectly become involved in Nansha 
Islands affairs. In this case, the situation could be even more 
disadvantageous for China. 
  We can see from this how urgent and complex the Nansha 
Islands question is for China's Naval leaders. However, the new 
generation of leaders, filled with a strong spirit of 
nationalism, will never abandon their efforts to bring about the 
return of the Nansha Islands to the bosom of the motherland. 
<H5>  Comparison of Forces Currently in the Nansha Islands </H5>
  If we were to say that now is the time to resolve the 
question of the Nansha Islands, our greatest advantage would lie 
in the ratio of military forces. 
  All of the nations involved in the dispute over the Nansha 
Islands are small military powers. In military force alone they 
are no match for China. Even if they were to join forces they 
might not be any match for China. According to the most recent 
statistics, the military status of the five nations involved in 
the dispute over the Nansha Island not including China and 
Taiwan is as follows: 
  The Phillipines: 
  Active duty military: 147,500 men. 
  Army: 65,000 men, forming six regional headquarters, six 
infantry divisions, one light armored brigade, one independent 
infantry brigade, one headquarters brigade, one commando 
brigade, three engineering brigades, four artillery brigades, 
one construction brigade, one special services brigade, and one 
presidential security unit. They are equipped with 28 light 
tanks, 45 infantry tanks, 245 armored transports, 32 suppression 
guns, and several recoilless rifles. The security forces have 
43,500 men, forming 13 regional headquarters and 225 local 
companies. 
  Navy: 23,000 men, equipped with three escorts, 41 patrol 
boats, 28 amphibious ships, six support ships, one naval air 
squadron with six aircraft and 12 helicopters. There are also 
9,500 marines comprising four brigades (10 battalions) and 
equipped with 85 armored transports and 85 field pieces, and a 
coast guard with 2,000 men equipped with 65 patrol boats. 
  Air force: 16,000 men composing one ground-attack fighter 
squadron, one armed helicopter gunship wing, three rebel 
suppression squadrons, one transport helicopter squadron, one 
air command aircraft, five transport squadrons, one 
communications aircraft squadron, and three training squadrons. 
They are equipped with more than 50 combat aircraft, more than 
60 armed helicopters, more than 70 transport aircraft, two 
communications aircraft, 51 trainers, and 20 air-to-air 
missiles. In addition, the Philippines also have a 48,000-man 
reserve and a 45,000-man national defense force. Currently, 50 
percent of their ships and 70 percent of their marines are 
deployed in Nansha waters. 
  Malaysia: 
  Active military: 114,500 men, including 90,000 in the army. 
They comprise one army, four divisions, one anti-riot security 
command, and nine infantry brigades (36 infantry battalions, 
four armored regiments, five field artillery regiments, two 
anti-aircraft regiments, and five engineer regiments). They 
also have one special services regiment (three battalions). 
They are equipped with 26 light tanks, 394 armored 
reconnaissance vehicles, 619 armored transports, more than 200 
suppression guns, 150 recoilless rifles, 118 anti-aircraft guns, 
and several rocket launchers and anti-tank weapons. 
  Navy: 12,500 men, comprising two naval headquarters and 
equipped with one escort ship, eight missile launches, 29 patrol 
boats, five minesweepers, two LSTs, 33 landing craft, and three 
support vessels. The naval air force has six helicopters. 
  Air Force: 12,000 men comprising two headquarters, three 
ground-attack fighter squadrons, one fighter squadron, one 
reconnaissance squadron, four transport squadrons, four 
helicopter squadrons, four trainer squadrons, and one airfield 
security squadron. They are equipped with 58 combat aircraft, 
38 transports, 60 helicopters, and 75 trainers. Not long ago, 
Malaysia imported 12 Tordado fighter bombers and 12 Dagger air 
defense systems from England, as well as 20 light artillery 
pieces. 
  Malaysia also has 47,600 men in its reserves and 200,000 men 
in paramilitary units. They are primarily police field units, 
water patrol police units, local security units, border 
reconnaissance units, and peoples' volunteers. 
  Brunei: 
  Active military: 4,000 men, including 250 female soldiers. 
  The army is made up of 3,200 men, comprising two infantry 
brigades, one armored reconnaissance squadron, one air defense 
missile company, one engineering squadron, and one 
communications squadron. They are equipped with 16 light tanks, 
24 armored transport vehicles, and 12 ground-to-air missile 
launchers. 
  The navy is made up of 500 men comprising one river boat 
squadron and one special combat squadron. They are equipped 
with three missile launches, three patrol boats, and three 
landing craft. 
  The air force is formed of 300 men comprising one riot 
suppression squadron and one helicopter squadron. They are 
equipped with six armed helicopter gunships, 12 helicopters, and 
four trainers. 
  Brunei also has 2,800 men in paramilitary units, including 
1,900 men in police units and 900 in Gurkha reserves. 
  Indonesia: 
  Active duty forces include 285,000 men, the reserves 800,000 
men, and paramilitary units 415,000 (including 300,000 in 
militia). 
  The army is made up of 215,000 men comprising one strategic 
reserve unit command and 10 district headquarters. Subordinate 
to the strategic reserve headquarters there are two infantry 
division headquarters, one armored cavalry brigade, three 
infantry brigades, three airborne brigades, two field artillery 
regiments, one anti-aircraft artillery regiment, two engineering 
battalions, four independent airborne battalions, eight 
independent air defense battalions, nine independent engineering 
battalions, one Army Air Corps squadron, one helicopter 
squadron, and four special forces detachments. They are 
equipped with 141 light tanks, 114 armored reconnaissance 
vehicles, 420 armored transport vehicles, more than 200 
suppression guns, 310 anti-aircraft guns, 92 different models of 
aircraft and helicopters, 21 landing craft, 14 transport ships, 
and more than 20 ground-to-air missiles. 
  The navy has 43,000 men comprising an eastern and western 
headquarters and equipped with two submarines, 15 escorts, 29 
patrol boats of different types, two mine sweepers, 15 
amphibious craft, and 20 support ships. There are 12,000 men in 
the marines, comprising two infantry regiments and one combat 
support regiment. They are equipped with 30 light tanks, 40 
infantry tanks, 57 armored transport vehicles, 40 towed guns, 
and 20 rockets and anti-aircraft guns. There are 1,000 men in 
the Naval Air Force equipped with 15 combat aircraft, nine armed 
helicopter gunships, nine anti-submarine aircraft, 15 
reconnaissance aircraft, and 24 other aircraft and helicopters. 
  The air force has 27,000 men comprising an eastern and 
western Air Force Combat Headquarters, two ground-attack fighter 
squadrons, one fighter squadron, one rebellion suppression 
aircraft squadron, one ocean reconnaissance aircraft squadron, 
four transport squadrons, three helicopter squadrons, and four 
trainer squadrons. They are equipped with 70 combat aircraft, 
60 transport aircraft, and 39 helicopters. They also have five 
battalions of rapid response forces. Not long ago, the 
Indonesians purchased four F-16 fighters, eight ground-attack 
fighters, 55 surface-to-air missile systems, four escorts, and 
ten air-to-ship missiles from the United States, England, and 
France. Currently, 55 percent of the Indonesian fleet and 45 
percent of its air force are deployed in the Nansha Islands. 
  Vietnam: 
  Active duty military: 1.252 million men. 
  The army has 1.11 million men (about to be reduced by 50 
percent). They are organized into 14 armies, 65 infantry 
divisions, 10 armored brigades, one support special forces unit, 
10 field artillery brigades, eight engineering divisions, 10 to 
16 economic construction divisions, and 20 independent 
engineering brigades. They are equipped with 2,210 tanks, 2,700 
armored combat vehicles, 1,000 suppression guns, more than 3,000 
anti-aircraft guns, and a certain number of anti-tank missiles 
and surface-to-air missiles. 
  The navy has 40,000 men (including 27,000 men in the 
marines). They are equipped with seven escorts, eight missile 
launches, 21 torpedo boats, 33 patrol boats, five mine sweepers, 
and seven landing craft. 
  There are 12,000 men in the air force. They are organized 
into four air divisions, one ground-attack fighter regiment, six 
interceptor regiments, three transport regiments, one helicopter 
division, and three training regiments. They are equipped with 
250 combat aircraft, 30 combat helicopter gunships, 135 
transport aircraft, 170 helicopters, 53 trainers, and a certain 
number of air-to-air missiles. 
  The air defense army has 100,000 men. They are organized 
into 14 air defense divisions (with subordinate surface-to-air 
missile regiments, anti-aircraft brigades, and radar brigades). 
They are equipped with 66 surface-to-air missile facilities, 
1,000 anti-aircraft guns, and 100 radars. 
  After normal relations were restored between China and 
Vietnam, Vietnam moved the center of gravity of its troop 
deployments to the south. Three armies making up 60 percent of 
the total forces are deployed along the coast to achieve their 
dream of being an "maritime superpower." 
  We can see from the data above that none of these countries 
has the capability to take on China. Even if the naval and air 
power of all five countries were combined, it would clearly 
still be too little. They would not even be strong enough to 
take on Taiwan. Therefore, from a purely military analysis, it 
would be a fairly easy task to drive the occupying forces from 
these islands. One moderately-sized task force wold be enough. 
However, the problem would be how to hold onto the recovered 
territory. This is the most practical problem. 
<H5>  The Magic Weapon For Defeating the Enemy </H5>
  In the fall of 1992, a long-range combat exercise with the 
Nansha Islands as the background had just concluded at a certain 
military base in South China. The military researchers were 
secretly called to a nondescript meeting room. There was a 
heated discussion over the local war the Chinese military might 
conduct in the Nansha Islands. The meeting focussed on 
resolving the major problems of principles over guiding 
philosophy and combat policy of the Chinese forces fighting in 
the Nansha Islands. These have formed a basis for policy by 
the highest commanding agencies. 
  The meeting believed that in a war in the Nansha Islands, 
they would have to achieve the best possible results under the 
worst conditions. They would have to use a combination of 
fighting and intimidation to quickly bring a quick conclusion to 
the first stage, which would be to drive out those occupying the 
islands. To do this, a war in the Nansha Islands would have to 
comply with the following principles. 
  Principle of surprise: All war preparations would have to 
be done in a way that would allow the attack to be a surprise, 
catching the opponents unaware as much as possible under the 
conditions of existing equipment and technology so it would be 
impossible for them to organize a timely counterattack. At the 
same time, after taking the islands, make preparations for 
holding them for a prolonged period of time. 
  Principle of focused attacks: It will be necessary to 
concentrate forces to first attack the Vietnamese forces, 
containing the Vietnamese air forces as much as possible to 
prevent the Vietnamese from reinforcing their troops in the 
Nansha Islands. The focus of the attack on the ocean should be 
against the Indonesian submarines and escorts. If it is 
possible to effectively overcome the Vietnamese air forces and 
the Indonesian Navy, we will maintain the initiative throughout 
the fighting. When necessary, we could also consider high speed 
surprise "surgical strikes" focused on the countries themselves, 
concentrating on destroying their military bases in order to get 
them to "comply." 
  Principle of three dimensional warfare: We must organize a 
task force of naval and air power for both offensive and 
defensive fighting which can effectively handle attacks from the 
air or ocean during the long trip, so it could arrive at the 
combat zone without any major problems. Since we are weak in 
shipborne aircraft, we could use the Xisha and Dongsha bases to 
be responsible for the primary air support missions. The 
marines and the naval air forces would be the primary task 
forces for attacking enemy-occupied islands and reefs, and the 
missile units and air force long-range bomber forces would 
become the key elements for conducting firepower assaults on the 
enemy. At the same time, during the process of the fighting, it 
would always be necessary to make full use of camouflage, 
deception, and early warning support measures. 
  Principle of enhanced rear services support: Prior to the 
fighting, it will be necessary to mobilize sufficient support 
vessels to join the task force. The Xisha and Dongsha Islands 
could become intermediate transhipment stations for transport 
services. Because the supply line would be more than 1,000 km, 
it will be especially important to use a large amount of 
anti-submarine and air defense forces in order to prevent the 
supply line from be disrupted. Consideration must be given to 
using a three dimensional supply route of naval and air forces. 
Therefore, the Air Force must place a large amount of its 
transport forces into service. In the combat stage of holding 
the recovered islands, an uninterrupted supply should be 
considered for building up the Nansha Islands from far off, 
using methods of simultaneously developing, solidifying, and 
constructing, to gradually turn the South China Sea into a 
permanent ocean route. 
  Principle of rapid fighting, rapid stabilization, and 
strict controls: In order to prevent the situation from 
expanding and the fighting from escalating, especially to avoid 
Japanese or U.S. involvement, after the surprise attack has been 
successful, we should quickly stabilize the defenses on the 
Nansha Islands to form a three dimensional defensive system. 
Then, every effort should be made to disengage from the enemy, 
announcing an end to the fighting. In this manner, it will be 
possible to concentrate our best forces to establish a permanent 
ocean channel. 
<H5>  How Should the War Be Launched? </H5>
  Without an aircraft carrier, what type of fighting and what 
steps might the Chinese forces use to accomplish their 
expedition to the Nansha Islands? According to the idea used 
for numerous long-range training flights by the South China Sea 
air forces combined with the combat sequence, it is possible to 
come up with a general outline of the fighting. 
  Composition of the task force: At the heart of the task 
force will naturally be the missile escorts which have the 
greatest defense penetration capabilities. From a comparison of 
military forces in the Nansha Islands, it would take at least 
five to eight of these, with 10 to 15 escort ships, 15 to 20 
submarines, 15 to 20 sub chasers, 20 to 30 patrol boats, three 
to five landing ships, 30 to 50 supply support vessels and, 50 
to 100 missile launches. It would take at least a week to 
assemble a task force of this size. 
  Carry out an effective naval blockade: While preparing to 
form the task force, at least 10 to 15 submarines and three to 
five long-range bomber squadrons should conduct a blockade of 
the Nansha Island waters to prevent to the greatest extent 
possible any reinforcement of the islands and reefs and to make 
defense preparations difficult. 
  Intermediate range missiles should constitute a threat to 
enemy vessels in the Nansha Island waters. Electronic 
countermeasures units should carry out continuous jamming to 
confuse the enemy, making it possible for the task force to 
assemble and advance undetected. Whether or not an effective 
three dimensional blockade can be enforced over the Nansha 
Islands is a key link determining whether or not the element of 
surprise can be brought to bear in the fighting. This process 
may continue until the task force has deployed to certain 
waters,or even until the landing combat has begun. 
  The naval blockade will not be a tight blockade all around 
the Nansha Islands, but will be a blockade of the major ship 
channels and main axes, not only establishing a blockade of the 
channels between Vietnam, the Philippines and Indonesia, and the 
Nansha Islands, but also necessary assaults against their land 
bases. Along secondary directions, a certain number of mines 
will normally achieve the objective. 
  The key to establishing a naval blockade is that it relies 
on advanced surveillance and monitoring technology. The primary 
means are the use of satellites, radar, and reconnaissance 
aircraft to form a multiple layer surveillance network which can 
provide real-time guidance to submarines and bomber aircraft to 
stop enemy transport. If this stage of the combat is 
successfully organized, it is very possible that no heavy 
fighting will be necessary, that the enemy may be forced to 
accept conditions or make concessions, avoiding the final 
outbreak of war. 
  Smoothly organize the advance: For a huge task force to 
smoothly arrive at a combat zone more than 1,000 km away is no 
easy task. Even if the naval blockade wins the necessary time 
for the advance and distracts the enemy's attention to a great 
degree, along the extended advance route there is no way to 
ensure the task force will not be attacked from many directions. 
Therefore, for the Chinese task force, the fighting begins with 
the advance. 
  "Advance and fight at the same time" is a concept that must 
be established by the task force commander. During the advance, 
the primary tasks of the task force will be anti-submarine and 
air defenses. Worst estimates are that the enemy could use four 
or five submarines and 200 combat aircraft. For the enemy, 
these assault forces would mostly be used during the advance of 
the Chinese task force. Although this would not be a clear 
naval and air superiority for the enemy, it would constitute a 
fairly large threat to the advancing task force. 
  Task forces are usually divided into the spearhead, main 
force, and rear guard stretched out over dozens of nautical 
miles with heavily exposed flanks which are easily attacked, and 
without an aircraft carrier, air defense would be even weaker. 
In order to deal with this, the task force advance must use a 
number of support methods. 
  First is enhanced firepower for the blockade of the Nansha 
Islands, suppressing as much of the enemy naval and air forces 
in the Nansha Islands as possible. 
  Second is the air force fighter bombers should provide air 
cover for the fleet, maintaining control of the skies as much as 
possible during the advance. Third, the task force must have and 
use enhanced anti-submarine and air defense capabilities. 
  From the firepower currently available to a task force, it 
is still possible that it could handle enemy attacks from the 
air and the sea. 
  Luda class missile [words indistinct] are equipped with two 
launchers for SS-N-2 anti-ship missiles, two twin 130-mm ship 
guns, eight 37-mm and eight 25-mm anti-aircraft guns, and two 
multiple rocket type depth charge launchers with rails which can 
hold 50 large depth charges. It has fairly strong 
anti-submarine defense capabilities. 
  The Jianghu class missile escort: It is equipped with two 
twin dual mounted SS-N-2 anti-ship missile launchers, four 
100-mm and 12 37-mm anti-aircraft guns, two rocket type depth 
charge launchers and two anti-aircraft missile launchers. This 
vessel has better air defense capabilities than cruisers. 
  The Hainan class sub chaser: This is equipped with two dual 
57-mm and two dual 25-mm guns, two rocket type mine launchers, 
four mine rocket guns, and mine launchers. This vessel is 
primarily used against submarines, but has a certain amount of 
air defense and ocean assault capabilities. 
  The Haidao class missile launch: This is equipped with 
four SS-N-4 anti-ship missiles and two dual 57-mm guns. In 
addition, the T-43 class mine sweepers, the Kronshtadt class 
patrol boats, the Huangfeng class and Hekou class missile 
launches, and the Shanghai class II model gunboats all have a 
certain degree of anti-submarine capabilities. 
  We can see from this that during the advance, the most 
reliable way to insure the advance is effective task force air 
defense and anti-submarine firepower. 
  It is worth noting that during the fighting, the ASEAN 
countries might receive advanced U.S. or Western fighters and 
missiles, and even though these may not be many in number, they 
could be a sizeable threat. Therefore, organizing the advance 
might not be without snags. If losses can be kept within 20 
percent during the advance, this would be a major achievement. 
  Launching an all-out landing campaign: An effective 
blockade and a successful advance will greatly reduce the 
intensity of landing combat. Therefore, the blockade itself 
must surround and assault the enemy forces holding the islands 
so they are isolated and without support. At the same time, 
when the task force advances to the specified zone, the enemy 
support vessels will have no time to worry about the defenses 
holding the islands. These vessels may make sacrificial defense 
against the task force, circling the force or may abandon the 
fighting and go home. In this manner, the task left to the 
landing combat will primarily be wiping out the stragglers left 
on the islands. 
  As for the tactics to be used in the landing, what should 
be used is to "surround larger forces and pursue smaller 
forces." This is to surround and wipe out the islands and reefs 
primarily defended by the Vietnamese, allowing the forces on the 
other smaller islands and reefs to escape, "leaving them an 
avenue" to escape so they will withdraw quickly. 
  Prior to the landing combat, the air forces and naval air 
forces and the task force guns should conduct a firepower 
assault on the defensive fortifications and enemy personnel on 
the islands for 40 to 60 minutes. The marines will await the 
opportunity to penetrate through breaches in enemy defenses into 
the interior of the islands to critical positions, executing 
separation and assault, waiting for the frontal landing units to 
enter the fighting when the enemy defense system is basically 
demolished. The overall battle to retake the islands and reefs 
is estimated to take no more than two days. Naturally, this 
will primarily be determined by the effectiveness of the 
blockade and success of the advance and not by the landing 
combat itself. 
  Holding onto the Nansha Islands is a big question mark. 
Just as in our earlier analysis, a naval blockade and a 
successful advance and landing combat would be necessary. These 
three stages may well all be successful for China, and we may 
even be optimistic for success. However, recovery of the lost 
territory is only half of the Nansha problem. The other half is 
whether we hold onto them after we recover them. Because the 
task force will not be able to remain at the Nansha Islands for 
a long period of time, and it would not be practical to deploy 
large numbers of troops to defend the various islands and reefs 
of the Nansha Islands, and the Nansha Islands are located in a 
"pocket" formed by the other countries concerned with the Nansha 
Question, so this all presents a difficult problem for holding 
onto the Nansha Islands. 
  As for the ASEAN countries, they may strategically fight a 
protracted seesaw battle with China. This would be that when 
China's task force goes south, the troops would leave the 
islands, and not fight the task force head on, but when the task 
force returned back north, they would come back. With China's 
current naval and air power, it would not be able to deal with 
such a situation. 
  The only hope for turning this question mark into an 
exclamation mark is China's aircraft carrier! 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66186 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar029___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-029 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Investigative Report of Surplus Rural Labor </ABS>
<DATE1>   16 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Investigative Report on China's Surplus Rural Labor </F>
<H3> <TI>   Part I </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Part I </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0219A Beijing ZHONGGUO QINGNIAN BAO in Chinese 16 Feb 94 
pp 1, 2 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0219A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO QINGNIAN BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Collection of essays: "An Investigative Report on China's </F>
Surplus Rural Labor Force; Exploring the Sources, Part I -- 
Migratory Workers, Do You Know Where You Are Headed?"] 
  [Text] Editorial Note: According to 
scholars, in the modernization process, China's rural areas will 
have 120 million surplus workers who must be removed from their 
land. According to newspaper reports, more than 10 million 
civilian workers will move across regions during the Spring 
Festival this year. This huge mobile army will consist almost 
entirely of young people. It is inevitable that we are concerned 
about their fate, their struggle, and their tremendous effect on 
the Chinese society as it heads toward modernization. 
  ZHONGGUO QINGNIAN BAO reporters in five provinces in the 
east, west, north, south, and central parts of the fatherland 
have chosen five fairly typical administrative villages as the 
sources of migration and five cities as the "destinations" of 
migration and have combined sociology and journalism in 
conducting a serious investigation, and they have obtained 
initial results. 
  Beginning today, this paper will publish a series entitled 
"An Investigative Report on China's Surplus Rural Labor Force" 
to share the results with our readers. We hope to attract some 
attention and promote the development and maturity of 
appropriate new mechanisms. 
<H5>  Where the Migratory Cranes Gather--by reporter Dai Yuanzhi </H5>
[2071 5913 2388] 
  In the hinterland of northern Jiangsu Province, at the 
junction of three of Yancheng City's counties--Funing, Jianhu, 
and Sheyang--lies a village called Dagang. Its nickname is 
"Share-a-Cigarette-With-Three-Counties." Reportedly, once upon a 
time there was a wealthy family that built high walls and dug a 
deep moat, and the village was named Dagang--big harbor--after 
the moat. At first it was but a grassy marsh with poor soil 
where only garlic grew, and so people also called it "Garlic 
Village." According to some old-timers, a Chen family originally 
from Suzhou's Lumen was "driven out by Hong Wu" and ended up 
there. 
  With the arrival of the swallows comes spring and the wild 
geese fall. Each year, flocks of cranes fly from the frozen 
north to coastal Yancheng to spend the winter. The migrant 
civilian workers return home several times a year, just like the 
migratory birds in their homeland. 
  Every year, in early summer, civilian workers who work south 
of the Changjiang River go back north to harvest wheat and 
transplant seedlings. Liu Xunjun [0491 6064 0193] also goes home 
to farm his own 3 mu of land. 
  Liu comes from Binhai County' Zhenghong Township, the 
hometown of the martyr, Gu Zhenghong. Liu graduated from junior 
high in 1983 and worked on the farm for two years, and that is 
why going back to the farm is nothing new to him. Last year, he 
went home and dug a 50-60 meter drain ditch in no time. The old 
peasants in the village even praised him, saying, "well, you've 
been away for a few years, but you're still good at digging 
ditches." 
  He went to Shanghai in 1988, repaired cables for half a year 
before deciding to go to Wuxi. 
  His three married brothers have set up separate households. 
At home, only his little sister is still around to keep his 
60-some-year-old widowed mother company. Usually his mother and 
sister can handle the farm work, but during summer harvest and 
planting, there is wheat harvesting, threshing, tilling, 
irrigating, and transplanting to do, and during the autumn 
harvest and planting, there is harvesting, threshing, plowing, 
and wheat planting to do, and he cannot bear over-working his 
mother and little sister. 
  The workshop has implemented a contract system, and during 
the busy seasons, Liu Xunjun will either go on leave or arrange 
with his fellow workers to take over his work (in this way, his 
wages and bonuses will not be deducted), so he can spend 10 days 
or so to work back home. He lost 10 jin during the autumn sowing 
season in 1991. Only in this way can he keep his contracted 
responsibility farm from turning into wasteland, and only then 
can he make a thousand yuan or so away from home. 
  During the harvest season, he will return home to find the 
swallows that have been returning to his house for decades have 
already arrived from the south, and by the time harvest is over 
and the seedlings planted, the swallows will have already gone 
south again. He thinks to himself, "I too am but a migratory 
bird." 
  He is lucky. His brothers are willing to help; he can go 
home 
twice a year, and he can still keep his wages and bonuses. But 
Lu Ningdong [7627 1380 2639], who works with him, was not as 
lucky. 
  Lu used to work for a construction company. He took half a 
month off to go back home during the busy season. His group 
leader lost his request of absence, and his superiors took that 
to be an unexcused absence and docked him a month's wage plus 
200 or 300 yuan from his year-end bonus. The group leader 
vouched for him but to no avail, and in his anger, he quit his 
job. At first, he couldn't even get his workman's deposit back. 
Someone showed him the way, and he went and bought a chicken, 
and only then could he get his money back. 
  "Their hearts are divided--they have to work away from home 
but tend to the family farm too." They are workers as well as 
peasants. Normally they are workers, but during the busy season 
they are peasants. They are like a flock of migratory birds, 
changing with the seasons, running back and forth between their 
hometown and their place of work. 
  Today, not too far north of Liu's hometown, in Chendu 
Township across from northern Jiangsu's main irrigation ditch, 
30 small village-level farms have been set up to centralize the 
land and implement collective contracting or concentrate the 
land in the hands of a few large farming households, so that 
people who are working away from home will not have to worry 
about their farms. Liu and his friends are envious. 
<H5>  Follow One's Instincts--by reporter Mao Hao [3029 3185] </H5>
  Gouzi Village is located in the hilly part Qianqiu 
Prefecture of northeastern Sichuan. It is named after a buddhist 
temple, Guozi Temple (an elementary school today). The 
prominent families in the village are all originally from 
Huguang. There used to be a Huguang guild hall in Hengsheng 
Plaza. Guozi village used to produce an abundance of corn. At 
one time, Guangan county, to which the village belongs, was 
known as "Golden Guangan." Historically, the village was not 
particularly famous for anything, and its economy is not very 
prosperous; no famous names or events have ever been recorded in 
the county annals. Industrialist Liu Yanlin [0491 1693 2651] who 
started out as a hired-hand was elected to Sichuan Province's 
CPPCC last year, thus becoming the village's best-known 
celebrity. 
  According to this reporter's investigation, most civilian 
workers who leave home for the first time have never left 
Guangan County before; a large percentage have only gone as far 
as Hengsheng Town. When choosing their job locations, most 
people rely on information provided by friends and relatives 
plus their own impression from radio and television shows, and 
so we can say they are following their "instincts." 
  Forty-some-year old Feng Zhigang [7458 1807 0474] is a 
failed 
hired-hand. "I am heart-broken," said Feng, who is working on 
his family farm today. "My disadvantage is that I have no 
education, I have no brain. When people say something is round, 
I agree; when they say it is flat, I agree too." In 1986, the 
company commander of the village militia told him that money 
could be made transporting sand in Hunan, and so he went there. 
But by then, the state had stopped the excavations. Feng went 
there for nothing. "In 1987, I heard that money could be made in 
Hainan, and I borrowed money and hurried there, but by the time 
I got there, all the projects had been completed. I had to do 
odd jobs along the way to get myself home." In 1988, Feng went 
to Hainan again. This time he made 300 yuan, but the boss saw 
that he was an honest man and gave him a citation instead of 
real money. Today, sickly Feng sits before the reporter in 
dejection. He said, "I will never go out again." 
  A middle school student in the same village by the name of 
Xiao Guanghe [5135 0342 0678] had a similar experience. In 1984, 
18-year-old Xiao heard from his cousin that there was work in 
Guiyang. He had never stepped outside of Hengsheng before, but 
he was young and bold, and he headed out by himself only to find 
that things were very different from what he had expected. "It 
was a terrible year. I did not have enough money to get home. I 
took the bus to Wangqi and walked more than 100 li to get home." 
  But Xiao at least had some education. "Back then I watched a 
lot of television. Most news came out of Guangdong. My 
father-in-law's neigbor kept sending money back from over there. 
This time I made sure that the capital construction works had 
just begun before I headed out there. I made the peak 
construction season, and adding that I had some experience by 
then, I worked six years straight, and each year I was able to 
bring home several thousand yuan." Today, Xiao is a small labor 
constractor with 23-30 hired-hands of his own. He came home 
early this year to build a new house for himself. When talking 
about this year's plans, he sounds very "well-seasoned," 
"Guangdong is almost completely opened up. I think the big 
bosses are heading to Fujian, thinking that there will be 
massive construction work there. I have asked around. They have 
shifting sand there which makes construction difficult and 
requires special skills." So long as the labor market is 
underdeveloped and labor export to undertake large-scale 
complete construction projects is still impractical, naturally 
those in Guozi village will not be the only people to follow 
their "instincts." 
  The reporter has found that most of Guozi village's civilian 
workers who "follow their instincts" have more or less been 
given some information, and in this respect, their relatives 
play a very important role. There is a direct correlation 
between how accurate and timely the information and the 
closeness of the relatives from whom they obtain their news. Liu 
Yanlin is chairman of the board of Guangdong's Chuanhui Group, 
and out of the seven Liu families in his former brigade, eight 
people have gone to work in Guangdong, and although few directly 
work in Liu's company, because of their access to information, 
they tend to be more rational about their "instincts" and 
generally are more accurate and steady in making their choices. 
This perhaps is a characteristic of the flow of rural surplus 
labor in the early stage. 
<H5>  Crossing the Tangula--by reporter Sun Kai [1327 0418] </H5>
  Gangu County was originally known as Fujiang. The 
county was created in Tang Dynasty; that is, it was created 
after conquering the Jiang people. Xinzhuang Village is situated 
in the valley in the better part of the county. The Weihe River 
flows by the village, and so the land is irrigated, but there 
are few farms. 
  The wind blows, the snow drifts. 
  On the world-renowned Qinghai-Tibet Highway, at 5,000 meter 
above sea-level, standing beside a truck loaded with cargo are a 
group of fur-clad men. In their midst stands a kerosene stove. 
Noodles--their lunch--are being cooked. 
  They are Huang Aisheng [7806 1947 3932] and his partners, 
all 
from Xinzhuang Village. They are going to Tibet to do business. 
  They hire a big truck in Gansu, fill it with clothing, food, 
and so on, go cross Qinghai Province and follow the 
Qinghai-Tibet Highway from Golmud into Tibet, and from there 
they go to Lhasa and Xigaze and other places to sell their 
goods. They make several trips a year. Huang Aisheng said, "It 
is easier to do business in Tibet than in the hinterland. If you 
don't mind hard work, you can easily make 10,000 yuan a year 
after expenses." 
  Huang said, "When we first came to Tibet, the lack of oxygen 
and the headaches alone were intolerable, not to mention other 
problems. In Golmud people warned us that Tibet was a dangerous 
place. They said that once they took a bus from Lhasa to Golmud, 
and it broke down half-way. The smart ones spent some money and 
hired another car, but most people thought that they had already 
paid the bus fare and if they left, they would be throwing money 
away plus they would have to pay again. So they sat down and 
waited for the bus to be repaired. Little did they expect that 
by night-fall the bus was still not repaired, and they had to 
spend the night on the bus. The night was cold and the air was 
thin. What a murderous night." 
  Huang said, "It is not easy to make money. When we first 
came 
to Tibet, the language alone posed a real problem. Every night I 
tried to learn the Tibetan language from the natives. Good thing 
that these minority races are very friendly and very warmhearted 
people. Both the Tibetan nationality and the Uygur nationality 
with whom I did business earlier in Xinjiang are very friendly 
people. Today I can speak two minority nationality 
languages--Uygur and Tibetan. Another problem is the customs 
outposts along the way. If you are stopped, you will have to 
pay up or you are going nowhere. Once I was stopped at a Qinghai 
customs outpost. They saw that Gansu's customs had already 
collected all the necessary fees, but they said their rates were 
too low and made me pay more." 
  The villagers said that years ago, Huang used to carry grain 
from Shaanxi to Gangu and was once arrested by the militia at 
the train station. Later he worked as a hired-hand in a 
construction site. He even worked as a street vendor in 
Xinjiang. He has done many things. 
  Huang said, "We peasants can endure all kinds of hardship, 
suffer all kinds of punishment. So long as we can make some 
money and have a better life, we are willing to do anything and 
work anywhere. Of course, we won't do anything illegal." 
  Many of Xinzhuang Village's peasants have gone to Xinjiang 
and Tibet instead of the coastal areas. This is rather puzzling. 
But to them it is the logical thing to do: "It is difficult for 
people like us to adjust to the developed regions. But the 
backward areas are a different story. For one thing, we more or 
less share a common language, and for another thing, life is 
tougher here, and people from the well-developed areas seldom 
come here, and so there are more opportunities for us." 
<H5>  Following in the Old-Timers' Footsteps--by reporter Liu Jian </H5>
[0491 0256] 
  Like numerous other natural villages in northern China, 
Liujiaguanfang, a small village at the edge of the Yimang 
mountain area, was, according to legend, moved from beneath a 
large Chinese Scholar tree from Shanxi's Hongdong County during 
Ming Dynasty's Hongwu Year. Most people (except for the women) 
have the same last name, Liu. According to the "Liu Family 
Annals," revised in the eighth year of Xianfeng of the Qing 
Dynasty, the Liu ancestors had come from Haizhou, south of the 
Changjiang River. 
  Liu Hengyun [0491 1854 6663] has gone to the northeast to 
visit his sons. His sons are working in the coal mines in 
Heilongjiang's Qitaihe coal mines. Last autumn, the elder son 
married a local girl. The old man has gone especially to visit 
his son's new home. 
  Traveling a thousand li to visit family--this is quite 
common 
among villagers from Liujiaguanfang. 
  Shandong's peasants have this famous saying, "Old people do 
not venture north; young people do not head down south." It 
means that old people do not go to the northeast, because 
coolies come from there; it is not a place for old people. Young 
people should not go down south, because it is a place full of 
temptations where young people can easily be tricked or 
corrupted. For hundreds of years, Shandong's peasants have 
traditionally stayed in the three northeastern provinces. In the 
first 30 years after the founding of the PRC, Shandong 
transferred out 162,000 people each year, mostly to the 
northeast, especially Heilongjiang. This did not include the 
temporary migrant workers who did not move their households but 
would travel back and forth. 
  Today, 80 percent of Liujiaguanfang Village's young men 
under 
25 years old have been to the northeast. Of course, they have 
gone out and have returned. But of those who have left and never 
to return, scores of families and nearly a hundred descendants 
of Liujiaguanfang villagers can be found in Heilongjiang's 
Qitaihe City alone. 
  When Liu Zaitian [0491 0961 3944] and Liu Hanying [0491 3352 
5391] were living in Liujiaguanfang last year, their homes were 
50 meters apart. Today, they are living in Qitaihe City, and 
their homes are only 5 meters apart. In the 500 square meters 
around their homes, there are 11 families originally from 
Liujiaguanfang. 
  Liujiaguanfang is my hometown. At 17, my father twice went 
to 
the Qitaihe coal mines and once to the Bianhe oil fields. The 
fourth time he headed east of Shanhaiguan, he already had four 
children at home. My eldest aunt's family is scattered in 
Yichun, Shangzhi, and Musuo in Heilongjiang. My youngest aunt 
lives in Jilin. My uncle also wandered throughout Heilongjiang 
when he was a teenager. My five uncles have all been east of 
Shanhaiguan. 
  Many people eventually move away after drifting back and 
forth. In 1993, seven people from three Liujiaguanfang families 
moved to Heilongjiang and Jilin permanently. 
  Today, it is no longer true that "only one way leads east of 
Shanhaiguan." In recent years, Jiaodong Peninsula has become one 
big construction site, and in the prefecture where 
Liujiaguanfang is located, the prefectural capital Linyi has 
become a commercial center. The demand for labor has increased 
significantly, and the flow of labor force has therefore 
branched out. In addition, one of the villagers has become an 
assistant manager is a labor service company, and a succession 
of 13 of his neighbors have joined the organized labor export 
team. They go east, west, north, and everywhere. Liu Tianchao 
[0491 3944 6389] and Liu Shun [0491 7311], the two brothers, are 
in Qitaihe, and their little sister is working in a joint 
venture enterprise in Tianjin as a physical health instructor. 
  When men braved the journey to the northeast in the old 
days, 
women never joined in. Today, the flow has branched out in all 
directions. Almost all of Liujiaguanfang's single women have 
left. Most have gone to Yantai's Changdao County to help raise 
fish. 
<H5>  Going to the Edge of the World for Greener Pastures--by </H5>
reporter Lu Yuegang [4151 6460 0474] 
  From Nanchang south 80 km to the famous "medicine 
capital" Zhangshu City and then across the Gongjiang River and 
head south for another 46 km is Huangtugang County's Huxia 
Village by the river Mengshui. This is a typical rural 
administrative village, with its rolling hills and hillocks at 
the edge of the Poyanghu plains. It is comprised of six natural 
villages. Its planting industry emphasizes two crops of rice 
each year and a crop of peanuts. It is named "Huxia Village" 
because it is situated at the lower reach of Jianhu lake. 
  Only 35 people have left Huxia village to work elsewhere. 
This is not a large number compared to the town's other 
villages. Sixty percent of Tuohu Village's and 56 percent of 
Huangjia village's workers have left. Most of them have gone to 
Shenzhen and Ningbo. 
  To almost-30-year-old Zou Xiaolan [6760 1420 5695], going to 
work in Ningbo has nothing to do with her wanting to see the 
world. Zou Binzi [6760 2430 0098] told me that she is the kind 
of spirited woman who is fed up with the rural custom of paying 
bride-price. She said, "I am not a pig or a dog." In choosing a 
husband, her standard is that he must be educated and that the 
two must be able to communicate in spirit. The purpose of her 
going to work in the city is clear. She wants to be independent. 
To reach this goal, she is willing to endure setbacks, hardship, 
fatigue, and discrimination by the city people. 
  Where can she go? To a rural society cut off from the 
outside 
world, information about work availability has to come mainly 
from good friends and relatives. This is also one of the main 
reasons why most of Huxia Village's surplus labor is still 
working on the land. Going away sounds very attractive to them. 
The numbers all add up: Even in Shenzhen or Zhejiang's Ningbo, 
if one is frugal, an ordinary skilled worker can easily take 
home a net of 2,000 to 3,000 yuan a year after paying for living 
expenses. This point alone makes it impossible for many to be 
"so attached to home as to be unwilling to leave it," even if it 
means taking a chance. 
  Huangtugang's county party committee secretary, Du Shuiyuan 
[2629 3055 3293], specifically went to the post office to find 
out about remittances in 1993 and learned that at least 15,000 
yuan was remitted each day, and not including the amount people 
brought home with them, this was a sum of 6 million yuan, 30 
times the county's total revenue. Du Shuiyuan told me that not 
long ago, the director of the prefectural policy research 
department came to Huangtugang to study the issue of rural 
surplus labor, and after checking with the post office and 
credit cooperatives, it was found that so far, the peasant 
workers who worked away from home had made 13.70 million yuan. 
  This is in sharp contrast to the kind of income generated by 
agriculture. 
  The grass is greener on the outside. Where can people go to 
make money and settle down? This is a question every able-bodied 
person in Huxia Village is wondering about day and night. 
<H5>  Map Showing the Flow of Rural Labor From Five Administrative </H5>
Villages 
  Gansu: Xinzhuang Village's surplus labor heads for Lanzhou, 
Xinjiang, Guangdong, Baoji, Henan, and Shanghai. 
  Shandong: Liujiaguanfang Village's surplus labor heads for 
the Northeast, Beijing, Tianjin, Wuxi, Lianyungang, and 
throughout Shandong Province. 
  Jiangsu: Dagang Village's surplus labor heads for Wuxi, 
Suzhou, ad Shanghai and so on. 
  Jiangxi: Huxia Village's surplus labor heads for Shenzhen, 
Ningbo, Nanchang, Beijing, and nearby counties and cities. 
  Sichuan: Guozi Village's surplus labor heads for Guangdong, 
Xinjiang, the Northeast, throughout Sichuan, Hainan, ad Fujian. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66187 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar029___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-029 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Investigative Report of Surplus Rural Labor </ABS>
<DATE1>   17 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Investigative Report on China's Surplus Rural Labor </F>
<H3> <TI>   Part II </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Part II </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0237A Beijing ZHONGGUO QINGNIAN BAO in Chinese 17 Feb 94 
p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0237A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO QINGNIAN BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Collection of essays in reportage: "An Investigative Report </F>
on China's Surplus Rural Labor Force; Exploring the Sources, 
Part II -- The Land That Cannot Bear More Burdens?"] 
  [Text] Can Grain and Hogs Keep Peace on Land Under 
Heaven--by reporter Mao Hao [3029 3185] 
  Last winter, Chengdu was bubbling over with the high tide of 
grain price increases. However, everything was quiet at the 
Hengsheng township, Guangan county, which was several kilometers 
away from Chengdu. Guangan is a famous granary in northern 
Sichuan. Our reporter visited the Guozi village of the township. 
Along the road, what he saw were plots of paddy fields. Peasants 
had stored water for winter a long time ago. They only wish to 
grow one season of grain crops next year. 
  Just like in any hilly district in northern Sichuan, 90 
percent of the young people in Guozi village left the village to 
work somewhere else. The average age of those left behind was 51 
years old. Liu Benren, Secretary of the village's party branch, 
said: "People always wish to live a better life, while water 
always flows downward. Who can tie up their feet?" 
  He has four sons and two daughter-in-laws working in other 
provinces. He himself stays behind to do farming for eight 
persons. "I was really upset during the busy farming season. I 
plan to call one daughter-in-law back next year. However, which 
one should I call? That is a good question," he said. In that 
village, calling a young worker back means a considerable loss 
of income. 
  In many areas of northern Sichuan, traditional farming 
(particularly grain production) has become a "sideline 
production" aimed at providing basic grain for peasants' own 
consumption, fulfilling the task in grain production and making 
payments for agricultural tax and public welfare funds and other 
expenses. He calculated as follows: On the presumption that he 
reaps two harvests of crops a year. The per-mu yield of paddy 
rice is 1,000 jin and that of wheat 300 jin. He would receive 
about 480 yuan for each mu of farm produce. Only 180 yuan is 
left after he deducts 240 yuan of production costs, 60 yuan for 
tax (not including miscellaneous expenses). "That is why 
peasants say that farming would only give peasants rice crusts 
instead of rice," he added. Our reporter visited the Hengsheng 
post office and found out that the average per capita annual 
income of a villager working outside is approximately 2,500 yuan. 
  It seems that Heaven itself makes special arrangements for 
the Guozi village to engage in farming. The gray, brown and 
purple soil in its Shaqimiao area is extremely fertile and good 
in retaining moisture and fertility. The climate is mild around 
the village with an annual precipitation of 1,050 ml, 1,246 
hours of sunshine time and 320 days free of frost. There was a 
saying in history about "gold Guangan and silver Yuechi" (which 
means the local bumper harvest of millet and paddy rice). Thus, 
the saying that "grain and hogs can keep peace on land under 
heaven" has always been a local creed that make people sincerely 
convinced. 
  Nevertheless, this creed is no longer useful. For the past 
40 years since liberation, particularly since the implementation 
of the system of production contracted to the household in 1981, 
peasants in the Guozi village have greatly emancipated the 
productive forces by carrying out farming with a scientific 
approach. The per-unit yield of grain (paddy rice) in 1985 
registered a five-fold increase over 1949. The fact that 
increases in production, but not income, has made peasants 
worriless about food and clothing, but they can hardly become 
rich. Prior to the exodus of a large number of labor force, the 
per capita income of villagers in the Guozi village was 
wavering, for eight years, around 400 yuan which is just enough 
to cover food and clothing only. 
  Slack farming season is a good time for building new houses. 
About 20 percent of the families in the village have built new 
houses since 1989. The majority of the families have people 
working outside. On one occasion, our reporter met Xiao Guanghe 
who just came back from Guanddong. He worked as a small 
contractor with a net monthly income of 2,000 yuan (He does not 
have work to do every month.) Right now, he is planning to 
build a 30,000-yuan new house. According to the local customs, 
men have to leave their family and live separately after 
reaching adulthood. Therefore, they often leave their hometown 
to start their new life. Their parents often cannot afford to 
support them from their meager farming income. It was under this 
condition that Xiao Guanghe left the village with a 400 yuan 
debt from his marriage. He paid back what he owed in the first 
year right after he started working outside. 
  The loss of creditability of the grain-hog creed is even 
more clear on the issue of land. In the past, there were always 
disputes among peasants on the uneven distribution of 
responsibility fields. Now nobody is willing to accept any 
farming assignment. In order to avoid any penalty for leaving 
the farmland idle, old people and women often take over the 
responsibility for farming. Anyone who wishes to sub-contract a 
mu of farmland for farming, he or she has to pay 50 yuan per mu 
of farmland to the one who accepts the responsibility for 
farming. Someone pointed at a plot of dry land which was lying 
idle to our reporter, saying that the person supposed to till 
this piece of land is an orphan. He left the village and worked 
outside for many years now. No one is paying any tax so far. 
  Liu Huaifu left the village and worked outside a year ago. 
He 
is now the deputy manager of the engineering command of the 
Chuanhui Group in Guangdong. Perhaps because he is educated, he 
can do a better job in doing calculation. In 1993, he 
straightforwardly bought grain from a supply and marketing 
cooperative and turned it over the state and considered his 
obligation to till his responsibility farmland as completely 
fulfilled. 
<H5>  A String Cannot Hold--by reporter Sun Kai [1327 0418] </H5>
  The first person our reporter visited in the Xinzhuang 
village was Huang Junfang, who ranked quite low in the Huang 
clan in terms of seniority. 
  From her outward appearance, Huang Junfang was entirely 
different from the village girls that our reporter met in the 
village. She wore a pair of ankle boots, a pair of jeans and a 
fashionable coat and had a fine hair style. In the Xinzhuang 
village, Gangu county, this 20-year old girl spoke Mandarin with 
a mixture of Guangdong and Gansu accents. She said: "What I 
cannot stand here is the lack of changes. Everything here 
remains the same as when I was a child." After graduating from a 
junior middle school three years ago, Huang Junfang went to 
Dongguan, Guangdong Province, and worked in a woolen textile 
mill. She just returned home to spend her new year here. 
  Our reporter talked to many young people in the village. 
They shared Huang Junfang's views. 
  People did farming scores of years ago just like their 
grandparents and parents. They still carry out farming in the 
same way. 
  Dozens of years ago, the narrow streets in the village were 
full of mud on rainy days. They are still full of mud on rainy 
days today. 
  Scores of years ago, the toilet in their house was 
concurrently used as a pig sty. It was so dirty that one could 
hardly put one's feet down. It is still the same way now. 
  Naturally, now they have enough to eat, and they can eat 
white bread and meat regularly. Many people can also watch 
television. However, as far as the young people are concerned, 
they are not satisfied. 
  After graduating from a junior or senior middle school, 
what can they do at home? Tilling a small plot of farmland is no 
fun either. Therefore, they just loved to loaf around. 
Fortunately there is the billiard. They spend a great deal of 
time in the billiard room. The millionaires in the developed 
countries will be shocked if they visit the most backward 
countryside in China, because they would discover that this kind 
of gentlemen's game is everywhere in China's rural areas. They 
would perhaps see an unkempt peasant using a cue to hit the 
balls just as dexterously as those bigshots in a television 
program. 
  However, young people still seek to leave the village! The 
per capita 0.3 mu of farmland to each person is a harsh reality 
which pushes the young people out of the village to look for a 
new and better life somewhere else. 
  Huang Junfang said: "It is only when I am outside that I 
realize that what kind of a poor life did I live before. It is 
just like what the song describes -- the world outside is 
wonderful. Right now I earn more than 1,000 yuan a month in 
Dongguan. In addition to what I give to my family, I can still 
buy clothing and other things for myself." 
  "I already have many friends in Dongguan. They teach me to 
speak Cantonese. Sometimes we went out to sing Karaoke. I feel 
that my life there is very happy. Right now, each time I come 
home to spend the new year, I feel uncomfortable. Everything is 
not right. I am no longer accustomed to this kind of 
environment," she added. 
  "There was a girl in the neighboring village. She is a 
senior 
middle school graduate. She is good in English. When she went to 
Dongguan, she worked as a temporary English teacher in a school. 
Later, she stopped teaching because of her heavy Gansu accent. 
However, she met another teacher in the same school and married 
him. Now she has a son, leading a happy life. Once she visited 
us, and all of us admire her immensely," she continued. 
  Looking at Huang Junfang, our reporter asked her: "Would you 
like to settle down there and never come back again?" 
  "I like to do so, but whether or not I can achieve this goal 
is another question," she replied. 
<H5>  One Cannot Afford To Build a House If One Needs To Feed </H5>
Oneself by Farming -- by reporter Liu Jian [0491 0256] 
  Moving, an immigrant's aspiration, seems to have been 
instilled into the gene of Liu's offsprings. Even during the 30 
odd years in which the system of household registration was 
mostly strictly implemented in China's history, villagers of the 
Liujiaguanfang Village had persistently left the village and 
moved to other localities. Gradually less people moved out of 
the village after land division in 1981 until the mid-1980s, 
because there were high yields of crops several years running, 
the price of grain was higher than that of industrial products, 
and peasants earned more money by growing crops. In addition, 
there was neither fund-raising nor fund retention for other 
miscellaneous expenses. Nor was there any "movement." Another 
peak of labor force exodus took place between 1986 and 1987, 
because the pressure for subsistence had once again increased. 
  In the vicinity of the Liujiaguanfang Village, peasants 
generally grow one season of wheat and one season of peanuts. A 
village cadre calculated in such a way. Suppose a mu of farmland 
yields 200 kg of peanuts a year (this output is already fairly 
high) and the net income from this will be 700 yuan. Peasants 
need to invest a minimum of 70 yuan for chemical fertilizer, 20 
yuan for insecticide, 20 yuan for plastic film, 60 yuan for 
seeds and 20 yuan for tractor plowing. Again suppose the per-mu 
yield of wheat is 175 kg (this output is already fairly high) 
and the net income of this will be 140 yuan. Peasants need to 
spend 10 yuan for tractor plowing, 20 yuan for seeds, 10 yuan 
for sowing, 55 yuan for chemical fertilizer and 10 yuan for 
insecticide. By adding and subtracting the aforementioned income 
and expenses and deducting 6.5 yuan for land tax and 200 yuan 
for the grain which peasants need to consume themselves, the net 
income will be approximately 340 yuan. After the mid-80s, a "two 
fields system" was introduced. The per-capita 1.5 mu of farmland 
was split into 0.8 mu of farmland planted with grain for 
peasants' own consumption and 0.7 mu of high-priced farmland 
which was taxed 100 yuan per mu. If these expenses were deducted 
and funds were retained for miscellaneous expenses, the annual 
net income from each mu of farmland would be less than 200 yuan. 
  This was entirely unthinkable ten years ago. An old man 
recalled that a bag of compound fertilizer which he paid 70 yuan 
now only cost 18 yuan at that time. A bag of ammonium 
bicarbonate made in the United States which he paid more than 90 
yuan now only cost 36 yuan at that time. There was no 
high-priced farmland which we need to pay 100 yuan per mu as 
land money. Peasants only needed to pay land tax no matter what 
kind of land it was. The prices for insecticide, and electricity 
are up. So is the amount of retention for public welfare funds 
and miscellaneous expenses. 
  The highest price increase is wedding. The old custom of 
having a family of three or four different generations living 
under the same roof is already smashed to pieces. No girl is 
going to marry someone who cannot afford independent housing. 
Even matchmakers would find all doors shut if the prospective 
bridegroom has no house of his own. Straw huts with earth-filled 
walls are out of fashion long time ago. Only bridegrooms with 
houses built of tiles and bricks and with glass windows will be 
considered. No matter how poor a bridegroom is, he must have a 
house of high standards, otherwise he would remain a bachelor 
for a long time. Several years ago, one must pay 5,000 yuan for 
a good house. Now standards are becoming higher and higher, and 
the building materials are becoming more and more expensive. Now 
it would cost at least 10,000 yuan to build a house. Another 
10,000 yuan are needed to pay for the wedding expenses. If the 
young people in the village were not hard pressed by the 20,000 
yuan they need to get married, there would be less young people 
leaving. 
  College and military service are the two ways for young 
people to distinguish themselves. During the 13 years between 
1981 and 1993, 12 young people from the Liujiaguanfang Village 
passed examinations and entered colleges and graduate schools. 
More than 100 years before, the most educated person in the 
Liujiaguanfang was Liu Songsheng, sometimes called Yuezhong or 
Junfeng, who was a candidate for the lowest degree under the 
former civil service examination in 1851 during the Qing 
Dynasty. The only goal to study is to enter a college. (People 
in Liujiaguanfang regard postgraduate, undergraduate and 
polytechnic school students as "college students.") All of them 
belong to a higher class. As for those children who are not so 
bright and whose academic standards are low, parents usually 
dragged them to do farming as soon as they finish their primary 
school education. If they have the slight hope to pass the 
college examination, the parents would economize on food and 
clothing to let them continue to study. When they fail one 
examination, they would attend revision classes for another 
year. If they failed again, they would attend revision class for 
another year.... Among the 12 college students, only one of 
them got into college as soon as he graduated from the senior 
middle school. All others had to repeat classes or attended 
revision classes from one to five years before they passed the 
college entrance examination. That means they had to attend the 
college entrance examination from two to six times. One of them 
had to transfer his household registration to Qihetai in 
Heilongjiang Province, because the standard is much lower there 
and he had a better chance to pass the college entrance 
examination. 
  Many of the young people in the Liujiaguanfang village serve 
in the army, but few of them ever came back to resume farming 
again. They often worked hard to distinguish themselves after 
joining the army. Even if they do not become cadres, they would 
work hard to win the title of "volunteers." In short, they try 
one thousand and one ways to change their rural residence 
registration to a city or other non-rural resident registration. 
  Between 1992 and 1993, city or "other nonrural resident 
registration" is on sale everywhere in the village. A Linyi 
resident registration was worth 5,000 yuan, and that of Junan 
resident registration 3,000 yuan. In 1993, five villagers of the 
Liuchiaguanfang village used this simple but quick way to move 
to the city. 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Table (II) (By village)                                                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Item        |Liujiaguanf-|Xinzhuang V-|Huxia Villa-|Guozi Villa-|Dagang Vill-| 
|            |ang Village,|illage, Gan-|ge, Jiangxi |ge, Sichuan |age, Jiangs-| 
|            | Shandong P-|su Province |            |Province    |u Province  | 
|            |rovince     |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|population  |1,115       |1,406       |1,065       |1,119       |1,768       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|per capita  |1.5 mu      |0.32 mu     |1.76 mu     |0.87 mu     |1.1 mu      | 
|farmland    |            |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Degree of M-|24 tractors |0           |3 small tru-|power equip-|315 kw      | 
|echanization|            |            |cks         |ment for fa-|            | 
|            |            |            |            |rming 170 h-|            | 
|            |            |            |            |orse power  |            | 
|            |            |            |            |and irrigat-|            | 
|            |            |            |            |ion power e-|            | 
|            |            |            |            |quipment    |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Total Manpo-|400         |350         |633         |771         |980         | 
|wer         |            |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Floating Ma-|210         |over 300    |35          |310         |200         | 
|npower      |            |            |            |            |            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


<H5>  Family of a Runaway From Marriage--by Lu Yaogang [4141 6460 </H5>
0474] 
  I finally met Zou Binzi. When I hurriedly entered the old, 
shabby waiting room at the Nanchang Railway Station on 4 January 
this year, it was already 2000 hours in the evening. I saw this 
dark and lean young man sitting there and reading a READERS 
magazine. He was just like a needle in the haystack which I just 
picked up. 
  Zou Benzi was born in the Huxia Village. I stayed in his 
house for eight days. I could see that his honest and sincere 
parents did not know the true reason for my visit. Nor did they 
know that their smart son Benzi had gone to Beijing to look for 
a job in order to runaway from a marriage which they had 
arranged for him earlier. Benzi was new in Beijing. He slept 
under the Jianguomen Overpass at night and looked for job during 
the daytime. It was a freezing early spring. Running out of 
cash, Benzi was in a desperate position. He was hungry and cold. 
He wandered around on the streets in Beijing for ten days. He 
was mentally on the verge of a total collapse. It was at the 
time that our newspaper's "Hotline for Young People" saved him 
on time. 
  In rural areas, parents also do not lead an easy life. Benzi 
has a family of seven including two elder brothers, one younger 
sister and one younger brother. His two elder brothers got 
married and moved out. So was his sister. The next one in line 
for marriage is Benzi himself. However, Benzi who just left the 
army did not want to get married according to his parents' wish. 
He just ran away, although his parents had already paid 3,200 
yuan as betrothal gifts to the bride-to-be. with their son 
disappeared and the bride-to-be family refusing to return the 
betrothal gifts according to a village custom, the parents 
poured out endless grievances. 
  There were six villagers' groups and 253 families in the 
Huxia Village. All villagers were of three surnames -- Zou, Fu 
and He. Zou Benzi's family belongs to the lower middle class in 
terms of living standards. Three thousand two hundred yuan is an 
astronomical figure! Now the money is gone forever. Price 
changes every year for wedding. If a man does not have 10,000 
yuan now, he has little chance to get married. Zou Pinzi's 
family has five mu of paddy rice field and three mu of upland 
field. In 1993, a natural calamity hit the farmland sown with 
early rice. The family only harvested 4,500 jin of paddy rice, 
400 jin of peasants, 70 jin of soybean, more than 30 jin of 
sesame and over 100 jin of rape seeds. When all accounts were 
settled, the family's net income from farming was only 1,000 
yuan after all the expenses were deducted (not counting the 
labor cost). Although the purchasing price for 100 jin of grain 
changed from over 20 yuan to 40 yuan, peasants in the vicinity 
of the Poyang lake only have a slight surplus from their 
double-crop paddy rice, even if they have engaged in meticulous 
farming, and weather is good for the crops. More serious is the 
fact that no one can prevent the price of the agricultural 
producer goods from increasing. These price increases would cut 
the small amount of surplus even further. The possibility for 
peasants to become well-to-do is almost zero. Relying on his 
dexterity, Zou Benzi's father has a sideline job of gathering 
and selling goose feather during the slack farming season, and 
earns about 1,000 yuan to help the family pay bills. However, he 
can only save about 200 to 300 yuan after paying all the 
expenses and putting aside enough money for preparing farming 
for the next year. Then, how many years they have to work hard 
in order to save enough money to help Benzi get married? 
  Under the light of a dim kerosene lamp, Benzi's mother said 
to our reporter with a sigh: "There is nothing our family can do 
to help Benzi any more in this connection. Let the brothers go 
out and blaze their trail." 
  Nevertheless, Zou Benzi also clearly understands that 
although he has finally attained his parents' understanding and 
extricated himself from the prearranged wedding, he has not 
completely broken away from his predicament in subsistence. This 
is the main reason for him to leave the village and work 
outside. That was precisely the topic he talked about most when 
he made a special trip from Guangdong's Kaiping City to see me. 
<H5>  World in Southern Jiangsu Is Wonderful--by Dai Yuanzhi [2071 </H5>
5913 2388] 
  No highway leads to the village. Nor is there any telephone 
in the village. One must cross the two main rivers in Southern 
Jiangsu -- the Tongyu River and the Chuanchang River, in order 
to go to the Goudun Township in Funing County where the village 
is. It takes 90 minutes to travel from Nanjing to Beijing by 
ship. However, it takes 70 minutes to ride the only 
private-owned passenger boat to travel from the village to the 
township. 
  With an opportune chance, Chen Liang, a young man of the 
Jieyu villagers' group of the Dagang Village of the Goudun 
Township in Funing County, Jiangsu, left his home village which 
was surrounded by water on three sides in the spring of 1993, 
travelled to Southern Jiangsu, arrived in the flourishing city 
of Wuxi, and worked in a state-owned factory. 
  A year ago, our reporter, under a moonlight, rode his 
bicycle along a narrow path and crossed two rivers and came to 
visit Chen Liang's family. 
  It was a quiet night in winter in the countryside. A thick 
layer of frost like snow settled on the ground. We smoked, drank 
tea and talked informally. 
  "Our village is always in the red. However, documents show 
that the 1993 per-capita net income in the village is 920 yuan. 
Sometimes, it is said to be over 800 yuan. (Some people said it 
was only 400 to 500 yuan, while others said 900 yuan.) In 1992, 
the village reported its per-capita net income to the high level 
as 750 yuan. The report failed to pass the township level. 
Finally, it was agreed to be 880 yuan." 
  Villagers who surrounded the reporter calculated as follows: 
There are 1,950 mu of farmland, power equipment for farming 
totaling 170 horsepower and power pumps for water drainage 
totaling 315 kw in the whole village. There are 980 able-bodied 
peasants in the village, but only 500 peasants are needed for 
farming. There is a surplus labor of 480 people. 
  A villager said: "A person who works outside can earn 1,000 
to 2,000 yuan a month. Most of the young people like to work 
outside and earn more money." 
  Chen Liang's family of six (including the grandmother they 
support) takes care of 10.6 mu of farmland. It raises some hogs 
and chickens. It also has a hand-driver tractor, a boat with a 
12-horsepower motor and a rice mill. The family is considered as 
doing well in the village. 
  However, Chen Liang's father said, I would have left the 
village long ago, if I have no facilities like these. I am 
someone who looks good in appearance, but lacks cash at home. My 
net income is several thousand yuan, but the money is never in 
my hands. People owe me money, and there is nothing I can do 
about it. When I went to the southern part of the Yangtze River 
last year, I really wanted to leave the village. If I work hard 
outside for a year, I would have cash on hand. 
  He said that right now, Chen Liang and his sister are 
working 
in Lucun, Wuxi. One works as a "peasant-turned contract worker" 
at the state-run Xinsu Machinery Plant, while the other works as 
a "contract worker" at a workshop in the Textile Varieties 
Research Institute. After the Spring Festival Chen Liang is 
going to send his younger sister to Wuxi. If there are suitable 
jobs and a place to live, he (Chen Liang's father) and his wife 
also plan to leave the village and work outside, and let the 
grandparents take care of their home. 
  Driven by the financial benefits, over 200 of the 480 
surplus men and women are working in other provinces, and more 
than 100 of them are working as temporary workers outside. With 
the development of the market economy today, the manpower is 
being used in close connection with tools of production [sheng 
chan gong ju 3932 3934 1562 0367) and objects of labor [lao dong 
dui xiang 0525 0520 1417 6272] according to the principle of 
market allocation. The export of labor force is perhaps one of 
the ways to help a less developed area become well-to-do. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66188 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar029___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-029 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Investigative Report of Surplus Rural Labor </ABS>
<DATE1>   19 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Investigative Report on China's Surplus Rural Labor </F>
<H3> <TI>   Part III </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Part III </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0220A Beijing ZHONGGUO QINGNIAN BAO in Chinese 19 Feb 94 
p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0220A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO QINGNIAN BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Collection of essays: "An Investigative Report on China's </F>
Surplus Rural Labor Force; Exploring the Sources, Part III -- 
Can They Leave Home But Not Their Roots?"] 
  [Text] Toil for Six Months, Idle for Six Months--by 
Lu Yaogang [4141 6460 0474] 
  Huxia village is right next to the Zhegan railroad and the 
Qingping highway and Huangcha highway; it is very accessible. 
The county party committee secretary Du Shuiyuan [2629 3055 
3293] told me that Huangtugang is considered a poor town in 
Zhangshu City and Yichun Prefecture, but compared to the rest of 
the county, Huxia Village is average in development. On the days 
I was there, it was in the midst of the pig-slaughtering season, 
but it was quiet everywhere. I was told by the villager that it 
is easier to go to town to buy pork than to raise pigs. 
  Villager Zou Liuya [6760 2696 5370] has a family of four. 
They only eat meat at New Years and on special occasions. On the 
day I visited, his house was filled with the aroma of meat 
cooking. He uncovered the piping-hot pan and said, "This is 
someone's dead pig. It died of some disease and was buried. I 
just dug it up." He said it is the luck of the poor--they can 
eat anything and will never get sick from it. How many in Huxia 
are living like Zou Liuya? 
  The villagers say things are much better for the last decade 
or so. Prior to 1977, Menghe River which passes through the 
village overflew almost every year, and in bad years, one could 
earn only a few cents for full-time work. But two things have 
changed things around. In 1977, massive water conservancy and 
capital construction work was undertaken. Back then, Qingjiang 
County (renamed Zhangshu County in October 1988) made a vigorous 
effort to straighten out Menghe River and built a large dam, 
radically solving the flood problem. Secondly, after the Third 
Plenary Session of the 11th Party Central Committee, 
family-based farm allotment was implemented, which at last gave 
the people enough to eat and to keep warm. But a decade later, 
Huxia village's people are still just "fed and warm" but have 
made no further progress. There has been no increase in 
farmland, but population has increased and the labor force has 
increased. Huxia's village party committee estimated that of the 
village's 633 workers, at least one-third are surplus and the 
other two-thirds are farm workers who "toil half a year and sit 
idle half a year." Can any village absorb a labor force nearly 
half of which is idle? 
  After land was alloted to individual households, the 
tractors 
and other machinery and equipment owned by the original 
collectives were sold. Every family, no matter how poor, now 
keep oxen, and people keep to the old traditional farming 
methods and mix of crops. Besides a small amount of rearing and 
breeding (a fish pond, 60-some pigs, and 50-odd cattle) and the 
three families that make sugar (and brew rice wine at the same 
time), there is no other sideline production. At one time, 
people grew fruit trees on a fairly large scale, but because of 
theft, damages, and mismanagement, they failed. It is fair to 
say that the land has reached beyond its limits. 
  Huangtugang town has a labor force of 11,900 but only 13 
township enterprises of different sizes which can only 
accommodate a little more than 2,000 people. More than half of 
the town's surplus workers are working out of town. Because of 
uneven regional economic development and various limitations in 
the township enterprises, it is not likely that the town can 
absorb more of the rural surplus labor in the near future so 
that the people can leave the land without leaving their homes. 
  To Huxia village, poverty is not only a consequence, it is 
also the cause of deterioration in the community. Standing on 
the river bank, one can see the pigs and the cows boldly 
munching on rape and the vegetables. Rats run amuck in the 
village. But from the county party committee secretary to the 
average villagers, they all tell me that one of the reasons they 
cannot destroy the rats is that people may use killing rats as 
an excuse to settle private scores and poison their neighbors' 
chickens and ducks. Even worse are the high cost of getting 
married, the concept of freedom of love and marriage, and the 
closed community life. Since 1982, Huxia village have ignored a 
thousand-year-old taboo and have allowed marriages within the 
same clan and between families of the same surname. This trend 
has taken off, and since 1982, 15 young couples have married. 
What will happen in the future? What will be the consequences? 
<H5>  Enterprises' Broken Dreams--by reporter Mao Hao [3029 3185] </H5>
  Once Guozi village's 28-year-old Mayor Bo asked me, "Is a 
place without mountains, without water, and without roads like 
ours doomed to be poor forever?" This question sums up the 
concern shared by every person in the hilly countries which make 
up more than 60 percent of Sichuan's total area. 
  Actually I have learned in Guangan that like the rest of the 
country, there have been several rounds of township enterprise 
craze here, but they failed every time, leaving many unfinished 
projects with very few benefits. I checked Hengsheng town's 
enterprise list and discovered that most are brick factories and 
breweries. Only this kind of enterprises that requires little 
investment and can sell their products locally can survive. The 
town party committee's secretary Jiang was talking on the town 
government's only local battery telephone while telling me that, 
"In the past, occasionally someone would think about opening a 
plant here, but after they looked at the communications system 
and the roads, and they looked at the food and lodgings here, 
they left. Today, we are doing work of the 1990's but using 
equipment of the 1950's." 
  Hengsheng holds an open-air market three times a week, and 
on 
market day, villagers from Guozi village will come to town early 
in the morning, carrying their goods in baskets at the ends of 
their bamboo poles and walking for an hour (the highway is not 
finished). Prior to 1989, this was their only source of 
sideline income. The development of Hengsheng's country market 
is very incongruent with its population of 36,000, and its 
service industry especially is out of step. In the beginning I 
wondered why the vegetables in the restaurants in the rural 
towns are more expensive than that in the county towns. Later I 
learned that people here still have the habit of eating only 
what is in season. If cabbage is in season, everybody eats 
cabbage, and if turnips are in season, everybody eats turnips, 
and if you want something different, you will have to go out to 
buy it, which naturally will cost more. A noodle shop owner 
complained, "It is hard to take precious money from the 
villagers' pockets!" Thus, Hengsheng town which is so close to 
the highway and could have made some money from the travelers is 
losing out; the townspeople would rather spend a few more hours 
on the road to get back to town even late at night. 
  Last year, Mayor Bo was all ambitious about opening a noodle 
factory to fill the vacuum, because Guozi village had no 
enterprise. But after looking around, he was completely 
discouraged. Guozi village has a poor transportation system; its 
products can only be sold in nearby localities, but the 
neigboring localities have a rich tradition of being 
self-sufficient and have little purchasing power anyway, so who 
is going to buy their noodles? 
  This is a vicious cycle. They are poor, and so they cannot 
afford to build infrastructure, and without infrastructure, 
there is no investment and no project, and without money and 
project, they cannot vigorously develop township enterprises, 
and without township enterprises, there is no place for the 
surplus labor to go, and if the productive forces cannot be put 
to use, purchasing power will decline, and in turn the economy 
cannot keep going, and so everybody stays poor. In recent years, 
some more fortunate localities (such as Guangan's Hua and 
Yuechi) have been able to take advantage of their natural 
resources to break this vicious cycle. But for a hilly area like 
Guozi village, prior to 1989, it seemed they would never get out 
of this strange endless circle. Thus, when Liu Yanlin [0491 1693 
2651] and Shao Yuanshou [6730 0337 1108] left town, in fact they 
were paving a new way by creating a chain of workers-for-hire. 
That is, people can use the most primitive capital--labor--to 
earn their initial fund, skills, and experience. 
  When I was in Guizi village, Secretary Liu and Mayor Bo were 
working on opening another brick factory. "Many people are 
building houses nowadays. Selling the bricks is no problem. We 
lack capital, but we have sent a letter to Boss Liu asking him 
to invest some money here." I wish them luck with their 
enterprise dream. 
<H5>  Northern Jiangsu and Southern Jiangsu in Sharp Contrast--by </H5>
reporter Dai Yuanzhi [2071 5913 2388] 
  Dagang village is situated in the town of Goudun. In the 
office of the town government, young Comrade Zhang, in his "full 
capacity as representative of the town party committee," was 
receiving reporters. Someone told me that Comrade Zhang is the 
secretary. 
  When Zhang talked about the town's 2,000-strong contingent 
in 
the service and business sector, his eyes lit up, and he said 
proudly, "You all know about Beijing's Wangfujing Boulevard. It 
is Beijing's most prosperous commercial street. There you will 
find 184 of our Guodun natives. It is also known as `Guodun 
Street.'" 
  Later, he spoke in a more serious tone, "From the long-term 
perspective, the more workers we export, the worse off it will 
be for the economy at home, and compared to the advanced 
regions, the gap will only get bigger. Those who work in 
southern Jiangsu are creating wealth for the south; most of 
their money is taken away by the southerners." 
  In his office, Yancheng's mayor Xu Qiyao [1776 0366 5069] 
told reporters that exporting labor can promote fresh ideas. 
People not only make money and learn new skills, but their minds 
are broadened, and they become more conscious about competition 
and about the commodity economy. 
  This government official is also a high-ranking economist. 
He 
said, "Labor export promotes economic development and prosperity 
among the people. Today, two-thirds of the people are working in 
the fields, and so we must lead the surplus labor out of the 
fields. When they find work elsewhere, they will have income, 
and when they get rich, they can set up joint-household 
processing and develop diversified management and earn even more 
money, and in the future, when the economy is developed, they 
can come home." 
  Guodun Town's Secretary Zhang has actually answered his own 
question. Guodun Town has a labor force of 27,000 people and 
92,000 mu of arable land. At an average of more than a mu per 
person, there is plenty of surplus labor. The town has set up 29 
enterprises and the village has 10 mainstay enterprises--"the 
per capita income is comparable to that in farming" and they can 
only "absorb a little over 3,000 people." Today, just those 
working out-of-town in construction, remodelling, water 
transport, and the service industry are numbered no less than 
8,000. Each year, construction work generates 14 million yuan in 
income. 
  In Chen Liang's [7115 0081] hometown, the villagers of 
Dagang 
have already figured out that of the village's 980 workers, only 
500 are needed in the farms, and discounting the 100 who engage 
in diversified management and family-based factory work, it 
still leaves 380. Given their lack of funds and skills, 
exporting labor is one solution. 
  In Yancheng, Cheng Jianjiang [4453 1696 3068], assistant 
manager of the city's labor market, eagerly told the reporter 
the following story: 
  Xiangshui County's Zhouji Township sends its surplus labor 
north and south. Between the end of the year before and the 
beginning of last year, more than 80 women workers were sent to 
work in a factory in Wujiang in southern Jiangsu, and in return, 
the factory set up a silk factory in Zhouji. It selected a group 
of mainstay workers from among the young women who had gone to 
work there and sent them back home, and in only a few month's 
time, the factory was able to get into production and showed 
some profit. It is fair to say that without the labor export, 
there would have been no new silk factory. 
  Zhouji village has also organized nearly 600 people from 
more 
than 200 households to set up camp in Beijing to work on wheaten 
food processing and services. In the first half of 1993, the net 
amount of money remitted through the post offices from Beijing 
to Zhouji increased by more than 400,000 yuan compared to the 
same period a year ago. Beijing's utility workers even took the 
initiative to install a program-controlled telephone for the 
village party committee. 
  Those with insight in Yancheng feel that people in the 
economically well-developed southern Jiangsu can leave the land 
without leaving home, but in northern Jiangsu where the economy 
is less well-developed, "to get rich, one solution is to export 
the surplus labor." 
  Jiangsu is a prosperous coastal province. Although it has 
920,000 township enterprises which can absorb 9.06 million 
workers, it still has 340,000 surplus laborer to export. Of its 
contingent of 1.28 million construction workers, 550,000 have to 
find work elsewhere. 
<H5>  There Is Sunshine to the East and Rain to the West--by </H5>
reporter Liu Jian [0491 0256] 
  As soon as I got back to the village, several old men from 
my 
grandfather's generation gave me the "news": A fortune-teller 
passing through the east end of the village exclaimed, "This 
village is going to get mighty rich!" Quite a few villagers 
believe in him, because in the last 10 years, Liujiaguanfang 
village has produced more than a dozen state cadres who were 
"champion growers." No other village came close. But still more 
and more of Liujiaguanfang's young men and women are leaving the 
village every year. 
  In the first few years, the village had a fairly decent 
industrial project--a brick factory. The factory director was 
hired from out-of-town. At the end of 1992, the factory and the 
factory director got into a lawsuit in the village, and the 
factory shut down, leaving the village with a sum of debts, and 
adding interests, today, the amount is in excess of 20,000 yuan, 
and adding the village's other debts, it owes no less than 
300,000 yuan. With this 300,000-yuan burden, the village in fact 
cannot start any more collective industrial and sideline 
projects. First of all, it cannot get bank loans, and second, no 
amount of money it earns can pay off its debts. 
  In recent years, the village has another big burden--cotton 
subsidies. The village had not planted a single cotton plant in 
almost 20 years, but in the last two years, the higher 
authorities have changed their minds. Those who plant cotton are 
rewarded, and those who don't are penalized. The rewards alone 
cost the village several hundred thousand yuan. 
  A few years back, the village complied with the "six 
complete 
projects" to rebuild a fancy elementary school. It was abandoned 
after only a few years. According to the authorities' new 
program, village children in first and second grades and those 
in third, fourth, and fifth grades are separately sent to two 
nearby village schools. Money invested in building schools just 
went down the drain. 
  Development of the individual economy has also run into 
serious problems. They do not have sufficient accumulation funds 
to set up factories. They can get into the tertiary industry 
which may be easier. But then everybody begin to come up with 
the same idea. A few years back, five families opened up small 
department stores in the village. In the tiny little village, 
where would the business come from? Before long, three of them 
went out of business. The villagers have limited purchasing 
power. Liu Hanming's best cigarette in his canteen is the 
"Qingzhou" cigarette which costs 1.2 yuan a pack. He can't sell 
two cartons in a year. 
  The most reliable is still the traditional handicrafts 
handed 
down from previous generations. The village has several old 
carpenters; their crafts are handed down from father to son. 
Today, 19 of them are making furniture for families in the 
county towns and nearby barracks for people who "hold government 
jobs." They earn a fairly good income. A carpenter's son is 
almost of marrying-age, and people are breaking down their door 
offering marriage proposals. 
  Another business that has attracted many young men is 
driving 
small, 12-horsepower tractors. These small tractors are 
inexpensive, and they can haul and plow. Liujiaguanfang already 
has 24 of these small tractors. Their main function is to haul 
bricks and gravel for the construction plants and construction 
units and peasant households. During the plowing season, they 
can also make some money by doing some plowing in their own 
villages. During the busy season, they can make a good sum of 
money, but when there is no work and the machines stop running, 
they must pay out of their own pockets, because they still have 
to pay road toll. 
  Another market has only just developed in recent years, and 
that is in the construction service industry. In the old days, 
when the peasants built houses, their friends and families would 
help out, and the host would provide the food and drinks; nobody 
paid money; it was a personal favor. Today, may be people have 
lost this kind of human touch or perhaps they are getting too 
mercenary, and anyway, everybody is having a difficult time, and 
when building houses, nobody ask their friends and relatives 
anymore; they hire constractors, and they negotiate prices 
beforehand and pay them off in one payment. Thus there is a 
construction team that is partly well-organized and partly 
not-so-well-organized, and that is a good sign. 
<H5>  The One, Two, Threes of Enterprises--by reporter Sun Kai </H5>
[1327 0418] 
  Xinzhuang village's Huang Erhu [7806 0059 7579] who spends 
all year selling clothes in Xinjiang may be only 23 years old, 
but his weather-worn face says it all. He told the reporter, 
"There is so little land, and there are few township enterprises 
to give us jobs. If we don't get out and make a go at it, how 
are we going to survive?" 
  The reporter has learned that not just in Xinzhuang village 
but in the entire Liufeng Township there is hardly a single 
township enterprise. Today, most township enterprises are 
construction companies and construction engineering teams that 
work out-of-town year-round. When I asked why nobody has opened 
industrial enterprises there, Xinzhuang's peasants said, "We 
have many province-run and county-run enterprises in the county, 
but most are failing and can't even pay wages. What peasant 
would dare set up enterprises?" 
  Xinzhuang village's clerk, Huang Shengzhao [7806 0524 2156] 
is the village's learned man. He said, "To set up enterprises, 
one, we need money; two, we need projects; three, we need 
skills. When it comes to money, to be honest, Xinzhuang's people 
probably have some, but nowadays it is difficult to pick a good 
project. So many enterprises that have been around for so many 
years are failing. We are backward, and information is hard to 
come by. Who dares to run an enterprise?" 
  Director Zhang of Gangu County's Labor Services Office said, 
"We export labor and often have to travel abroad. I contacted a 
Hong Kong businessman. I worked hard to recruit him to invest in 
Gangu and build a factory here. I told him that Gangu's workers 
are good and abundant, and labor cost is low, and he is bound to 
make money if he invests and builds his factory here. But he 
said even if our workers worked for free, he wouldn't build a 
factory here. He said that our county didn't even have a 
direct-line telephone (it was installed at the end of 1993), and 
if anything should happen, he would simply worry sick. 
Furthermore, he has a factory is in the Zhujiang Delta, and his 
products can get to Hong Kong in no time, and whatever new 
product Hong Kong has, information travels fast and he can react 
immediately. But to build a factory in Gangu, the products would 
have to be transported by train, through Baoji and then 
Zhengzhou and so on, and who knows when they would reach Hong 
Kong. That is why he would rather pay more to hire our workers 
to go to work in the Zhujiang Delta." 
  Ganzu County's party committee vice secretary, Li Pingding 
[2621 1627 1353] said, "The county worked hard at one time and 
mobilized people to set up township enterprises and collective 
enterprises. But at a meeting, some leading individual business 
units said, `Many enterprises are failing these days. We should 
be careful, for if we are reckless, if we fail, it would affect 
some people, and so we ask the county not to be too demanding.' 
The county leaders agreed with that reasoning and took Gangu's 
actual conditions into consideration, and that is why it is not 
emphasizing number but are striving to build one enterprise at a 
time." 
  Xinzhuang's peasants say, "We hear that the peasants are 
having no trouble setting up enterprises down south and that 
they are always successful, which is something we can't measure 
up to. It will be great one day when we too can build that many 
factories, because then we will not have to suffer night and day 
by working away from home." 
<H5>  Appendix </H5>


Item/Village    Shandong:          Gansu:           Jiangxi:    Sichuan:    Jiangsu: 
                Liujiaguangfang    Xinzhuang        Huxia       Guozi       Dagang 
                village            village          village     village     village 

village's own   300 people         more than 300    190         350         480 
surplus labor 


village-run     0                  4                0           0           0 
enterprises                        (construction 
                                   work; work 
                                   out-of-town 
                                   year-round) 

local           5                  3                13          7           29 
township                           (construction 
enterprises                        work; work 
                                   out-of-town 
                                   year-round) 

township                           more than 800    2,029       142         more than 
enterprises'                                                                3,000 (not 
employment                                                                  including 
                                                                            those in 
                                                                            construction 
                                                                            and 
                                                                            transport) 

village         11 (not include    more than 10     0           0           no data 
employment      sideline 
                productions) 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66189 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar029___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-029 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Investigative Report of Surplus Rural Labor </ABS>
<DATE1>   21 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Investigative Report on China's Surplus Rural Labor </F>
<H3> <TI>   Part IV </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Part IV </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0221A Beijing ZHONGGUO QINGNIAN BAO in Chinese 21 Feb 94 
p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0221A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO QINGNIAN BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Collection of essays: "An Investigative Report on China's </F>
Surplus Rural Labor Force; Exploring the Sources, Part IV -- 
Shaking Up Life in the Countryside"] 
  [Text] Master of `House of Fury'--by reporter Lu 
Yuegang [4151 6460 0474] 
  Normally, to gather news, one would go to the county or the 
city first and ask the propaganda department people to escort 
one to the countryside and ask the township cadres to give a 
briefing and then let them make the arrangements and accompany 
one to the villages. This time I skipped the above procedure and 
went straight from Beijing to the most basic cells of the 
Chinese society. 
  My arrival brings quite a bit of excitement to Huxia village 
which normally leads a quiet life. Historically, no reporter has 
ever patronized Huxia, let alone stayed for a whole week. 
  Compared to Huxia village's branch party secretary, Guanfu 
village's secretary Fu Jiannian [0102 1696 1628] is more active, 
hot-tempered, and outspoken. In seeing Du Shuiyuan, he ignored 
the presence of other people and said, "Secretary Du, this year, 
our per capita income will at most reach 700 yuan; we won't be 
able to meet the 900-plus yuan goal." He has been village branch 
secretary for only a year. It will not be wrong to say that he 
fought and won the post of village branch secretary. At the 
beginning, everybody was surprised. A capable man who had gone 
out to do business and gotten rich in the construction business 
has suddenly returned to hold a government post, and he even 
told Du Shuiyuan that if he served, he wanted to be village 
branch secretary in charge of the village. 
  I visited Zou Mugen's [6760 2606 2704] family in Huxia 
village's Fujianao village. His eldest son and daughter work in 
an electronics factory in Shenzhen. His son wrote home and ended 
his letter with the words "bye-bye." His parents were shocked. 
They asked me, "What does `bye-bye' mean?" Compared to the shock 
the Guanfu villagers are experiencing, Zou Mugen's was nothing. 
  After wandering around for many years and having seen the 
world, Fu Jianning returned to the village to be branch party 
committee secretary. Du Shuiyuan asked about his plans. He said, 
"Repair the roads, build a factory, and propagate scientific and 
technological results." What upset the villagers most was that 
the village had 776 people but only 580 mu of farm, but in one 
stroke, he transformed 241 mu into a nursery to grow citrus 
fruits, loquat, peaches, and other cash crops intermingled with 
other grain crops. He said, "There is so little land, and if we 
only plant grain, it won't even be enough to feed everybody." 
  The peasants did not understand. They fought their way to 
his 
house and yelled obscenities at him. He pretended that he didn't 
hear them. Soon, he invited a scholar from town, and after three 
rounds of drinks, he said, "Would you write something for me?" 
"Write what?" "`House of Fury'" Bolstered by a few drinks, the 
scholar took a giant pen and wrote on the white wall three big 
one-meter-square characters. 
  "Why `House of Fury'?" I asked. 
  "Of course I have to accomplish something big here; 
otherwise, why would I give up good money on the outside and 
come back here to this poverty-stricken village to be a branch 
secretary?" He said, "I'm not being arrogant, but there are too 
few people like me in the villages." 
  Not long ago, he sent me a five-year-plan to change the face 
of Guanfu village. He said that he would fulfill each and every 
one of his plans. 
<H5>  New Biographies of the Heroic Sons and Daughters--by </H5>
reporter Mao Hao [3029 3185] 
  Upon entering Guozi village, the first thing that comes into 
sight is a yet-unfinished, four-story building. Surrounded by 
lower civilian homes, it stands like a crane among chickens. 
This building which is built according to state specifications 
and will soon have air-conditioners installed is the Yanlin 
Elementary School, named after industrialist Liu Yanlin who 
donated 400,000 yuan. 
  In Guangan county, everybody has heard of Liu Yanlin. At the 
station, this reporter heard the driver talked about Boss Liu 
getting a new car for the county mayor. In recent years, Liu has 
given his village nearly a million yuan. In 1992, he paid to 
repair the road that allowed farm machinery to move from his 
house to the end of the village. In 1993, Guangan went to the 
coastal areas to solicit business and investments. Liu indicated 
that he was interested in investing 10 million in a joint 
investment with the county to build the Guangfu building. 
  But Liu's mother thinks little of his son's success. "He is 
in small business. His work is not as stable as yours. Out 
there, he is like playing mahjong; he wins if he draws the right 
tile, and someone else wins if he doesn't." We can't blame her. 
In a traditional farming community, people have their own idea 
of a hero. This reporter looked up Who's Who in the 
Guangan County Annals. Many government officials' names are in 
there, followed by those in scientific and technological fields, 
and there are names of all kinds of skilled craftsmen, but under 
industries, there is only Hu Zhongshi [5170 0112 1395]. 
Traditionally, people only admired those will exceptional 
farming skills. The local people have a saying, "The business of 
buying and selling is just like a flower that doesn't last. It 
is the hoe that works the ground that yields the crop." 
  Liu's father was a typical country hero. He not only was a 
successful farmer but he was honest, sincere, and never 
offensive. When the younger Liu first revealed his rebellious 
side, he took quite a few lashes from his father. The village 
clan also rebuked him for being a bad son. He was not a bit like 
his old man; he was superficial, and he ran around all day long 
on his motorcycle (the kind pig-sellers ride), and hard on his 
heels were a bunch of creditors. This was the impression Liu 
Yanlin left behind when he took off. Liu simply could not stay 
in that environment. He left home in 1991 with 9 yuan and 2 jiao 
in his pocket. 
  "In 1985, Number Two Son came home and said he wanted to buy 
a brick factory and borrow 5,000 yuan from the credit 
cooperative. He took the note home, but neither his father nor I 
dared to sign the note." Liu's mother recalled. "He got married 
that year, and many people warned the girl against it, saying he 
had several hundred thousand yuan's debt out there that he had 
not paid off. Whoever married him would certain cry her eyes out 
later." 
  Yet only a few years later, Liu came back to Guangan with 
his 
huge economic clout, and the succession of action he took 
stirred the people of Guangan. They were forced to reassess him 
and his flaws. Liu Yanlin's elementary school teacher, Liu 
Huaifu [0491 0001 4395] had joined him a year earlier. He was 
cautious in talking about Liu: "Liu Yanlin's greatest asset is 
that he is bold; he is full of drive; he is never hesitant or 
indecisive; he is never complacent or satisfied with what he 
has." Teacher Liu has nothing but admiration for his former 
student. "Only those who have been out and about can appreciate 
that he deserves to get rich." 
  Indeed, Liu's success deeply affects the young people of 
Guozi village. Today, any young person who has not traveled 
around a bit will be considered a worthless wretch. In the last 
few years, Guozi villagers have gone so far as the northeast and 
Xinjiang, and there are scores of bosses with hundreds of 
thousands of yuan in assets. At the village's elementary school, 
I asked the children whom they admired most, and they answered 
in one voice, "Liu Yanlin." At the end of 1993, even though 
Liu's family had moved to Guangdong, he was still named first 
among Guangan's top ten young people. 
<H5>  The Same Eyes, But Shine Brighter--by reporter Sun Kai [1327 </H5>
0418] 
  Guo Sanhu [6753 0005 5706] who has been away doing small 
business for seven-eight years said that having been away for a 
few years and coming back today, one can see that there are more 
and more ways to make money. 
  He said that in the days of the "Gang of Four," just that 
little bit of land couldn't produce enough to keep people alive, 
but they were still forced to remain on the farm and were not 
allowed to leave. Every year, people looked forward to the day 
they were paid dividends, but usually when that day came, they 
not only did not get anything but found out that they actually 
owed the brigade money. In the village some people smuggled 
grain from Shaanxi and sold them in the village. The leaders 
even led militiamen to the railway station to arrest them. 
People not only did not have enough to eat, they couldn't even 
afford to buy salt. 
  The truth is, what Guo Sanhu described was the history not 
only of Xinzhuang village. It was the epitome of the by-gone 
days for numerous villages in rural China. 
  Today, Xinzhuang's people have bid farewell to the poverty 
of 
yesterday. Going away has meant many new ways for the people to 
make money. 
  The bright ones bring Gangu's chili noodles and Chinese 
herbal medicine to the outside to be sold and shipped elsewhere 
and do some small business while they are out there. The strong 
ones make money in the construction teams. The old folks and the 
women stay home to farm what little land there is. Those who 
have been away and come back inevitably find many ways to make 
money--women who stay home can process chili noodles and do some 
embroidery work on the ready-made clothing they sell, or they 
can work on the sweaters and so on and let other people take 
them out and sell them. All these can bring substantial income. 
Old people can set up a pingpong table, and each month they can 
make more money than a department-level cadre. 
  Different types of peasants are finding different ways to 
make money. Some of these money-making avenues have always been 
there, but they were not discovered until people started going 
out and their horizon began to broaden; others were created and 
developed only after people gained mobility. 
  Mobility has allowed the peasants to make lots and lots of 
money. 
  Mobility has allowed the people to look away from the land 
and set their sights on the broad horizon yonder. 
  Mobility has changed the people's concept of wealth, which 
is 
far more valuable than just giving these peasants more money. 
<H5>  Today One Realizes That Education Is Money--by reporter Dai </H5>
Yuanzhi [2071 5913 2388] 
  A township enterprise in southern Jiangsu reaches across the 
river to recruit workers. The test for the applicants is very 
simple: Bring in a sewing machine and sew in the hidden pocket 
below the waistline on the trousers, and then the applicant 
leaves his or her name and identification card number. The 
qualified workers show up for work with their ID cards. 
  More and more factories are hiring working boys and girls, 
but they only hire the skilled ones. 
  There used to be a saying in Yancheng, "You can't pick up 
pennies without bending down." It means if one is not willing to 
work hard, one cannot make money. 
  And so everybody bend down to "scrap" money off the ground. 
When they first arrived in town, they thought that physical 
strength alone could earn them some money. But once they had to 
work with machines, reality taught them that physical strengthen 
alone was not enough; they needed technology and skill. 
  "Migatory bird," Liu Xunjun said, "This is known as `if you 
ride other people's horse, you carry other people's gun'--you 
work for other people and you learn their skills." Once, the 
workshop contractor quietly sent him to Zhangjiagang's Chenghang 
Township to work in a factory to install axles and repair cars 
while the workshop director arranged to have someone else take 
over his old job. He made money for the workshop, and so 
besides his original wage and bonus, he also made extra money. 
The other factory manager saw that he was a good technician and 
kept him there and paid him 500 yuan a month. 
  Life has taught him that skill is money. Work is to earn 
money, but without skills, there will be fewer job opportunities 
and one would earn less. "With skills, the world opens up." 
  Yet, learning a skill is not easy. When Liu first arrived at 
the Zhongshi Factory, he was assigned to sweep floors. He swept 
floors while learning from the master craftsmen. He caught up 
with some young men who had entered the plant before him and 
borrowed such technical books as "1515 Loom Repair and 
Maintenance Manual" and "1515 Multiple Shuttle Box 
Maintenance Manual." Behind his back the plant's master 
craftsmen said, "Let him read. He can't understand anyway." 
Workers who came to the plant before him also asked him, "Can 
you understand?" 
  Reading alone was not enough. When the looms broke down, he 
took one look before the master craftsman came to repair it, and 
he took another look after the repair, and after a few more 
tries on his own, he began to figure things out. 
  Chen Chao [7115 6389] had a similar experience. After he 
borrowed the book, he would "match everything by number" to the 
machine according to the book. He looked at the machine and then 
checked the flow chart and he clutched the books and let the 
master craftsmen test him. But when repairing the machines, some 
master craftsmen would send him away. Some would even warn him, 
saying, "You don't know how to do it. Don't touch." 
  When the machines break down, repair work is the day shift 
job. Chen Chao also wanted to try it. At the beginning, he was 
scared, afraid that he could not do it and the master craftsman 
would yell at him. So he read some books first and then thought 
about what the master would do. When he really couldn't do it, 
the next day he went to the master craftsman to apologize. The 
teacher saw that he was willing to learn and did not give him a 
hard time. 
  "Three months after I arrived, I was doing the day shift, 
but 
after dinner, I would also work the swing shift. I wanted to 
learn to repair cone winders. Someone in that shift was also 
from northern Jiangsu. He had been there for more than a year. 
He told my master, `Don't let him come.' It turned out that this 
man was negotiating with the unit, and he figured that if 
someone else learned the skill, his deal with the unit would 
fall through." 
  Today, in Chen Chao's factory dormitory, he still has 
Cotton Spinning, Carding Machine Repair 
Manual and other technical books by his bedside. 
  Lu Ningdong [4151 1380 2639] the "migratory bird" who worked 
in a construction company and ended up losing his job also 
worked hard to learn a skill, and ultimately he made good and 
became the platform car brigade leader. The workshop director 
even let him contract his work. He said after he began 
contracting he wanted to quit two lowing-paying "basic jobs" in 
the city, but the workshop supervisor would not let him and gave 
him a 50-yuan-a-month raise instead. Of course with the raise 
came more responsibilities. Without skill, how could he have 
made an extra 50 yuan a month? 
  At the Xinsu Machinery Factory where Chen Liang [7115 0081] 
works, the young men from Yangzhou's Tiaxing who are certified 
technicians who have "fourth-level knowledge plus third-level 
know-how" have a competitive edge over the young men from 
Yancheng's Funing and are hot commodities in the factories. 
  Among the Funing youths, those who are smart already realize 
that skill is money. When Chen Liang returned to the village, he 
talked about a young "combination factory worker and peasant" in 
his workshop who had once been "foolish": This young man asked 
to extend his apprenticeship for another month so that he could 
learn more from the master. The workship was fairly open-minded 
and did not keep him to his quota for that month so that he 
could fully learn his skills. Today, among the two groups of 80 
young workers from Funing, the first 10 who passed the tests 
have been upgraded by half a grade in pay by the factory. 
  After throwing away the scythe, if one truly wants to pick 
up 
the hammer, one must have skills. A Jiangsu Provincial Labor 
Bureau official told me that today, Nantong has added an 
educational course called "Employment Guide" for the graduating 
middle and high school classes. This year. Jiangsu has handed 
down its guidance-oriented plan to the labor exporting 
localities asking them to provide training for 340,000 people. 
<H5>  Looking Forward To Autumn In Spring--by reporter Liu Jian </H5>
[0491 0256] 
  Forty-eight-year-old Liu Zaitian [0491 0961 3944] was 
probably the youngest kid in Liujiaguanfang village to learn to 
write with a brush. He is very smart, but unfortunately, he only 
went as far as finishing elementary school. In 1977, 
Heilongjiang Province's Qitaihe Mining Bureau was recruiting 
many full-time miners. His older brother who had long planted 
roots in Qitaihe asked someone to send in an application for 
him, and when everything was arranged, he took off. A few years 
later, his whole family moved to Qitaihe, and henceforth they 
would no longer be Shandong people. 
  This is Liujiaguanfang's typical emigration story. Those who 
have no luck will always come home no matter how long they have 
been away. Those who come back are back, and those who come back 
first should not regard those who come back later as 
"extraterrestrials," and those who have just returned will get 
rid of their little bit of northeastern accent after ten days or 
half a month, and then basically they become "one of the crowd" 
and go back to do what they have been doing all along. 
  As for people who had been away but have returned to the 
village to hold government posts and change the village, 
occasionally one may read about them in the newspaper in 
Liujiaguanfang. The village's rule is that those who are village 
cadres or have a chance of becoming village cadres obviously 
will not go "wandering around," and generally speaking, those 
who did go out have very little hope of returning to serve as 
officials. 
  At first, many who left Liujiaguanfang did so because they 
owed people money or were trying to stay out of debt. But this 
situation no longer holds true today. Since 1992, young people 
who have no debts and whose families are fairly well-off have 
been leaving simply because they want to earn more money. When I 
returned home to gather materials for this story, a fairly 
well-off elderly lady in the village asked me to pull strings 
for his son so he could get his driver's license, because the 
line for driver's license examination was too long at the local 
traffic police training center. Five or six young kids from the 
village have already obtained their "driver's licenses" and have 
gone to nearby Linyi and Rizhao to make money driving cars, and 
some have even gone to Jiaodong Peninsula. They clearly make 
more money than the others. They have not been gone for long, 
and it is not likely that they will be returning home soon. 
  In a place like Liujiaguanfang, if one can find a job at a 
state-owned or collective enterprise in the nearby towns and 
townships, it is considered something to be proud of. This is 
different from venturing out to the northeast. Anybody can get 
out to the northeast, and anybody out there can find a job, good 
or bad. But to be able to go to work in an enterprise or an 
institution in the city, county, or even the township (even as a 
driver) is something else. It requires pulling strings. Scarce 
goods are always better. Even though one can clearly make more 
money working in the northeast than at home, at home one does 
not have to go down to the coal pits and suffer. 
  From the point of future impact on these small villages, 
those who move about in nearby cities and towns will have 
greater impact than those who venture out east of Shanhaiguan. 
Almost 70 percent of those who go to the northeast end up in 
Qitaihe, Shuangyashan, Jixi, Hegang, and Daxinganling and 
Xiaoxinganling and other mining towns and forest areas to do 
work that requires sheer physical labor. Shandong's workers have 
little opportunity of getting into even construction work. Over 
there, the civilian construction market belongs to the Jiangsu 
people. That is why although they travel far, their horizon may 
be broaden at most to the extent of knowing that at the end of 
several thousand kilometers of railway line lies a mine or a 
huge forest. Moreover, the northeast is a region with the oldest 
tradition of planned economy. 
  The young people who do not stray too far from home are 
different. Almost all of them are also engaged in physical 
labor, but they are in Linyi, Rizhao, Jinan, Qingdao, and 
Yantai, and they directly observe life in another world. They 
are fully stimulated. When these people (and not those who 
venture out to the northeast) decide to go back to the villages, 
will they create a "revolution"? 
<H5>  Appendix </H5>


Item/Village     Gansu:       Jiangxi:    Sichuan:    Jiangsu:    Shandong: 
Name             Xinzhuang    Huxia       Guozi       Dagang      Liujiaguanfang 
                 village      village     village     village     village 

per capita       (family of   (family     (family     (family     430 yuan 
annual income    3) 480       of 4) -30   of 5) 650   of 4) 500 
for household    yuan         yuan        yuan        yuan 
without mobile 
worker 

per capita       (family of   (family     (family     (family     1,280 yuan 
annual income    3) 1,440     of 4) 750   of 3) 980   of 3.5, 
for household    yuan         yuan        yuan        paying 
with one                                              half of 
mobile worker                                         the 
                                                      mother's 
                                                      living 
                                                      expense) 
                                                      600 yuan 

per capita       (family of   (family     (family     (family 
annual income    5) 1,200     of 5) 900   of 3)       of 6) 920 
for household    yuan         yuan        1,833       yuan 
with two                                  yuan 
mobile workers 


per capita       (family of               (family 
annual income    5) 1,920                 of 5) 
for household    yua                      1,560 
with three                                yuan 
mobile workers 


per capita       (family of               (family 
annual income    5) 3,000                 of 2) 
for household    yuan                     2,600 
with all                                  yuan 
mobile workers 


(Note: One 
sample only of 
each category 
from each of 
the five 
villages. No 
consideration 
is given to 
the types of 
employment of 
the non-mobile 
labor.) 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66190 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar029___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-029 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Investigative Report of Surplus Rural Labor </ABS>
<DATE1>   23 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Investigative Report on China's Surplus Rural Labor </F>
<H3> <TI>   Part V </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Part V </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0222A Beijing ZHONGGUO QINGNIAN BAO in Chinese 23 Feb 94 
p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0222A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO QINGNIAN BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Collection of essays: "An Investigative Report on China's </F>
Surplus Rural Labor Force; Exploring the Sources, Part V -- Torn 
Between Coming and Going"] 
  [Text] The Ambivalent "Amphibians"--by reporter Mao 
Hao [3029 3185] 
  Ou Cunyu [2962 1407 3254] is acknowledged to be Guozi 
village's most able man. Unfortunately, when I visited the 
village, he was away on a buying trip. His family members said 
he goes on these trips for two to three months every year. In 
Guoji village, there are already several of these "amphibians" 
who have one foot in the city and the other in the village. 
  Ou was in the army, and after his discharged, he became 
village cadre (company commander of the village militia). In 
the 1980's, he was among the first to leave the village to work 
on the outside. Lately he has accumulated substantial amount of 
money and experience and has forged personal ties at work which 
prompted him to turn around and head back to the village to take 
up the pig-feed additive business. Usually he stays home to tend 
to his farm, and when farm work is slow, he goes on his business 
trips. Some of his business is all the way out in Guangdong. 
Today, his is the best house in the village (repaired once when 
he was still working for others and repaired again when he got 
into business for himself). Many in Guozi village who have 
dreams of becoming well-off are envious of him. 
  Yang Shicheng [2789 0013 7022] is another of such 
"amphibians." His business is a mixed-bag -- he picks up 
whatever there is to do. When the reporter visited him at his 
house, he was just buying up the local oranges to ship them 
out-of-town. "This is but my odd job. My main business out there 
is in lumber. There is money to be made out there everyday, and 
coming home, I find it uncomfortable to be idle all day long. 
Everybody wants to make money." Perhaps having been out and 
about in the world has given him a better sense and better 
judgment about commodities; Yang is clearly ahead of everybody 
else. 
  Even though most people who have retired and gone back to 
the 
villages are those who had left early and had reaped substantial 
profit, the material and cultural differences between town and 
country and their anxiety about future competition still make 
them ambivalent about returning to their ancestral homes like 
fallen leaves returning to their roots. Like "amphibians," they 
don't know where they really belong. 
  Shao Yuanshou [6730 0337 1108] and Liu Yanlin left the 
village at about the same time. He has gone through 14 provinces 
and municipalities. Today, he is home taking care of some 
sideline business. Because he is very skillful, he can make 
300-400 yuan a month weaving bamboo. In talking to the reporter, 
he sighed and said, "I have never wanted to live in the city 
permanently. I was not born for that kind of life. But having 
been out there to see the sights and experience the fun, I am 
not satisfied with being back here again. Life is hard out 
there. There is always someone looking over your shoulders, and 
even when the wind is blowing and the snow is falling, you still 
have to go to work. But there is one good thing about it: 
Usually, the harder you work, the more money you make. You can 
figure it out for yourself. Moreover, it makes a difference if 
you are skilled, and so it forces one to learn. At the 
beginning, I could not adapt to city life. People are yelling at 
you and ordering you around all day long, and everything is so 
rigid. But now that I am back home, I can't get used to things 
here either. You may be free here, but you have nothing to do 
all day, and you have no steady income. Here in the village, 
besides watching TV, there is no other form of entertainment. If 
you have never experienced life on the outside, you will never 
think about it, but once you had a taste of it but can't get it 
anymore, it is hard to take. Is this ironic or what?" 
<H5>  A Step Ahead of the Others--by reporter Da Yuanzhi [2071 </H5>
5913 2388] 
  Let us return to Chen Liang's home and listen to his story. 
  Those who know Chen Liang know that he failed to get a job 
in 
Suzhou's Wuxian County and Shanghai's Chongming one year. When 
he returned to the village, mentally he went through a very 
difficult period. 
  The closer he got to his home, the more he worried about 
running into people he knew, and the more he worried, the more 
people he ran into. 
  On the boat to the village, he ran into a relative. 
  "How come you are back?" He detested that question the most. 
  "Coming home to visit the family." 
  Those who left always come home "in their silken robes" -- a 
sign of success -- clutching gift packages of all sizes, but 
Chen had lost his job and was kind of ashamed to come home to 
face the village elders and worried even more about others 
suspecting that he had done something wrong and that was why he 
was fired. 
  Later, whenever he left the village, he would put on a pair 
of sunglasses. 
  He and his father wanted to contract or buy the village's 
plastic factory which had shut down earlier, but the deal fell 
through because the price was not right. The factories in the 
township were beyond their reach, and some were not that 
profitable. 
  His father recalled that back then, whenever they had time, 
they would search for a newspaper to read. 
  People always look down on young people who are still living 
at home. 
  "One must get ahead, just like knives must be sharpened. You 
should go out to see the world." Chen Liang said, "When you are 
out there, even in your dreams, you dream about working 
alongside your father and washing clothes beside your mother." 
Even if the food is plain and the tea coarse, they are still 
sweet. "There is an inexplicable tenderness about them." But he 
still wants to get away. 
  "You know, my parents have kept me for more than 20 years. 
It 
just doesn't feel right to spend another cent of my father's 
money. To earn more money and find more business is the best 
way to repay my parents. That was why I left when I had a 
chance." 
  Of course people look for work away from home in order to 
make money. But "city life has its attractions too. Sitting at 
home makes one feel as if one is looking at the sky from the 
bottom of a well." 
  "Listening to tapes at home is no longer fun. Life in the 
village is too monotonous. One has to go 4 li just to catch a 
movie; there are no karaoke, no books, no song and dance shows 
that one likes. Before, I would watch other people dance on TV, 
but I didn't know how. Today, even I can dance a little--not 
that I think about dancing all the time or dance away all my 
free time." 
  "There is no room for me in the village." Upon saying that, 
Chen felt that he had mis-spoken himself. He thought for a while 
and corrected himself, saying, "There is no future here." 
  Chen Liang left several times and came back several times. 
His father said, "If he hadn't leave, his sister couldn't leave." 
  It turned out that when Chen Liang sister failed to find a 
job in Kunshan, it was Chen Liang who found a place for her at 
the Wuxi Textile Goods Research Institute's Zhongshi Factory not 
far from his own work place." 
  "What young people would want to remain at home?" Chen 
Liang's younger sister who had just graduated from middle school 
interjected. 
  Her grandmother chided her, "You wish your brother would 
come 
home tomorrow and leave on the next day. How terrible." 
  "Water drains down; people heads up. People absolutely want 
that work permit." 
  Usually after one person leaves a village, others will 
follow. Dagang's villagers told me that none of those who have 
left have returned. 
<H5>  Secretly Giving Him the Thumbs-Up--by reporter Liu Jian </H5>
[0491 1696] 
  Liujiaguanfang's peasants are not satisfied with making some 
money on the outside to feed the family. They want to get the 
"green card" to the "new world." People here are very keen about 
"emigrating." 
  The reason the peasants from the Liujiaguanfang area often 
go 
out to the northeast, besides the fact that they are familiar 
with the place and have friends and relatives there, is that 
household registration is less strict and outsiders are usually 
allowed to settle there. 
  One's highest ideal of course is to get an official post. 
Two 
li away from Liujiaguanfnag is Zhangjiaguanfang. In 1963, Ji 
Qingren [4764 1987 0088] left the village for Heilongjiang's 
Qitaihe. Today, Ji is the head of Qitaihe's City mines as well 
as its party committee secretary. Everybody in Qitaihe City 
knows his nickname "Ji Dahu--Tiger Ji." When he arrived in the 
coal pits, he truly "worked hard and sweated hard," and soon 
became a model production trooper. In 1973, he was promoted to 
deputy head of the mine; it took him only 10 years. Today he is 
in charge of more than 3,800 workers; he is a county-level cadre 
and is Qitaihe's number one enterpreneur. Most of 
Liujiaguanfang's peasants who venture out to the northeast are 
trying to follow in Ji's example; they just don't want to admit 
it. 
  If one can't make it as a cadre, a lesser goal is to become 
an official employee in a state-owned enterprise and live on the 
"state's payroll." Dozens in Liujiaguanfang have succeeded with 
this approach. In fact, in the more than 40 years since the 
founding of the PRC, most of those in Liujiaguanfang village who 
have managed to get on the state's payroll had started on in the 
northeast. Liu Huitian [0491 2585 3944], a young trooper who 
ventured out to Qitaihe alongside Ji Qingren in 1963 and engaged 
in the same death-defying struggles in the same pit with him, 
has now settled in Qitaihe with his family, all legal and 
proper. Last year, having been away from the village for 30 
years, he took his wife and children back home to visit his 
ancestors' graves. They set off enough firecrackers to litter 
the whole street. Though not the grandest by comparison, his was 
nevertheless a glorious homecoming, sufficient to make his 
ancestors proud. 
  Only a handful can triumphantly land in the "new world." 
Most 
return home to Liujiaguanfang village after three to five months 
or even three to five years, upon making some money here and 
there. Eighty percent of Liujiaguanfang's male between the ages 
of 30 and 60 fall into this category. They either had little 
luck or had just missed the opportunities, or they have simply 
lost the patience to "wait a little while longer" after waiting 
and waiting for a long time. Like those workers who go overseas 
to work, they make some hard-earned money and head home. They 
are neither success stories nor are they failures. 
  No matter where the Liujiaguanfang villagers go, and no 
matter how far they travel, their standard for success or 
failure is still Liujiaguanfang's standard and not the "new 
world's" standard. They seem to have eyes on their backs. 
<H5>  Books Make People Ambitious--by reporter Sun Kai [1327 0418] </H5>
  When I arrived at Huang Xiaomin's [7806 2556 2404] house, 
they had just finished cleaning house and had just started a 
large frying pan to heat some honey. They told me that they were 
getting ready to make some local yellow wine to celebrate an 
important occasion. 
  Twenty-four-year-old Huang was getting married in a few 
days, 
but he looked rather sad. Huang joined a construction brigade 
two years ago upon graduating from high school. Today, he has 
traveled a long way home for his wedding. 
  He said, "After graduating from high school, I didn't make 
it 
to college, but I still felt good about myself. I still believed 
that I could accomplish something. I have always loved to write, 
and I figured that with my education, I could always make some 
money. But once out there, I realized how naive I was." 
  In the construction bridgade, he was an unskilled labor just 
like any other civilian worker. He worked more than 10 hours a 
day. He has been to Xinjiang and Qinghai. During the day, he set 
tiles, and at night, when the others laid in bed chatting with 
one another, he would play the flute or read a book about 
tile-setting, and only at that time would it become apparant 
that he was an educated man. He also admitted that because he 
was educated, the team leaders and others always looked up to 
him. 
  He said, "Actually I would still like to go back to school. 
If my family had money, I would like to get another year of 
schooling. But having worked out there for a couple of years has 
its merits. At least I am more mature. When I first went out 
there, I was vain. I never ventured out of the construction site 
and was too embarrassed to meet people. Now I am a changed man." 
  At one time, Huang Xiaomin submitted some articles to the 
newspapers and magazines. He did not even get a letter of 
rejection. He also tried getting into business for himself but 
was too shy to talk to people. So he ended up becoming an 
unskilled laborer. 
  Today, after having wandered around for two years, marriage 
has brought him back to the village. The outside world is 
illusive, and the air in the village is oppressive. His worries 
about the future keeps bearing down on him. 
  He said, "After the wedding, I am sure I will have to stay 
home for a while, and I am sure I will not be able to accomplish 
much at home. So I am sure I will leave again." 
  He said, "I have to get out there and do something for my 
father and mother and everybody to see, to make society 
acknowledge my worth. One day, if I manage to accomplish 
something big, I will return and change the face of this 
village." 
<H5>  Torn Between Coming and Going--by reporter Lu Yuegang [4151 </H5>
6460 0474] 
  Two things bothered me incessantly while I was staying in 
Huxia village. The first was insomnia, because of the rats, and 
the other was the language problem. 
  Huxia village's grain silos used to be built out of reed or 
wood. No one knows when the rats began to run amuck. What is 
interesting is that instead of working together to rid the 
village of rats, every family began to build cement silos. Even 
if the rats had steel fangs, they couldn't chew through the 
cement walls. Starving rats are everywhere, and they gnaw at 
anything that they can sink their teeth into. Sometimes, a 
foot-long rat would crawl along the bed-rail. They would look 
straight into your eyes, showing no fear at all. What can you do? 
  People speak the Hu native dialect here. Outsiders simply 
can't understand them. Fortunately, I had Zou Binzi [6760 2430 
1311] to interpret for me. 
  Actually, Zou is around because of this piece of 
poverty-stricken land. He was in the military police army for 3 
years and joined the Party while serving. After he returned 
home, he wanted to do something big, but every time he returned 
home full of hope he was forced to leave full of despair. It was 
as if there was no room for him on that piece of land. He worked 
as a hired hand everywhere. He worked hard. He went all over the 
country, but he always felt that he had an unfulfilled dream. In 
July 1993, he drummed up enough courage to write Wu Guanzheng 
[0702 1351 2973], governor of Jiangxi Province, a letter in 
which he said, "Upon returning to the village, I wanted to 
embark on the road to riches along with my fellow villagers. But 
alas there was 'no room for a hero to display his prowess' 
there." He went on to make some good suggestions about many 
rural projects. 
  His letter was forwarded from the province to Yichuan 
Prefecture and from the prefecture to Zhangshu City and then to 
Huangtugang Town, from level to level, and eventually the town's 
leader met with him. This kind of sensationalism only invited 
the villagers' criticism. 
  Another failure. He was forced to go to work in Guangdong: 
First, he could avoid further criticisms, and second, he could 
make some money to support himself. 
  He told me that as far as Huxia village is concerned, there 
are only two kinds of resources: the land and the surplus labor. 
In particular, he said that the land has not been properly 
utilized. He showed me his plan. He pointed to a field at the 
foothill and said, "There are more than 40 mu of red-loam, 
low-yield farms. Planting rice will yield only several hundred 
jin. If we do some excavating, it will be a perfect place for 
ecology-based breeding [SHENGTAI YANGZHI]." 
  Ecology-based breeding techniques can be brought in from the 
outside, but who will put up the 40 to 50,000 yuan in initial 
investments? It will be harder to get the money than to get into 
heaven. 
  In early February, I received a letter from Zou. He said 
that 
upon parting with me in Nanchang, he thought about starting an 
all-purpose agricultural development company, but his family was 
dead against it. The reason was quite simple: they did not have 
the means to support him. 
  He is already 26 years old. In the village, the pressure is 
already unbearable if one is still not married at that age. Even 
worse is, what is he going to do with himself? He plays mahjong 
during the day, and at night, there is no electricity, so he 
goes to bed early. Is this the way to fritter one's life away? 
  Should he go out to work again? Once Spring Festival is 
over, 
he will have to make a decision. He must be torn between coming 
and going at this point. 
<H5>  Appendix </H5>


Item/Village       Shandong:         Gansu:       Jiangsi:    Sichuan:     Jiangsu: 
                   Liujiaguanfang    Xinzhuang    Huxia       Guozi        Dagang 
                   village           village      village     village      village 

Number of mobile   210               more than    35          310          200 
workers                              300 

Workers who have   0 (excluding      0            0           16 
returned (never    those who 
to leave again)    returned before 
                   1992) 

(Returned          employment mix    0            0           3 in 
workers) in        of people who                              business, 
nonagricultural    returned before                            2 others 
sector             1992 is the 
                   same as those 
                   who never left 

Number of people   same as above     0            0           11 
returning to 
agriculture 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66191 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar029___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-029 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  Investigative Report of Surplus Rural Labor </ABS>
<DATE1>   25 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100></F>
<F P=101>   Investigative Report on China's Surplus Rural Labor </F>
<H3> <TI>   Part VI </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Part VI </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0223A Beijing ZHONGGUO QINGNIAN BAO in Chinese 25 Feb 94 
p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0223A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing ZHONGGUO QINGNIAN BAO </F>
<F P=105>  Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Collection of essays: "An Investigative Report on China's </F>
Surplus Rural Labor Force; Exploring the Sources, Part VI -- 
What the Peasants Themselves Have To Say"] 
  [Text] This part was originally entitled 
"Developmental Plans For the Year 2000 For the Towns and 
Townships Where the Villages In This Report Are Located." But in 
the course of investigation, it was discovered that Gansu's 
Liufeng township where Xinzhuang village is located and 
Shandong's Guanfang Township where Liujiaguanfang is located had 
no plans. Jiangsu Province's Hengsheng Town where Guozi village 
is located only has a plan for the current term of the 
government (three years). Meanwhile by the year 1995, Hengsheng 
Town's total income is expected to reach 32.965 million yuan, 
49.1 percent more than in 1992. At the end of the Eighth 
Five-Year period, Goudun Town's GVIOA [Gross Value of Industrial 
and Agricultural Output] is expected to double that of 1993's, 
surpassing 600 million yuan. Jiangxi's Huangtugang town where 
Huxia village is located projects that by the year 2000, each 
village under its jurisdiction should have an income of 100,000 
yuan. 
<H5>  Huxia Village Branch Secretary Zou Chungen [6760 1504 2704] </H5>
Says: "Go And Take a Look First"--by reporter Lu Yuegang [4151 
6460 0474] 
  In discussing Huxia's future, the village branch secretary 
Zou Chungen said, "There is no stability without agriculture; 
there is no wealth without industry." 
  How is agriculture doing? 
  He said, "China's grain supply is still tight. The peasants 
don't want to see grain prices go up. We have an analogy: Grain 
is the water and industrial products are the boats, and if the 
water rises, the boats rise along with it, and how much money 
will truly end up in the peasants' hands? Moreover, the 
authorities want to see the per capita income increase every 
year. We have no sideline productions or industries in the 
village. How do we make our income go up? The authorities won't 
like the numbers we show them, and so we simply don't report 
anything and just stamp the village's seal and let them fill in 
whatever they want." (Note: According to the town party 
committee secretary, Du Shuiyuan, the higher authorities have 
asked the town for an 80-yuan increase in per capita income for 
1993, and the localities have asked for another 20 yuan, making 
it a total of 100 yuan. This is known as "talking strategy on 
paper--just words.") He is probably exaggerating. 
  "There is no wealth without industry." He said, "In here, 
even if we worked for free, investors would not come here to 
invest. Enterprises need electricity. We don't even have 
electricity to cook dinner, hull rice, or for a television set. 
Who is going to invest here? (Note: Every household in Huxia has 
electricity for lighting, but I was there for eight days, and 
lights were lit for only a few hours in all.) 
  "Agriculture can barely keep people warm and fed. We have 
surplus labor, but various constraining factors have kept us 
from setting up enterprises, and so we must ship out the surplus 
labor instead. But who wants them? We have strength but no place 
to spend it. Furthermore, the peasants here have no skill. 
Technical training requires investments. Who will pay? I figure 
that the village has more than 1,000 people and there are only 
four cement and tile setters, two carpenters, six bamboo 
weavers, one tailor, one blacksmith, and one barber. They total 
19 people, young and old. It is written in our Zou's Family 
Annals, `Only with a generation of talents can there be a 
generation of undertakings. A generation's undertakings rely on 
a generation of talents.' Where has our generation of talents 
gone? 
  Developing rural productive forces is easier said than done. 
We will have to take one step at a time." 
<H5>  Ping Yuanbiao [1627 0337 2871], President of Dagang's </H5>
Village Committee, Says, "First You Want To Leave, Then You Want 
To Come Home"--by reporter Dai Yuanzhi [2071 0337 2871] 
  Not far from the bridge in the heart of the village are the 
offices of Dagang's village committee and village branch party 
committee. The village's office on crackdowns, family planning 
committee, joint defense brigade and other village-level organs, 
and the radio station and health center are all located there. 
  Ping Yuanbiao, president of the villagers' committee, has 
been in office for only one month. He told this reporter that 
the village is within the Huanghuaihai Plains Planned 
Development Zone. Most of the village's low-lying paddy fields 
are susceptible to waterlogging. 
  He said that without sufficient labor input, each mu of land 
will be lucky to just break even. Today, the main approach is to 
diversify, like planting lake mulberry and raising ducks, sheep, 
pigs, and aquatic products and so on. Raising poultry earns more 
money than farming, and aquatic products make more money than 
poultry. The village has 446 households and 1,768 people. Each 
household has an average of 1 mu of mulberry. There are 250 mu 
of water for breeding aquatic products along the interior 
rivers, and there are plans for a 100-mu fishpond. Among the 
aquatic products, specialty products make the most money but 
require some input and special techniques. Labor export, 
however, requires little outlay and is one way for the village 
to get rich. 
  The village has a tradition of emphasizing education and 
learning. Since 1989, the village has raised funds for the 
schools each year. This reporter noticed that it has built a 
little pavilion for the elementary school and has given it land 
for a fishpond. An elderly man helped Ping Yuanbiao figure out 
that the village has produced five college students, two 
polytechnic school graduates, around 25 high school graduates, 
and 130-140 middle school graduates. 
  President Ping told me that in 1990, the village ran a 
70-80,000 yuan deficit, and today, it still has over 10,000 yuan 
in deficits. The village-run factory has shut down, and it now 
only has a few household-run factories. 
  The accountant has figured out that the village has 1,950 mu 
of land and 980 workers, nearly 600 of them work at home, in the 
farms, or engage in diversified management; more than 200 work 
elsewhere year-round; more than 100 hold temporary jobs. This 
still leaves around 80 surplus workers. 
  The village party branch secretary, Lao Xu, said that the 
village has more people than land, and even if they had more 
land, it wouldn't earn much. People are not enthusiastic about 
farming. More than 40 percent of those who leave the village are 
young people; they have had at least middle school education and 
with that they have more confidence in themselves. 
  President Ping took me on a bike-ride around the village. 
Chen Jiaxin [7115 1367 2450] has a family of four; no family 
member works outside the village. They have 12-13 mu of land, 4 
of which they use to plant cotton. Each year they raise 10 
chickens and four pigs, and their per capita net income is 500 
yuan. Wang Dengrong's [3769 4098 2837] family has one member 
working elsewhere; their per capita income is more than 600 
yuan. Chen Jiawang [7115 1367 3076] has a family of four; two 
are farmers and two are workers out-of-town, and their annual 
net income is 1,500 yuan higher. 
  It seems that besides letting the workers who are staying in 
the village grow more grain and cotton, they must let some of 
the surplus labor shift to diversified management, especially to 
breed specialty aquatic products, and meanwhile continue to 
export the remaining surplus labor. This probably is the main 
direction of the village leaders' future plans. Working for 
others is a way to escape poverty and attain wealth and 
accumulate funds for setting up enterprises in the future. It is 
also a way to explore future projects (including learning about 
information, technologies, management, raw materials, and sales 
channels). This is the village's guiding ideology for 
encouraging labor export. 
  But I was told that none of those who had left have 
returned. 
  On the morning of my departure, the landlord woke me up. The 
cock was crowing. Before I boarded the boat, I took one last 
look at the village. I hope one day some people will "return to 
cause a revolution here." Let Dagang, "a land where a cockcrow 
wakes three counties' people", rise up; let the villagers get 
rich even faster. 
<H5>  Xinzhuang Village's Branch Secretary Gong Wanfu [7255 5502 </H5>
4395] Says, "Cities Don't Belong Only to the City Folks"--by 
reporter Sun Kai [1327 0418] 
  "To tell the truth, those who go out to work as common 
laborer and suffer are people without ability, that is, they are 
us peasants. They can do nothing else and have no choice, so 
they must go to the city to do what other people are not willing 
to do in order to make a little money," said Gong Wanfu, 
Xinzhuang village's branch party committee. 
  "Things were terrible a few years ago. The village was so 
poor it couldn't even afford to buy a piece of paper and the 
people didn't have enough sorghum noodle to eat. It was at that 
time that we began exporting labor, and things began to improve 
slowly." 
  Gong said, "When I read the newspaper, sometimes they say 
that too many of our peasants go to the cities and create public 
security problems for the cities. Our own village people come 
back and say the same thing. I myself often go to town and feel 
the same way. This is a law enforcement problem. But I also feel 
that some city people tend to thumb their noses at the people 
from the villages. Actually, cities do not belong to the city 
folks alone. They are part of the state and belong to the 
village people too. Just like in our village, when the elder son 
repairs the house and the younger son moves in and later the 
elder son wants to move back into the house and the younger son 
is upset, but in fact it was the elder son who repaired the 
house and not the younger son." 
  "No matter how you look at it, city people do benefit more 
from the state. If you don't believe me, ask the state to repair 
the roads or build a theater or a park in our village so that we 
can be better than the city." Gong lit a cigarette and went on, 
"Xinzhuang village has money. We just don't want to show it. The 
shabbier a person looks, the richer he may be. The rich wear 
cheap clothes, and the poor wear good clothes. In my village, at 
least a dozen families have more than 100,000 yuan, at least a 
dozen have 50-60,000 yuan, and three or four families have 
200-300,000 yuan or 300-400,000 yuan. No less than a hundred 
families have 20-30,000 or 30-40,000 yuan. Believe it or not. I 
have no reason to exaggerate." 
  Gong said, "Village people don't like to show their wealth. 
They won't tell you the truth. They don't want to part with 
their money. They dont's eat good food or wear expensive 
clothes; some don't even go to the bank--they don't put the 
money in the bank but prefer to put it in a jar and bury it in 
the ground. They are different from city folks. City people who 
have some money will invest it or have fun. We village people 
have to work hard to earn our money, and we don't want to part 
with it." 
  "City people nevertheless are more cultured; they have 
experienced more and seen more. We in the village have our 
advantages. We can have fresh vegetables anytime; we have our 
own land to grow things, and we don't have to pay. It is just 
that we country people are kind of dumb, a bit shortsighted, and 
kind of narrow-minded." 
  In talking about his future plans, he said, "This village's 
future is fairly limited. There is less land and more people 
everyday. The village's own cement factory has shut down. We 
mainly have to turn to the outside." 
  "If we have nothing to do, we will fix the village roads and 
then add a large well. That is our plan for the next two years." 
<H5>  Liujiaguanfang's Village Branch Secretary Liu and President </H5>
Liu Say, "Not Enough Ways To Make Money."--by reporter Liu Jian 
[0491 1696] 
  Forty-eight-year-old Liu Jinghan [0491 2529 3352] returned 
to 
the village in the 1970's after serving in the army. A few years 
later he joined the party branch group and became secretary 
early last year. Liu Hengye [1854 0673], who was in his early 
20's in 1971 also joined the part branch at the same time and 
has been president of the village committee for more than a 
decade. 
  While I was interviewing them, the loudspeaker outside was 
broadcasting, "A few households have not paid their electric 
bills. Pay them now. You are fussing over a little electric 
bill. Don't fuss." 
  "We are in a most difficult time. The village debts will not 
be easily paid off. If we didn't have the cotton responsibility, 
it would have been easier. But we still have to plant this 
year's cotton. The village owes money for it, and the citizens 
don't feel like planting cotton. Isn't it terrible? In recent 
years, the higher authorities want the citizens to plant several 
things, and you will be fined if you don't. They insist that we 
plant yellow tobacco, and when the authorities come to procure 
the tobacco, they cheat at the scales. Secretary Li of the 
village party committee has personallly arrested some of them. 
This year, we still have to plant it. 
  Other matters such as fund collection and retention are 
better left unsaid. 
  Those not leaving the village but are staying home will have 
to depend on breeding and planting to make a living. Individual 
families may raise pigs or chickens. Growing crops doesn't pay 
and even if one makes some money, it is negligible. In the old 
days when we were learning from Dazhai, we weren't even allowed 
to leave the village. Those who moved about illegally would find 
their families being dragged to study lessons or even to the 
communes and fined. But in fact that had not stopped the people 
from moving. Not long ago, there was another round [of 
prohibitions]: Those who wanted to leave had to have a letter 
from the county government before they could purchase a train 
ticket. The railroads couldn't handle them all. In recent years, 
there have been no more attempts to stop the people. Anyone who 
wants to leave may leave. We neither encourage nor discourage 
them. Whoever makes the money is entitled to pocket the money. 
We have no sideline production, and the little bit of land is 
not enough for growing anything, and that is why people want to 
leave. Today, one may not see a young person in the village all 
day. Anybody who can leave have left. 
  Just say that there is a way to make money and the people 
will go crazy. Making a little money is better than none. But 
there are just not enough ways to make money. It is easier said 
than done. Tell me, where would one make money these days? 
  The biggest difference between today and the old days is 
that 
everybody is basically warm and fed today. Before the 
re-allocation of land, people mostly lived on yam stalks and 
didn't even have enough of that to eat. Each commune member had 
10-20 jin of wheat a year; some had to sell that in order to get 
more yam stalks. Today, most families' staple food is noodles. 
In the past, half the people who left the village left because 
they were hungry. Today, they leave for money. The people live 
one day at a time. In the long-run, they will only grow 
stronger." 
<H5>  Guozi Village's Branch Secretary Liu Bencheng [0491 2609 </H5>
2052] Says, "People Always Want To Move Up. Why Stop Them?"--by 
Mao Hao [3029 3185] 
  I interviewed Liu Bencheng, the village branch secretary, in 
a small grocery store at one end of Guozi village. 
  "To tell the truth, today, nobody wants to be a cadre. All 
the smart people have left the village. I am useless, and that 
is why I am standing around like a stick (a little humor here.) 
A few years ago, everybody kept their eyes on the steelyard 
(referring to their grain allotment). Today, with their ID 
cards, they can go anywhere they please. You can't even stop 
them. At first, we were willing to heed the authorities to stop 
the people. But then we figured, we couldn't solve their 
problems, so why stop them? People always want to move upward, 
just like water always flows downward. Want to tie them up? 
  To tell you the truth, my four sons and two daughters-in-law 
all work on the outside. They stay out for a month and can make 
enough to buy a year's grain. In 1984, when the system of 
setting farm output quota for each household was implemented, 
grain production doubled, which more or less ended the practice 
of reselling government-procured grain to feed the people, but 
it was still impossible to rely on agriculture to make the 
people well-off. We tried. In 1990, I made a come-back and was 
determined to do something big. That winter, the village people 
planted an average of 600 mulberry trees per person and 
instantly increased the number of sheets of paper with silkworm 
eggs from 27 to 265. The county's silkworm and mulberry work 
committee was started here. The entire county came to tour the 
village. Impressive enough for you? But when they came to 
collect the cacoons, the silkworm stations refused to buy up 
everything. The contracted price of 9 jue per jin had to be 
lowered to 7 jue. The procurement was completed later only when 
urged by the town's party committee and the town government. 
They still owe us 4,800 yuan today. The people were upset. Last 
year, there were attempts to destroy the mulberry trees. 
  To be fair, we can't blame it all on the silkworm stations. 
When it comes to farm work, we are dependent on nature. That 
year, the village people who sold mulberry and cacoons made 150 
yuan per person, which was not bad. But at year-end, those who 
had left the village to work came home (people left en masse 
beginning in 1989,) and upon figuring and comparing the numbers, 
that little bit of income came to less than one-tenth of what 
the others made on the outside. People who have left in recent 
years are coming back with their wives to build new houses. Now, 
that is heavy stuff. We can't measure up. 
  In my experience, working on the outside won't last. Things 
will change later. Everybody is out there trying to make a 
bundle while they still can, and if you are stupid enough to 
stick around the farm, you will regret it later. Today, many 
young people don't even come home for Spring Festival. They are 
afraid that they may not be able to find work later. The kids 
are having a tough time out there. I know. Well, there is 
nothing good about the peasants except that they can endure 
hardship. I encourage every young person in the village to get 
out there to see the world. That is why I always issue a permit 
to anyone who asks. 
  Of course, the draining of manpower is not without its 
problems. I am a village branch secretary. `Deceiving those 
above me and bullying those below me' is an honest day's work (a 
little humor here). But I feel that like it or not, it is 
already a fact that most young workers have gone out to find 
work; we can no longer pretend that we don't know about it. But 
we need clear regulations on issues such as the transfer of 
contracted land. The kind of private negotiation we have going 
on today is not a solution. I always feel that working for 
others out there is not a permanent solution. The young people 
will come back home. If Gouzi village really wants to get rich, 
it must have its own township enterprises. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66192 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar030___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  13 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTERNATIONAL </F>
<F P=101> GENERAL </F>
<H3> <TI>   Nuclear Test Ban Treaty Prospects Explored </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Nuclear Test Ban Treaty Prospects Explored </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0228A Beijing GUOJI WENTI YANJIU [INTERNATIONAL STUDIES] 
in Chinese No 51, 13 Jan 94 pp 5-12 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0228A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GUOJI WENTI YANJIU [INTERNATIONAL STUDIES] 
in Chinese No 51, 13 Jan 94 pp 5-12 </F>

<F P=105> Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zou Yunhua (6760 0061 5478), Associate Fellow, </F>
National Defense Science, Technology, and Industry Commission: 
"Comprehensive Nuclear Test Ban Inevitable in the Developing 
Circumstances -- Written on the Eve of Talks on a `Comprehensive 
Nuclear Test Ban Treaty'"] 
  [Excerpts] Nuclear testing is a unique yardstick for 
measuring the level and speed of nuclear weapons development. 
Non-nuclear nations have long stressed the urgency and the 
necessity for a comprehensive nuclear test ban. They firmly 
maintain that a comprehensive test ban is an important step in 
nuclear disarmament, and that it is the key to halting the 
nuclear arms race, particularly to preventing qualitative 
improvement of nuclear weapons and nuclear weapons proliferation. 
  International society has made many efforts to ban and limit 
nuclear testing during the past more than 40 years, and some 
advances have been made in negotiations to ban nuclear tests. 
  At the beginning of 1994, negotiation of a "Comprehensive 
Nuclear Test Ban Treaty" will begin at the Geneva Disarmament 
Negotiations Conference. There are two possible prospects for 
these negotiations: 1) Negotiation of a comprehensive test ban 
treaty will proceed rapidly, or 2) treaty negotiations will go 
through a tortuous and complex process because of numerous 
imponderables. [passage omitted] 
  C. Nuclear Test Ban Situation After 1990 
  During the summer session of the Geneva Disarmament 
Negotiations Conference in July 1990, a special committee on 
banning nuclear testing was founded after a seven-year hiatus. 
This was no doubt closely related to the international 
situation, particularly new changes in the international 
disarmament situation. First of all, on the nuclear disarmament 
question, the United States and the USSR prepared for a 
strategic arms reduction treaty (START) as a follow-on to the 
signing of a U.S.-Soviet "intermediate range ballistic missile 
treaty," and continuation of talks on the further reduction of 
nuclear weapons. Second, the United States and Western 
countries, which were anxious to respond to the needs of the 
fourth deliberative meeting (held in August 1990) on a "Nuclear 
Non-Proliferation Treaty," had to adopt a flexible attitude. At 
that time, France still maintained its rigid position, affirming 
anew that it would not take part in the work of the special 
nuclear test ban committee. China participated in the work of 
the special committee. It expressed willingness to understand 
the demand of non-nuclear nations for a ban on nuclear weapons, 
and it desired to take an active part in the special committee's 
work. 
  However, from 1990 until 1922, serious differences existed 
among the parties to the disarmament talks, particularly on the 
issue of whether the special committee should have negotiating 
authority. A group of 21 unaligned nations called for immediate 
negotiation of a comprehensive test ban treaty, strongly 
asserting that they could not permit a situation to continue in 
which a serious priority matter was only discussed but not 
negotiated. The United States and the United Kingdom were 
stubbornly opposed. Subsequently, the special committee 
conducted only a general discussion of the nuclear test ban 
issue. On 26 May 1992, France declared at a full meeting of the 
disarmament negotiations conference that it would participate in 
the work of the special nuclear test ban committee. 
  1993 was an unusual year. On 10 August, the Geneva 
Disarmament Conference passed a decision (Document Number: CD 
1212), granting negotiating authority to the nuclear test ban 
committee, and in early 1994, negotiation of a treaty formally 
began. At the 1993 disarmament conference, both the unaligned 
nations and non-nuclear western nations were extremely active in 
an effort to obtain complete test ban treaty negotiating rights. 
They did not want the treaty to be like "partial test ban 
treaties," the nuclear powers concocting a treaty only to use a 
disarmament talks conference as an alibi, insisting that 
discussions could be conducted only at a disarmament conference. 
<H5>  III. Nuclear Test Ban Is an Inevitability in the Developing </H5>
and Changing International Situation 
  The reality facing the world during the 1980s was a constant 
escalation of the nuclear arms race between the United States 
and the Soviet Union for more than 40 years. However, they were 
never able to break the balance of power between their strategic 
forces. Peace was substantially maintained in the world for 40 
years. Maintenance and updating of such super inflationary 
nuclear weapons during this protracted period of peace was an 
extremely heavy burden, particularly for the USSR. Changes in 
the world situation forced both the United States and the USSR 
to consider readjustment of their nuclear arms policy. The 
strategic defense initiative (SDI) that the Reagan 
administration proposed in 1983 was an effort to replace an 
offensive strategy with a defensive strategy. In March 1983, 
after Mikhail Gorbachev took office, the USSR changed from 
pursuit of great military power status to development of its 
domestic economy and enhancement of its overall national 
strength. Beginning in 1985, this readjustment of the nuclear 
arms policies of the United States and the Soviet Union brought 
about the most relaxed atmosphere in the nuclear arms field 
since the advent of nuclear weapons. Both the United States and 
the USSR began to dismantle and destroy their global 
intermediate range and intermediate short range missiles. 
Following discussions in mid-September 1987, the foreign 
ministers of the two countries issued a joint statement stating 
that "both parties unanimously agreed to begin comprehensive, 
phased" negotiations "before 1 December," the two nations first 
"agreeing on effective nuclear inspection measures." Next, they 
would "conduct negotiations in the intermediate stage on the 
issue of further limiting testing," and "the final goal is a 
complete ban on nuclear testing." Both the United States and the 
USSR also sent experts to examine each other's nuclear test 
ranges, and they conducted joint tests. 
  At the same time, the United States Government came under 
increasingly strong pressure from forces in the country opposed 
to the continuation of nuclear testing. In March 1986, 58 
members of the House of Representatives, led by the House 
majority leader, and five senators wrote a joint letter urging 
Reagan to accept the USSR's proposal for a halt to nuclear 
testing. In August of the same year, the United States House of 
Representatives again passed a resolution calling upon the 
United States Government and the USSR to negotiate the banning 
of all nuclear protests. Outside the Congress, public 
anti-nuclear demonstrations increased in intensity. During 
demonstrations and gatherings opposing nuclear testing that were 
held year after year, some demonstrators even marched on the 
Nevada test range in an effort to block nuclear testing. Faced 
with such tremendous pressure, the Reagan administration could 
only adopt a tough opposition policy. 
  Developments since the mid-1980s foretold the possibility 
that a new turning point period might occur on the nuclear test 
ban issue. 
  As the world entered the 1990s, the international situation 
changed greatly. East-west relations underwent enormous changes, 
notably the disappearance of the Warsaw Pact and the dramatic 
dissolution of the USSR. No longer did they pose a serious 
threat to the United States and West Europe. The nuclear 
strategy of the United States and its allies was commensurately 
adjusted. The United States lost its erstwhile worthy adversary, 
and the western nations headed by the United States began to 
shift their imaginary enemy to third world countries. More and 
more, the western countries emphasized that prevention of 
weapons of mass destruction, particularly the proliferation of 
nuclear weapons, was the most prominent problem in disarmament 
and arms control in the world today. They made prevention of 
proliferation the foremost strategic task, holding that such 
proliferation posed the greatest global threat to international 
security following the cold war. They also maintained that early 
conclusion of a complete test ban treaty could effectively and 
promptly prevent nuclear threshold countries (also termed 
near-nuclear countries) from crossing the nuclear threshold, 
thereby eliminating a hidden danger. This was because, generally 
speaking, near-nuclear countries had to do only a certain amount 
of nuclear testing in order to qualify to join the ranks of 
countries having nuclear weapons of value in actual warfare. 
  On the other hand, the great tide of international 
relaxation 
stimulated further demands that the United States and Russia 
make more nuclear arms cuts and ban nuclear testing. Great 
advances were also won in the international disarmament field. 
In July 1991, the United States and Russia signed the "Strategic 
Nuclear Arms Reduction Treaty" (START). On 16 June 1992, 
American President George Bush and Russian President Boris 
Yeltsin signed the "Strategic Arms Reduction Agreement of 
Understanding." According to the provisions of this treaty, the 
nuclear warheads on the nearly 10,000 strategic weapons that 
each side had deployed would be reduced by two-thirds, i.e., by 
2003, the number of nuclear warheads on strategic weapons that 
each side had deployed would be no more than between 3,000 and 
3,500. 
  As a super power, with the easing of the confrontation 
between the USSR and the United States, and the beginning of new 
changes in the European strategic pattern, the United States 
made a step-by-step readjustment of its nuclear strategy to meet 
the post-cold war international situation. After the Clinton 
administration took office, readjustment of America's national 
security strategy became increasingly evident. 
  Following the dissolution of the USSR, the United States 
unilaterally adopted various measures to prevent loss of control 
over and proliferation of the former Soviet Union's nuclear 
weapons. The United States readjusted its own nuclear force 
structure and nuclear weapons development plans. In 1992, the 
United States stopped production of new model nuclear warheads. 
On 2 July 1992, Bush announced the return to the United States 
from abroad of all land-based and sea-based tactical nuclear 
weapons that were slated for withdrawal. On 13 July, President 
Bush announced a halt to the production of weapons-grade 
plutonium and highly enriched uranium used to manufacture 
nuclear warheads. Inevitably, the United States also gradually 
readjusted its nuclear test ban policy as well. In July 1992, 
President Bush stated in his nuclear test ban policy proposal 
that in order to ensure the dependability of a U.S. nuclear 
deterrent force, appropriate and effective nuclear testing was 
necessary. However, the clamor and pressure inside the United 
States for a complete test ban was extremely strong. The United 
States Congress passed a bill on 24 September 1992 that provided 
for no further nuclear tests after 30 September 1996 unless 
other countries conduct such tests. It also provided that prior 
to 1996, the total number of underground nuclear tests could not 
exceed 15, and it required the United States to temporarily halt 
nuclear testing for nine months. 
  On 3 July 1993, the Clinton administration's new nuclear 
test 
ban policy was inaugurated. It approved earliest initiation of 
multilateral talks, and early conclusion of a comprehensive test 
ban treaty. It emphasized that the United States might conclude 
a test ban treaty in advance of the already stated 1996 date. It 
declared that the United States' temporary halt to testing would 
extend until September 1994 unless another country conducted 
tests. Actually, earliest initiation of negotiations on a 
comprehensive test ban had been jointly agreed earlier in 
discussions between the American and Russian heads of state in 
Vancouver. 
  The Clinton administration's establishment of a new nuclear 
test ban stemmed mostly from political necessity, Clinton's own 
campaign promise, and the U.S. "nonproliferation" policy. 
However, the inauguration of this new policy had a direct and 
major influence on "Comprehensive Nuclear Test Ban Treaty" 
negotiations. Opening of the curtain on this treaty's 
negotiation benefitted from it. 
  Naturally, not only has readjustment of America's nuclear 
test ban policy played a major role in bringing about the 
nuclear test ban treaty negotiations, but there have also been 
other reasons as well. 
  1. With the approach of the 1995 meeting to discuss a 
"Nuclear Non-Proliferation Treaty," loud cries from third world 
countries for a comprehensive test ban are reaching a crescendo. 
They have taken the opportunity to redouble pressures on nuclear 
nations to force them to political promises and to negotiate at 
once the conclusion of a comprehensive test ban treaty. Western 
nonnuclear nations are also actively promoting early 
negotiations. 
  2. Other nuclear countries have agreed or have been forced 
to 
agree to take part in negotiations for a comprehensive test ban 
treaty. Russia has consistently supported a comprehensive test 
ban. Not only does Russia gain political advantage from this 
position, but of greater importance today is preservation of its 
nuclear power position, and its economic predicament. Although 
it still has a need to conduct nuclear tests, the United Kingdom 
relies on America's test ranges and joint testing with the 
United States. It has no choice but to do as the United States 
says. France was virtually forced to agree to take part in the 
negotiations as a result of domestic and foreign political 
pressure. China supports early negotiations to conclude a 
"Comprehensive Nuclear Test Ban Treaty," and emphasis that all 
nuclear nations should simultaneously negotiate and conclude an 
unconditional international treaty of no first use of nuclear 
weapons, and not using or threatening to use nuclear weapons on 
non-nuclear nations and non-nuclear territories. 
  3. Some nuclear countries announcements of a temporary halt 
to nuclear tests will certainly promote progress in negotiations 
for a comprehensive test ban treaty. Mostly in response to 
international or domestic pressures, Russia, the United States, 
and France announced a temporary halt to nuclear testing. In 
October 1991, Russia announced a one-year temporary halt to 
testing, which it later extended for one year. In 1992 and 1993, 
the United States announced a temporary halt to testing. On 8 
April 1992, France also announced a temporary halt to nuclear 
testing for that year (France's action was purely a cheap 
political decision). In response, third world nations repeatedly 
called loudly for these temporary halts to testing by some 
nuclear countries to become a permanent halt to testing by all 
nuclear nations. 
<H5>  IV. Prospects for Negotiation of a "Comprehensive Nuclear </H5>
Test Ban Treaty" 
  In early 1994, talks on the "Comprehensive Nuclear Test Ban 
Treaty" will begin in the only multilateral disarmament 
organization -- the Geneva Disarmament Negotiations Conference. 
Theer are two possible prospects for these talks. 
  A. Negotiations on a Comprehensive Test Ban Treaty Will 
Be Conducted Swiftly 
  1. On the basis of the resolution that the Geneva 
Disarmament 
Negotiations Conference passed on 10 August 1993, negotiations 
on a comprehensive test ban treaty will formally begin in 
January 1994. The First Committee of the United Nations General 
Assembly (the UN First Committee) discussed and unanimously 
approved a resolution on a "Comprehensive Nuclear Test Ban 
Treaty" on 19 November 1993. This resolution urged the Geneva 
Disarmament Conference's 1994 session to regard a "Comprehensive 
Nuclear Test Ban Treaty" as a priority task and accelerate 
negotiations in order to reach a universal international 
agreement that provides for effective international nuclear 
inspections. A total of 156 nations jointly sponsored this 
resolution, an unprecedented number, which shows the high degree 
of attention that international society pays to the 
comprehensive test ban issue, and also suggests that the talks 
will be conducted with great fanfare. 
  2. Since it is limited by Congress' nuclear test ban law, 
the 
United States is anxious to complete negotiations for a 
comprehensive test ban treaty by 1996; it will apply pressure on 
other nuclear states. Russia has always advocated early 
conclusion of a comprehensive test ban treaty, so naturally it 
is actively pushing for it. To a very large extent, the attitude 
of the United Kingdom will follow that of the United States. 
  Technologically speaking, after more than nearly a half 
century of high speed development, America's and Russia's 
nuclear weapons long ago passed their peak period. No 
earth-shaking advances have been made for the past nearly 20 
years, so the need to continue nuclear testing has greatly 
decreased. Furthermore, several nuclear weapons research 
institutes in the United States have explored various approaches 
in recent years in a search for methods that can replace or 
partially replace nuclear tests, and they have made some 
progress. Without doubt, other nuclear power have conducted or 
are in process of conducting similar research. Pioneering in 
this field of technology in order to continue to maintain 
nuclear weapons security and reliability following a 
comprehensive test ban, and even being able to continue to open 
new approaches to the development of nuclear weapons, will 
provide the technical guarantees needed for the realization of a 
comprehensive test ban. 
  4. Pressures from non-nuclear states for the early 
conclusion 
of a "comprehensive nuclear test ban" treaty will increase 
steadily. Some third world countries have already demanded that 
such a treaty be concluded before 1994, and that it be linked to 
extension of the "Nuclear Non-Proliferation Treaty." Without 
doubt, this will also be a major motivation for conclusion of 
the treaty. The international anti-nuclear movement is gathering 
strength. Continuation of nuclear testing in a nuclear test ban 
atmosphere has become fraught with difficulties. 
  Sweden proposed a "Comprehensive Nuclear Test Ban Treaty": 
in 
1991, and it 1992, it proposed new amendments. Many disarmament 
talks nations have expressed support for this draft, and they 
have suggested making it the basis for treaty talks. Even the 
United States said that the Swedish text might serve as an 
important basis for talks. The text of the Swedish treaty draft 
creates favorable conditions for the formal initiation of 
disarmament talks and for accelerating treaty negotiation. 
  B. Many Imponderables Remain in the Negotiation of a 
Comprehensive Test Ban Treaty; Treaty Negotiations Will Go 
Through a Tortuous and Complex Process 
  1. As with any complex project, a comprehensive test ban 
treaty cannot be negotiated in a day. The provisions of a future 
treaty will have wide ramifications, and negotiations will 
involve numerous specifics such as the scope of the ban, the 
definition of a nuclear explosion, the laboratory simulated 
nuclear explosion issue, conditions under which the treaty takes 
effect, and the duration of the treaty, etc. The talks 
intensify, problems will become increasingly complex. Presumably 
negotiations will take some time. 
  2. The treaty's nuclear testing issue will be the key 
component of talks. Comprehensive test ban nuclear inspection 
techniques are numerous. They include mostly the following: 
seismological monitoring (used for long distance monitoring of 
underground explosions in violation of the treaty), satellite 
monitoring (used in monitoring preparations for nuclear testing 
and for atmospheric nuclear testing), on-site inspections (used 
for further inspection following discovery of suspicious things 
that violate the treaty), etc. Discussion of the treaty's 
nuclear inspection provisions involves numerous questions such 
as technical issues and costs, reasonableness, and how to 
organize execution. Once talks begin, there will be a multitude 
of matters. 
  3. The unaligned nations and the nuclear nations do not 
agree 
with each other on the starting point and the goals for 
conducting a comprehensive nuclear test ban treaty. The 
unaligned nations want to limit the nuclear nations' further 
development of nuclear weapons. They are anxious to conclude a 
treaty. However, most of the nuclear nations feel that the sole 
goal in concluding a comprehensive test ban treaty is the 
prevention of nuclear proliferation. Britain and France insist 
that any future treaty must be one that permits genuine nuclear 
inspections universally, and that no final deadline should be 
set for its conclusions. Predictably, there are major 
differences among all parties about the timetable for concluding 
treaty negotiations. 
  Among the nuclear states, France will protract the 
negotiating time because it still wants to conduct nuclear 
tests. France has long adopted an extremely hard line attitude 
about the nuclear test ban issue. It was not until 1992 that 
France agreed to take part in the work of the Geneva disarmament 
conference's special nuclear test ban committee. Although France 
began to reduce outlays for nuclear weapons development plans in 
1992 in response to changes in the international situation and 
to save money, it still wants to conduct a certain amount of 
nuclear testing. For example, it wants to use nuclear tests to 
continue to authenticate the warheads on the missiles to be 
installed on the new Le Triomphant class ballistic missile 
nuclear submarines. On 7 October 1993, the French minister of 
national defense openly stated that France would not sign a 
comprehensive test ban treaty before mastering simulated nuclear 
testing, and that France would require between 6 to 8 years to 
master this technology. This also suggests that France will play 
a role in comprehensive test ban treaty negotiations. 
  Concluding Remarks 
  Conclusion of a "Comprehensive Nuclear Test Ban Treaty" has 
been the fervent hope of international society for several 
decades. Third world countries have termed it "something that is 
extremely desirable yet most difficult to attain." Finally there 
is hope that this day will come. However, treaty negotiations 
will positively not be easy. People will have to wait and see 
what steps the Geneva Disarmament Talks Conference will take to 
advance to the final point in concluding a treaty. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS4-66193 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpcar030___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   JPRS-CAR-94-030 </AU>
JPRS 
China 

<DATE1>  13 January 1994 </DATE1>

</HEADER>

<F P=100> INTERNATIONAL </F>
<F P=101> NORTHEAST ASIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Japan's `Back-To-Asia' Strategy Analyzed </TI></H3>
<HT><F P=107><PHRASE>    Japan's `Back-To-Asia' Strategy Analyzed </PHRASE></F></HT>

<F P=102>   94CM0229A Beijing GUOJI WENTI YANJIU [INTERNATIONAL STUDIES] 
in Chinese No 51, 13 Jan 94 pp 17-21, 12 </F>

<F P=103> 94CM0229A </F>
<F P=104>  Beijing GUOJI WENTI YANJIU [INTERNATIONAL STUDIES] 
in Chinese No 51, 13 Jan 94 pp 17-21, 12 </F>

<F P=105> Chinese </F>


<TEXT>
CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Zhang Dalin (1728 1129 2651): "Economic </F>
Regionalism, Protectionism Drive Japan's Move Back to Asia"] 
  [Text] Japan has begun implementing its strategy of 
"dissociating itself from America and returning to Asia" even as 
it continues to insist it is a "member of the Western camp." Its 
central purpose is to become a political power. With the Asian 
economy growing by leaps and bounds, Japan must return to Asia 
if it is to secure its place in the world, jockeying for a 
favorable spot as it wages economic war with the United States 
and Europe. 
  In pursuit of its back-to-Asia strategy, Japan follows these 
policies: Cooperate as well as compete with the United States; 
resolve the issues inherited from history; use economic and 
technological means to achieve leadership in Asia; and make use 
of international organizations and international conferences. 
  Japan's "detaching itself from America to return to Asia" 
strategy has caught the attention of nations around the world, 
particularly its neighbors in Asia. 
  Both inside Japan and overseas, some of the hottest topics 
in 
political, economic, and academic circles as well as the media 
these days are the notion of Japan "detaching itself from the 
United States to return to Asia," the idea that "Japanese 
diplomacy is redoubling its attention to Asia," and the sense 
that Japan is "shifting its development strategy back to Asia." 
These issues are being explored from a variety of perspectives, 
political, economic, diplomatic, and security. 
  This article examines the current status, background, and 
future trends of Japan's back-to-Asia strategy, its principal 
point of departure being Japan's foreign economic strategy. 
  1. Japan On the Way Back To Asia 
  After World War II, it was Japan's strategy to dissociate 
itself from Asia and link up with the United States, toeing 
Washington's line diplomatically and relying on it economically. 
Since the mid-1980's, as its economic prowess grew rapidly, 
Japan is no longer content to remain America's junior partner 
and has been trying to achieve political parity with the latter, 
drawing support from Asia. Thus it began its strategy of 
"detaching itself from the United States and returning to Asia" 
even as it insisted on remaining a member of the Western 
alliance. Adopting a three-in-one approach combining trade and 
investment with economic aid, with direct investment playing the 
dominant role, Japan has vigorously pursued the "wild goose" 
model, building a solid foundation in the making the itself the 
leader of the regional economy of East Asia. 
  A. Japan-Asian Trade Increasing Every Year 
  On the exports front, Japan's exports to Asia rose 14 
percent 
between 1991 and 1992, while exports to America increased just 7 
percent. In 1992, Japan's exports to Asia accounted for 38.8 
percent of the nation's total exports, while exports to the 
United States made up only 28.8 percent. On the imports side, 
Japan's imports from Asia rose 6 percent, while those from the 
United States slipped 3 percent. In 1992, Japan's imports from 
Asia accounted for 45 percent of Japan's total imports, while 
imports from the United States amounted to just 22.4 percent. 
(HUSHENG MONTHLY, July 1991; GUOSHI TUHUI, 1993 edition) Asia 
has become Japan's largest trading partner, overtaking the 
United States. 
  The above data aside, the following points need to be made 
about the increasing Japan-Asia trade: 1) Japan has resumed its 
trade ties with Asia. Before the war (1934-1936), Japan mainly 
looked to Asia as the source of raw materials it imported and 
the destination of the manufactured goods it exported. At its 
peak, Japan-Asian trade accounted for 60 percent of Japan's 
total trade. After the war, Japan-United States trade blossomed 
while Japan-Asian trade dropped below 30 percent in the late 
1970's. In recent years, however, Japan-Asian trade has 
gradually rebounded to almost 40 percent, exceeding the size of 
Japan-United States trade. (HUSHENG MONTHLY, July 1993) 2) The 
pattern of commodity exchange has shifted from vertical to 
horizontal, however. In the pre-war years, Japan's imports from 
Asia consisted of raw materials, grain, and assorted mineral 
products, agricultural products, and handcrafted articles. To 
date, most imports from Asia's four "mini-dragons" are 
manufactured goods, with machinery and electronic parts and 
components accounting for one-quarter. More machinery is 
imported from member nations of ASEAN than raw materials. 3) 
Asia has become an increasingly important export market for 
Japanese goods. Ten years ago, only Taiwan barely made it onto 
the list of Japan's top-ten export market by placing tenth. To 
date, seven Asian nations and regions, namely mainland China, 
Taiwan, Hong Kong, South Korea, Singapore, Thailand, and 
Malaysia have earned themselves a spot on the top-ten list. 
  B. Direct Japanese Investment in Asia Rising Without 
Interruption 
  In the early 1980's, direct Japanese investment in Asia was 
more or less on a par with American investment in Asia. In 1992 
Japanese investment in Asia totalled $60 billion, up from $19.5 
billion in 1985. During the same period, direct American 
investment in Asia rose just 22 percent. In the 5 years between 
1987 and 1990, direct Japanese investment in the four 
"mini-dragons" and ASEAN amounted to $26.8 billion, 360 percent 
more than American investment, catapulting Japan into the top 
investor spot ahead of other economic powers. (ZHUJUN MONTHLY, 
February 1992) Japanese investment in Asia has been an economic 
boon to Japan. According to statistics from the Ministry of 
International Trade and Industry [MITI], the Asian subsidiaries 
of Japanese corporations earned 487 billion Japanese yen in 
profits in the fiscal year between April 1991 and March 1992. In 
contrast, their counterparts in Europe only earned Y6.6 billion 
in profits and those in North America suffered losses totalling 
Y208 billion. (THE ECONOMIST 24 April 1993) 
  C. Government Development Aid Focusing On Asia 
  Government development aid is an essential component of 
Japan's foreign policy as well as a major tool of its foreign 
strategy. The "Outline of Government Development Aid," adopted 
by the Japanese cabinet on 30 June 1992, states explicitly, "The 
Asian region has intimate historical, geographical, political, 
and economic ties with Japan... Japan should continue to make 
Asia the focus of its assistance program." (WAIJIAO YUEKAN 
MONTHLY, March 1993) In 1991 the Japanese government dispensed 
$11 billion in development aid, which placed it ahead of the 
United States ($9.4 billion) as the world's top aid giver. Over 
60 percent of Japan's development aid goes to Asia, with the 
five nations of Indonesia, China, Thailand, the Philippines, and 
Bangladesh alone accounting for almost half of all Japanese aid. 
("Economic Cooperation: Current Status and Problems," 1992 
edition) 
  In addition, Japan is also playing an increasingly prominent 
role in debt payments, trade settlement, and foreign exchange 
reserves in Asia. 
  4) Creating "East Asia Economic Sphere" 
  In the late 1980's, Japan's economic position in Asia 
consolidated, the cabinet introduced the idea of an "East Asian 
economic sphere" to include 10 nations and regions, namely the 
four "mini-dragons," ASEAN, and Japan itself. For starters, 
Japan began shifting those of its industries that had become 
uncompetitive to the four "mini-dragons" in a big way. Later 
Japan and the four "mini-dragons" started exporting capital to 
ASEAN, setting in motion a chain-like adjustment of the region's 
industrial structure. The upshot is an international division of 
labor in which Japan specializes in the production of high-tech 
products; the four "mini-dragons," conventional technical goods 
and durable consumer goods; and ASEAN, labor-intensive products. 
In the process, both the four "mini-dragons" and ASEAN have 
become more dependent on Japan. 
  Building on its success with the "East Asian economic 
sphere," Japan pushed hard for and devoted itself to putting 
together a "Sea of Japan economic sphere." What the "Sea of 
Japan economic sphere" mainly entails is Japan-led economic 
cooperation, with Russia contributing resources, Japan and South 
Korea contributing funds and technology, and China and North 
Korea contributing manpower. Japan envisions the "Sea of Japan 
economic sphere" as a bridge linking Northeast Asia with 
Southeast Asia, thus steering the entire East Asia into its 
development orbit. 
  5) Conducting a Vigorous Asian Diplomacy 
  As it became a stronger and stronger economic power in Asia, 
Japan applied itself to achieving a political standing 
commensurate with its economic might. Its Asian foreign policy, 
hitherto dominated by economic diplomacy, now became 
increasingly "politicized." Japan has taken a string of major 
steps in the political, military, and diplomatic arenas in Asia 
in recent years. Among them are these three: 1) Participated 
actively in resolving the Cambodian issue. No sooner did the 
Japanese Diet pass the "UN Peacekeeping Activities and 
Cooperation Law" in April 1992 than Japan sent self-defense 
troops to take part in the UN peacekeeping effort in Cambodia. 
Moreover, Japan hosted two conferences aimed at solving the 
Cambodian issue. Japan's enthusiasm on behalf on the Cambodian 
problem was driven by its desire to gain a louder voice in Asian 
affairs. 2) The Japanese emperor visited China. Emperor Akihito 
and Empress Michiko visited China between 23 and 28 October 
1992, becoming the first Japanese monarch ever to visit China in 
the ancient history of Chinese-Japanese relations. That the 
Japanese emperor put off visiting the United States and instead 
made China the destination of his first trip overseas after 
ascending the throne was much discussed in the international 
media. A "Shishi She" commentary noted, "The basic government 
position is that a stable Sino-Japanese relationship is the 
cornerstone of stability in the Pacific.... That consideration 
underpins Japan's active Asian diplomacy, using Sino-Japanese 
relations as its axis." (29 October 1992) 3) Prime Minister 
Kiichi Miyazawa visited ASEAN. In January 1993 Prime Minister 
Kiichi Miyazawa visited Indonesia, Malaysia, Thailand, and 
Brunei, all ASEAN members. While in Bangkok, he delivered a 
speech entitled "The New Asian Pacific Era and Cooperation 
between Japan and ASEAN" enunciating what has been delivered the 
"Miyazawa Doctrine." In his speech he laid down Japan's four 
basic policies in Asia: First, actively participate in the 
creation of a "security dialogue mechanism" in the Asian Pacific 
area; second, help open up the Asian Pacific area economically; 
third, exert itself on behalf of democracy, human rights, and 
environmentalism; and fourth, engage in cooperation with the 
three nations in Indochina. His speech painted in broad strokes 
the basic features of Japanese policy in Asia. 
  2. The Focuses of Japan's Return to Asia 
  Japan's strategic decision to return to Asia was prompted by 
more than considerations that have to do with geography, 
history, and its relations with the various Asian nations. There 
are other major concerns: 
  1) Achieving its goal of becoming a political power. 
  In a speech in his native Qunma Prefecture in July 1982, 
Prime Minister Zenko Suzuki said, "Japan must seek a louder 
voice in world politics, raising its stature not only as an 
economic power but also as a political power." ("Diplomacy Green 
Paper," 1983 edition) That was the first time a Japanese prime 
minister unequivocally articulated the goal of making Japan a 
"political power." Successive administrations led by the Liberal 
Democratic Party [LDP] after Suzuki adopted this slogan as an 
official policy. More recently, Xiaoze Yilang [1420 3419 0001 
6745], an official of the New Life Party, put forward a 
"conventional nation" theory in his book A Plan for 
Transforming Japan While he did not use terms like 
"political power," he came up with a number of new suggestions 
such as amending the constitution, changing the nature and 
strategy of the self-defense forces, participating in UN 
peace-keeping activities, pushing for a permanent seat on the 
Security Council, and building a new world order side by side 
with the United States and Europe. Xiaoze Yilang's "conventional 
nation" theory, it may be said, goes one step beyond the 
"political power" theory advanced by the LDP. We can thus see 
that no matter which party or faction is in power, Japan will 
not deviate from its strategic objective of achieving the status 
of "political power." They all seek to make Japan part of a 
tri-polar world, exercising world leadership along with the 
United States and Europe. 
  To achieve the above strategic objectives, Japan attaches 
the 
utmost importance to finding its own base and establishing its 
own economic sphere. Where, then, is Japan's base? What about 
its economic sphere? These questions were answered by Gangqi 
Jiuyan [1481 1505 0036 1750], a former Japanese ambassador to 
Thailand, who said Japan must return to Asia and create a "super 
Asian sphere." In his 1992 article entitled "The New Strategy of 
Striving to Create a Super Sphere in Asia," he wrote that "it is 
in Asia that Japan will find its diplomatic future, a stage 
where it can maneuver.... In any case, except for Asia, one 
cannot find another arena at the moment which offers a bright 
future for Japanese diplomacy; there is no other oasis." 
("Dumai" monthly, August 1992) Gangqi Jiuyan's words provide a 
graphic explanation of the motives behind Japan's return to Asia 
and the actions it has taken toward that purpose. 
  2) Explosive Economic Growth in Asia 
  According to World Bank reports, East Asian economies grew 
8.5 percent in the 1980's, up from 6.6 percent in the 1970's. 
Since 1990, amid the backdrop of global recession, Asia 
continued to lead the world in economic growth. The 
International Monetary Fund estimates that economic growth in 
the ten major Asian nations and regions other than Japan may 
have reached 8.75 percent in 1993 and will average 7.1 percent 
in 1994, far higher than the growth rate of the Western 
economies. Even more spectacular is the expansion of the Chinese 
economy in recent years, growing 7 percent in 1991, 12.8 percent 
in 1992, and 14 percent in the first half of 1993. One United 
States magazine has calculated that the Asian economy now 
accounts for 25 percent of the global economy, up from 4 percent 
30 years ago, and may well make up one-third by the year 2000. 
(FORTUNE MAGAZINE, November 1993) 
  All eyes are on the booming Asian economy. To some developed 
nations, Asia is the most dynamic, most promising place in the 
world. Both the United States and Germany are scrambling to 
shift their attention to Asia, pinning their hopes for ending 
the economic recession at home on the Asian market. As for 
Japan, a resource-poor nation with a small domestic market which 
is mired in a deep recession, Asia resembles a huge magnet. It 
is thought that only by returning to Asia and relying on Asia 
can it secure a firm foothold in the world. 
  3) Disintegration of the Soviet Union; Escalating 
Japan-United States Conflicts 
  During World War II, the United States and the Soviet Union 
were allies which fought Japan side by side. Later, during the 
Cold War, the United States allied itself with Japan against the 
Soviet Union. With the end of the Cold War, the relations among 
these three countries are still evolving, but already ther are 
signs pointing to new changes. On a political level, the United 
States and Russia, former adversaries, have now become partners. 
In 1992, President Bush of the United States and Russian 
President Boris Yeltsin signed the "Camp David Declaration" and 
"Washington Charter," proclaiming a friendly partnership between 
the two nations. After taking office, President Clinton has been 
even more energetic in improving diplomatic relations with 
Russia, supporting the Yeltsin regime politically and offering 
Russia economic aid. Due to the improvement in United 
States-Russian relations, the practical function of the United 
States-Japanese alliance has diminished significantly. 
  Economically speaking, the United States and Japan, 
erstwhile 
allies, have now become rivals. After he took office, Clinton 
has shifted priority from the military to the economy, making 
economic strength the key to national security. Revitalizing the 
U.S. economy and eliminating the huge deficit in its trade with 
Japan have become urgent and major issues in United 
States-Japanese relations. Not only does Clinton relentlessly 
push for a more expansive yen, but he has also demanded that 
Japan open up its market, even specifying the market share that 
U.S. goods should have in Japan as a means of trimming Japan's 
trade surplus. As United States and Russia nudge closer to each 
other and Japan-United States trade friction escalates, Japan 
has no choice but to return to Asia to find its destiny there. 
  4) Regionalization and Rise of Economic Blocs 
  The trends in the world economy today are regionalization 
and 
the formation of economic blocs. The EC unified its market on 1 
January 1993. A number of countries in north Europe are lobbying 
hard to join the EC. In late 1992, the three countries in North 
America--the United States, Canada, and Mexico--signed the North 
American Free Trade Act [NAFTA] and the United States has also 
talked about extending the free trade zone in North America to 
Latin America. Although both EC and NAFTA have publicly declared 
they would comply with the principle of free trade and keep 
their markets open, the fact of the matter is that they have 
acted in a way that is clearly discriminatory and exclusionary. 
  Moved by protectionism and regionalism, Japan increased its 
investment in and stepped up trade with countries in North 
America and West Europe, intensifying its penetration of those 
markets. On the other hand, it has been hard at work trying to 
consolidate its political and economic position in Asia. Japan 
considers East Asia its "courtyard" in the same way that the 
United States views Latin America as its "backyard." Japan works 
assiduously to bring about its East Asian economic sphere in 
order to position itself favorably in its economic war with the 
United States and Europe. 
  3. Japan's Return to Asia: Future Prospects 
  Japan is set on returning to Asia, but not too rapidly. The 
road back to Asia is fraught with many an obstacle, both 
domestic and international, and Japan must overcome them by 
moving cautiously and diplomatically. Reviewing the words and 
deeds of both the Japanese Government and people in private 
life, we see that these are the major strategies Japan pursues 
to engineer its return to Asia: 
  1) Cooperate and Compete With the United States 
  In devising its Asian policy, the United States goes tit for 
tat with Japan, not ceding any ground at all. During the Bush 
Administration, Secretary of State Baker countered Japan's "wild 
goose" model, a strategy aimed at dominating the Asian economy, 
with his "fan-shaped" model. Under the latter model, Asia was 
perceived as an open fan; America would be the axis and the 
United States-Japan alliance would be the backbone, supplemented 
by America's alliances with South Korea, Australia, and ASEAN 
and embracing the entire Asian Pacific region. The purpose was 
to ensure America's economic interests and dominance in the 
region. After he assumed office, Clinton has shifted the U.S. 
strategic focus from the Atlantic to the Pacific as a means of 
revitalizing the U.S. economy. Assistant Secretary of State 
Winston Lord has said, "No other region is more important to the 
United States to date than East Asia and the Pacific region." 
(United States Information Agency, 9 June 1993) In July 1993, 
Clinton called for a "new Pacific community" during his visit to 
Japan and South Korea and proposed upgrading the Asian Pacific 
Economic Cooperation [APEC] ministerial conference scheduled to 
be held in Seattle under the auspices of the United States to an 
informal conference attended by heads of government. It was the 
goal of the United States to link APEC with NAFTA, thus 
preserving and expanding America's political and economic 
interests in the Asian Pacific region. 
  There are three schools of thought in Japan's academic 
circles regarding how best to counter U.S. Asian strategy. One 
group advocates globalism. It would like Japan to continue to 
uphold the postwar multilateral free and equal trade system, do 
its best to bring the Uruguay round of talks under GATT to 
fruition, and eschew exclusivity in Asian Pacific economic 
cooperation. The second school of thought prefers a 
confrontational approach: build up an independent free trade 
zone in Asia (or just East Asia) as a counterweight to EC and 
NAFTA. Most people want to make some sort of a compromise 
between these two positions. They believe that while the 
conflicts between Japan and the United States in Asia have 
intensified, Japan cannot afford direct confrontation with the 
latter because it still cannot do without it. Economically, the 
United States is indispensable, absorbing one-third of Japan's 
exports. Militarily, Japan still depends on America's security 
shield. Politically, Japan needs backing from the United States 
if it is to become a political power. Therefore they advocate a 
middle course: cooperate as well as compete with Washington. 
Specifically, the so-called "middle course" means maintaining 
the free trade system, adhering to GATT, making concessions to 
regionalism to some extent, expanding its economic muscle in 
Asia, and holding fast to its alliance with the United States. 
For Japan, this amounts to tightrope diplomacy, which no doubt 
is most challenging. In the absence of any better course, 
however, Japan has no choice but to go ahead with this balancing 
act gingerly. 
  2) Resolve Problems Inherited From History 
  It has been 48 years since the end of World War II. However, 
the war's instigator, Japan, has not been forgiven by the people 
of the various Asian nations. To remove the mistrust of its 
neighbors in Asia and create an image of peace and friendship, 
Japan's new prime minister, Morihito Hosokawa, broke with the 
ambiguous attitude of his predecessors and forthrightly admitted 
as soon as he took office that the "previous war was a war of 
aggression. We believe the war was a mistake." (Japan GONGTONG 
SHE 10 August 1993) "We again express our profound 
self-reflection and apologies for the intolerable suffering and 
pain our past aggression and colonial rule had caused many 
people." He also declared, "We should take our proper role as a 
member of the Asian Pacific community seriously and do our best 
to contribute to the peace and prosperity of this region." 
(SHISHI SHE 23 August 1993) 
  The constructive attitude of the new administration toward 
solving the problems left over from history no doubt was meant 
to set the stage for Japan's return to Asia. While Hosokawa's 
remarks and apologies were widely welcome by Japan's neighbors, 
the response was cautious. In his government report on 23 
August, Hosokawa retreated from the term "war of aggression" 
uttered days earlier during his press conference, now 
downgrading it to "aggressive conduct." In addition, members of 
his coalition government worshipped at the Yasukuni shrine. All 
this made many Asian nations skeptical whether Japan can really 
face up to the historical problems honestly. 
  3) Use Economics and Technology To Dominate Asia 
  History may be a barrier on Japan's road back to Asia, but 
economics and technology give Japan an overwhelming edge. Japan 
can participate in and dominate the Asian economy through trade, 
direct investment, development aid, technology transfer, 
personnel exchange, and other economic and technological 
activities. Professor Rujianglung of Meiji University in Japan 
sums up this approach as "winning without victory." In other 
words, the leadership in the Asian Pacific area that Japan is 
pursuing is a kind of imperceptible victory. He also refers to 
it as "different hegemony," a new-concept hegemony distinct from 
conventional hegemony which is backed by economic, 
technological, and financial forces. (WENYI ChUNQIU MONTHLY July 
1990) The "winning without victory" approach, which can achieve 
goals that military power failed to achieve in the past, no 
doubt will serve Japan well as it seeks to return to Asia, 
However, if Japan relies solely on its technical and economic 
superiority and fails to handle its relations with the various 
Asian nations correctly and truly bring about joint development 
on the basis of equality and mutual benefit, this superiority 
will not last long. 
  4) Rely on International Organizations and International 
Conferences 
  First and foremost, Japan looks to the United Nations. Right 
now Japan is working hard to gain a permanent seat on the 
Security Council, a crucial step on Japan's road toward becoming 
a political power. Japan has put forward a series of proposals 
about reforming the United Nations to its General Assembly 
during the current session and has repeatedly indicated its 
readiness to participate in UN peace-keeping efforts. All these 
moves are intended to prepare public opinion for Japan's return 
to Asia. 
  Next, Japan relies on the G-7 summit, the meeting of the 
heads of government of seven Western powers, of which Japan is 
the only Asian member. At the G-7 meeting in Tokyo in 1993, 
Japan served as Asia's spokesman. When President Suharto of 
Indonesia visited Japan, the host nation agreed to forward his 
opinions to the G-7 meeting. 
  Then there is the APEC ministerial conference. To prepare 
for 
the informal meeting of APEC leaders in Seattle, Japan held 
consultations with South Korea and ASEAN to coordinate their 
views. It was also slated to present the report "Ideas for 
Economic Cooperation in the Asian Pacific Region for The Year 
2000" at the conference. Among the ten topics covered by the 
report were the promotion of trade and investment within the 
region, the strengthening of its industrial base, and 
environmental issues. The thrust of the report was the 
furthering of liberalization in regional trade and investment. 
Clearly, Japan's goal is to use APEC to counter the 
protectionism of NAFTA and consolidate Japan's economic position 
in Asia. 
  Furthermore, Japan has gained a stronger voice at the annual 
enlarged meeting of ASEAN foreign ministers. 
  We should note that most of the international organizations 
mentioned above operate under American leadership and Japan's 
influence is limited. Whether or not Japan will achieve all its 
objectives depends on how things turn out. 
  A historical issue that has confronted Japan ever since 
Meiji 
Modernization is this: Should Japan exist as part of Asia or 
part of the United States and Europe? Or should it compromise 
between the two? If we look back at over a century of diplomatic 
history, we see that by and large Japan has allied itself with 
Europe and the Western camp. In 1885, Fuze Yuji, a bourgeois 
thinker, put forward his "out of Asia" theory in SHISHI XINBAO. 
By that he meant Japan should join the camp of the European 
powers and the United States and invade Asia (primarily China). 
The Japanese Government embraced his theory and launched one war 
of aggression after another, culminating in the country's utter 
defeat and surrender in the Pacific War. After the war, Japan 
allied itself with America and toed the Washington line in 
opposition to China. Only after Nixon visited China in 1972 did 
Japan normalize diplomatic relations with China. 
  After a century, Japan's foreign strategy finally shifted 
from "leaving Asia to join Europe" to "detaching itself from the 
United States to rejoin Asia." This is the third time Japan 
changed national direction after the Meiji Restoration and its 
defeat in the war. This strategic shift naturally has attracted 
profound concern in nations around the world, particularly its 
neighbors in Asia. These nations hope that Japan will learn a 
lesson from history and totally put aside its contempt for Asia. 
They hope that Japan will not become a military power or 
intervene in the domestic affairs of another country and that it 
will use its formidable economic power and advanced science and 
technology to cooperate with the nations of Asia on an equal 
basis, building a prosperous Asia together. Will Japan, on its 
way back to Asia, do what other Asian nations hope that it will 
do? That remains to be seen. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>
